Stand: 01.2025
Deutsche Version
I. Name and Address of the Person Responsible
Ebner Media Group GmbH & Co KG
Frauenstraße 77
89073 Ulm
E-mail:
info@ebnermedia.de
Website:
www.ebnermedia.de
Is the responsible party in the sense of the EU General Data
                                    Protection Regulation (DSGVO) and other national data protection laws.
II. Name and Address of the Data Protection Officer
The data protection officer of the controller is:
AGOR AG
Niddastraße 74
60329 Frankfurt am Main Germany
Te.: +49 (0) 69 - 9494 32 410
Website:
www.agor-ag.com
E-Mail:
info@agor-ag.com
Please assert your data protection rights at
datenschutz@ebnermedia.de
.
III. Scope of Application
This privacy policy applies to our websites, which are accessible
                                    under the following domains and their subdomains:
abo.wuv.de
akademie.sazbike.de
anbieter.telecom-handel.de
archiv.computerworld.ch
archiv.dotnetpro.de
archiv.eyebizz.de
archiv.feuerwehrmagazin.de
archiv.gitarrebass.de
archiv.page-online.de
archiv.watchtime.net
archive.watchtime.com
area-112.com
area112.de
briefing.com-magazin.de
briefing.computerworld.ch
cmcx.com
communicate.telecom-handel.de
developer-media.de
druckawards.de
ebnerjobs.de
en.cmcx.com
etiketten-labels.com
event.sazbike.de
event.sazsport.de
executive-briefing.wuv.de
flexotiefdruck.de
flix.cmcx.com
goodmorninghr.de
jobs.developer-media.de
jobs.eyebizz.de
jobs.leatcon.com
jobs.print.de
jobs.saz.de
jobs.telecom-handel.de
kuendigung.ebnermedia.de
lox.space
marketplace-convention.de
membership.wuv.de
microsites.wuv.de
page-online.de
projekte.wuv.de
rechnung.ebnermedia.de
seminare.eyebizz.de
shop.dotnetpro.de
shop.natursteinonline.de
shop.page-online.de
shop.skimagazin.de
shop.telecom-handel.de
shop.wanderlust-magazin.de
shop.watchtime.net
shop.wuv.de
show.watchtime.net
skimagazin.de
stellenmarkt.page-online.de
stellenmarkt.wuv.de
verlag.wuv.de
wiki.production-partner.de
www.blaulicht-stellenmarkt.de
www.cinec.de
www.computerworld.ch
www.designbusinessdays.de
www.developer-week.de
www.digital-printing-summit.de
www.dotnet-developer-conference.de
www.dotnetpro.de
www.ebnermedia.de
www.event-partner.de
www.eyebizz.de
www.feuerwehrmagazin.de
www.filmundtvkamera.de
www.gitarrebass.de
www.guitarsummit.de
www.keyboards.de
www.leatcon.com
www.live-production.tv
www.muellerundsohn.com
www.natursteinonline.de
www.onlinepc.ch
www.optics-conference.de
www.pctipp.ch
www.print.de
www.production-partner.de
www.professional-system.de
www.promedianews.de
www.rettungsdienst.de
www.sazbike.de
www.sazsport.de
www.soundandrecording.de
www.sporthandelskongress.de
www.studioszene.de
www.telecom-handel.de
www.the-avard.de
www.wanderlust-magazin.de
www.watchtime.com
www.watchtime.net
www.web-developer-conference.de
www.wuv-abo.de
www.wuv-summit.de
www.wuv.de
Not all services and technologies mentioned in this privacy
                                    policy are used on every website. However, it represents all possible data
                                    processing that can be carried out on the websites. You can view and set which
                                    services are actually used on the individual pages in the cookie settings or the
                                    cookie banner of the respective website, where you will receive further information
                                    on the respective service.
IV. General Information on Data Processing
1. The Scope of the Processing of Personal Data
We collect and use personal data of the users of our homepages only
                                    as far as this is necessary for the provision of a functional website, our contents
                                    and services.
In principle, the collection and use of personal data of our users
                                    only takes place after their consent. An exception to this principle applies in
                                    cases where processing of the data is permitted by legal regulations or obtaining
                                    prior consent is not possible for actual reasons.
2. Legal Basis for the Processing of Personal Data
The legal bases for the processing of personal data result in
                                    principle from:
Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. a DSGVO when obtaining the consent of
                                    the data subject.
Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. b DSGVO for processing operations that
                                    serve to fulfil a contract to which the data subject is a party. Included here are
                                    processing operations that are necessary for the implementation of pre-contractual
                                    measures.
Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. c DSGVO in the case of processing which is
                                    necessary for the fulfilment of a legal obligation.
Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. d DSGVO, if vital interests of the
                                    data subject or another natural person make it necessary to process personal
                                    data.
Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f DSGVO, if the processing is
                                    necessary to protect a legitimate interest of our company or a third party and the
                                    interests, fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject do not override the
                                    first-mentioned interest. In order to be able to base the processing of personal
                                    data on a legitimate interest, an examination is carried out in each case in
                                    consultation with the data protection officer for each relevant process, whereby the
                                    following three prerequisites must be met:
The controller or a third party has a legitimate interest in
                                    processing the personal data.
The processing is necessary to protect the
                                    legitimate interest.
interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the data
                                    subject which require the protection of personal data do not prevail.
3. Data Deletion and Storage Period
The personal data of the users will be deleted or blocked as soon as
                                    the purpose of the storage no longer applies. Storage beyond this may take place if
                                    this has been provided for by the European or national legislator in Union
                                    regulations, laws or other provisions to which the responsible party is subject.
                                    Data will also be blocked or deleted if a storage period prescribed by the
                                    aforementioned standards expires, unless there is a need to continue storing the
                                    data for the conclusion or performance of a contract.
V. Use of our Websites, General Information
1. Description and Scope of Data Processing
Each time our website is accessed, our system automatically collects
                                    data and information from the user's computer system. The following information is
                                    collected:
Information about the browser type and version used, the user's
                                    operating system, the user's Internet service provider, the user's IP address, the
                                    date and time of access, websites from which the user's system accesses our website,
                                    websites accessed by the user's system via our website.
The described data is stored in the log files of our systems. This
                                    data is not stored together with other personal data of the user.
2. Purpose and Legal Basis for Data Processing
The short-term recording of the IP address by our system is
                                    necessary to enable the delivery of the websites to the user's computer.
The storage in log files is done to ensure the functionality of the
                                    websites. In addition, we use the data to optimize the websites and to ensure the
                                    security of our information technology systems. An evaluation of the data for
                                    marketing purposes does not take place in this context.
The legal basis for the temporary storage of the data and the log
                                    files is Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
The collection of their personal data for the provision of our
                                    website and the storage of the data in log files is mandatory for the operation of
                                    the websites. Therefore, there is no possibility for the user to object.
3. Duration of Storage
Your data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer required to
                                    achieve the purpose for which it was collected. If your data is collected to ensure
                                    the provision of the website, the data will be deleted when the respective session
                                    has ended.
If your data is stored in log files, it will be deleted after seven
                                    days at the latest. Storage beyond this period is possible, whereby the IP addresses
                                    of the users are deleted or alienated in this case. An assignment of the calling
                                    client is no longer possible.
VI. General Information on the Use of Cookies
We use cookies on our websites. Cookies are text files that are
                                    stored in the Internet browser or by the Internet browser on the user's computer
                                    system. If you call up a website, a cookie may be stored on your operating system.
                                    This contains a characteristic string of characters that enables the browser to be
                                    uniquely identified when the website is called up again.
Cookies are used by us to make our homepages more user-friendly.
                                    Some elements of our websites require that the browser can be identified even after
                                    a page change.
TDDDG:
The legal basis for the storage of cookies, device
                                    identifiers and similar tracking technologies or for the storage of information in
                                    the end user's terminal equipment and access to this information is the European
                                    ePrivacy Directive in conjunction with the Telecommunications and Telemedia Data
                                    Protection Act (TDDDG).
Please note that the legal basis for the processing of the personal
                                    data collected in this context then results from the DSGVO (Article 6 (1) sentence 1
                                    DSGVO). The relevant legal basis for the processing of personal data in each
                                    specific case can be found below the respective cookie or the respective processing
                                    itself.
The primary legal basis for the storage of information in the end
                                    user's terminal equipment - consequently in particular for the storage of cookies -
                                    is your consent, § 25 para. 1 p.1 TDDDG. Consent is given when visiting our websites
                                    - although this does not have to be given, of course - and can be revoked at any
                                    time in the cookie settings.
According to Section 25 (2) No. 2 TDDDG, consent is not required if
                                    the storage of information in the end user's terminal equipment or the access to
                                    information already stored in the end user's terminal equipment is absolutely
                                    necessary in order for the provider of a telemedia service to provide a telemedia
                                    service expressly requested by the user. You can see from the cookie settings which
                                    cookies are to be classified as absolutely necessary (often also referred to as
                                    "technically necessary cookies") and therefore fall under the exemption of Section
                                    25 (2) TDDDG and therefore do not require consent.
DSGVO:
When cookies are used, for example, the following
                                    data is stored and transmitted:
Items in a shopping cart, log-in information
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using cookies
                                    results from Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f DSGVO. The purpose of the use of technically
                                    necessary cookies is to simplify the use of our website.
We would like to point out that some functions of our website can
                                    only be offered with the use of cookies.
These are, for example, the following applications:
CMP Cookies from Usercentrics and Traffective, shopping cart,
                                    remembering search terms, language settings
We do not use user data collected through technically necessary
                                    cookies to create user profiles.
Cookies are stored on the user's computer and transmitted from it to
                                    our pages. As a user, you therefore have control over the use of cookies. You can
                                    restrict or deactivate the transmission of cookies by making changes in the settings
                                    of your Internet browser. You can also delete stored cookies there. Please note that
                                    you may no longer be able to use all the functions of our website if you deactivate
                                    cookies.
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using cookies
                                    for analysis and advertising purposes is Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO if the
                                    user has given his consent in this regard.
Which services are used on the respective website and which of them
                                    are only activated with your consent can be viewed and set in the respective cookie
                                    settings or cookie banners. Our websites use the following Consent Manager Platforms
                                    (CMP):
1. Cookie Consent with Usercentrics
We have integrated the consent management tool "Usercentrics" (
https://usercentrics.com/de/
) of
                                    Usercentrics GmbH, Sendlinger Straße 7, 80331 Munich, Germany, Phone: + 49 89 21 54
                                    01 20, Email: contact@usercentrics.com integrated on some of our websites to request
                                    consent for data processing or the use of cookies or comparable functions. With the
                                    help of "Usercentrics" you have the possibility to give or refuse your consent for
                                    certain functionalities of our websites, e.g. for the purpose of integrating
                                    external elements, integrating streaming content, statistical analysis, coverage
                                    measurement and personalized advertising. You can use "Usercentrics" to give or
                                    refuse your consent for all functions or to give your consent for individual
                                    purposes or individual functions. The settings you have made can also be changed by
                                    you afterwards. The purpose of the integration of "Usercentrics" is to allow the
                                    users of our websites to decide on the aforementioned matters and to offer the
                                    possibility of changing settings already made in the context of the further use of
                                    our websites.
When you enter our websites, the following personal data is
                                    transferred to Usercentrics:
Your consent(s) or revocation of your consent(s), your IP address,
                                    information about your browser, information about your terminal device, time of your
                                    visit to the website.
Furthermore, Usercentrics stores a cookie in your browser in order
                                    to be able to assign the consent given to you or its revocation. The data collected
                                    in this way is stored until you request us to delete it, delete the Usercentrics
                                    cookie yourself or the purpose for storing the data no longer applies. Mandatory
                                    legal storage obligations remain unaffected.
"Usercentrics" uses the Google Cloud Platform from Google Ireland
                                    Limited. The server locations are in Frankfurt and Belgium. A third country transfer
                                    to the USA cannot be excluded. However, we have concluded an order processing
                                    agreement and standard data protection clauses with the provider.
The legal basis for the processing is Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. c in
                                    conjunction with Art. 6 para. 3 p. 1 lit. a. Art. 6 para. 3 p. 1 lit. a in
                                    conjunction with. Art. 7 para. 1 DSGVO and alternatively lit. f. Usercentrics helps
                                    us with the processing of the data to fulfil our legal obligations (e.g. obligation
                                    to provide evidence). Our legitimate interests in the processing lie in the storage
                                    of user settings and preferences in relation to the use of cookies and other
                                    functionalities.
Further information on data processing by "Usercentrics" can be
                                    found in the data protection notice at
https://usercentrics.com/privacy-policy/
.
2. Cookie Consent with Traffective
We use the consent management tool from Traffective GmbH
                                    (Kastenbauerstr. 2, 86177 Munich, Germany) on some of our websites to request
                                    consent for data processing or the use of cookies or comparable functions. The tool
                                    helps us to ensure a transparent presentation and up-to-dateness.
With the help of the consent screen, you have the option of granting
                                    or rejecting your consent for certain functionalities of our websites, e.g. for the
                                    purpose of integrating external elements, integrating streaming content, statistical
                                    analysis, coverage measurement and personalised advertising. In this way, you can
                                    give or refuse your consent for all functions or give your consent for individual
                                    purposes or individual functions. The settings you have made can also be changed by
                                    you afterwards.
In the course of using the Consent Screen, personal data, such as
                                    the IP address, as well as information about the end devices used are processed. The
                                    legal basis for the processing is Art. 6 para. 1 sentence 1 lit. c in conjunction
                                    with Art. 6 para. 3 sentence 1 lit. a. Art. 6 para 3 p. 1 lit. a in conjunction
                                    with. Art. 7 para. 1 DSGVO and alternatively lit. f. Traffective helps us with the
                                    processing of the data to fulfil our legal obligations (e.g. obligation to provide
                                    evidence). Our legitimate interests in the processing lie in the storage of user
                                    settings and preferences in relation to the use of cookies and other
                                    functionalities.
Further information on data processing can be found at
https://www.iubenda.com/privacy-policy/70389320
.
3. Google Consent Mode (Basic implementation)
To obtain your consent for Google products, we use Google's Consent
                                    Mode (Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, 4 Barrow St, Dublin, D04
                                    E5W5, Ireland).
This includes the following products: YouTube, Google Forms, Google
                                    Tag Manager, ajax.googleapis.com, Google Web Fonts, Google ReCaptcha, Google
                                    Analytics, Google Maps, Google Firebase, Google AdSense, Google Ads Conversion,
                                    Google Ads Remarketing, Google Analytics Remarketing, Google Dynamic Remarketing,
                                    Google DoubleClick, Google Syndication, Google Ads Measurement.
We use the basic implementation of Consent Mode. This means that no
                                    data is transmitted directly to Google for the Consent Mode. Your consent will only
                                    be transmitted, and a Google product will only be executed if you have given us your
                                    consent to do so.
By using Consent Mode, Google can regard the consent you have given
                                    as consent within the framework of the Digital Markets Act.
Further information on Google Consent Mode can be found directly at
                                    Google at:
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/9976101?hl=en
or in the data protection information at:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
.
VII. Your Rights / Rights of the Data Subjects
According to the EU General Data Protection Regulation, you have the
                                    following rights as a data subject. You could assert these rights at:
datenschutz@ebnermedia.de
.
1. Right to Information
You have the right to receive from us as data controller the
                                    information whether and which personal data concerning you are processed by us as
                                    well as further information in accordance with the legal requirements pursuant to
                                    Art. 13, 14 DSGVO.
2. Right of Rectification
If the personal data processed by us and relating to you is
                                    incorrect or incomplete, you have a right to rectification and/or completion. The
                                    correction will be made without delay.
3. Right to Restriction
You have the right to restrict the processing of personal data
                                    concerning you in accordance with the legal provisions (Art. 18 DSGVO).
4. Right to Erasure
If the reasons set out in Article 17 of the GDPR apply, you may
                                    request that the personal data relating to you be deleted without delay.
We would like to point out that the right to erasure does not exist
                                    insofar as the processing is necessary for one of the exceptional circumstances
                                    mentioned in Art. 17 (3).
5. Right to Information
If you have asserted the right to rectification, erasure or
                                    restriction of processing, we are obliged to notify all recipients to whom the
                                    personal data relating to you has been disclosed of this rectification or erasure of
                                    the data or restriction of processing, unless this proves impossible or involves a
                                    disproportionate effort. You also have the right to be informed about these
                                    recipients.
6. Right to Data Portability
Under the GDPR, you also have the right to receive the personal data
                                    relating to you that has been provided to us in a structured, commonly used and
                                    machine-readable format or to request that it be transferred to another
                                    controller.
7. Right to Revoke the Declaration of Consent under Data Protection Law
You have the right to revoke your declaration of consent under data
                                    protection law at any time. We would like to point out that the revocation of
                                    consent does not affect the lawfulness of the processing carried out on the basis of
                                    the consent until the revocation.
8. Right to Object
Furthermore, you have the right to object at any time, on grounds
                                    relating to your particular situation, to the processing of personal data relating
                                    to you which is carried out on the basis of Article 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. e or f
                                    DSGVO.
9. Automated Decision in Individual Cases Including Profiling
Under the EU General Data Protection Regulation, you also have the
                                    right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing,
                                    including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly
                                    significantly affects you.
10. Right to Complain to a Supervisory Authority
Finally, if you consider that the processing of personal data
                                    concerning you infringes the GDPR, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a
                                    supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of your residence,
                                    workplace or the place of the alleged infringement.
VIII. Data Transfer Outside the EU
The GDPR ensures an equally high level of data protection within the
                                    European Union. When selecting our service providers, we therefore rely on European
                                    partners wherever possible when your personal data is to be processed. Only in
                                    exceptional cases will we have data processed outside the European Union in the
                                    context of using third-party services. We will only allow your data to be processed
                                    in a third country if the special requirements of Art. 44 et seq. DSGVO are
                                    fulfilled. This means that the processing of your data may then only take place on
                                    the basis of special guarantees, such as the determination of a level of data
                                    protection corresponding to the EU officially recognised by the EU Commission or the
                                    observance of officially recognised special contractual obligations, the so-called
                                    "standard data protection clauses".
1. EU-US Trans-Atlantic Data Privacy Framework
Within the framework of the so-called "Data Privacy Framework" (DPF), the EU
                                    Com-mission has also recognized the level of data protection for certain companies
                                    from the U.S. as safe within the framework of the adequacy decision of 10.07.2023.
                                    The list of certified companies as well as further information on the DPF can be
                                    found on the website of the U.S. Department of Commerce at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search
.
2. Data Processing under the Swiss DPA
In principle, the use of our website is subject to the legal regulations of the
                                    GDPR. Insofar as you also visit our website from Switzerland and insofar as the
                                    related data processing also affects you as a Swiss citizen, the data protection
                                    provisions under the Swiss Federal Data Protection Act ("Swiss DPA" as amended on 01
                                    September 2023)also apply to you, analogously to the GDPR.
In principle, the Swiss DPA does not require the naming of a legal basis. In this
                                    respect, we only process your data from Switzerland if the processing is lawful, is
                                    carried out in good faith and is justified in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 and 2
                                    of the Swiss DPA. Furthermore, your data will only be collected for a specific
                                    purpose that is recognizable to the data subject and will only be processed in such
                                    a way that it is compatible with these purposes in accordance with Art. 6 para. 3 of
                                    the Swiss DPA.
In this context, please also note that although certain terms are formulated
                                    differently under the GDPR, they have the same legal meaning as under the Swiss DPA.
                                    For example, the German GDPR terms " Verarbeitung", " personenbezogene Daten" as
                                    well as "berechtigtes Interesse" and "besondere Kategorien von Daten" used in the
                                    German Version of this Privacy Policy correspond to the terms "Bearbeitung",
                                    "Personendaten", "überwiegendes Interesse" and "besonders schützenswerte
                                    Personendaten" used in the Swiss DPA.
The data subject rights set out here pursuant to Art. 12 et seq. GDPR can be
                                    asserted by data subjects from Switzerland in analogy to the regulations pursuant to
                                    Art. 25 et seq. of the Swiss DPA.
IX. Newsletter
1. General
You can subscribe to a free newsletter on some of our homepages,
                                    with which we inform you about our current interesting offers. The advertised goods
                                    and services are named in the declaration of consent. The data that you enter in the
                                    input mask during registration will be transmitted to us.
We collect the following data, for example, on the basis of the
                                    consent obtained from you during the registration process:
Last name, first name, e-mail address, title, company, position
Furthermore,
                                    the following data is stored at the moment of transmission:
IP address of the calling computer, date and time of
                                    registration.
Your data will not be passed on in connection with the data
                                    processing for the dispatch of newsletters. The data will be used exclusively for
                                    sending the newsletter.
2. Double Opt-in and Logging
The registration for our newsletters takes place in a so-called
                                    double opt-in process. After registration, you will receive an e-mail in which you
                                    are asked to confirm your registration. This confirmation is necessary so that no
                                    one can register with other email addresses.
The registrations for the newsletter are logged in order to be able
                                    to prove the registration process according to the legal requirements. This includes
                                    the storage of the registration and confirmation time, as well as the IP
                                    address.
3. Legal Basis
The legal basis for the processing of the data is Art. 6 para. 1 p.
                                    1 lit. a DSGVO if the user has given his consent. The collection of the user's email
                                    address serves to deliver the newsletter.
4. Deletion, Revocation and Objection
Your data will be deleted as soon as they are no longer required to
                                    achieve the purpose for which they were collected. Your e-mail address will
                                    therefore be stored as long as the subscription to the newsletter is active. The
                                    subscription to the newsletter can be terminated by you at any time by revoking your
                                    consent. For this purpose, you will find a corresponding link in each
                                    newsletter.
We would also like to point out that you can object to the future
                                    processing of your personal data in accordance with the legal requirements pursuant
                                    to Art. 21 DSGVO at any time. The objection can be made in particular against the
                                    processing for purposes of direct advertising.
5. Statistical Survey
We would like to point out that we evaluate your user behaviour when
                                    sending the newsletter. For this evaluation, the emails sent contain so-called web
                                    beacons or tracking pixels, which are single-pixel image files that are stored on
                                    our website. For the evaluations, we link the data mentioned under point 1 and the
                                    web beacons with your e-mail address and an individual ID.
Links contained in the newsletter also contain this ID.
With the data obtained in this way, we create a user profile in
                                    order to tailor the newsletter to your individual interests. In doing so, we record
                                    when you read our newsletters, which links you click on in them and infer your
                                    personal interests from this. We link this data to actions you have taken on the
                                    corresponding website.
If you do not wish to be analysed by our newsletter, you must
                                    unsubscribe from the newsletter. For this purpose, we provide a corresponding link
                                    in each newsletter message. Furthermore, you can also unsubscribe directly from the
                                    newsletter on some of our websites. The information will be stored as long as you
                                    have subscribed to the newsletter.
6. Shipping Service Provider
We currently use the following service providers to send our
                                    newsletters:
a) MailChimp
The dispatch of some of our newsletter offers is carried out using
                                    "MailChimp", a newsletter dispatch platform of the US provider Rocket Science Group,
                                    LLC, 675 Ponce De Leon Ave NE #5000, Atlanta, GA 30308, USA.
The email addresses of our newsletter recipients, as well as their
                                    other data described in these notes, are stored on the servers of MailChimp in the
                                    USA. MailChimp uses this information to send and evaluate the newsletter on our
                                    behalf. Furthermore, according to its own information, MailChimp may use this data
                                    to optimise or improve its own services, e.g. for the technical optimisation of the
                                    dispatch and the presentation of the newsletters or for economic purposes in order
                                    to determine from which countries the recipients come. However, MailChimp does not
                                    use the data of our newsletter recipients to write to them itself or to pass them on
                                    to third parties.
We trust in the reliability and IT and data security of MailChimp.
                                    We have concluded a "Data Processing Agreement" with MailChimp. This is a contract
                                    in which MailChimp undertakes to protect the data of our users, to process it on our
                                    behalf in accordance with its data protection provisions and, in particular, not to
                                    pass it on to third parties. You can view MailChimp's privacy policy here:
https://mailchimp.com/legal/privacy/
With the help of MailChimp, we can analyze our newsletter campaigns.
                                    When you open an email sent with MailChimp, a file contained in the email (so-called
                                    web beacon) connects to MailChimp's servers in the USA. This makes it possible to
                                    determine whether a newsletter message has been opened and which links, if any, have
                                    been clicked on. In addition, technical information is recorded (e.g. time of
                                    retrieval, IP address, browser type and operating system). This information cannot
                                    be assigned to the respective newsletter recipient. It is used exclusively for the
                                    statistical analysis of newsletter campaigns. The results of these analyses can be
                                    used to better adapt future newsletters to the interests of the recipients.
If you do not want any analysis by MailChimp, you must unsubscribe
                                    from the newsletter. For this purpose, we provide a corresponding link in every
                                    newsletter message.
The data processing is based on your consent according to Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. You can revoke this consent at any time by unsubscribing
                                    from the newsletter. The legality of the data processing operations already carried
                                    out remains unaffected by the revocation.
b) Salesforce Salescloud / Salesforce Marketing Cloud
Data that you provide to us via some of our websites (e.g. in forms
                                    for purchase, newsletter registration, contacting us, as well as the fact that you
                                    have entered a competition) is currently stored on servers in the EU in the
                                    Salesforce Sales Cloud (salesforce.com Germany GmbH, Erika-Mann-Str. 31, 80636
                                    Munich, Germany) and used to send order confirmations and shipment notices.
For sending our newsletters, for automated mailings (e.g. welcome
                                    mailing) as well as for advertising campaigns in social networks, we use the
                                    Salesforce Marketing Cloud. For this purpose, the newsletter subscriber's data is
                                    transferred from Salescloud to Marketing Cloud. The Salesforce Marketing Cloud data
                                    is stored and processed on Salesforce servers in the USA. Salesforce undertakes to
                                    comply with an appropriate level of data protection with binding internal data
                                    protection regulations in accordance with Art. 46 (2) lit. b and Art. 47 DSGVO
                                    (so-called binding corporate rules), even when processing data outside the European
                                    Union. With the help of so-called web beacons and pixels, we receive information
                                    about the click behaviour of users via the Marketing Cloud. Interaction data is
                                    stored in the Marketing Cloud directly on the user so that we can send you more
                                    targeted advertising via the Ad Studio, e.g. also via social networks. If you do not
                                    want this, you have, on the one hand, the option to turn off personalized
                                    advertising in your account settings on the social networks. In addition, you can
                                    use a different email address for the newsletters or your customer account with us
                                    than the one for your social media accounts.
For more information about Salesforce's data processing, please
                                    visit:
https://www.salesforce.com/de/company/privacy/
.
c) SendGrid
Some of our websites use SendGrid to send newsletters. The provider
                                    is SendGrid, Inc., 1801 California Street, Suite 500, Denver, CO 80202, USA.
SendGrid is a service with which, among other things, the sending of
                                    newsletters can be organised and analysed. The data you enter for the purpose of
                                    receiving the newsletter will be stored on SendGrid's servers in the USA.
If you do not want SendGrid to analyze your data, you must
                                    unsubscribe from the newsletter. For this purpose, we provide a corresponding link
                                    in each newsletter message.
With the help of SendGrid, it is possible for us to analyze our
                                    newsletter campaigns. For example, we can see whether a newsletter message was
                                    opened and which links, if any, were clicked. In this way, we can determine, among
                                    other things, which links were clicked on particularly often.
In addition, we can see whether certain previously defined actions
                                    were carried out after opening/clicking (conversion rate). For example, we can see
                                    whether you have visited one of our websites after clicking on the newsletter.
SendGrid also allows us to subdivide newsletter recipients based on
                                    various categories. In doing so, the newsletter recipients can be subdivided
                                    according to age, gender or place of residence, for example. In this way, the
                                    newsletters can be better adapted to the respective target groups.
The data processing is based on your consent according to Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. You can revoke this consent at any time.
The data you provide for the purpose of receiving the newsletter
                                    will be stored by us until you unsubscribe from the newsletter and will be deleted
                                    from our servers as well as from the servers of SendGrid after you unsubscribe from
                                    the newsletter. Data that has been stored by us for other purposes remains
                                    unaffected by this.
For more information on data processing by SendGrid, please visit:
https://sendgrid.com/policies/security/
.
An order processing contract was concluded with "SendGrid" on the basis of the standard data protection clauses.
d) Mailingwork
The e-mail addresses of our newsletter recipients and the data
                                    described in this notice are stored on the servers of mailingwork GmbH at Birkenweg
                                    7, 09569 Oederan, Germany.
Mailingwork uses this information to send and
                                    evaluate the newsletters on our behalf. Furthermore, according to its own
                                    information, mailingwork may use this data to optimize or improve its own services,
                                    e.g. to technically optimize the dispatch and presentation of the newsletters or for
                                    economic purposes to determine from which countries the recipients come. However,
                                    Mailingwork does not use the data of our newsletter recipients to write to them
                                    ourselves or to pass them on to third parties. We trust in the reliability and the
                                    IT and data security of mailingwork.
The data processing is based on your
                                    consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. You can revoke this consent
                                    at any time.
Furthermore, we have concluded a "Data Processing Agreement" with
                                    mailingwork. This is a contract in which mailingwork undertakes to protect the data
                                    of our users, to process it on our behalf in accordance with its data protection
                                    provisions and, in particular, not to pass it on to third parties. You can view
                                    mailingwork's privacy policy here:
https://mailingwork.de/datenschutzerklaerung
.
e) Customer Managers
The email addresses of our newsletter recipients and the data
                                    described in these notes are stored on the servers of index Internet und
                                    Mediaforschung GmbH, Zinnowitzer Straße 1, 10115 Berlin, Germany.
Kundenmanager
                                    uses this information to send and evaluate the newsletters on our behalf.
                                    Furthermore, according to its own information, Kundenmanager may use this data to
                                    optimise or improve its own services, e.g. to technically optimise the dispatch and
                                    presentation of the newsletters or for economic purposes in order to determine from
                                    which countries the recipients come. However, Kundenmanager does not use the data of
                                    our newsletter recipients to write to them itself or to pass them on to third
                                    parties. We trust in the reliability and the IT and data security of Kundenmanager.
The data processing is based on your consent in accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1
                                    S. 1 lit. a DSGVO. You can revoke this consent at any time. We will delete your data
                                    after your revocation or after two years of the last contact on your part.
Furthermore, we have concluded a "Data Processing Agreement" with
                                    Kundenmanager. This is a contract in which Kundenmanager undertakes to protect the
                                    data of our users, to process it on our behalf in accordance with its data
                                    protection provisions and, in particular, not to pass it on to third parties. You
                                    can view Kundenmanager's data protection provisions here:
https://km.index.de/datenschutzerklaerung/
.
f) Messenger Service WhatsApp
On some of our websites you can register for our messenger service
                                    via WhatsApp with your mobile phone number. After your registration, we only store
                                    your mobile number. The processing of your mobile number is done to provide our
                                    messenger service and is not visible to other subscribers of our services. They will
                                    also not be able to send you WhatsApp messages because our messages are not sent in
                                    a Messenger group but in a broadcast list.
The legal basis for the processing is the necessity for the
                                    fulfilment of the contract or the implementation of pre-contractual measures (Art. 6
                                    para. 1 lit. b DSGVO). For this purpose, we commission the service provider
                                    MessengerPeople, which uses your telephone number to send you our messages.
                                    MessengerPeople processes your data exclusively on our instructions and is
                                    contractually obligated by a so-called contract for order processing to treat your
                                    data confidentially.
You can unsubscribe from the Messenger service at any time by
                                    sending the word "stop" in our Messenger channel. If you also want to have all data
                                    deleted from the database, send the message "DELETE ALL DATA". We will then delete
                                    all data immediately or store it only to the extent that legal, statutory or
                                    contractual retention periods exist or further storage is necessary for the
                                    assertion, exercise or defense of legal claims.
More information and the privacy policy of MessengerPeople can be
                                    found at the following link: www.whatsbroadcast.com/de/datenschutz/. WhatsBroadcast
                                    may use personal data stored with WhatsApp, in particular first and last name,
                                    terminal device, profile picture and the messages exchanged via MessengerPeople.
                                    WhatsApp may in turn collect data independently. You can learn more about the
                                    purpose and scope, processing and use, your rights and setting options to protect
                                    your privacy directly from the privacy policy of WhatsApp, at the following link:
https://www.messengerpeople.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung/
.
X. Electronic Contact
If you would like to contact us, there is a contact form available
                                    on some of our websites which you can use to contact us electronically. The data
                                    entered in the input mask will be transmitted to us and stored. These data are for
                                    example:
Salutation, title, name, e-mail, position in the company, company.
The following data is also stored at the time the message is
                                    sent:
The IP address of the user, date and time of the sending process
Furthermore, it is possible to contact us via the e-mail address
                                    provided. In this case, the personal data of the user transmitted with the e-mail
                                    will be stored.
The data is used exclusively for the processing of the communication
                                    recording.
The legal basis for the processing of the contact request and its
                                    handling is regularly Art. 6 Para. 1 S.1 lit. b DSGVO.
If further personal data is processed during the sending process,
                                    this is only used to prevent misuse of the contact form and to ensure the security
                                    of our information technology systems.
Your data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer required to
                                    achieve the purpose for which it was collected. For the personal data from the input
                                    mask of the contact form and those sent by e-mail, this is the case when the
                                    respective conversation with the user has ended. The conversation is ended when it
                                    is clear from the circumstances that the matter in question has been conclusively
                                    clarified.
The additional personal data collected during the sending process
                                    will be deleted after a period of seven days at the latest.
1. Typeform
We use the Typeform service provided by TYPEFORM SL, C/Bac de Roda,
                                    163 (Local), 08018 Barcelona Spain (Typeform) for some of our contact forms. This
                                    allows us to provide you with an easy way to contact us.
Typeform is the recipient of your personal data and acts as a
                                    processor for us. In addition, Typeform collects personal data with the help of
                                    cookies, for example information about your terminal device (IP address, device
                                    information, operating system, browser settings). Furthermore, usage data is
                                    collected such as date and time and when you used the contact form. Typeform needs
                                    this data to ensure the presentation of the contact form and its functionality. This
                                    corresponds to Typeform's legitimate interest according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit.
                                    f DSGVO and serves the execution of the contract according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1
                                    lit. b DSGVO. For more information, please visit:
https://help.typeform.com/hc/en-us/articles/360029581691-What-happens-to-my-data
.
For more information on how to object to and remove Typeform, please
                                    visit:
https://admin.typeform.com/to/dwk6gt
.
2. EMG-Form-Builder
The EMG Form Builder is a tool developed by Ebner Media Group GmbH & Co. KG to query
                                    data within input masks on our website, whereby both personal data is processed, and
                                    anonymous surveys can be carried out. For example, your e-mail address and,
                                    depending on the individual case, your first name, surname, position, field of
                                    activity, company, telephone number and, if applicable, other interests are
                                    processed.
The data collected in this way is forwarded directly to our internal CRM system and
                                    stored there for further processing.
                                    Depending on the use case, the legal basis for the processing may either be your
                                    consent, which can be revoked at any time, in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1
                                    lit. a GDPR, or the implementation of (pre-)contractual measures in accordance with
                                    Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR.
Further information on data processing by Ebner Media Group GmbH & Co. KG can be
                                    found in this privacy policy or at
https://www.ebnermedia.de/datenschutzerklaerung/index.html
.
XI. Notes on the Use of Mobile Apps
For the use of some of our services on an end device with the
                                    operating system "iOS" an app is required, which can be downloaded free of charge
                                    via the iTunes Store or the App Store. iTunes Store and App Store are products of
                                    the company Apple Inc., Infinite Loop, Cupertino, CA 95014, USA. For the use and
                                    download of apps via the iTunes Store and the App Store, the General Terms and
                                    Conditions of Apple Inc. must be accepted separately.
To use some of our services on an end device with the "Android"
                                    operating system, an app is required, which can be downloaded free of charge from
                                    the Google Playstore. The Google Playstore is a product of Google Ireland Limited,
                                    Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland. For the use and download of apps
                                    via the Google Playstore, the General Terms and Conditions of Google Inc. must be
                                    accepted separately.
If we become a contractual partner for the purchase of the App in
                                    accordance with the applicable terms of use of the third-party providers from which
                                    you download the App (such as iTunes, Google, etc.), we will process the data
                                    provided to us by the third-party provider, e.g. your Device ID, to the extent
                                    necessary for the performance of the contract so that you can download the App to
                                    your mobile device.
XII. Registration / Shops / Subscriptions
You have the option of registering on some of our homepages by
                                    providing your personal data, e.g. to use our shops and order the goods and services
                                    we offer or to take out a subscription. The data is entered into an input mask,
                                    transmitted to us and stored. The following data is collected during the
                                    registration process, for example:
Salutation, title, name, e-mail, position in the company, company, address,
                                        payment data
The following data is also stored at the time of registration:
The IP address of the user, date and time of registration
Registration regularly serves the fulfilment of a contract to which
                                    the user is a party or the implementation of pre-contractual measures in the form of
                                    the extended use of our website. The legal basis for the processing of the data is
                                    therefore Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
Your data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer required to
                                    achieve the purpose for which it was collected. This is the case for the data
                                    collected during the registration process when the registration on our website is
                                    cancelled or modified.
This is the case for the data stored during the registration process
                                    for the fulfilment of a contract or for the implementation of pre-contractual
                                    measures if the data is no longer required for the implementation of the contract.
                                    Even after the conclusion of the contract, there may be a need to store personal
                                    data of the contractual partner in order to comply with contractual or legal
                                    obligations.
You have the possibility to cancel the registration on our homepage
                                    at any time. Furthermore, you can also change the data stored about you at any
                                    time.
Due to commercial and tax law requirements, we are obliged to store
                                    your address, payment and order data for a period of 10 years. However, we will
                                    restrict processing after 6 years, i.e. your data will only be used to comply with
                                    legal obligations. To prevent unauthorized access by third parties to your personal
                                    data, especially financial data, the ordering process takes place via encrypted
                                    connection.
1. Advertising and Direct Marketing / Christmas Greetings
We also process data from customers and interested parties for
                                    advertising purposes, e.g. in order to make offers that are as specific as possible
                                    to the target group for segments to be determined in each case. The legal basis for
                                    the processing for the preparation of advertising measures including data analyses
                                    is the protection of our legitimate interests Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f DSGVO. The
                                    processing is necessary in order to be able to make you offers tailored to you. We
                                    assume that this is also in your interest because you are thereby made aware of
                                    products that are potentially interesting for you.
For a direct advertising approach by telephone or e-mail by us
                                    or third parties (e.g. in the context of free downloads), we also request your
                                    consent, which you can revoke at any time. If the consent refers to third parties,
                                    we transmit the relevant contact data to the named third parties. These are
                                    themselves responsible parties in the sense of data protection law. We do not
                                    require your consent for direct advertising contact with our customers by e-mail,
                                    provided that we have received their e-mail address in connection with the sale of
                                    goods or services and it concerns the advertising of our own similar goods or
                                    services (cf. Section 7 (3) UWG).
In this context, we send mailings to partners with whom we have a
                                    long-standing business relationship (e.g., business partners, authors and speakers)
                                    on special occasions in order to honor and appreciate them accordingly. This
                                    includes, for example, Christmas greetings.
However, you can also object to such use at any time without
                                    incurring any transmission costs other than those according to the basic rates. To
                                    do so, simply send an e-mail to datenschutz@ebnermedia.de or click on one of the
                                    unsubscribe links at the end of each promotional e-mail sent to you.
Should there be any postal advertising, the legal basis for this is
                                    the protection of our legitimate interests according to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f
                                    DSGVO. We assume that, in principle, there are no objections to a direct mailing, as
                                    this can easily be sorted out, unless you have objected to such a direct mailing,
                                    which you can do at any time.
If you revoke your consent to electronic contact for advertising
                                    purposes or wish to object to the use of your data for advertising purposes, you can
                                    contact us at any time. In this case, we will delete your data immediately or retain
                                    it only to the extent that legal, statutory or contractual retention periods exist
                                    or further storage is necessary for the assertion, exercise or defense of legal
                                    claims. In addition, the storage of your e-mail address in our so-called opt-out
                                    database may be necessary to ensure that this e-mail address is no longer served.
                                    The legal basis for this purpose-related storage is the protection of our legitimate
                                    interests and the fulfilment of legal obligations in accordance with Art. 6 (1) p. 1
                                    lit. f and c DSGVO, because we want to take precautionary technical measures to
                                    ensure that no unwanted advertising is delivered.
2. Service Provider
We currently use the following service providers to implement our
                                    shop and subscription portals:
a) Plenigo
For the administration of your registration in some of our shops and
                                    our paid subscription offers, we use a software-as-a-service platform provided by
                                    our technology partner plenigo GmbH, Königstraße 4, 87435 Kempten (hereinafter
                                    "plenigo"). We use the plenigo platform to process contracts with customers who make
                                    use of our fee-based offers. plenigo processes the personal data required for this
                                    purpose, namely surname, first name, billing/delivery address (private or business)
                                    and e-mail address, as well as the personal data otherwise relevant for registering
                                    a user account on our portals, as our order processor.
The payment methods offered by us, in particular those via external
                                    payment providers, are also technically integrated into the payment process on our
                                    websites via the plenigo platform and linked to the corresponding processes. In the
                                    case of the connection of online payment systems via external payment providers, a
                                    connection to the online payment system of the respective selected payment provider
                                    is automatically established upon completion of your order, via which you then
                                    authorise the payment process yourself, if necessary by providing your personal
                                    access data to this provider. In this case, your data is processed exclusively for
                                    the purpose of payment processing, whereby the payment data must regularly be
                                    forwarded by the payment provider to the credit institution specified by you in
                                    order to trigger and authorise the payment transaction.
The processing by plenigo is necessary for the fulfilment of the
                                    contract concluded with you. The legal basis is Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b
                                    DSGVO.
For more information, please see plenigo's privacy policy:
https://plenigo.com/datenschutz
.
b) Eventbrite
For some websites, we offer the possibility to book participation in
                                    events. For this purpose, we use the tool "Eventbrite" from Eventbrite, Inc., 155
                                    5th Street, Floor 7, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA. When you register for an event,
                                    you will be redirected to the Eventbrite website. Eventbrite therefore does not
                                    consider itself to be part of our website offering. We have no influence on the data
                                    processing by Eventbrite.
For more information about how Eventbrite Inc. uses personal
                                    information, please see Eventbrite's Privacy Policy:
https://www.eventbrite.de/help/de/articles/460838/datenschutzrichtlinien-von-eventbrite
.
If you have any questions about privacy, please contact Eventbrite
                                    directly at
www.eventbrite.de/support/contact-us
.
As the event organizer, we receive access to the above data of the
                                    participants of an event from Eventbrite. We use the data for the purposes of
                                    preparation and follow-up of the event. The legal basis for the use of Eventbrite is
                                    the fulfilment of a contract Art. 6 para. 1 p.1 lit. b DSGVO.
c) Shopware
We use Shopware on some of our websites, an open source software to
                                    improve and optimize the use of our online shop.
Shopware stores cookies in your browser to ensure the basic
                                    functions of the shop. The cookies are used, for example, to enable the shopping
                                    cart content, the login state and also the CSRF protection. Without having cookies
                                    enabled in your browser, Shopware cannot be used. Shopware only stores IDs in your
                                    browser, the assignment to the respective information is done in the application
                                    area.
Based on the session cookie, Shopware decides whether you have an
                                    active shopping cart and whether you are logged in. It therefore serves as
                                    identification between your browser and the server. No other information is stored
                                    in the browser except for the session ID. The handling of session cookies is
                                    controlled on the server side via PHP and is independent of Shopware.
In addition, Shopware generates an individual CSRF cookie when you
                                    visit the shop, so that you can operate the individual areas of the shop.
In addition, an SLT cookie is set, which allows us to recognize you
                                    when you return to our online shop, even if the session has already expired. The SLT
                                    cookie can be deactivated in the basic settings of your browser.
When you add a product to your notepad, a cookie called "sUniqueID"
                                    is created to store the contents of the notepad.
The browser's Local Storage also stores the "recently viewed items"
                                    information.
For more information about Shopware's privacy policy, please visit:
https://www.shopware.com/de/datenschutz/
.
d) Rodrigue
On some of our websites we use the ticket provider Rodrigue, offered
                                    by RODRIGUE GmbH, Werderplatz 7, 68161 Mannheim, Germany.
If you would like to order a ticket, your data will be stored and
                                    processed on Rodrigue's servers. The legal basis for this is the fulfilment of the
                                    contract according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
In order to be able to carry out payment transactions, external
                                    payment service providers are used. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 para. 1 lit.
                                    b. DSGVO, as the payment service providers are essential for the fulfilment of
                                    contracts.
The payment service providers used collect and process inventory
                                    data required for the transaction, such as contact data, bank data/credit card
                                    numbers, passwords and contract details, among other things. The collected data is
                                    only processed and stored by the selected service provider. This means that we do
                                    not receive and store any transaction data. The respective payment service provider
                                    only transmits information about a confirmation of the payment to us.
For more information on Rodrigue, visit:
https://rodrigue-solution.com
.
e) Doo GmbH
The ticket ordering process, the issuing of digital tickets as well
                                    as the on-site support for some of our digital, physical and hybrid events is
                                    implemented by our service provider DOO. The provider is doo GmbH, Hultschiner
                                    Straße 8, D-81677 Munich.
During the ordering process, either a Doo iFrame is integrated into
                                    our regular website or we link completely to the Doo order page. As part of the
                                    ordering process and the issuing of digital tickets, Doo processes your necessary
                                    contact and payment data for order processing. In addition, Doo will also send you
                                    order confirmation emails.
The legal basis for the processing of the above-mentioned data is
                                    Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
For more information about how Doo handles your information, please
                                    see Doo's privacy policy at:
https://www.doo.net/datenschutz
.
f) Lumux
On some of our websites, we use the ticket provider Lumux, offered
                                    by Alpha Loop GmbH, Schreinerweg 2d, 51789 Lindlar,
www.alpha-loop.de
. This allows you to order tickets for the LEaTcon or LEaT X CiNEC events, for
                                    example (
https://www.leatcon.com/
).
If you would like to order a ticket, your data will be stored and
                                    processed on the Lumux servers. The legal basis for this is the fulfilment of the
                                    contract pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR.
The following data is collected when you place an order:
Customer type (B2B/B2C)
e-mail address
Salutation
Title (optional)
First name
Last name
Company name
Position
In addition to ordering tickets for yourself, you also have the
                                    option of ordering tickets for other people. Please note that the person placing the
                                    order must first obtain the consent of the person for whom a ticket is being ordered
                                    so that their details can be entered for the order.
The person for whom a ticket has been ordered will then receive a
                                    confirmation email. In this email, the person is informed about the ticket purchase
                                    and is given the opportunity to access their user account via the link in the email,
                                    view the order details and provide further information about themselves, or to
                                    delete their data.
External payment service providers are used to carry out the
                                    necessary payment transactions. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit.
                                    b. GDPR, as the payment service providers are essential for the fulfilment of
                                    contracts.
Lumux and the payment service providers used collect and process
                                    inventory data required for the transaction, such as contact details, bank
                                    details/credit card numbers, passwords, and contract details. The data collected is
                                    only processed and stored by the selected service provider. This means that we do
                                    not receive and store any transaction data. The respective payment service provider
                                    only sends us information about a confirmation of the payment.
Further information on data processing by Lumux can be found at:
https://www.lumux-events.com/datenschutzerklaerung/
.
g) Guitar & Bass annual digital subscription in cooperation with "Guitar Summit
                                    Weekend Package"
Purchasers of the "Guitar Summit Weekend Package", offered by
                                    SÜDWEST PRESSE + Hapag-Lloyd Reisebüro GmbH & Co. KG, Hafenbad 4, 89073 Ulm,
www.hapag-lloyd-reisen.de
, Mail:
reisebuero-goeppingen@swphl.de
(SWPHL), will automatically receive our free "Gitarre & Bass Abo annual digital
                                    subscription (12 issues)" with their order.
To set up the subscription, SWPHL will send us your data from the
                                    booking for the "Guitar Summit Weekend Package". This data usually includes:
Personal master data (names as well as address and contact details)
Communication data (telephone, e-mail)
Contract master data (data on the contractual relationship
Marketing data (data on product or contractual interests)
Information data (from third parties such as credit agencies or from public
                                        directories)
SWPHL acts as our processor, with whom we have concluded
                                    corresponding contracts for data processing on our behalf.
The legal basis is the fulfillment of the contract pursuant to Art.
                                    6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR.
Further information on data processing by SWPHL can be found at
https://www.hapag-lloyd-reisen.de/datenschutz
.
XIII. Encrypted Payment Transactions on this Website
If, after the conclusion of a contract with costs, there is an
                                    obligation to transmit your payment data to us (e.g. account number in the case of
                                    direct debit authorisation), this data is required for the processing of
                                    payments.
Payment transactions via the common means of payment
                                    (Visa/MasterCard, direct debit) are made exclusively via an encrypted SSL or TLS
                                    connection. You can recognise an encrypted connection by the fact that the address
                                    line of the browser changes from "http://" to "https://" and by the lock symbol in
                                    your browser line.
With encrypted communication, your payment data that you transmit to
                                    us cannot be read by third parties.
We use the following service providers for this purpose:
1. Paypal
If you pay via PayPal, we will pass on your payment data to PayPal
                                    (Europe) S.a.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449 Luxembourg
                                    (hereinafter "PayPal") as part of the payment processing.
The transfer takes place in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 p.1 lit.
                                    b DSGVO and only insofar as this is necessary for the payment processing. For the
                                    payment methods credit card via PayPal, direct debit via PayPal or - if offered -
                                    "purchase on account" or "instalment payment" via PayPal, PayPal reserves the right
                                    to conduct a credit check. For this purpose, your payment data may be passed on to
                                    credit agencies in accordance with Art. 6 (1) sentence 1 lit. f DSGVO on the basis
                                    of PayPal's legitimate interest in determining your solvency. PayPal uses the result
                                    of the credit check with regard to the statistical probability of non-payment for
                                    the purpose of deciding on the provision of the respective payment method. The
                                    credit report may contain probability values (so-called score values). Insofar as
                                    score values are included in the result of the credit report, these have their basis
                                    in a scientifically recognised mathematical-statistical procedure. The calculation
                                    of the score values includes, but is not limited to, address data. For further
                                    information on data protection law, including information on the credit agencies
                                    used, please refer to PayPal's data protection declaration:
www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
.
You can object to this processing of your data at any time by
                                    sending a message to PayPal. However, PayPal may still be entitled to process your
                                    personal data if this is necessary for the contractual processing of payments.
2. Stripe
If you choose a payment method of the payment service provider
                                    Stripe, the payment processing is carried out by Stripe Payments Europe Ltd., 1
                                    Grand Canal Street Lower, Grand Canal Dock, Dublin, Ireland, to whom we pass on your
                                    information provided during the ordering process together with the information about
                                    your order (name, address, account number, bank code, possibly credit card number,
                                    invoice amount, currency and transaction number) in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1
                                    sentence 1 lit. b DSGVO. The transfer of your data takes place exclusively for the
                                    purpose of payment processing with the payment service provider Stripe Payments
                                    Europe Ltd. and only insofar as it is necessary for this purpose.
Stripe transfers, processes and, where applicable, stores personal
                                    data outside the EU. In doing so, Stripe undertakes to take appropriate safeguards
                                    in accordance with Art. 46 GDPR in the form of standard contractual clauses (See
https://stripe.com/privacy-center/legal#data-transfers
).
We have also entered into an order processing agreement with
                                    Stripe.
For more information about Stripe's privacy policy, please visit
https://stripe.com/de/privacy#translation
.
XIV. Career Portal
On some of our websites, we display job offers for which interested
                                    parties can apply by e-mail or by filling out the respective input masks.
                                    Unsolicited applications can also be sent to us by e-mail. In the event of an
                                    incoming application, we process the data received from the applicant exclusively
                                    for the purpose of processing for potential filling of the vacant position.
The primary legal basis for this is Article 88 DSGVO in conjunction
                                    with Section 26 (1) BDSG.
Within our company, only those persons have access to your personal
                                    data who are responsible for the processing of the application procedure and who are
                                    the decision-makers regarding the application outcome.
We delete your personal data as soon as they are no longer required
                                    for the above-mentioned purposes. If we conclude an employment contract with an
                                    applicant, the transmitted data will be stored for the purpose of processing the
                                    employment relationship in compliance with the statutory provisions. If no
                                    employment contract is concluded with the applicant, the application documents will
                                    be deleted no later than six months after notification of the rejection decision,
                                    provided that no other legitimate interests of the controller conflict with such
                                    deletion. Other legitimate interest in this sense is, for example, a duty to provide
                                    evidence in proceedings under the General Equal Treatment Act (AGG).
Jobware
Some of our job markets are implemented with our partner, Jobware
                                    GmbH, Technologiepark 15, 33100 Paderborn, Germany (Jobware). Jobware writes some
                                    necessary cookies and local storage objects. All cookies and local storage objects
                                    are important technical components of the counting and billing functionality as well
                                    as the quality management of Jobware.
When you call up and use the job market websites listed above, your
                                    IP address, user agent string and standard headers are transmitted to Jobware. This
                                    is a technical necessity in order to be able to display job offers to you.
In addition to the aforementioned user session log data, Jobware
                                    stores other cookies, such as a pseudonymous cookie ID ("jobtimize"), which is used
                                    to provide advertisers with anonymous statistics on the performance of job ads. In
                                    addition, "jobtimize" is used together with the collection of IP address, operating
                                    system, browser, screen resolution, geolocation (down to city level) and click time
                                    to prevent click fraud. The data collected is not processed for any other
                                    purpose.
Jobware anonymises this data after one month, so that no reference
                                    to the user is possible any more.
XV. Forum
Reading our forums is possible without registration. If you would
                                    like to actively participate in a forum, you must register by providing your e-mail
                                    address, a password of your choice and your freely selectable user name. There is no
                                    obligation to use a clear name, a pseudonymous use is possible. We use the so-called
                                    double opt-in procedure for registration, i.e. your registration is only completed
                                    once you have confirmed your registration by clicking on the link contained in a
                                    confirmation e-mail sent to you for this purpose. If your confirmation is not
                                    received within 24 hours, your registration will be automatically deleted from our
                                    database.
If you register a forum account, we store all the information you
                                    provide in the forum, i.e. public posts, pinboard entries, friendships, private
                                    messages, etc., in addition to your registration data until you log out, in order to
                                    operate the forum. The legal basis is Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
If you delete your account, your public statements, especially
                                    contributions to the forum, will remain visible to all readers, but your account
                                    will no longer be retrievable and will be marked with "[Guest]" in the forum. All
                                    other data will be deleted.
XVI. Comment Function
On some of our homepages you have the possibility to comment on
                                    individual contributions. If you leave a comment, this comment will be made publicly
                                    accessible. Furthermore, the selected user name as well as the date and time of the
                                    comment entry will be stored and published. We would like to point out that for
                                    security reasons your IP address will also be logged.
The legal basis for the storage of this personal data is Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. c DSGVO, as we must exculpate ourselves in the event of a
                                    violation of the law. Your personal data will not be passed on to third parties. The
                                    only exceptions are if the disclosure is required by law or serves the legal defense
                                    of the controller.
Disqus
For some comment functions we have integrated the components of the
                                    company Disqus. Disqus allows you to log in either via your own Disqus user account
                                    ("Account") or via existing user accounts on Facebook, X and Instagram. If
                                    you log in to the Disqus function on our websites with your social media accounts,
                                    these service providers will also collect and process information about your use of
                                    the Disqus functions.
Please take note of the privacy information of the respective
                                    providers. Disqus is an internationally widespread platform. With a registration,
                                    one can comment on any website that uses Disqus. Disqus transmits the user's email
                                    address and the IP address used while entering a comment. We need this information
                                    solely for the purpose of contacting you in connection with your use of Disqus, for
                                    example if we have queries about your user comment.
The operating company of Disqus is Disqus Inc., 301 Howard St, Floor
                                    3 San Francisco, CA 94105, USA. The privacy policy is available at
help.disqus.com/terms-and-policies/disqus-privacy-policy
.
XVII. Production of Film, Image and Sound Recordings
As already stated on your ticket or event documents, film and photo
                                    recordings may be made within the scope of events of the EBNER MEDIA GROUP for media
                                    support in print and online media. The recordings are intended to document the event
                                    - however, it is possible that you as a participant will be seen on one of the
                                    recordings. According to the new data protection regulations, we are obliged to
                                    inform you how we handle these recordings.
This statement explains how we use your personal information, the
                                    purposes for which it is used, with whom it is shared, and what control and
                                    information rights you may have.
In the context of an EBNER MEDIA GROUP event, film and photo
                                    recordings may be made to accompany the event in the media. It is possible that you
                                    as a participant are visible on one of the recordings, if necessary only in the
                                    background.
The EBNER MEDIA GROUP or the third parties commissioned with the
                                    documentation process the photographs and video recordings made by us for the media
                                    accompaniment of the event, for subsequent reporting as well as for the advertising
                                    of other similar events of ours in both print and online media, so that the
                                    recordings can also be placed on the Internet.
If data is transferred to service providers, this is done by way of
                                    order processing. For the above-mentioned purposes, we may also use the recordings
                                    made in online media, e.g. on the Internet.
We process the recordings in our legitimate interest in media
                                    coverage of concerts organised by us as well as for the promotion of other similar
                                    events in accordance with Art. 6 (1) lit. f DSGVO. If you have given us your
                                    (implied) consent, the processing of the photo and video recordings will be based on
                                    your consent in accordance with Art. 6 (1) a DSGVO.
Our aim is to process your personal data only to the minimum extent
                                    possible. As a matter of principle, we will only store your personal data for as
                                    long as it is required to fulfil the purpose for which it was originally
                                    collected.
You have other data protection rights, depending on the
                                    circumstances of the specific case. Read here about the section Your rights in this
                                    privacy statement.
XVIII. Implementation of Webinars / Online Events
A webinar can be compared to a face-to-face seminar. The difference
                                    is that it is computer/software based and takes place over the internet.
If you would like to register for one of the webinars offered on our
                                    websites, this is done via the registration mask provided by us. In doing so, we
                                    collect the following data from you, for example:
Salutation, title, name, e-mail, position in the company, company, address,
                                        payment data.
During and after the webinar, statistical data will be transmitted
                                    to us.
An encrypted connection is established between you and the webinar
                                    organizer. We will not record the audio or visual information you transmit during
                                    this session. By clicking "Join" you confirm that you will not record or screen
                                    capture this session either.
We do, however, make recordings of some of our events, whereby only
                                    the webinar leaders and presenters are recorded in order to later offer the digital
                                    events recorded in this way in our shop. However, you as a participant are not
                                    recorded.
You can end the session at any time by simply closing the browser
                                    window or exiting the program or app. If the presenter ends the session, your
                                    session participation will automatically end as well."
We use the following service providers to implement the
                                    webinars:
1. goToMeeting
In order to be able to conduct webinars via the Internet, we
                                    sometimes use the software solution "GoToWebinar" of LogMeIn, Inc, 320 Summer
                                    Street, Boston, MA 02210, USA. For the provision of this service and the related
                                    data processing, LogMeIn, Inc. is the controller.
The LogMeIn, Inc. privacy policy can be found at:
https://www.logmeininc.com/de/legal/privacy
.
For the order-related execution of the webinar, we transmit your
                                    registration data to LogMeIn, Inc.
The legal basis for the processing of data via GoToWebinar is Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO. We provide contractual services with "GoToWebinar". In
                                    addition to the implementation of webinars, this includes the follow-up of
                                    participation data for the creation of e.g. certificates of participation.
An order processing contract has been concluded with GoToWebinar on
                                    the basis of the standard data protection clauses.
2. Daily
We also sometimes use the service of the US provider daily.co, San
                                    Francisco (HQ), CA, United States, 1925 48th Ave, San Francisco, "daily", to host
                                    webinars.
The legal basis for the processing of data via "daily" is Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO. We provide contractual services with "daily". In addition
                                    to the implementation of webinars, this includes the follow-up of participation data
                                    for the creation of e.g. certificates of participation.
An order processing contract was concluded with "daily" on the basis
                                    of the standard data protection clauses.
For more information on data processing by "daily", please visit:
https://www.daily.co/privacy
.
3. Vimeo
For live streaming events we sometimes use the service of the US
                                    provider Vimeo, Inc., 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011, USA "Vimeo".
The legal basis for the processing of data via "Vimeo" is Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO. We provide contractual services with "Vimeo". In addition
                                    to the implementation of live streaming events, this includes the post-processing of
                                    participation data for the creation of e.g. certificates of participation.
The videos are played on
https://vimeo.com/de/
and can be played directly from our website.
These are all integrated in "extended data protection mode", which
                                    means that no data about you as a user is transferred to Vimeo if you do not play
                                    the videos. Only when you play the videos, the data mentioned in paragraph 2 are
                                    transmitted. We have no influence on this data transmission.
By visiting the website, Vimeo receives the information that you
                                    have accessed the corresponding subpage of our website. This occurs regardless of
                                    whether Vimeo provides a user account through which you are logged in or whether no
                                    user account exists. Vimeo stores your data as user profiles and uses them for the
                                    purposes of advertising, market research and/or the design of its website in line
                                    with requirements. Such an evaluation is carried out in particular (even for users
                                    who are not logged in) to provide needs-based advertising and to inform other users
                                    of the social network about your activities on our website. You have the right to
                                    object to the creation of these user profiles, whereby you must contact Vimeo to
                                    exercise this right.
An order processing contract was concluded with "Vimeo" on the basis
                                    of the standard data protection clauses.
For more information on data processing by "Vimeo", please visit:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
.
4. YouTube
For live-streaming events we sometimes use the service of the US
                                    provider YouTube of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4,
                                    Ireland.
The legal basis for the processing of data via "YouTube" is Art. 6
                                    para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO. We provide contractual services with "YouTube". In
                                    addition to the implementation of live-streaming events, this includes the
                                    post-processing of participation data for the creation of e.g. certificates of
                                    participation.
The videos are played on
https://www.youtube.com/
and can be played directly from our website.
These are all integrated in "extended data protection mode", i.e. no
                                    data about you as a user is transmitted to YouTube if you do not play the videos.
                                    Only when you play the videos, the data mentioned in paragraph 2 are transmitted. We
                                    have no influence on this data transmission.
By visiting the website, YouTube receives the information that you
                                    have accessed the corresponding subpage of our website. This occurs regardless of
                                    whether YouTube provides a user account via which you are logged in or whether no
                                    user account exists. YouTube stores your data as usage profiles and uses them for
                                    the purposes of advertising, market research and/or designing its website in line
                                    with requirements. Such an evaluation is carried out in particular (even for users
                                    who are not logged in) to provide needs-based advertising and to inform other users
                                    of the social network about your activities on our website. You have the right to
                                    object to the creation of these user profiles, whereby you must contact YouTube to
                                    exercise this right.
An order processing contract was concluded with "YouTube" on the
                                    basis of the standard data protection clauses.
For more information on the purpose and scope of data collection and
                                    processing by YouTube, please see the privacy policy. There you will also find
                                    further information about your rights and setting options to protect your privacy:
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/10261289?hl=de&ref_topic=7048998
.
5. LO:X
LO:X is our digital event and e-learning platform. It is developed
                                    and operated by Team Seefried GmbH Co. KG, Traubinger Str. 41, 82327 Tutzing.
Both digital and hybrid events are conducted via LO:X. In order to
                                    use the service, registration with your data required from the input mask is
                                    necessary. This allows you to create a public profile that other participants of our
                                    events can view. Subscribers to certain products can access their subscribed content
                                    via the platform as part of their subscription. Individual courses can also be
                                    purchased via the platform.
The legal basis for the processing of the above-mentioned data is
                                    Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. b DSGVO.
Further information on the handling of your data can be found in the
                                    data protection declaration of Team Seefried GmbH Co KG at:
https://teamseefried.digital/datenschutzerklarung/
.
6. Miro
If you take part in our online events, in some cases we offer you
                                    the opportunity to collect, record and share topics and ideas together via the
                                    virtual whiteboard software Miro.
To do this, you usually register directly on miro.com or are invited
                                    to do so via a link, in which case no registration is necessary, and work together
                                    on whiteboards created or provided by us as part of the moderated webinar.
The provider is RealtimeBoard, Inc. dba Miro ("Miro"), 201 Spear
                                    Street, Suite 1100, San Francisco, CA 94105.
If you use this interaction tool, this requires your consent to the
                                    use of data by Miro. Thus, the legal basis results from Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a
                                    DSGVO.
The following personal data may be processed by you:
User details (if you participate with registered access): First name, last name,
                                        e-mail address, password (if "Sin-gle Sign-On" is not used), telephone
                                        (optional), profile picture (optio-nal).
Meeting metadata: Topic, description (optional), IP address, device/hardware
                                        information.
Shared content: Content shared on a Miro whiteboard is stored. It can be, for
                                        example, text, images, drawings, audio or video files, websites or embeddings
                                        from other services
Aggregated data: Miro stores anonymized data about user behavior such as the
                                        geographic location of the dial-in or the type of terminal device. This
                                        aggregated data does not allow any inference to the person and is stored even
                                        after the individual user has been deleted.
You have the option to minimize the personal data collected and
                                    stored by Miro by participating without registering an account or giving your
                                    name.
Please note that RealtimeBoard, Inc. has its headquarters in the
                                    USA. Therefore, a third country transfer to the USA cannot be excluded. However, we
                                    have concluded an order processing agreement and standard contractual clauses with
                                    the provider.
Further information on data processing by Miro can be found at:
https://miro.com/legal/privacy-policy/
.
7. Memberspot
We use the service Memberspot (Memberspot GmbH, Rilkestr. 26, 71642
                                    Ludwigsburg, Germany) for hosting and providing video courses. This also includes
                                    the necessary account and access management for the corresponding courses.
For this purpose, an account will be created for you at Memberspot,
                                    which requires your e-mail address and, if applicable, your first and last name.
                                    In addition, your meta and communication data, such as your device information and
                                    your IP address, will be processed for technical provision.
The legal basis for data processing when providing the “Memberspot”
                                    course platform is the processing of the contractual relationship in accordance with
                                    Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR.
Your data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer required to
                                    fulfill contractual or legal obligations and there are no legal obligations to retain it.
Further information on data processing by Memberspot can be found at
https://www.memberspot.de/datenschutz
.
XIX. Competitions and Quizzes
To participate in sweepstakes, you provide data that we may process
                                    for the performance of the contract (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. b DSGVO) and based on your
                                    consent (Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a DSGVO). Your data will be passed on to our
                                    competition service providers and sponsors within the framework of the conditions of
                                    participation to which you have consented and deleted if it is no longer required.
                                    You have the right to revoke any consent given in accordance with Art. 7 (3) DSGVO
                                    with effect for the future.
Contentbird
For the provision of competitions on some websites we use the
                                    service provider Contentbird of contentbird GmbH, Knesebeckstraße 59-61, D-10719
                                    Berlin. Contenbird processes the data required by you in the corresponding input
                                    mask in order to be able to participate in the competition.
You can obtain further information on data processing by Contentbird
                                    at:
https://de.contentbird.io/terms-conditions/
.
XX. Surveys
Following successfully completed orders or at the appropriate place
                                    on our websites, we provide you as a user with a survey (via e-mail) at regular
                                    intervals. If you click on the corresponding link within the e-mail or the website,
                                    you will be taken to our survey page, where you can then participate in it. Through
                                    this survey, we aim to use your satisfaction to continually improve our services and
                                    products. You can object to participation in the surveys and the receipt of further
                                    e-mails at any time.
The following data will be linked to the previously stored data from
                                    your profile, or collected in the corresponding input mask, for example:
Satisfaction on a scale, comment entered, name, e-mail address
Furthermore, the following data will be stored when you submit the
                                    survey:
IP address, date and time of the sending process
If you have agreed to a survey, the legal basis for offering the
                                    surveys and linking the data provided with a profile is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S.1 lit. a DSGVO.
If you have placed an order with us and have not objected to the
                                    survey, the legal basis for the survey in connection with your order is § 7 para 3
                                    UWG. You can object to further contact on our part at any time without incurring
                                    further costs. To do so, simply click on the corresponding link in the email.
The additional data collected during the submission process is only
                                    used to prevent misuse of the survey and to ensure the security of our information
                                    technology systems. These are deleted at the latest after the evaluation of the
                                    surveys.
Your personal data will be deleted as soon as they are no longer
                                    required to achieve the purpose for which they were collected. For the survey, this
                                    is the case when the evaluation of the survey has taken place. You also have the
                                    option to revoke your consent to the processing of the data provided in the survey
                                    before this time.
In addition, we sometimes use the following service providers for
                                    the surveys:
1. Surveymonkey
To conduct surveys on our websites, we sometimes use the services of
                                    SurveyMonkey Europe UC, 2 Shelbourne Buildings, Shelbourne Road, Dublin, Ireland.
                                    When you voluntarily participate in these surveys, SurveyMonkey collects information
                                    about the device and application you use to take the survey. This includes your IP
                                    address, operating system version, device type, system and performance information,
                                    and browser type. If you are taking the survey through a mobile device, SurveyMonkey
                                    also collects the device's UUID. SurveyMonkey also uses so-called third-party
                                    tracking services, which in turn use cookies and page tags (also known as web
                                    beacons) to collect usage data and user statistics. We have no control over the
                                    amount of data SurveyMonkey collects. For more information about the cookies
                                    SurveyMonkey uses, privacy practices, and retention periods, please visit
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/
.
You can prevent the installation of cookies by deleting existing
                                    cookies and deactivating the storage of cookies in the settings of your web browser.
                                    We point out that in this case you may not be able to use all features of our
                                    website.
We use SurveyMonkey to provide you with surveys. The basis for the
                                    collection of your data is your consent according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a
                                    DSGVO.
SurveyMonkey Europe UC is a subsidiary of SurveyMonkey Inc. based in
                                    the USA. It is not excluded that your data collected by SurveyMonkey will also be
                                    transmitted to the USA.
2. LimeSurvey
For surveys we also sometimes use the survey system "LimeSurvey" of
                                    LimeSurvey GmbH, Umfragedienste & Beratung, Papenreye 63, 22453 Hamburg /
                                    Germany. LimeSurvey is a free survey software. It can be used to create and conduct
                                    web-based surveys. The survey results are recorded anonymously in a database and can
                                    be evaluated and/or exported by the survey creator with internal functions.
No personal information about you is stored in the survey responses
                                    unless explicitly asked for in a question. The response in this regard is always
                                    voluntary. Nevertheless, it cannot be ruled out in individual cases that, on the
                                    basis of the survey responses given, it is possible to draw conclusions about a
                                    certain number of people. Therefore, it is always possible to answer such prominent
                                    answers with the answer "no information" or to skip the answer.
Data processing in the context of participation in an online survey
                                    is based on your consent Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
If you have accepted the consent to the survey on the start page,
                                    LimeSurvey sets a so-called function cookie. This corresponds to a normal session
                                    cookie as is the case when calling up websites.
3. Google Forms
For the creation and implementation of surveys to improve our
                                    services and for the participation in competitions, we occasionally use the tool
                                    Google Forms as part of the program package G-Suite of the company Google Ireland
                                    Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland ("Google").
We do not assign the data collected with the Google Forms such as
                                    gender, age, occupational group and interests to specific persons. They are stored
                                    anonymously and evaluated in internal company statistics to improve our offer. An
                                    exception to this is the e-mail address for participation in the competition. We use
                                    this to notify the winners. The e-mail addresses are stored and deleted after the
                                    competition has been completed. Participation in the surveys and the competitions is
                                    voluntary. The legal basis for the data processing is your consent pursuant to Art.
                                    6 (1) sentence 1 lit a DSGVO or our contractual obligation to notify the winners
                                    pursuant to Art. 6 (1) sentence 1 lit b DSGVO. You can revoke your consent at any
                                    time. Automated decision-making including profiling does not take place.
Your data will not be passed on to third parties. However, we cannot
                                    exclude that Google processes personal data of the user on its own authority. This
                                    may happen on servers in third countries. To meet EU data protection requirements,
                                    G-Suite offers EU standard contractual clauses and a data processing addendum. For
                                    more information about data processing in connection with Google Forms, please
                                    visit:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
XXI. Google Tag Manager
Some of our websites use Google Tag Manager. Google Tag Manager is a
                                    solution that allows marketers to manage website tags through one interface. The
                                    tool itself (which implements the tags) does not use cookies and only collects your
                                    IP address out of technical necessity. The tool triggers other tags, which in turn
                                    may set cookies and collect data. Google Tag Manager does not access this data. If a
                                    deactivation has been made at the domain or cookie level, this remains in place for
                                    all tracking tags implemented with Google Tag Manager.
The legal basis for the use of the technically necessary service is
                                    the legitimate interest of the website operator according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1
                                    lit. f DSGVO.
For further information, please refer to the provider's terms of use
                                    at:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/tagmanager/use-policy.html
.
XXII. Content Delivery Networks (CDN) / Hosting / Security / Search Services
Some of our websites use so-called content delivery networks to
                                    provide popular online libraries and web fonts. Access is then made directly to the
                                    servers of the operators, so that data such as the calling IP address, referrer,
                                    browser information, etc. accrue there.
In addition, some websites are hosted by external service providers
                                    with whom we have concluded a corresponding order processing agreement.
Finally, we use services that serve to maintain the security and
                                    functionality of our website.
The legal basis for this is our legitimate interest in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. f DSGVO, to present our site in line with
                                    requirements, to optimise the user experience and to guarantee security and
                                    functionality.
You can prevent the collection as well as the processing of your
                                    data by such services by deactivating the execution of script code in your browser
                                    or by installing a script blocker in your browser (you can find such a blocker e.g.
                                    at
www.noscript.net
).
The following is a list of the services used:
1. DigitalOcean
Some of our websites are operated on servers of DigitalOcean, LLC
                                    based in NYC, USA (server owner). The server operated is located in Frankfurt,
                                    Germany (server location).
The hoster uses the collected data to operate the websites and to
                                    ensure IT security. In the event of concrete indications, the log data may be
                                    analysed subsequently.
Visitor data stored by the hoster is deleted after 365 days.
For more information on data protection, please visit
https://www.digitalocean.com/legal/gdpr/
.
2. Amazon Cloudfront
Furthermore, we occasionally use the Content Delivery Network (CDN)
                                    Amazon CloudFront of Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 avenue John F. Kennedy,
                                    L-1855 Luxembourg (AWS) to increase the security and delivery speed of our website.
                                    For this purpose, personal data may be processed in server log files by AWS.
AWS is a recipient of your personal data and acts as a processor on
                                    our behalf.
The processing of the data provided under this section is not
                                    required by law or by contract. The functionality of the website is not guaranteed
                                    without the processing.
Your personal data will be stored by AWS for as long as necessary
                                    for the purposes described.
For more information on how to object to and opt out of AWS, please
                                    visit:
https://www.digitalocean.com/legal/gdpr/
.
AWS has implemented compliance measures for international data
                                    transfers. These apply to all global activities where AWS processes personal data of
                                    individuals in the EU. These measures are based on the EU Standard Contractual
                                    Clauses (SCCs). For more information, please visit:
d1.awsstatic.com/legal/aws-gdpr/AWS_GDPR_DPA.pdf
.
3. code.jquery.com for jQuery Migrate
Some of our websites use jQuery Migrate for better stability. In
                                    this regard, program libraries are called from jQuery servers. Google's CDN (content
                                    delivery network) is used. If you have previously used jQuery Migrate on another
                                    page from the jQuery CDN, your browser will fall back to the cached copy. If not,
                                    this will require a download, where data from your browser will go to the jQuery
                                    Foundation ("jQuery.org"). Your data will be transferred to the USA. You can find
                                    out more at:
https://code.jquery.com/
and the jQuery Foundation privacy policy:
https://openjsf.org/privacy
4. ajax.googleapis.com for jQuery and jQueryUI
Some of our websites use Ajax and jQuery or jQueryUI technologies,
                                    which optimizes loading speeds. In this regard, program libraries are called from
                                    Google servers. Google's CDN (content delivery network) is used. If you have
                                    previously used jQuery on another page from the Google CDN, your browser will fall
                                    back to the cached copy. If this is not the case, it will require a download, and
                                    data from your browser will be sent to Google. Your data will be transferred to the
                                    USA. You can find out more at:
developers.google.com/speed/libraries/
and at the privacy policy:
policies.google.com/privacy
5. Google Web Fonts
Sometimes we integrate the fonts ("Google Web Fonts") of the
                                    provider Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, on
                                    the
                                    basis of our legitimate interest pursuant to Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. f DSGVO. The aim
                                    is the optimization and economic operation of our homepage.
The privacy policy of the provider can be found at:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
.
The opt-out can be set at:
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
6. Font Awesome
Some of our websites use so-called web fonts for the uniform display
                                    of fonts, which are provided by Fonticons, Inc., 6 Porter Road, Apartment 3R,
                                    Cambridge, MA 02140, United States of America. When you call up a page, your browser
                                    loads the required web fonts into its browser cache in order to display texts and
                                    fonts correctly.
For this purpose, the browser you use must connect to the servers of
                                    Fonticons, Inc. This enables Fonticons, Inc. to know that our website has been
                                    accessed via your IP address. The use of web fonts is in the interest of a uniform
                                    and appealing presentation of our online offers.
This constitutes a legitimate interest within the meaning of Art. 6
                                    para. 1 s. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
If your browser does not support web fonts, a default font will be
                                    used by your computer.
For more information about Font Awesome, please visit
https://fontawesome.com/help
and read the
                                    Fonticons, Inc. privacy policy:
https://fontawesome.com/privacy
.
7. Cloudflare
In order to provide you with secure data transmission on our
                                    websites using SSL encryption and to secure our websites against malicious, mass
                                    (DDoS) or other access that would interfere with or prevent the operation of the
                                    websites, we sometimes use the service of Cloudflare, Inc. 101 Townsend St San
                                    Francisco, CA 94107.
We have concluded a corresponding order processing agreement with
                                    Cloudflare on the basis of the DSGVO.
As part of the protection of these websites Cloudflare uses a script
                                    and possibly a cookie in your browser. This cookie is used to validate access and
                                    detect malicious access attempts. Cloudflare collects statistical data about visits
                                    to this website. The access data includes:
Name of the website accessed, file, date and time of access, amount
                                    of data transferred, notification of successful access, browser type and version,
                                    the user's operating system, referrer URL (the previously visited page), IP address
                                    and the requesting provider.
Cloudflare uses the log data for statistical analysis for the
                                    purpose of operation, security and optimization of the offer. Please also read the
                                    privacy policy of Cloudflare which is available here
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/
.
Your data will be deleted as soon as they are no longer required to
                                    achieve the purpose for which they were collected.
You can prevent the collection and forwarding as well as the
                                    processing of this data by deactivating the execution of script code in your
                                    browser, installing a script blocker in your browser (you can find this for example
                                    at
www.noscript.net
) or activating the "Do
                                    Not Track" setting of your browser.
8. Google ReCaptcha
Furthermore, on some of our websites we use the Google service
                                    reCaptcha to determine whether a human or a computer makes a certain entry in our
                                    contact or newsletter form.
Google uses the following data to check whether you are a human or a
                                    computer: IP address of the terminal device used, the website that you visit with us
                                    and on which the captcha is embedded, the date and duration of the visit, the
                                    recognition data of the browser and operating system type used, Google account if
                                    you are logged in to Google, mouse movements on the reCaptcha areas as well as tasks
                                    in which you have to identify images.
Further information on the provider Google Ireland Limited, Gordon
                                    House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland is available at
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
.
Opt-Out:
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
9. AddSearch Oy
On some of our websites, we offer you the possibility of full-text
                                    search via our content. We implement the search solution with our service provider
                                    AddSearch Oy, Töölönkatu 4, FI-00100 Helsinki, Finland (AddSearch). AddSearch does
                                    not write cookies or local storage objects. We process information about the use of
                                    the services anonymously for statistical purposes on the basis of our legitimate
                                    interest (Art. 6 para. 1 p.1 lit. f DSGVO) to improve the quality of the service.
                                    The storage period for this data is max. 1 year. An objection to the usage analysis
                                    is possible in the privacy settings. You can find the privacy policy of AddSearch
                                    at:
https://www.addsearch.com/privacy/
XXIII. Web Analytics
The following analysis and tracking services may be used on our
                                    websites:
1. Google Analytics
Google Analytics, a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc
                                    ("Google"). Google Analytics uses "cookies", which are text files placed on your
                                    computer, to help the website analyze how users use the site. The information
                                    generated by the cookie about your use of the website will be transmitted to and
                                    stored by Google on servers in the United States. In the event that IP anonymisation
                                    is activated on this website, however, your IP address will be truncated beforehand
                                    by Google within member states of the European Union or in other contracting states
                                    to the Agreement on the European Economic Area. Only in exceptional cases will the
                                    full IP address be transmitted to a Google server in the USA and shortened there. On
                                    behalf of the operator of this website, Google will use this information for the
                                    purpose of evaluating your use of the website, compiling reports on website activity
                                    and providing other services relating to website activity and internet usage to the
                                    website operator.
The IP address transmitted by your browser as part of Google
                                    Analytics will not be merged with other Google data.
You may refuse the use of cookies by selecting the appropriate
                                    settings on your browser, however please note that if you do this you may not be
                                    able to use the full functionality of this website. You can also prevent the
                                    collection of data generated by the cookie and related to your use of the website
                                    (including your IP address) to Google and the processing of this data by Google by
                                    downloading and installing the browser plug-in available at the following link:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout?hl=de
.
We use Google Analytics with the extension "_anonymizeIp()". This
                                    means that IP addresses are processed in abbreviated form, which means that personal
                                    references can be ruled out. If the data collected about you is related to a person,
                                    this is therefore immediately excluded and the personal data is deleted
                                    immediately.
We use Google Analytics to analyse and regularly improve the use of
                                    our website. The statistics obtained allow us to improve our offer and make it more
                                    interesting for you as a user. The legal basis for the use of Google Analytics is
                                    your consent in accordance with Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Third party information: Google Dublin, Google Ireland Ltd, Gordon
                                    House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, Fax: +353 (1) 436 1001.
User terms and conditions:
https://www.google.com/analytics/terms/de.html
,
                                    overview of data protection:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/learn/privacy.html
,
                                    and data protection declaration:
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy
.
2. Google Firebase
We sometimes use the tracking service "Firebase" provided by Google
                                    Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland ("Google").
Google Firebase uses tracking technologies that enable an analysis
                                    of your use of our app, e.g. for performance monitoring, for error logs and for the
                                    analysis of user behaviour, e.g. which screens were viewed and which publications
                                    were opened how often.
The purpose of using Firebase is to analyse the use of our app, to
                                    improve it regularly and thus to be able to operate it more economically. The
                                    statistics obtained enable us to improve our offer and make it more interesting for
                                    you as a user.
The legal basis for this data processing is your consent within the
                                    meaning of Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
With Firebase, information about the use of our app is collected and
                                    transmitted to Google in Ireland or the USA and stored there. The data is only
                                    collected anonymously and transmitted to Firebase. A link with other user data does
                                    not take place.
Google will use said information to evaluate your use of our app and
                                    to provide other app-related services to us.
If necessary, data will be transferred to the USA.
More information about Google Firebase and privacy can be found at
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
and
https://firebase.google.com
.
3. INFOnline /AGOF
Our websites sometimes use the INFOnline Measurement anonymous
                                    measuring procedure of INFOnline GmbH, Brühler Str. 9, D-53119 Bonn (
https://www.infonline.de
) to determine
                                    statistical parameters about the use of our offerings. The aim of the range
                                    measurement is to determine the intensity of use, the number of users of a website
                                    and the surfing behaviour statistically - on the basis of a uniform standard
                                    procedure - and thus to obtain values that are comparable across the market.
Technical and organizational measures ensure that individual users
                                    cannot be identified at any time. Data that may have a reference to a specific,
                                    identifiable person are anonymized as soon as possible. The processing of the
                                    anonymization takes place in the area of responsibility of the website operator. The
                                    collection and anonymization of the IP address is technically necessary to establish
                                    a connection to the user and to make the website available. The collection therefore
                                    takes place in the sense of Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f DSGVO.
To provide the anonymous usage data, the usage data is encrypted in
                                    the user's browser without the use of identifiers such as cookies or similar. This
                                    includes the following data:
Offer-specific information: si field (Site Information)
Device-specific
                                    information: di field (Device Information)
Technical information: ti field
                                    (technical Information)
Client information ci field (Client Information)
Measured
                                    data: md field (Measured Data)
The encrypted data is transmitted to INFOnline together with a
                                    geolocation, which enables a regional classification at federal state/regional
                                    level. Under no circumstances can conclusions be drawn about the specific place of
                                    residence of a user from the geographical information obtained in this way.
The usage data of a technical client (e.g. a browser on a device) is
                                    aggregated across websites and stored in a database. This information is used for
                                    the technical estimation of the socio-information age and gender and transferred to
                                    the AGOF sub-service providers (agof - Arbeitsgemeinschaft Online Forschung e.V.,
                                    Europa-Allee 22 60327 Frankfurt, Germany) for further coverage processing. Within
                                    the scope of the AGOF study, socio characteristics are technically estimated on the
                                    basis of a random sample, which can be assigned to the following categories: Age,
                                    gender, nationality, occupation, marital status, general household information,
                                    household income, place of residence, Internet usage, online interests, place of
                                    use, user type.
The validity of the cookie is limited to a maximum of one year. The
                                    full IP address is not stored. The shortened IP address is stored for a maximum of
                                    60 days. The usage data in connection with the unique identifier are stored for a
                                    maximum of six months.
The purpose of the processing of personal data is the creation of
                                    statistics and the formation of user categories. The statistics are used to track
                                    and document the use of our offer. The user categories form the basis for an
                                    interest-based targeting of advertising media and advertising measures. In order to
                                    market this website, it is necessary to measure usage, which ensures comparability
                                    with other market participants. Our legitimate interest results from the economic
                                    usability of the findings resulting from the statistics and user categories and the
                                    market value of our website. This can be determined on the basis of the statistics -
                                    also in direct comparison with third-party websites.
In addition, we have a legitimate interest in making the
                                    pseudonymised data available to INFOnline, AGOF and IVW (Informationsgemeinschaft
                                    zur Feststellung der Verbreitung von Werbeträgern e. V. [IVW] Verbändehaus, Am
                                    Weidendamm 1A, 10117 Berlin, Germany) for the purpose of market research (AGOF,
                                    agma) and for statistical purposes (INFOnline, IVW). Furthermore, we have a
                                    legitimate interest in making the pseudonymised data available to INFOnline for the
                                    further development and provision of interest-based advertising media.
For the preparation of the AGOF study, the data is passed on to
                                    service providers for market research.
If you do not wish to participate in the measurement, you can object
                                    under the following link:
https://optout.ioam.de
.
Further information on data protection in the measurement process
                                    can be found on the INFOnline GmbH website
https://www.infonline.de
.
4. eTracker
On our homepages, technologies from etracker GmbH (
https://www.etracker.com
) can be used to
                                    analyse the use of our website in order to be able to improve it regularly. The
                                    statistics obtained enable us to improve our offer and make it more interesting for
                                    you as a user. The data collected is stored permanently and analysed pseudonymously.
                                    The legal basis for the use of eTracker is your consent according to Art. 6 para. 1
                                    p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
This data may also be collected and stored for marketing and
                                    optimization purposes. Usage profiles can be created from this data under a
                                    pseudonym. Cookies can be used for this purpose. Cookies are small text files that
                                    are stored locally in the cache of the site visitor's Internet browser. The cookies
                                    enable the recognition of the Internet browser. The data collected with the eTracker
                                    technologies will not be used to personally identify the visitor to this website
                                    without the separately granted consent of the person concerned and will not be
                                    merged with personal data about the bearer of the pseudonym. The collection and
                                    storage of data can be objected to at any time with effect for the future.
The service provider is: etracker GmbH, Erste Brunnenstraße 1, 20459
                                    Hamburg, Germany;
https://www.etracker.com/de/datenschutz.html
.
5. Hotjar
We use on our website the web analytics service "Hotjar" of Hotjar
                                    Ltd. Hotjar Ltd. is a European company based in Malta (Hotjar Ltd, Level 2, St
                                    Julians Business Centre, 3, Elia Zammit Street, St Julians STJ 1000, Malta,
                                    Europe).
Through the use of "Hotjar", movements on our website can be tracked
                                    (so-called heat maps). For example, it is possible to see how far users scroll and
                                    how often they click on which buttons. Furthermore, with the help of the tool it is
                                    also possible to obtain feedback directly from the users of the website. In this
                                    way, we obtain valuable information to make our website even faster and more
                                    customer-friendly.
This website takes particular care to protect your privacy when
                                    using "Hotjar". For example, we can only track which buttons are clicked, mouse
                                    history, how far you scroll, device screen size, device type and browser
                                    information, geographic location (country only) and preferred language to display
                                    our website. Areas of the websites in which personal data of you or third parties
                                    are displayed are automatically hidden by "Hotjar" and are therefore not traceable
                                    at any time.
"Hotjar" offers each user the possibility to prevent the use of the
                                    tool by means of a "Do Not Track header". In this case, no data about the visit to
                                    the respective website will be recorded. This is a setting that is supported by all
                                    common browsers in current versions. To do this, your browser sends a request to
                                    "Hotjar" with the information to deactivate the tracking of the respective user. If
                                    you use this website with different browsers/computers, you must set up the "Do Not
                                    Track header" separately for each of these browsers/computers.
The legal basis for the use of Hotjar is your consent according to
                                    Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
You can find detailed instructions with information about your
                                    browser at:
For more information about Hotjar Ltd. and about the "Hotjar" tool,
                                    please visit:
https://www.hotjar.com
The privacy policy of Hotjar Ltd. can be found at:
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy
.
6. Mixpanel
For product analysis we use "Mixpanel" of Mixpanel Inc., One Front
                                    Street, Floor 28, San Francisco, CA 94111, USA on our website.
We use "Mixpanel" for marketing and optimization purposes, in
                                    particular to analyze the use of our website and to continuously improve individual
                                    functions and offers as well as the user experience. Through the statistical
                                    evaluation of user behavior, we can improve our offer and make it more interesting
                                    for you as a user.
"Mixpanel" offers each user the possibility to prevent the use of
                                    the tool by means of a "Do Not Track header". In this case, no data about the visit
                                    to the respective website will be recorded. This is a setting that is supported by
                                    all common browsers in current versions. To do this, your browser sends a request to
                                    "Mixpanel" with the information to deactivate the tracking of the respective user.
                                    If you use this website with different browsers/computers, you must set up the "Do
                                    Not Track header" separately for each of these browsers/computers.
The legal basis for the use of "Mixpanel" is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Detailed instructions with information about your browser can be
                                    found at:
mixpanel.com/optout/
For more information about Mixpanel Inc. and the Mixpanel tool,
                                    please visit:
https://www.mixpanel.com
.
The privacy policy of Hotjar Ltd. can be found at:
https://mixpanel.com/legal/privacy-policy/
.
7. Instana
Furthermore, on some websites we use a plugin of the performance
                                    analysis service of Instana Inc, 222 South Riverside Plaza, 15th Floor, Chicago, IL
                                    60606, USA ('Instana'), which enables us to collect statistical evaluations about
                                    the speed of the website. The application sets cookies on the user's terminal
                                    device.
When a user calls up a page of the website that contains such a
                                    plugin, their browser establishes a direct connection with Instana's servers. We
                                    therefore have no influence on the scope of the data that Instana collects with the
                                    help of this plugin and therefore inform users according to their level of
                                    knowledge.
By integrating the plugin, Instana receives the information that a
                                    user has called up the corresponding page of the website. If the user is logged in
                                    to Instana, Instana can assign the visit to the website to his account with Instana.
                                    If a user is not a member of Instana, there is still the possibility that Instana
                                    learns and stores his IP address.
The purpose and scope of the data collection as well as information
                                    on the processing and use of the data by Instana, as well as setting options for
                                    protecting the privacy of users, can be found in the Instana data protection
                                    information:
https://www.instana.com/privacy-policy/
.
Instana processes personal data not only on servers in the European
                                    Economic Area but also in the USA. The USA does not have a level of data protection
                                    comparable to the GDPR; in particular, US security authorities have extensive access
                                    rights to data stored in the USA. Instana secures this data processing by concluding
                                    EU standard contractual clauses.
If the user is a member of Instana and does not want Instana to
                                    collect data about him/her on the website in order to link it to his/her membership
                                    data stored with Instana, he/she must log out of Instana before visiting the
                                    website.
8. VG Wort (METIS)
Cookies and reports on access figures
We use "session cookies"
                                    from VG Wort, Munich, to measure accesses to texts in order to record the
                                    probability of copying. Session cookies are small units of information that a
                                    provider stores in the RAM of the visitor's computer. A randomly generated unique
                                    identification number, a so-called session ID, is stored in a session cookie. In
                                    addition, a cookie contains information about its origin and the storage period.
                                    Session cookies cannot store any other data. These measurements are carried out by
                                    Kantar Germany GmbH according to the Scalable Central Measurement Method (SZM). They
                                    help to determine the copy probability of individual texts for the remuneration of
                                    legal claims of authors and publishers. We do not collect any personal data via
                                    cookies.
Some of our pages are provided with JavaScript calls, via which we
                                    report the accesses to the Verwertungsgesellschaft Wort (VG Wort). We thereby enable
                                    our authors to participate in the distributions of the VG Wort, which ensure the
                                    statutory remuneration for the uses of copyrighted works in accordance with § 53
                                    UrhG.
It is also possible to use our offers without cookies. Most browsers
                                    are set to automatically accept cookies. However, you can deactivate the storage of
                                    cookies or set your browser to notify you as soon as cookies are sent.
Web offers
Our website and our mobile web offer use the
                                    "Scalable Central Measurement Method" (SZM) of Kantar Germany GmbH for the
                                    determination of statistical characteristic values for the determination of the copy
                                    probability of texts.
Anonymous measurement values are collected in the process. The
                                    access count measurement alternatively uses a session cookie or a signature, which
                                    is created from various automatically transmitted information of your browser, for
                                    the recognition of computer systems. IP addresses are only processed in anonymous
                                    form.
The procedure was developed with due regard for data protection. The
                                    sole aim of the procedure is to determine the copying probability of individual
                                    texts.
At no time are individual users identified. Your identity always
                                    remains protected. You will not receive any advertising via the system.
For more information, please visit
https://www.vgwort.de/datenschutz.html
9. Matomo
In order to better understand what interests visitors to our
                                    websites and whether they find their way around, we sometimes use the open-source
                                    analysis tool Matomo (formerly Piwik). This tool does not use cookies to distinguish
                                    between individual users. The legal basis for the use of Matomo is Art. 6 para. 1 p.
                                    1 lit. f DSGVO.
Since Matomo is hosted on our server, data is not passed on to third
                                    parties. IP addresses are anonymized by six digits in our configuration and do not
                                    allow any conclusion about the actual connection of the visitor. Returning visitors
                                    cannot be identified.
If you do not want your visits to our websites to be recorded, you
                                    can activate the 'Do not track' option in your browser and Matomo will not collect
                                    any data from you. Via this click you can deactivate the visit statistics from you.
                                    To do this, an opt-out cookie will be set in your browser, which will disable
                                    tracking. If you do not want any tracking, activate the "Do not Track" function in
                                    your browser.
In addition, you can object to processing by activating the
                                    checkbox at the end of a page that we track with Matomo.
Further information on data processing by Matomo can be found at
https://matomo.org/privacy-policy/
.
XXIV. Social Media
We currently use the following social media platforms:
a) Facebook
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, Merrion Road, Dublin 4, D04 X2K5,
                                    Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
Opt-Out:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
and
https://www.youronlinechoices.com
b) Instagram
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, Merrion Road, Dublin 4, D04 X2K5,
                                    Ireland.
Privacy Policy/Opt-Out:
https://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/
.
c) X
Twitter International Unlimited Company, One Cumberland Place,
                                    Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://twitter.com/de/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://twitter.com/settings/account/personalization
d) YouTube (Google)
Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4,
                                    Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
e) LinkedIn
LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company Wilton Place, Dublin 2,
                                    Ireland
Privacy policy
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Opt-Out:
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
,
f) WhatsApp
Ireland Limited, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin
                                    2, Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://www.whatsapp.com/legal/
g) Xing
XING AG, Dammtorstraße 29-32, 20354
                                    Hamburg, Germany
Privacy Policy/ Opt-Out:
https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung
.
h) Spotify
Spotify AB, Birger Jarlsgatan 61, 113 56 Stockholm in Sweden
Privacy Policy:
www.spotify.com/de/legal/privacy-policy/
.
i) SoundCloud
SoundCloud Limited, Berners House, 47-48 Berners Street, London W1T
                                    3NF, United Kingdom.
Privacy Policy:
https://soundcloud.com/pages/privacy
.
j) TikTok
TikTok Technology Limited, 10 Earlsfort Terrace, Dublin, D02 T380,
                                    Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy-eea
k) Pinterest
Pinterest Europe Ltd, Palmerston House, 2nd Floor, Fenian Street,
                                    Dublin 2, Ireland
Privacy Policy:
https://policy.pinterest.com/de/privacy-policy.
l) Acast
Acast AB (publ), Kungsgatan 12, Stockholm 111 35, Sweden
Privacy Policy:
https://www.acast.com/de/privacy-policy
1. Social Media Presence
We maintain fan pages within various social networks and platforms
                                    with the aim of communicating with the customers, interested parties and users
                                    active there and informing them about our services there.
We would like to point out that your personal data may be processed
                                    outside the European Union, which may result in risks for you (e.g. when enforcing
                                    your rights under European / German law).
As a rule, user data is processed for market research and
                                    advertising purposes. For example, usage profiles can be created from the usage
                                    behaviour and resulting interests of the users. These usage profiles can in turn be
                                    used, for example, to place advertisements within and outside the platforms that
                                    presumably correspond to the interests of the users. For these purposes, cookies are
                                    usually stored on the computers of the users, in which the usage behaviour and the
                                    interests of the users are stored. Furthermore, data may also be stored in the usage
                                    profiles regardless of the devices used by the users (in particular if the users are
                                    members of the respective platforms and are logged in to them).
The processing of the personal data of the users is based on our
                                    legitimate interests in effective information of the users and communication with
                                    the users pursuant to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f. DSGVO. If users are asked by the
                                    respective providers for consent to data processing (i.e. declare their consent,
                                    e.g. by ticking a checkbox or confirming a button), the legal basis for processing
                                    is Art. 6 (1) S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO.
You can obtain further information on the processing of your
                                    personal data as well as your objection options under the links of the respective
                                    provider listed below. The assertion of information and other rights of the data
                                    subjects can also be made against the providers, then only they have direct access
                                    to the data of the users and have the corresponding information. Of course, we are
                                    available for any queries and will support you if you need help.
A supplementary agreement is concluded with some social media
                                    platforms when operating a fan page. According to this agreement, data subject
                                    rights can usually be asserted both with the social media platform and with us.
                                    However, the primary responsibility under the GDPR for the processing of insights
                                    data lies with the social media platform and it fulfils all obligations under the
                                    GDPR with regard to the processing of insights data. In this context, the social
                                    media platform provides the essence of the page insights supplement to the data
                                    subjects.
We, as the operator of the Fanpage, do not make any decisions
                                    regarding the processing of Insights data and all other information resulting from
                                    Art. 13 DSGVO, such as the legal basis, the identity of the responsible party and
                                    the storage period of cookies on user terminals.
2. Social Media Plug-ins
Normally, social plugins lead to the fact that every visitor to a
                                    page is immediately recorded by these services with his IP address and his further
                                    activities on the Internet are logged. This happens even if the user does not click
                                    on one of the buttons.
To prevent this, we use the Shariff method on our homepages. The
                                    social media buttons establish direct contact between the social network and the
                                    visitor only when the user actively clicks on the share button. If the user is
                                    already logged in to a social network, this is done without another window on
                                    Facebook and Instagram. On X, a pop-up window appears in which the text of the
                                    tweet can still be edited.
Consequently, you can post on social networks without the networks
                                    being able to create complete surfing profiles of you. The Shariff method is already
                                    widely used to protect users. The starting point was an initiative by www.heise.de ,
                                    where you can find more information on the current state of the discussion.
In addition, the data mentioned in section IV of this declaration
                                    will be transmitted. In the case of Facebook and Xing, according to the respective
                                    providers in Germany, the IP address is anonymised immediately after collection. By
                                    activating the plug-in, your personal data is transmitted to the respective plug-in
                                    provider and stored there (in the case of US providers, in the USA). Since the
                                    plug-in provider collects the data in particular via cookies, we recommend that you
                                    delete all cookies via your browser's security settings before clicking on the
                                    greyed-out box.
We have neither influence on the collected data and data processing
                                    procedures, nor are we aware of the full extent of the data collection, the purposes
                                    of the processing, the storage periods. We also have no information on the deletion
                                    of the collected data by the plug-in provider.
The plug-in provider stores the data collected about you as usage
                                    profiles and uses them for purposes of advertising, market research and/or
                                    demand-oriented design of its website. Such an evaluation is carried out in
                                    particular (also for non-logged-in users) for the display of needs-based advertising
                                    and to inform other users of the social network about your activities on our
                                    website. You have the right to object to the creation of these user profiles,
                                    whereby you must contact the respective plug-in provider to exercise this right. Via
                                    the plug-ins, we offer you the opportunity to interact with the social networks and
                                    other users so that we can improve our offer and make it more interesting for you as
                                    a user. The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 (1) p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers process
                                    your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this respect, we
                                    are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the operation of the
                                    social media offers.
The data transfer takes place regardless of whether you have an
                                    account with the plug-in provider and are logged in there. If you are logged in to
                                    the plug-in provider, your data collected by us will be directly assigned to your
                                    account with the plug-in provider. If you click the activated button and, for
                                    example, link to the page, the plug-in provider will also store this information in
                                    your user account and share it publicly with your contacts. We recommend that you
                                    log out regularly after using a social network, but especially before activating the
                                    button, as this allows you to avoid an assignment to your profile with the plug-in
                                    provider.
Further information on the purpose and scope of the data collection
                                    and its processing by the plug-in provider can be found in the data protection
                                    declarations of these providers communicated below. There you will also receive
                                    further information about your rights in this regard and setting options to protect
                                    your privacy.
3. Integration of YouTube Videos
We have integrated YouTube videos into our online offers, which are
                                    stored on www.youtube.com and can be played directly from our websites. These are
                                    all integrated in "extended data protection mode", i.e. no data about you as a user
                                    is transmitted to YouTube if you do not play the videos. Only when you play the
                                    videos, the data mentioned in paragraph 2 are transmitted. We have no influence on
                                    this data transmission.
By visiting the website, YouTube receives the information that you
                                    have accessed the corresponding subpage of our website. This occurs regardless of
                                    whether YouTube provides a user account through which you are logged in or whether
                                    no user account exists. If you are logged in to Google, your data will be directly
                                    assigned to your account. If you do not wish to have your data associated with your
                                    YouTube profile, you must log out before activating the button. YouTube stores your
                                    data as usage profiles and uses them for the purposes of advertising, market
                                    research and/or demand-oriented design of its website. Such an evaluation is carried
                                    out in particular (even for users who are not logged in) to provide needs-based
                                    advertising and to inform other users of the social network about your activities on
                                    our website. You have the right to object to the creation of these user profiles,
                                    whereby you must contact YouTube to exercise this right.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-in is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers
                                    process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this
                                    respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
For more information on the purpose and scope of data collection and
                                    processing by YouTube, please refer to the privacy policy. There you will also find
                                    further information about your rights and setting options to protect your privacy:
                                    www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://support.google.com/ads/answer/10261289?hl=de&ref_topic=7048998
4. Google Maps
On some of our websites we use the offer of Google Maps. This allows
                                    us to show you interactive maps directly on the website and enables you to use the
                                    map function conveniently.
By visiting the website, Google receives the information that you
                                    have called up the corresponding sub-page of our website. In addition, the data
                                    mentioned in section IV of this declaration will be transmitted to Google. This
                                    occurs regardless of whether Google provides a user account through which you are
                                    logged in or whether no user account exists. If you are logged in to Google, your
                                    data will be directly assigned to your account. If you do not wish to be associated
                                    with your Google profile, you must log out before activating the button. Google
                                    stores your data as usage profiles and uses them for the purpose of advertising,
                                    market research and/or demand-oriented design of its website. Such an evaluation is
                                    carried out in particular (even for users who are not logged in) to provide
                                    needs-based advertising and to inform other users of the social network about your
                                    activities on our website. You have the right to object to the creation of these
                                    user profiles, whereby you must contact Google to exercise this right.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-in is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers
                                    process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this
                                    respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
Further information on the purpose and scope of the data collection
                                    and its processing by the plug-in provider can be found in the provider's privacy
                                    policy. There you will also find further information about your rights in this
                                    regard and setting options for protecting your privacy:
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy
.
5. Vimeo Player
We have integrated Vimeo videos into our online offers, which are
                                    stored on vimeo.com/en/ and can be played directly from our websites. The provider
                                    is Vimeo, Inc., 555 West 18th Street, New York 10011, USA.
These are all integrated in "extended data protection mode", which
                                    means that no data about you as a user is transferred to Vimeo if you do not play
                                    the videos. Only when you play the videos, the data mentioned in paragraph 2 are
                                    transmitted. We have no influence on this data transmission.
By visiting the website, Vimeo receives the information that you
                                    have accessed the corresponding subpage of our website. This occurs regardless of
                                    whether Vimeo provides a user account through which you are logged in or whether no
                                    user account exists. Vimeo stores your data as user profiles and uses them for the
                                    purposes of advertising, market research and/or the design of its website in line
                                    with requirements. Such an evaluation is carried out in particular (even for users
                                    who are not logged in) to provide needs-based advertising and to inform other users
                                    of the social network about your activities on our website. You have the right to
                                    object to the creation of these user profiles, whereby you must contact Vimeo to
                                    exercise this right.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-in is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers
                                    process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this
                                    respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
For more information on the purpose and scope of data collection and
                                    processing by Vimeo, please refer to the privacy policy. There you will also find
                                    further information on your rights and setting options to protect your privacy:
https://vimeo.com/privacy
. Vimeo also
                                    processes your personal data in the USA.
6. Intercom
To communicate via chat or respond to your support requests, we
                                    occasionally use Intercom, a service provided by Intercom, Inc, 98 Battery Street,
                                    Suite 402, San Francisco, CA 94111 USA (hereinafter "Intercom").
The legal basis for the use of the plug-in is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers
                                    process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this
                                    respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
Detailed information about Intercom's privacy policy can be found at
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
.
7. Spotify
We have sometimes integrated functions of the music service Spotify
                                    on our websites. The provider is Spotify AB, Birger Jarlsgatan 61, 113 56 Stockholm
                                    in Sweden. You can recognize the Spotify plugins by the green logo on our pages. You
                                    can find an overview of the Spotify plugins at:
developer.spotify.com
.
This allows a direct connection between your browser and the Spotify
                                    server to be established via the plugin when you visit our websites. Spotify thereby
                                    receives the information that you have visited our site with your IP address. If you
                                    click the Spotify button while logged into your Spotify account, you can link the
                                    content of our pages on your Spotify profile. This allows Spotify to assign the
                                    visit to our pages to your user account.
For more information, please see Spotify's privacy policy:
https://www.spotify.com/de/legal/privacy-policy/
.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-in is your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media providers
                                    process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In this
                                    respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
If you do not want Spotify to associate your visit to our site with
                                    your Spotify user account, please log out of your Spotify user account.
8. Acast
We also occasionally use the podcast hosting service Acast (Acast AB
                                    (publ), Kungsgatan 12, Stockholm 111 35, Sweden). The podcasts are loaded by Acast
                                    or transmitted via Acast.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent
                                    according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media
                                    providers process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In
                                    this respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
Acast processes IP addresses and device information to enable
                                    podcast downloads/playbacks and to determine statistical data, such as retrieval
                                    figures. This data is anonymized or pseudonymized before being stored in Acast's
                                    database unless it is necessary for the provision of the podcasts.
For more information and to opt-out, please see Acast's privacy
                                    policy at
https://www.acast.com/de/privacy-policy
.
9. Gravatar
We use the service Gravatar of Automattic Inc., 60 29th Street #343,
                                    San Francisco, CA 94110, USA, within our online offers and especially in blogs.
Gravatar is a service where users can register and store profile
                                    pictures and their email addresses. If users leave posts or comments on other online
                                    presences (especially blogs) with the respective email address, their profile
                                    pictures can be displayed next to the posts or comments. For this purpose, the email
                                    address provided by users is transmitted to Gravatar in encrypted form for the
                                    purpose of checking whether a profile is stored for it. This is the sole purpose of
                                    the transmission of the email address and it is not used for other purposes, but
                                    deleted afterwards.
By displaying the images, Gravatar obtains the IP address of the
                                    user, as this is necessary for communication between a browser and an online
                                    service. More information about the collection and use of data by Gravatar can be
                                    found in the privacy policy of Automattic:
https://automattic.com/privacy/
.
If users do not want a user image associated with their Gravatar
                                    email address to appear in the comments, they should use an email address that is
                                    not on file with Gravatar to comment. We also note that it is also possible to use
                                    an anonymous email address or no email address at all if users do not want their
                                    email address to be sent to Gravatar. Users can completely prevent the transmission
                                    of data by not using our commenting system.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent
                                    according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media
                                    providers process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In
                                    this respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
10. Podigee
We also occasionally use the podcast hosting service Podigee
                                    (Podigee GmbH, Ritterstraße 2A, 10969 Berlin, Germany). The podcasts are thereby
                                    loaded by Podigee or transmitted via Podigee.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent
                                    according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media
                                    providers process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In
                                    this respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
Podigee processes IP addresses and device information in order to
                                    enable podcast downloads/playbacks and to determine statistical data, such as
                                    retrieval figures. This data is anonymized or pseudonymized before being stored in
                                    Podigee's database, unless it is necessary for the provision of the podcasts.
For more information and to opt-out, please see Podigee's privacy
                                    policy
https://www.podigee.com/de/about/privacy/
.
11. DaCast
We use the embedding function of DaCast ltd 31-33 Bondway, Vauxhall,
                                    London SW8 1SJ, United Kingdom on some of our websites. When you visit one of our
                                    pages equipped with a DaCast plugin, a connection to the DaCast servers is
                                    established. In doing so, the DaCast server is informed which of our pages you have
                                    visited. In addition, DaCast obtains your IP address. This also applies if you are
                                    not logged in to DaCast or do not have an account with DaCast. The information
                                    collected by DaCast is transmitted to the DaCast server in the USA. If you are
                                    logged into your DaCast account, you allow DaCast to associate your surfing behavior
                                    directly with your personal profile. You can prevent this by logging out of your
                                    DaCast account. For more information on the handling of user data, please refer to
                                    DaCast's privacy policy at (
www.dacast.com/privacy-policy/
).
The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent
                                    according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media
                                    providers process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In
                                    this respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
12. SoundCloud
Plugins of the social network SoundCloud (SoundCloud Limited,
                                    Berners House, 47-48 Berners Street, London W1T 3NF, United Kingdom.) may be
                                    integrated on our pages. You can recognise the SoundCloud plugins by the SoundCloud
                                    logo on the pages concerned.
When you visit our pages, a direct connection between your browser
                                    and the SoundCloud server is established after activation of the plugin. SoundCloud
                                    thereby receives the information that you have visited our site with your IP
                                    address. If you click the "Like" or "Share" button while logged into your SoundCloud
                                    user account, you can link and/or share the content of our pages with your
                                    SoundCloud profile. This allows SoundCloud to associate your visit to our pages with
                                    your user account. We would like to point out that we, as the site operator, have no
                                    knowledge of the content of the transmitted data or its use by SoundCloud. For more
                                    information, please see the SoundCloud privacy policy at
https://soundcloud.com/pages/privacy
.
If you do not want SoundCloud to associate your visit to our pages
                                    with your SoundCloud user account, please log out of your SoundCloud user account
                                    before activating any SoundCloud plugin content.
The legal basis for the use of the plug-ins is your consent
                                    according to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO. How the respective social media
                                    providers process your personal data, please refer to their own privacy policy. In
                                    this respect, we are not the responsible party in the sense of the DSGVO for the
                                    operation of the social media offers.
13. Amazon Interactive Video Service (Amazon IVS)
For on-demand streaming and the organization of live streaming
                                    events, we sometimes use the Amazon IVS service of the provider Amazon Europe Core
                                    S.à r.l. (Société à responsabilité limitée), 38 avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855
                                    Luxembourg.
The legal basis for the processing of data via "Amazon IVS" is Art.
                                    6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR. We provide contractual services with "Amazon IVS". In
                                    addition to the execution of live-streaming events, this includes the
                                    post-processing of participation data for the creation of certificates of
                                    participation, for example.
The videos are played via the Amazon AWS servers and can be played
                                    directly from our website.
By visiting the website, Amazon IVS receives the information that
                                    you have accessed the corresponding subpage of our website. This occurs regardless
                                    of whether Amazon IVS provides a user account through which you are logged in or
                                    whether no user account exists. Amazon IVS stores your data as usage profiles and
                                    uses them for the purposes of advertising, market research and/or the needs-based
                                    design of its website. Such an evaluation is carried out (even for users who are not
                                    logged in) to provide needs-based advertising and to inform other users of the
                                    social network about your activities on our website. You have the right to object to
                                    the creation of these user profiles, whereby you must contact Amazon IVS to exercise
                                    this right.
Further information on data processing by "Amazon IVS" can be found
                                    at:
https://d1.awsstatic.com/legal/privacypolicy/AWS_Privacy_Notice_German_2023-09-22.pdf
.
14. Issuu
Our website includes the "Issuu" application from Issuu Inc, 131 Lytton Ave, Palo
                                    Alto, CA 94301, USA, which allows you to access and read published print media and
                                    articles as e-papers and PDFs.
Issuu uses cookies that enable your use of the website to be analysed. In this way,
                                    Issuu collects and stores personal data such as your IP address and information
                                    about the time and duration of use.
If you have an Issuu user account and do not want Issuu to collect data about you
                                    via this website and link it to your membership data stored with Issuu, you must log
                                    out of Issuu before visiting this website.
Insofar as we obtain your consent, the legal basis for the use of Issuu is your
                                    consent in accordance with Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can find out how
                                    Issuu processes your personal data in the privacy policy. We are not the controller
                                    within the meaning of the GDPR for data processing by Issuu.
Further information on data processing by Issuu can be found at:
https://issuu.com/legal/privacy
.
XXV. Online advertising
The following advertising technologies may be used on our
                                    websites:
1. LinkedIn Insight Tag
We also occasionally use the LinkedIn Insight Tag feature. This
                                    allows us to track conversions, retarget website visitors, and gain additional
                                    information about members who view advertisements. We thereby pursue the interest of
                                    showing you advertisements that are of interest to you in order to make our website
                                    more interesting for you.
The LinkedIn Insight tag enables the collection of data about visits
                                    to these sites, including URL, referrer URL, IP address, device and browser
                                    properties (user agent), and timestamp. This data is encrypted, IP addresses are
                                    shortened, and LinkedIn members' direct IDs are removed within seven days to
                                    pseudonymize the data. This remaining pseudonymized data is then deleted within 90
                                    days.
LinkedIn does not share any personally identifiable information with
                                    us, but only provides aggregate reports on site audience and ad performance.
                                    LinkedIn also provides retargeting for site visitors, so we can use this data to
                                    display targeted ads outside of its site without identifying the member.
Legal basis for the processing of your data your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Deactivation of the "LinkedIn Insight Tag" function is possible at
                                    any time in the individual cookie settings and for logged-in users at
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/advertising/actions-that-showed-interest
.
For more information on data processing by LinkedIn, please visit
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
2. Google AdSense
On our homepages, we sometimes also use the online advertising
                                    service Google AdSense, through which you can be presented with advertising tailored
                                    to your interests. We pursue with it the interest to show you advertisement, which
                                    could be of interest for you, in order to arrange our website more interesting for
                                    you. For this purpose, statistical information about you is collected and processed
                                    by our advertising partners. These advertisements are recognizable by the reference
                                    "Google ads" in the respective advertisement.
By visiting our website, Google receives the information that you
                                    have accessed our website. For this purpose, Google uses a web beacon to set a
                                    cookie on your computer. The data mentioned in section IV of this declaration is
                                    transmitted. We have no influence on the data collected, nor do we know the full
                                    extent of the data collection and the storage period. Your data will be transferred
                                    to the USA and evaluated there. If you are logged in with your Google account, your
                                    data can be directly assigned to it. If you do not wish to have your data associated
                                    with your Google profile, you must log out. It is possible that this data will be
                                    passed on to contractual partners of Google to third parties and authorities.
Legal basis for the processing of your data your consent according
                                    to Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
You can prevent the installation of cookies from Google AdSense in
                                    various ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by deactivating Google's interest-based ads via the link
https://www.google.de/ads/preferences
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulatory campaign "About Ads" via the link
www.aboutads.info/choices
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
Further information on the purpose and scope of the data collection
                                    and its processing as well as further information on your rights in this regard and
                                    setting options for protecting your privacy can be obtained from: Google Ireland
                                    Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland; Privacy policy for
                                    advertising:
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/technologies/ads
.
3. Google Ads Conversion (Formerly Google Adwords Conversion)
We use the offer of Google Ads to draw attention to our attractive
                                    offers with the help of advertising media (so-called Google Ads) on external
                                    websites. We can determine how successful the individual advertising measures are in
                                    relation to the data of the advertising campaigns. In this way, we pursue the
                                    interest of displaying advertising that is of interest to you, making our website
                                    more interesting for you and achieving a fair calculation of advertising costs.
These advertisements are delivered by Google via so-called "ad
                                    servers". For this purpose, we use ad server cookies, through which certain
                                    parameters for measuring success, such as display of the ads or clicks by users, can
                                    be measured. If you access our website via a Google ad, Google Ads will store a
                                    cookie on your PC. These cookies usually expire after 30 days and are not intended
                                    to identify you personally. The unique cookie ID, number of ad impressions per
                                    placement (frequency), last impression (relevant for post-view conversions) and
                                    opt-out information (marking that the user no longer wishes to be addressed) are
                                    usually stored as analysis values for this cookie.
These cookies enable Google to recognise your internet browser. If a
                                    user visits certain pages of the website of an Ads customer and the cookie stored on
                                    his computer has not yet expired, Google and the customer can recognize that the
                                    user clicked on the ad and was redirected to this page. A different cookie is
                                    assigned to each Ads customer. Cookies can therefore not be tracked across Ads
                                    customers' websites. We ourselves do not collect or process any personal data in the
                                    aforementioned advertising measures. We only receive statistical evaluations from
                                    Google. Based on these evaluations, we can see which of the advertising measures
                                    used are particularly effective. We do not receive any further data from the use of
                                    the advertising media, in particular we cannot identify the users on the basis of
                                    this information.
Due to the marketing tools used, your browser automatically
                                    establishes a direct connection with the Google server. We have no influence on the
                                    scope and further use of the data collected by Google through the use of this tool
                                    and therefore inform you according to our state of knowledge: Through the
                                    integration of Ads Conversion, Google receives the information that you have called
                                    up the corresponding part of our website or clicked on an advertisement from us. If
                                    you are registered with a Google service, Google can assign the visit to your
                                    account. Even if you are not registered with Google or have not logged in, there is
                                    the possibility that the provider learns your IP address and stores it.
You can prevent participation in this tracking process in several
                                    ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by disabling conversion tracking cookies by setting your browser
                                    to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
,
                                    which setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
https://www.aboutads.info/choices
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent Art.
                                    6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Further information on data protection at Google can be found here:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
and
https://services.google.com/sitestats/de.html
.
Alternatively, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative
                                    (NAI) website at
https://www.networkadvertising.org
.
4. Google Ads Remarketing
We use the remarketing function within the Google Ads service. The
                                    provider is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
                                    With the remarketing function, we can present users of our websites with
                                    advertisements based on their interests on other websites within the Google
                                    advertising network (in Google Search or on YouTube, so-called "Google Ads" or on
                                    other websites). For this purpose, the interaction of users on our website is
                                    analysed, e.g. which offers the user was interested in, in order to be able to
                                    display targeted advertising to users on other sites even after they have visited
                                    our website. For this purpose, Google stores cookies on the end devices of users who
                                    visit certain Google services or websites in the Google display network. These
                                    cookies are used to record the visits of these users. The cookies are used to
                                    uniquely identify a web browser on a particular device and not to identify an
                                    individual.
You can prevent participation in this tracking process in several
                                    ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by disabling conversion tracking cookies by setting your browser
                                    to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
,
                                    which setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
https://www.aboutads.info/choices
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Further information on data protection at Google can be found here:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
and
https://services.google.com/sitestats/de.html
.
Alternatively, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative
                                    (NAI) website at
https://www.networkadvertising.org
.
5. Google Analytics Remarketing
Some of our websites use the functions of Google Analytics
                                    Remarketing in conjunction with the cross-device functions of Google AdWords and
                                    Google DoubleClick. The provider is Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow
                                    Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
This function makes it possible to link the advertising target
                                    groups created with Google Analytics Remarketing with the cross-device functions of
                                    Google AdWords and Google DoubleClick. In this way, interest-based, personalised
                                    advertising messages that have been adapted to you depending on your previous usage
                                    and surfing behaviour on one end device (e.g. mobile phone) can also be displayed on
                                    another of your end devices (e.g. tablet or PC).
If you have given your consent, Google will link your web and app
                                    browsing history with your Google Account for this purpose. In this way, the same
                                    personalised advertising messages can be displayed on every device on which you log
                                    in with your Google account.
To support this feature, Google Analytics collects
                                    Google-authenticated IDs of users that are temporarily linked to our Google
                                    Analytics data to define and create audiences for cross-device ad advertising.
You can prevent participation in this tracking process in several
                                    ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by disabling conversion tracking cookies by setting your browser
                                    to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
,
                                    which setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
https://www.aboutads.info/choices
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Further information on data protection at Google can be found here:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
and
https://services.google.com/sitestats/de.html
.
Alternatively, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative
                                    (NAI) website at
https://www.networkadvertising.org
.
6. Google Dynamic Remarketing
We use the Google Dynamic Remarketing application. This is a
                                    procedure with which we would like to address you again. Through this application,
                                    after visiting some of our websites, our advertisements can be displayed to you
                                    during your further internet use. This is done by means of cookies stored in your
                                    browser, via which your usage behaviour is recorded and evaluated by Google when you
                                    visit various websites. In this way, Google can determine your previous visit to our
                                    website. According to its own statements, Google does not combine the data collected
                                    in the course of remarketing with your personal data, which may be stored by Google.
                                    In particular, according to Google, pseudonymisation is used in remarketing.
You can prevent participation in this tracking process in several
                                    ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive
                                    advertisements from third parties;
b) by disabling conversion tracking cookies by setting your browser
                                    to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
,
                                    which setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
https://www.aboutads.info/choices,
whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Further information on data protection at Google can be found here:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
and
https://services.google.com/sitestats/de.html
.
Alternatively, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative
                                    (NAI) website at
https://www.networkadvertising.org
.
7. Google DoubleClick
Some of our websites continued to use the online marketing tool
                                    DoubleClick by Google. DoubleClick uses cookies to serve ads that are relevant to
                                    users, to improve campaign performance reports, or to prevent a user from seeing the
                                    same ads more than once. Google uses a cookie ID to record which ads are shown in
                                    which browser and can thus prevent them from being shown more than once. In
                                    addition, DoubleClick can use cookie IDs to record so-called conversions that are
                                    related to ad requests. This is the case, for example, when a user sees a
                                    DoubleClick ad and later uses the same browser to visit the advertiser's website and
                                    make a purchase. According to Google, DoubleClick cookies do not contain any
                                    personal information.
Due to the marketing tools used, your browser automatically
                                    establishes a direct connection with the Google server. We have no influence on the
                                    scope and further use of the data collected by Google through the use of this tool
                                    and therefore inform you according to our level of knowledge: Through the
                                    integration of DoubleClick, Google receives the information that you have called up
                                    the relevant part of our website or clicked on an advertisement from us. If you are
                                    registered with a Google service, Google can assign the visit to your account. Even
                                    if you are not registered with Google or have not logged in, there is the
                                    possibility that the provider learns your IP address and stores it.
You can prevent participation in this tracking process in several
                                    ways:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by disabling cookies for conversion tracking by setting your
                                    browser to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
www.google.de/settings/ads
, which
                                    setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
www.aboutads.info/choices
, whereby
                                    this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
Further information on data protection at Google can be found here:
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
and
https://services.google.com/sitestats/de.html
.
8. Google Syndication
On our websites, we occasionally use a web tracking service of the
                                    company Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, 4 Dublin, Ireland
                                    (hereinafter: Google Syndication). Within the scope of web tracking, Google
                                    Syndication uses scripts which are executed on your computer and which enable an
                                    analysis of the use of our website and your surfing behaviour (so-called
                                    tracking).
We carry out this analysis on the basis of the tracking service of
                                    Google Syndication in order to constantly optimise our internet offer and make it
                                    more available. In the course of using our website, data, such as in particular your
                                    IP address and your user activities, are transmitted to servers of the Google
                                    Syndication company and processed and stored outside the European Union, e.g. in the
                                    USA.
The legal basis for data processing is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S.1 lit. a DSGVO.
The data is deleted as soon as the purpose of its collection has
                                    been fulfilled.
For more information on the handling of transmitted data, please see
                                    the Google Syndication privacy policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
You can prevent the collection and forwarding of personal data (in
                                    particular your IP address) and the processing of this data by deactivating the
                                    execution of script code in your browser, installing a script blocker in your
                                    browser (you can find this, for example, at
www.noscript.net
)
                                    or activating the "Do Not Track" setting in your browser.
9. Google Ads Measurement
We use "Google Ads Measurement" on some of our websites, a service
                                    of Google Ireland Limited, Google Building Gordon House, Barrow St, Dublin 4,
                                    Ireland (hereinafter referred to as "Google"). Google Ads Measurement stores and
                                    processes information about your user behaviour on our websites. For this purpose,
                                    Google Ads Measurement uses, among other things, cookies, i.e. small text files that
                                    are stored locally in the cache of your web browser on your end device and that
                                    enable an analysis of your use of our website.
We use Google Ads Measurement for marketing and optimization
                                    purposes, in particular to analyze the use of our website and to continuously
                                    improve individual functions and offers as well as the user experience. Through the
                                    statistical evaluation of user behavior, we can improve our offer and make it more
                                    interesting for you as a user.
The legal basis for data processing is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S.1 lit. a DSGVO.
You can prevent the installation of cookies by deleting existing
                                    cookies and deactivating the storage of cookies in the settings of your web browser.
                                    Please note that in this case you may not be able to use the full functionality of
                                    our website. You can also prevent the collection of the aforementioned information
                                    by Google by setting an opt-out cookie on one of the websites linked below:
a) by an appropriate setting of your browser software, in particular
                                    the suppression of third party cookies leads to the fact that you do not receive any
                                    advertisements from third party providers;
b) by disabling cookies for conversion tracking by setting your
                                    browser to block cookies from the domain "www.googleadservices.com",
https://www.google.de/settings/ads
,
                                    which setting will be deleted when you delete your cookies;
c) by deactivating the interest-based ads of the providers that are
                                    part of the self-regulation campaign "About Ads" via the link
https://www.aboutads.info/choices
,
                                    whereby this setting is deleted when you delete your cookies;
d) by permanent deactivation in your browsers Firefox, Internet
                                    Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
https://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
.
                                    We would like to point out that in this case you may not be able to use all
                                    functions of this offer to their full extent.
You can find more information about data protection at Google here:
http://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy
.
10. Seeding Alliance
Seeding Alliance collects anonymized information about user
                                    behavior, such as what content or products were viewed, which Seeding Alliance
                                    Native Advertising campaigns play. This helps Seeding Alliance to better target
                                    native advertising campaigns and show you more relevant advertising. All collectable
                                    information is anonymously assigned by Seeding Alliance to a multi-digit
                                    identification number, which is stored in a cookie on the user's computer. This
                                    means that it is not possible to draw any conclusions about the identity of the
                                    user. If IP addresses are collected, this is done immediately and anonymously.
                                    Collected data is processed in computer centres within the EU and stored in
                                    encrypted form in accordance with data protection regulations. Personal data is
                                    generally not collected. The legal basis is therefore Art. 6 para. 1 p. 1 lit. f
                                    DSGVO.
Further information:
https://seeding-alliance.de/datenschutz/
Link to opt out:
https://seeding-alliance.de/opt-out/
11. Facebook Custom Audiences / Facebook Pixel
Furthermore, some of our websites use the remarketing function
                                    "Custom Audiences" of Meta Platforms Ireland Limited ("Facebook"). This allows users
                                    of the websites to be shown interest-based advertisements ("Facebook ads") when they
                                    visit the Facebook social network or other websites that also use this procedure.
                                    We thereby pursue the interest of showing you advertisements that are of interest to
                                    you in order to make our website more interesting for you.
Due to the marketing tools used, your browser automatically
                                    establishes a direct connection with the Facebook server. We have no influence on
                                    the scope and further use of the data collected by Facebook through the use of this
                                    tool and therefore inform you according to our level of knowledge: Through the
                                    integration of Facebook Custom Audiences, Facebook receives the information that you
                                    have accessed the corresponding website of our Internet presence, or clicked on an
                                    ad of ours. If you are registered with a Facebook service, Facebook can assign the
                                    visit to your account. Even if you are not registered with Facebook or have not
                                    logged in, it is possible that the provider will learn and store your IP address and
                                    other identifying features.
Deactivating the "Facebook Custom Audiences" function is possible
                                    for logged-in users at
https://www.facebook.com/settings/?tab=ads#
.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For more information on data processing by Facebook, please visit
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
.
12. X Ads
We use "X Ads" on some of our websites, a service provided by
                                    Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02
                                    AX07 Ireland.
X Ads stores and processes information about your user
                                    behaviour on our website. For this purpose, X Ads uses, among other things,
                                    cookies, i.e. small text files that are stored locally in the cache of your web
                                    browser on your terminal device and that enable an analysis of your use of our
                                    website.
We use X Ads for marketing and optimization purposes, in
                                    particular to analyze the use of our website and to continuously improve individual
                                    functions and offers as well as the user experience. Through the statistical
                                    evaluation of user behavior, we can improve our offer and make it more interesting
                                    for you as a user.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For more information about the third-party provider's privacy
                                    practices, please visit the following website:
https://twitter.com/de/privacy
.
13. GetSiteControl
We occasionally use the provider GetSiteControl (GetWebCraft Limited
                                    Klimentos 41-43, Klimentos Tower, Flat/Office 25, 1061, Nicosia, Cyprus).
GetSiteControl is a program that displays popups and overlay windows
                                    for information purposes and better user guidance on the website. The windows can be
                                    controlled according to certain rules (e.g. number of page visits). For this
                                    purpose, cookies are set by GetSiteControl.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For more information about the third-party provider's privacy
                                    practices, please visit the following website:
https://getsitecontrol.com/privacy/
.
14. Adition
We sometimes use the ADITION service from ADITION technologies AG,
                                    Oststraße 55, 40211 Düsseldorf, Germany on our websites.
ADITION uses cookies to control and optimise the display of
                                    advertising material placed by ADITION's customers for the user. This concerns, for
                                    example, the maximum display frequency of advertisements that a user can see. In
                                    addition, ADITION uses stored cookie information for statistical surveys in
                                    individual cases.
ADITION does not store any personal data such as name, e-mail
                                    addresses or other personal details by setting cookies. All information is purely
                                    anonymous and contains technical information such as the frequency and date of
                                    display of advertising material, the browser used or the operating system installed.
                                    ADITION works in all processes of data collection strictly in accordance with German
                                    data protection law. All stored data is stored on servers in the Federal Republic of
                                    Germany.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For information on ADITION's privacy policy, please visit
www.adition.com/kontakt/datenschutz/
.
15. Business Ads
On our Internet pages, interests (e.g. advertising banners clicked,
                                    sub-pages visited etc.) of you are sometimes recorded in a cookie by means of
                                    anonymous user numbers on behalf of Business Advertising GmbH ("businessAD"),
                                    Tersteegenstraße 30, 40474 Düsseldorf. Under no circumstances will personal data
                                    such as name, address or IP address be stored in these cookies.
The delivery of usage-based online advertising is also operated by
                                    the advertising marketer Business Advertising GmbH. For this purpose, other service
                                    providers (so-called vendors) are used for these advertising purposes as well as for
                                    market research and statistical purposes.
The legal basis for the processing of your data is your consent in
                                    accordance with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
You can find the provider's privacy policy here:
https://www.businessad.de/datenschutz
.
16. PubMatic
In some areas of our websites, we use PubMatic, a service for
                                    displaying usage-based advertising. The provider is PubMatic Inc, 305 Main Street,
                                    First Floor, Redwood City, CA 9406, USA. PubMatic uses technology to deliver ads
                                    that are relevant to you.
The legal basis for data processing is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For more information about privacy, please see PubMatic's privacy
                                    policy here:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
17. Outbrain
We use Outbrain, of Outbrain UK Limited,100 New Bridge Street,
                                    London, UK within some of our websites.
The purpose of the processing is the playout of personalized ads and
                                    content as well as the implementation of ad and content measurements and the
                                    acquisition of knowledge about target groups and product developments. For this
                                    purpose, so-called tracking pixels are integrated on our pages. When you visit our
                                    pages, a direct connection between your browser and the Outbrain server is
                                    established via the tracking pixel. Outbrain thereby receives, among other things,
                                    the information from your browser that our page was called up from your end device.
                                    We can then select which segments of site visitors (e.g. visit to a specific
                                    section) should be shown our advertising. The display of advertising only takes
                                    place on external websites that have integrated the Outbrain widget. For this
                                    purpose, Outbrain processes the data displayed in the interest profile, which you
                                    can retrieve under the link
https://my.outbrain.com/recommendations-settings/home
.
The legal basis for the processing is your consent in accordance
                                    with Art. 6 Para. 1 S. 1 lit. a DSGVO.
For more information, please see Outbrain's privacy policy at
https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy
.
18. Taboola
On some of our websites, we give Taboola Germany GmbH, c/o MindSpace
                                    Friedrichstraße 68, 10117 Berlin the opportunity to show you interest-based and
                                    personalized recommendations via a feed using cookies and pixels. The
                                    recommendations can be, for example, articles or advertisements from us or from
                                    third parties. When you visit our website, we display these recommendations as well
                                    as Taboola's feed at the end of an article and provide Taboola with browser data
                                    that is necessary to show you Taboola's feed at the end of the article.
We allow Taboola cookies to be set so that Taboola receives the
                                    information they contain. We have no influence on the processing of your personal
                                    data by Taboola, in particular the personalisation of recommendations, so that we
                                    have to refer to the data protection declaration (
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy
) and the cookie policy (
https://www.taboola.com/policies/cookie-policy
)
                                    of Taboola. In this respect, Taboola is responsible for the processing of your
                                    personal data under data protection law. In order to enable you to continue to use
                                    our website and journalistic and editorial offers without a subscription via
                                    advertising revenue, our interest in processing your personal data outweighs your
                                    interest in advertising-free use. In our view, there is also a parallel between our
                                    interests and yours in improving our website and advertising offers. Your data will
                                    not be stored by us as a matter of principle.
You have the possibility at any time to object to the processing of
                                    your personal data by us and Taboola under the following link:
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy#user-choices-and-optout
.
This document has been translated into English using the software
                                    DeepL. As there may have been inconsistencies in the translation, in case of doubt
                                    the wording of the German privacy police shall be deemed legally binding.
Deutsche Version
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://usercentrics.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policy
www.usercentrics.com
Last update: March 3rd, 2025
Your privacy is important to us. This Privacy Policy covers what we collect and how we use, disclose, transfer and store your information.
I. NAME OF THE PERSON RESPONSIBLE
The person responsible within the meaning of the GDPR and other national data protection laws of the member states as well as other data protection regulations is the
Usercentrics GmbH
Sendlinger Straße 7
80331 Munich
Germany
E-mail:
datenschutz@usercentrics.com
| Website: www.usercentrics.com
II. DATA PROTECTION OFFICER
You can contact our data protection officer under:
SECUWING GmbH & Co. KG
Maximilian Hartung
Frauentorstr. 9
86152 Augsburg
Germany
E-mail:
epost@datenschutz-agentur.de
| Phone: +49 821 90786450 | Fax: +49 821 90786459
III. GENERAL INFORMATION ABOUT THE COLLECTION AND PROCESSING OF YOUR DATA
1. Scope of processing
In principle, we process personal data only insofar as this is necessary to provide a functioning website and our content and services. The processing of personal data of our users takes place regularly only with the consent of the user. An exception applies to cases in which prior consent can not be obtained for reasons of fact and the processing of the data is permitted by law.
2. Legal basis
Insofar as we obtain the consent of the data subject for processing of personal data, Art. 6 para.1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR serves as a legal basis.
If the processing of personal data is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the data subject is a party, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR is a legal basis. This also applies to processing operations required to carry out pre-contractual actions.
Insofar as processing of personal data is required to fulfill a legal obligation that is subject to our company, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. c GDPR serves as the legal basis.
If processing is necessary to safeguard the legitimate interests of our company or a third party, and if the interests, fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject do not prevail over the first interest, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR serves as the legal basis for processing.
3. Storage and deletion of your data
In principle, we only store personal data for as long as is necessary to fulfill contractual or legal obligations for which we collected the data. After that, we delete the data immediately, unless we still need the data until the expiry of the statutory limitation period for evidence purposes for claims under civil law or due to statutory retention obligations.
For evidentiary purposes, we must retain contractual data for six years from the end of the year in which the business relationship with you ends. Any claims become statute-barred at this point at the earliest according to the statutory limitation period.
Even after this, we still have to store some of your data for accounting reasons. We are obliged to do so because of legal documentation obligations that may arise from the German Commercial Code, the German Fiscal Code, the German Banking Act, the German Money Laundering Act and the German Securities Trading Act. The periods specified there for the retention of documents are two to ten years.
We delete or block the personal data of the data subject as soon as the purpose of the storage is fulfilled. It may also be stored if provided for by the European or national legislator in EU regulations, laws or regulations to which our company is subject. Blocking or deletion of the data also takes place when a storage period prescribed by the standards mentioned expires, unless there is a need for further storage of the data for conclusion of a contract or fulfillment of the contract.
4. Please note
Your consent data will be processed for the use of this website and the use of the implemented Consent Management Platform. We use the Google Cloud Platform, provided by Google Cloud EMEA Ltd. The servers are located in Germany and Belgium. We would like to inform you that we cannot exclude the fact that data may be transferred to the US and may be subject to access by the US security authorities in accordance with 50 U.S.C. §1881(b)(4), 50 U.S.C. §1881a (= FISA 702). In the event that personal data is transferred to the USA or other third countries, we have taken necessary measures with Google in accordance with Art. 44 et seq. GDPR. More information can be found in the Data Protection references of Google. Additionally we have taken further safety measures to ensure the security of the data.
IV. PROVISION OF THE WEBSITE AND CREATION OF LOG FILES
1. Scope of processing
Each time our website is accessed, our system automatically collects data and information from the computer system of the calling computer. This is e.g. information like
Information about the type and version of your internet browser,
The operating system of your computer or smartphone,
Your internet service provider,
Your IP address,
Date and time of your access,
Geographic location,
Websites from which you came to us,
Websites that you visit from our site.
When applicable – Referrer URL from Partner Website.
We collect such technical information in so-called “log files”, so that you can display our website correctly and we can identify the causes of any technical problems, for the technical optimization of our websites and for the purpose of the security of our computer systems and networks. For these purposes, we have a legitimate interest in the processing of data according to Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR.
The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary for the purpose of its collection. Typically, this technical information will be erased or rendered unrecognizable at the latest after seven days.
The collection of data for the provision of the website and the storage of the data in log files is essential for the operation of the website.
V. CONTACT REQUESTS FOR PRODUCT INFORMATION, A DEMO OR OTHER CONCERNS
1. Description and scope of data processing
On our website you can contact us via various options: e.g. contact form, book a demo, request a quote, request product information, request guides. If you make use of these options, the data entered in the input mask will be transmitted to us and saved. In addition to the specific input macro data, the IP address and the date and time of the request are collected and stored.
Alternatively, a contact via e-mail address is possible. In this case, your personal data transmitted by e-mail will be stored.
In this context, there will be no disclosure of the data to third parties, unless this is necessary for the processing of the query (for example, demo booking tool). In any case, the data will be used exclusively for processing the conversation, unless agreed upon otherwise.
2. Legal basis for processing
Legal basis for the processing of the data is in general consent of the user, art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR.
3. Purpose of the data processing
The processing of personal data from the input mask is solely for the processing of your request. In the case of contact via e-mail, this also includes the required legitimate interest in the processing of the data.
The other personal data processed during the sending process serve to prevent misuse of the contact form and to ensure the security of our information technology systems.
4. Duration of storage
If you have booked a demo, requested product information or an offer, we reserve the right to store the data for two years to measure the profitability of our sales and marketing. Otherwise, we will delete the data as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection. For the personal data entered in the contact form and those sent by e-mail, this is the case when the respective conversation with you has ended. The conversation is ended when it can be inferred from the circumstances that the relevant facts have been finally clarified.
5. Revoking consent and removal possibility
You have the possibility at any time to revoke your consent to the processing of the personal data. If you contact us by e-mail, you may object to the storage of his personal data at any time. In such a case, the conversation can not continue. All personal data stored in the course of contacting will be deleted in this case.
VI. NEWSLETTER, PRODUCT RECOMMENDATIONS, WEBINARS,CUSTOMER SURVEYS AND PARTNER PORTAL
1. Newsletter
When signing up for the Newsletter, data entered into the input mask will also be stored, in order to provide the Newsletter. The legal basis for this processing is art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. Your e-mail address, time of subscription and the IP address used for subscribing will be retained as long as you subscribe to our Newsletter. This service is provided by means of a double opt-in. Thus, you will receive an e-mail containing a link by which you can confirm that you are the owner of the e-mail address and wish to be notified via our e-mail service. You can unsubscribe from this service at any time by contacting us at
unsubcribe@usercentrics.com
or by opting out via the link provided in each Newsletter any time.
2. Product Recommendations
You will be informed by Usercentrics about relevant changes concerning the Services, such as the implementation of additional functions, by e-mail, if you purchase the Usercentrics product. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. f GDPR in conjunction with § 7 Para. 3 UWG, justified by our interest in sending you individual offers.
3. Webinars
Usercentrics offers from time to time webinars, to which you can sign up from our website. In these cases the data put in the sign-up form during the sign-up process will be used by Usercentrics for the purposes of the webinar and communication regarding the webinar and other relevant topics. If the webinar is organized together with a partner, then the data might be shared with them. The data is processed on the legal basis of consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You have the right to withdraw your consent to process your data at any time by contacting
unsubscribe@usercentrics.com
.
4. Customer Surveys
If you place an order with us, we will also use your e-mail address to send you customer and satisfaction surveys. We will use the results of the surveys to improve our products and services. The legal basis for this is Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR, if you have given your consent. In some cases Art. 6 para. 1 lit. f GDPR might apply, justified by our legitimate interest in constantly improving our service.
5. Preference Management Platform
We use the Usercentrics Preference Management Platform, in order to provide you as a recipient of our newsletter and other kinds of communication the option to choose which kinds of communication you want to receive. You can change your settings and preferences at any time. By using this service your e-mail address and the preference decision will be stored. This data is used in order for us to be able to send communication based on your preferences. The above mentioned data is only processed with your consent (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR). You can withdraw your consent at any time. The data is not shared with any third parties.
6. Partner Portal
We use the Usercentrics Partner Portal as a Partner Management tool. When using the Partner Portal, the personal data of our Partners might be processed. This can include the following information: name, e-mail address, company name and information, information about signed deals (deal data, partner tier, etc.), information on the partner’s clients (including e-mail address and name), behavior in the Partner Portal, and possibly transactional information. This data is processed in order to fulfill our contractual relationship. The data is kept for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose. Data collected is not shared with third parties.
7. Support tickets
When you create a support ticket with Usercentrics, we will be process the data that you have entered into the ticket, for the purposes of evaluating and responding to your request. In this case, we use the service Zendesk provided by Zendesk, Inc., 1019 Market Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA (hereinafter Zendesk) as a support system, which allows users to communicate with Usercentrics. In order to do so the data entered into the ticket will be processed (name, e-mail address, etc.) as well as the IP aAddress will be processed. The legal basis for the processing is consent (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR). When creating a ticket through Zendesk, you also accept the use of following features on Zendesk: Zendesk Advanced AI, Intelligent triage, Intelligence in the context panel, Generative AI for agents, Macro suggestions for admins, Autoreply and internal note trigger actions, and Generative AI for Help Center. You can find further information on Zendesk’s usage of AI
here
. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection.
For more information on how data is processed by Zendesk, you can visit Zendesk’s
privacy policy
or contact Zendesk at
privacy@zendesk.com
.
VII. YOU BECOME A CUSTOMER OR PARTNER OF USERCENTRICS
1. Description and scope of data processing
You can become a customer or partner of Usercentrics. The following data is collected during the registration process:
your e-mail address
first name and last name
if necessary company affiliation,
payment information (possibly the company)
other data that we request from you, and
possibly data that we receive in the course of the business relationship.
2. Legal basis for processing
Legal basis for the processing of the data is in the presence of the consent of the user art. 6 para 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR and art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR, since the registration of the fulfillment of a contract or the implementation of pre-contractual measures.
3. Purpose of the data processing
Registration is required to fulfill the customer or partner contract or to carry out pre-contractual measures.
4. Opposition and removal possibility
As a customer you always have the option to cancel your account. You can change the data stored about you at any time. If the data is required to fulfill a contract or to carry out pre-contractual measures, premature deletion of the data is only possible, unless contractual or legal obligations preclude deletion.
5. Embedded Links
In case you sign up for our services, please note that we evaluate your user behavior when you register for our service. We record your campaign behavior. Embedded links contain UTM parameters and other identifiers which will identify all parameters of your “clicks”.
The UTM parameters and other identifiers allow us to add trackable extensions to your URLs. The parameters are:
Medium: this parameter describes the medium in which the link is embedded. Examples: email, social media or website.
Source: with this UTM parameter we define the source of the link. This can be newsletters, websites, apps or social media channels.
Campaign: this type of UTM parameter is used to identify the actual campaigns. For example, if we send you a newsletter every month, the individual newsletters can be evaluated separately.
Term: keywords, so that the link can be identified better.
Content: within a campaign we insert different elements to be tracked in order to identify them clearly and evaluate them separately. Examples: button, image or video.
Coupons: identifiers added to a campaign in order to track interactions with a campaign element or apply a discount.
The identifiers are generated by the service providers listed in section IX. of this privacy policy. We use the identifiers in combination with conversion events, such as account creation (for example, if a trial period starts or you upgrade to a premium account) to inform the service providers about the event in relation to the provided identifiers.
VIII. COOKIES AND TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
1. What are Cookies?
Web Browser Cookies: A web browser cookie is a small text file sent from a website to your computer or mobile device where it is stored by your web browser. Web browser cookies may store information such as your IP address or other identifier, your browser type, and information about the content you display and interact with on the digital services. By storing such information, web browser cookies can store your preferences and settings for online services and analyze how you use online services.
Tracking Technologies: Web Beacons, Pixels, Tags, Scripts.
E-mails and mobile applications can contain small, transparent image files or lines of code to record how you interact with them. This information is used to help website and app publishers better analyze and improve their services.
2. Use, legal basis and purpose
We use cookies to make our website more user-friendly. Some elements of our website require that the calling browser be identified even after a page break. Cookies as well as the storage of data in the local storage only allow functionalities which should contribute to a positive user experience on our website. We do not use cookies with personal data without given consent.
In addition, we use cookies on our website that allow an analysis of users’ browsing behavior.
When accessing our website, the user is informed about the use of cookies for analytics purposes and his consent to the processing of the personal data used in this context is obtained.
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using technically necessary cookies is Article 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR. The purpose of using technically necessary cookies is to facilitate the use of websites for users. Some features of our website can not be offered without the use of cookies. For these, it is necessary that the browser is recognized even after a page break. We require cookies for the following applications: acceptance of language settings. The user data collected through technically necessary cookies will not be used to create user profiles.
The legal basis for the processing of personal data using cookies for analytics purposes is the consent of the user Art. 6 para. 1 lit. a GDPR. The use of the analytics cookies is for the purpose of improving the quality of our website and its contents. Through the analytics cookies, we learn how the website is used and so we can constantly optimize our offer.
3. Duration of storage, objection and disposal options
Cookies are stored on the computer of the user and transmitted to our side. Therefore, as a user, you have full control over the use of cookies. By changing the settings in your internet browser, you can disable or restrict the transmission of cookies. Already saved cookies can be deleted at any time. This can also be done automatically. If cookies are disabled for our website, it may not be possible to use all the functions of the website to the full.
4. Recipients of data
We only pass on the data we have collected if this is necessary for the fulfillment of the contract or for the provision of the technical functionality of the website, or if there is another legal basis for passing on the data.
In principle, we process your data ourselves. In some cases, however, we also use service providers. In addition to the service providers mentioned in this privacy policy, these may include, in particular, data centers that store our website and databases, IT service providers that maintain our systems, and consulting companies. If we pass on data to service providers, they may only use the data to fulfill their tasks. The service providers have been carefully selected and commissioned by us. They are contractually bound to our instructions, have suitable technical and organizational measures in place to protect the rights of the data subjects and are regularly monitored by us.
In addition, disclosure may take place in connection with official enquiries, court orders and legal proceedings if it is necessary for legal prosecution or enforcement. When governments make a lawful demand for customer data from Usercentrics, Usercentrics strives to limit the disclosure. Usercentrics will only release specific data mandated by the relevant legal demand.
If compelled to disclose your data, Usercentrics will promptly notify you and provide a copy of the demand unless legally prohibited from doing so.
If Usercentrics commissions third parties with the collection, processing and use of data within the scope of commissioned processing in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, this will also take place exclusively in compliance with the statutory provisions on data protection.
IX. IMPLEMENTED TECHNOLOGIES
1. Third Party Technologies used on Website
Zapier
We are using the service Zapier as workflow automation software. The service is provided by Zapier Inc., 548 Market St., # 62411, San Francisco, California 94104, United States of America. This service is used to transfer information entered into forms on our website to our systems. Additionally, information like IP Address might be processed through the service. Legal basis for the usage of this service is legitimate interest, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. f GDPR, as the service is required to transfer the input to our internal systems. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose for its collection. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Zapier, you can visit Zapier’s
privacy policy
or contact Zapier at
privacy@zapier.com
.
LinkedIn Leads
We are using the service provided by LinkedIn Leads for lead generation. When signing up for Usercentrics events or content on LinkedIn, we will process your data. The email address will be used for sending the resources, and for direct advertising and contact initiation in the context of the products and services we offer. The data is also shared with Google Ads for the purpose of retargeting. Additionally, the data will be shared with Expandi.io (ProfitSoft B.V., Meerenakkerplein 51, Eindhoven, 5652BJ, the Netherlands), for the automation of communication and interaction on LinkedIn . You can find further information
here
.
The collection of the data does not take place on the Usercentrics website, but on the sign-up forms on LinkedIn. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time.
Personio
We are using the service Personio as applicant management software. The service is provided by Personio GmbH, Rundfunkplatz 4, 80335 Munich, Germany. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. The data will be stored for a period of 60 days after the application process has been concluded. For further information on how data is processed by Personio, you can visit Personio’s
privacy policy
or contact Personio at privacy@personio.com.
Storylane
We are using the service provided by Storylane Inc. as an interactive demo platform. The service is provided by Storylane Inc., 2261 Market Street #4813, San Francisco, CA 94114, United States of America. The service is used as an interactive demo platform, in order to provide demo’s on the website, which users can use to guide themselves through the product demo. When using this service, data like the IP Address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Storylane, you can visit Storylane’s
privacy policy
or contact Storylane at
privacy@storylane.io
.
Zoom
We are using the service provided by Zoom as a video conferencing service. The service is provided by Zoom Video Communications Inc., 55 Almaden Boulevard, 6th Floor, San Jose, CA 95113, United States of America. The service is used as a video conferencing service in order to host webinars and other types of video conferences. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
.
For more information on how data is processed by Zoom, you can visit Zoom’s
privacy policy
or contact Zoom at privacy@zoom.us.
SayMine Technologies
We use the service MineOS provided by SayMine Technologies Ltd., Alon 1 Tower, 94 Yigal Alon St, Tel Aviv-Yafo, 6789139, Israel (hereinafter SayMine) in order to provide a data privacy request management tool. In order to do so the name, email address and other data shared by the requester may be processed. The legal basis for the processing is legal obligation (Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. c GDPR), as the service is used in order to fulfill the legal obligations of responding to requests for exercising the data subjects’ rights under the GDPR. The data will be deleted as soon as it is no longer necessary to achieve the purpose of its collection.
For more information on how data is processed by SayMine, you can visit SayMine’s
privacy policy
or contact SayMine at
portal@saymine.com
.
Stripe
We are using the service provided by Stripe as an online payment system. The service is provided by Stripe, Inc., 3180 18th Street, San Francisco, CA 94110, United States of America. The service is used in order to enable the payment process on the website. Legal basis is performance of a contract, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. b GDPR, as this service is required in order to be able to finalize the purchase process. When using this service data, like the payment information (including payment card information), purchase information, as well as IP Address, might be processed. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
.
For more information on how data is processed by Stripe, you can visit Stripe’s
privacy policy
or contact Stripe at
privacy@stripe.com
.
Chili Piper
We are using the service provided by Chili Piper as a booking and meeting platform, in order to provide our users the ability to schedule meetings with our teams, as well as for video conferencing. The service is provided by Chili Piper, Inc., 228 Park Ave. S., #78136, New York, New York 10003-1502, United States of America. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. When using this service data, such as meeting date, time and title, guest list, first name, last name, and e-mail address might be processed. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have agreed on standard contractual clauses with the service provider.
For more information on how data is processed by Chili Piper, you can visit Chili Piper’s
privacy policy
or contact Chili Piper at
support@chilipiper.com
.
Pardot
We are using the service provided by Pardot as customer relationship management software, in order to manage marketing automation and lead generation. The service is provided by Salesforce, Erika-Mann-Straße 31-37, 80636 Munich, Germany. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. When using this service, data such as first and last name, contact information, e-mail address, company information, as well as IP Address might be processed.
For more information on how data is processed by Pardot, you can visit Pardot’s
privacy policy
or contact Pardot at
privacy@salesforce.com
.
Google Customer Match
We use Google Customer Match for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, 4 Barrow Street, Dublin D04 E5W5, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, will be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by Google, you can visit Google’s
privacy policy
.
Meta Custom Audiences
We use Meta Custom Audiences for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by Meta Platform Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin, D02, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by Meta, you can visit Meta’s
privacy policy
.
LinkedIn Matched Audiences
We use LinkedIn Matched Audiences for marketing and retargeting purposes. This service is provided by LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company, Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Ireland. When using this service, data, such as first and last name, as well as e-mail address, might be processed. The legal basis is consent, Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a GDPR. You can revoke your consent at any time. This service might transfer data outside of the EU/EEA. For that case we have signed standard contractual clauses with the service provider and the provider is included in the
Data Privacy Framework List
. For more information on how data is processed by LinkedIn, you can visit LinkedIn’s
privacy policy
.
2. Recipients of data
Usercentrics does not sell, trade or otherwise transfer to outside parties any personally identifiable information.
This does not include trusted third parties or processors that assist us in operating our website, conducting our business, or servicing you. Such trusted parties may have access to personally identifiable information on a need to know basis and will be contractually obliged to keep your information confidential.
We will also share data among the Usercentrics entities (Usercentrics A/S, Usercentrics GmbH, Cybot A/S (including CYBOT A/S, odštěpný závod office in Prague), Usercentrics Unipessoal, Usercentrics Inc.), here also including sharing data among Cookiebot™ and Usercentrics products when needed. All the entities may have access to personally identifiable information on a need to know basis and will be contractually obliged to keep your information confidential (joint controller agreement).
We may also release your information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce our site policies, or protect our rights or the rights of others, property, or safety. Furthermore, non-personally identifiable visitor information may be provided to other parties for marketing, advertising, or other uses.
We only pass on the data we have collected if this is necessary for the fulfillment of the contract or for the provision of the technical functionality of the website, or if there is another legal basis for passing on the data.
In principle, we process your data ourselves. In some cases, however, we also use service providers. In addition to the processors mentioned in this privacy policy, these may include, in particular, data centers that store our websites and databases, IT service providers that maintain our systems, and consulting companies. If we pass on data to processors, they may only use the data to fulfill their tasks. The processors have been carefully selected and commissioned by us. They are contractually bound by our instructions, have suitable technical and organizational measures in place to protect the rights of the data subjects and are regularly monitored by us.
In addition, disclosure may take place in connection with official enquiries, court orders and legal proceedings if it is necessary for legal prosecution or enforcement. When governments make a lawful demand for customer data from Usercentrics, Usercentrics strives to limit the disclosure. Usercentrics will only release specific data mandated by the relevant legal demand.
If compelled to disclose your data, Usercentrics will promptly notify you and provide a copy of the demand unless legally prohibited from doing so.
If Usercentrics commissions third parties with the collection, processing, and use of data within the scope of commissioned processing in accordance with Art. 28 GDPR, this will also take place exclusively in compliance with the statutory provisions on data protection.
Matomo Opt-Out
X. CALIFORNIA CONSUMER PRIVACY ACT COMPLIANCE
In addition to the above mentioned, the following provisions apply specifically for residents of California, USA.
The California privacy laws provide residents with specific rights regarding their personal information. This section describes the consumers’ rights and explains how to exercise those rights, subject to exceptions under the law.
1. Your rights under California Privacy Law
Right to Know About Personal Information Collected, Sold or Shared (“Right to Know”)
You have the right to request to know what personal information we have collected about you, including:
The categories of personal information collected
The categories of sources from which the personal information is collected
The business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling personal information
The categories of third parties to whom the personal information is shared
The specific pieces of personal information collected about you that are permitted by law
Right To Request Deletion of Personal Information (“Right to Delete”)
You have the right to request that we delete any of your personal information that we collect, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive your request
and verify your identity
, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your Personal Information from our records, unless an exception applies.
Right to Correct Inaccurate Personal Information (“Right to Correct”)
You have the right to request correction of inaccurate personal information that we maintain about you or update the information we have on file.
Right to Opt Out of Sale or Sharing of Your Personal Information
You have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information. Usercentrics does not sell personal information, including personal information of minors under the age of 16. You can make use of your right to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information by clicking the “Do Not Sell Or Share My Personal Information” link at the bottom of the page.
Right to Non-Discrimination For The Exercise Of Your Privacy Rights
You have the right to be protected from discrimination for exercising your rights. We will not discriminate against you for exercising your rights.
Right to Limit the Use of Sensitive Personal Information
Usercentrics does not use sensitive personal information in any manner that requires offering a right to limit its use.
2. How To Submit a Request to Exercise Your Right to Know, Delete, or Correct
You may submit your request by sending an email to privacy@usercentrics.com. We will compare the information you submit to us with the information we have in our records to ensure your request meets the definition of “verifiable consumer request” under the California Privacy Laws. We will then respond to your request in accordance with the requirements.
Response Timing and Format
Usercentrics endeavors to respond to a request within forty-five (45) days of its receipt. If Usercentrics requires more time (up to 90 days), you will be informed of the reason and extension period in writing. Any disclosures provided will only cover the twelve (12) month period preceding the receipt of the verifiable request. If applicable, the response will also explain the reasons for which Usercentrics cannot comply with a request. For data portability requests, Usercentrics will select a format to provide the Personal Information that is readily usable and should allow transmission of the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance. Usercentrics does not charge a fee to process or respond to the verifiable request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If Usercentrics determines that the request warrants a fee, we will inform why Usercentrics made that decision and provide a cost estimate before completing the request.
3. Children Under the Age of 16
Usercentrics does not knowingly collect or disclose the personal information of children under the age of 16. As stated above, Usercentrics also does not sell or share personal information, including personal information, of children under the age of 16.
XI. MINORS
Our services are not aimed at children under 13 years. We do not knowingly collect information from children under the age of 13. If you have not reached the age limit, do not use the services and do not provide us with your personal information. If you are a parent of a child below the age limit and you learn that your child has provided Usercentrics personal information, please contact us at
datenschutz@usercentrics.com
and insist on exercising your rights of access, correction, cancellation and / or opposition. If you are resident in California and are under 16 years of age and wish to erase publicly available content, please contact us at
datenschutz@usercentrics.com.
XII. ONLINE PRESENCE IN SOCIAL NETWORKS
We maintain online presences in social networks in order to communicate there with customers and interested parties, among others, and to provide information about our products and services.
The users’ data is usually processed by the social networks concerned for market research and advertising purposes. In this way, usage profiles can be created based on the interests of the users. For this purpose, cookies and other identifiers are stored on the users’ computers. On the basis of these usage profiles, advertisements, for example, are then placed within the social networks but also on third-party websites.
As part of the operation of our online presences, it is possible that we can access information such as statistics on the use of our online presences, which are provided by the social networks. These statistics are aggregated and may include, in particular, demographic information and data on interaction with our online presences and the posts and content distributed via them. Please refer to the list below for details and links to the data of the social networks that we can access as operators of the online presences.
The legal basis for data processing is Art. 6 para. 1 s. 1 lit. a and b, in order to stay in contact with and inform our customers and to carry out pre-contractual measures with future customers and interested parties.
For the legal basis of the data processing carried out by the social networks on their own responsibility, please refer to the data protection information of the respective social network. The links below also provide you with further information on the respective data processing and the options to object.
We would like to point out that data protection requests can be asserted most efficiently with the respective provider of the social network, as only these providers have access to the data and can take appropriate measures directly. Below is a list with information on the social networks on which we operate online presences:
Facebook (USA and Canada: Facebook Inc., 1601 Willow Road, Menlo Park, California 94025, USA; all other countries: Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Operation of the Facebook fan page in joint responsibility on the basis of
an agreement on joint processing of personal data
(so-called Page Insights Supplement regarding the controller).
Information on the processed Page Insights data and the contact option in the event of data protection enquiries:
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/information_about_page_insights_data
Privacy policy:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
Opt-out:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads and http://www.youronlinechoices.com
.
Instagram (Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Privacy policy:
https://help.instagram.com/519522125107875
Google/ YouTube (Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland).
Privacy policy: https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Opt-out:
https://www.google.com/settings/ads
.
Twitter (Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02 AX07 Ireland).
Privacy policy: https://twitter.com/en/privacy
Opt-Out:
https://twitter.com/personalization
.
LinkedIn (LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Ireland).
Operation of the LinkedIn company page in joint responsibility on the basis of
an agreement on joint processing of personal data
(so-called Page Insights Joint Controller Addendum).
Information on the Page Insights data processed and the contact option in the event of data protection enquiries:
https://legal.linkedin.com/pages-joint-controller-addendum
Privacy policy:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
Opt-out:
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
.
Google my business
We operate a so-called Google My Business entry. Should you find us in this way, we make use of the information service offered by Google and the services of Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland (hereinafter “Google”).
We would like to point out that you use the Google site and its functions on your own responsibility. This applies in particular to the use of the social and interactive functions (e.g. commenting, sharing, rating, direct messaging). When you visit and interact with our Google My Business listing, Google also collects your IP address and other information that is present on your terminal device in the form of so-called cookies. This information is used to provide us, as the operator of the Google My Business listing, with statistical information about the use of Google services. The data collected about you in this context will be processed by Google and may be transferred to countries outside the European Union. Google generally describes what information it receives and how it is used in its privacy policy. Google provides more detailed information in its privacy policy:
Google privacy policy
We do not know how Google uses the data from the visit for its own purposes, to what extent activities of individual users are assigned, how long Google stores this data and whether data is passed on to third parties. When accessing Google services, the IP address assigned to your terminal device is transmitted to Google. Google also stores information about its users’ end devices; this may enable Google to assign IP addresses to individual users or user accounts.
If you contact us via our Google My Business entry or other Google services by direct message, we cannot rule out the possibility that these messages may also be read and evaluated by Google (both by employees and automatically). We therefore advise against providing us with personal data there. Instead, another form of communication should be chosen as early as possible. We delete conversations no later than 14 days after the last chat activity, or immediately after switching to another communication channel. The use of this service is subject to the Google Privacy Policy, which you – with use – have already agreed to.
We, as the provider of our Google My Business entry, do not collect or process any further data from your use of this Google service. Beyond that, we do not use any Google functions on our website.
XIII. DATA TRANSFER TO THIRD COUNTRIES
As explained in this privacy policy, we use services whose providers are partly located in so-called third countries (outside the European Union or the European Economic Area) or process personal data there, i.e. countries whose level of data protection does not correspond to that of the European Union. Where this is the case and the European Commission has not issued an adequacy decision (Art. 45 GDPR) for these countries, we have taken appropriate precautions to ensure an adequate level of data protection for any data transfers according to Art. 44 et seq. GDPR. These include, among others, the standard contractual clauses of the European Union or binding internal data protection regulations.
If a third country transfer is provided for and no adequacy decision or appropriate safeguards are in place, it is possible and there is a risk that authorities in the respective third country (e.g. intelligence services) may gain access to the transferred data in order to collect and analyze it, and that enforceability of your data subject rights cannot be guaranteed.
XIV. THIRD PARTY LINKS
Occasionally, at our discretion, we may include or offer third-party products or services on our website. These third-party sites have separate independent privacy policies. We therefore have no responsibility or liability for the content and activities of these linked websites. Nonetheless, we seek to protect the integrity of our website and welcome any feedback about these websites.
XV. YOUR RIGHTS
If we process your personal data you have – after successful identification – the following rights towards us:
Right to information (Article 15 GDPR, § 34 BDSG)
Right to deletion (Article 17 GDPR, § 35 BDSG)
Right to rectification (Article 16 GDPR, Section 34 BDSG)
Right to restriction of processing (Article 18 GDPR)
Right to data portability (Article 20 GDPR)
Right to withdraw consent (Article 7(3) GDPR)
Right to object to certain data processing activities (Article 21 GDPR).
In order to exercise your rights described here, you can contact us at any time using the contact details listed under “
Name of the person responsible
“.
You also have the right to complain to the data protection supervisory authority responsible for us. You can contact the data protection authority in your place of residence, which will then forward your request to the competent authority.
XVI. SECURITY AND INTEGRITY OF THE DATA
Protecting the information you give us or that we receive about you is our priority. We take appropriate security measures to protect your information from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. Usercentrics has taken measures to ensure the ongoing confidentiality, integrity, availability and resiliency of systems and services that process personal information, and will restore the availability and access to information in the event of a physical or technical incident in a timely manner.
XVII. UPDATES
We reserve the right to update this privacy policy from time to time. In the event that we make material changes that restrict Usercentrics’ rights or obligations under this Privacy Policy, we will publish a clear notice in this section of this Privacy Policy that informs users when they are updated.
Click
here
to see the previous Privacy Policy valid until March 2nd 2025.
Sub-policy 1
https://www.iubenda.com/privacy-policy/70389320:
Personenbezogene Daten, die für die folgenden Zwecke und durch die Nutzung der folgenden Dienste verarbeitet werden:
Analytik
Google Analytics mit Erweiterung für Display-Werbung, Google Analytics (Universal Analytics), Wordpress Stat und Google Analytics (Universal Analytics) mit IP-Anonymisierung
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Nutzungsdaten
Google Analytics: Berichte zur Leistung nach demografischen Merkmalen und Interessen
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Eindeutige Gerätekennzeichnung für Werbung (Google-Werbe-ID oder IDFA, beispielsweise)
Anmeldung und Authentifizierung
Direkte Anmeldung
Personenbezogene Daten: Adresse; E-Mail; Land; Name des Unternehmens; Passwort; Rechnungsadresse
Stripe OAuth
Personenbezogene Daten: Tracker; verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
Auth0
Personenbezogene Daten: Bild; E-Mail; Nachname; Passwort; Tracker; verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben; Vorname
Anzeigen von Inhalten externer Plattformen
Google Fonts
Personenbezogene Daten: Nutzungsdaten; verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
YouTube-Video-Widget und Google-Maps-Widget
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Nutzungsdaten
Datenübermittlung außerhalb der EU
Datenübermittlung in Länder, die europäische Standards gewährleisten
Personenbezogene Daten: verschiedene Datenarten
Dienste zum Schutz vor SPAM und Bots
Google reCAPTCHA
Personenbezogene Daten: Antworten auf Fragen; Aufzeichnungen des Bewegungssensors; Bewegungen der Maus; Klicks; Nutzungsdaten; Scrollposition; Tastenanschläge; Touch Events; Tracker
Hosting und Backend-Infrastruktur
iubenda Consent Solution
Personenbezogene Daten: Tracker; Während der Nutzung des Dienstes übermittelte Daten
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Personenbezogene Daten: verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
Interaktion mit externen sozialen Netzwerken und Plattformen
„Gefällt mir“-Schaltfläche und soziale Widgets für Facebook
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Nutzungsdaten
Kontaktieren des Nutzers
Kontaktformular
Personenbezogene Daten: Adresse; E-Mail
Optimierung und Verbreitung des Datenverkehrs
Cloudflare
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
Bunny CDN
Personenbezogene Daten: Nutzungsdaten
Plattform-Dienste und Hosting
WordPress.com
Personenbezogene Daten: verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
Remarketing und Behavioural-Targeting
Google Ads Remarketing
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Nutzungsdaten
Standortbezogene Interaktionen
Geolocation
Personenbezogene Daten: Geografische Position
Umgang mit Aktivitätsdaten
Vom Gerät aufgezeichnete Aktivitätsdaten
Personenbezogene Daten: Allgemeine Aktivitätsdaten
Umgang mit Zahlungen
Stripe
Personenbezogene Daten: verschiedene Datenarten, wie in der Datenschutzerklärung des Dienstes beschrieben
Verwaltung von Produktivitätsvorgängen
Personio
Personenbezogene Daten: E-Mail; Nachname; Telefonnummer; Vorname; Während der Nutzung des Dienstes übermittelte Daten
Werbung
Google Ad Manager
Personenbezogene Daten: Cookie; Nutzungsdaten
Traffective
Personenbezogene Daten: Nutzungsdaten; Tracker
Informationen zur Ablehnung von interessenbasierter Werbung
Zusätzlich zu jeder Opt-Out-Funktion, die von den in diesem Dokument aufgelisteten Diensten zur Verfügung gestellt
wird, können Nutzer im entsprechenden Abschnitt der Cookie-Richtlinie mehr darüber
erfahren, wie sie generell interessenbasierte Werbung ablehnen können.
Kontaktdaten
Anbieter und Verantwortlicher
Traffective GmbH
Dachauer Str. 90
80335 München
E-Mail-Adresse des Anbieters:
privacy@traffective.com
Sub-policy 2
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Hauptmenü
Google-Apps
Sub-policy 3
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 4
https://mailchimp.com/legal/privacy/:
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
Privacy & Security
Your Privacy
Protect Your Privacy
Do Not Call Policy
Privacy Statements
For Consumers
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
For Applicants & Employees
English
Français
Español
For Contingent Workers
English
Français
Español
Intuit Financial Services
English
Security Center
Our Security Practices
Account Security Checklist
Online Safety Tips
Security Notices
Responsible Disclosure
Responsible AI
FAQ
hide
Contact Us
GLOBAL PRIVACY STATEMENTS
You deserve transparency into our data use
Select your preferred language
English
Français
Français (Canada)
Español
Intuit Global Privacy Statement
Last Updated: September 8, 2024
See previous Privacy Statements
Expand All
Collapse All
Scope of this Privacy Statement and our role
Intuit responsibly leverages technology to power prosperity around the world. We believe that everyone has a right to privacy. As a financial services and technology company, we’re providing this Global Privacy Statement (
“Privacy Statement”
) to explain how we, Intuit Inc. and the
Intuit group companies
(collectively
“Intuit,” “we,” “us,” or “our”
), collect, use, share, or otherwise process information that we collect through our services. These services include, as applicable, our websites, mobile applications, social media pages, marketing activities, and other activities described in this Privacy Statement, or when other businesses provide us your personal information (collectively, the
“Services”
). This Privacy Statement is global, meaning it applies to all Intuit Services. We may provide additional or supplemental privacy statements for certain products or services.
This Privacy Statement describes our privacy practices when we process:
Personal information for the purposes of preparing a tax return or in connection with the preparation of a tax return (collectively, “
Tax Preparation Information
”) as part of providing TurboTax tax preparation services;
Personal information for the purposes of providing the benefits of our websites and the Intuit platform, which includes all of Intuit’s services, sites, experiences and software (including through our mobile applications and desktop applications) other than Tax Preparation Information (the “
Intuit Platform
”); and
Personal information as necessary to manage, run, improve, and develop our business and personalize your experience while interacting with the Intuit Platform. Depending on your settings, this may include showing you personalized ads or recommending certain Intuit products based on your interests.
Intuit determines the purposes and means of the processing of your personal information as described in this Privacy Statement, and therefore acts as a ‘data controller’ (or equivalent/similar terms under applicable data privacy laws) of such information. We may share your personal information within the
Intuit group companies
and conduct processing activities as controllers or joint controllers for the purposes set out in this Privacy Statement.
In certain circumstances, there may be more than one data controller processing your personal information. For example, your employer or a financial partner may also act as a data controller. In these situations, we act as an independent data controller over our processing activities. This means we determine how your personal information will be processed independently from the other data controllers. The other data controllers have their own obligations under applicable data privacy laws. Intuit is not responsible for other data controllers’ processing activities, and you should contact them directly for questions about how they process your personal information and about how to exercise your privacy rights in relation to such processing.
This Privacy Statement does not apply to certain processing activities where we are not the controller. For example, where Intuit processes personal information as a processor or service provider on behalf of our customers, including when we process personal information on behalf of customers of our professional tax software products. When we act as a processor or service provider, the privacy statement of the customer who uses our Services applies, instead of this Privacy Statement, and our processing of such personal information is governed by our agreements with such customers. If you have concerns about personal information that we process on behalf of a customer, or wish to exercise your privacy rights regarding such personal information, please contact the customer directly.
This Privacy Statement also does not apply to Intuit Financial Services or Intuit’s processing of education records subject to state or federal laws or children’s data in our education curriculum products. You may find the privacy statement for Intuit Financial Services
here
, and the privacy statement for Intuit for Education
here
.
If you have any questions about how Intuit processes your personal information, please see How to contact us below.
The Intuit platform
The Intuit Platform and your personal information
When we say “platform,” we mean that when you choose to share data with us, or bring over information from third parties (like a bank or loan provider), Intuit uses that data together, not just within the individual offering(s) you’re using. This means that, for example, we may use your bookkeeping details from QuickBooks, contact and purchase history details from Mailchimp, and/or recommendations from Credit Karma. The personal information we use in this centralized way may relate to you as an end user of our Services or as a customer or vendor of an Intuit customer whose personal information has been included in the Intuit Platform.
Business account information
Some experiences and services within the Intuit Platform allow you to interact with a business (such as your employer). If you are granted access to a business account (for example, in QuickBooks), the business owner or a designated administrator may control and administer details of your account, for example, by deciding your access rights; making decisions about your personal information (such as details about your payroll); or requiring you to take certain actions (for example, use location tracking to clock in for a shift). If the owner or designated administrator changes your access rights, then you may lose access to the information the business controls.
Your use of the Intuit Platform as part of a business account may be subject to the business’s policies, which may differ from this Privacy Statement. We are not responsible for the privacy or security practices of other businesses, and you should consider both the business’s policies and whether you are comfortable giving the business access to your personal information before connecting to their services.
Personal information we collect
The personal information that we collect or otherwise receive about you depends on the context of your interactions with Intuit, how you configure your account, and the choices you make, including your privacy settings. The way we process your personal information may also depend on the particular Services, functionalities, or experiences you use, your location, and applicable law.
Information you provide to us
You may provide us with your information as follows:
Contact data and account profile data.
We collect information when you (or your organization) create an account, activate a subscription, and/or upload information to the Intuit Platform. Personal information may include your name, previous name(s) and/or nicknames, title and honorifics, professional title and company name, education, billing and mailing addresses, phone number and email address, profile photo, billing information (your payment information), purchase history, demographic information, preferences, subscription data, and your username and account credentials.
Identity verification information.
We collect information to verify your identity, including your name, date of birth, social security number, social insurance number, driver’s license number, passport number, government-issued identification details, and similar information to verify your identity and to help you file your tax return.
Communications, feedback and survey data, and related data.
We may collect personal information such as your name, email address, telephone number and any other personal information you choose to share when you reach out to us for support, give us feedback, participate in optional surveys, attend our events, participate in product research or training, or otherwise interact or communicate with us. This information may include: call center recordings and call monitoring records, chat and text records, voicemails, photographs, and video images.
Marketing data.
You may provide us with your contact information and preferences for receiving marketing communications.
Social and community content.
We receive content you post on our social media pages and our community pages.
Business and financial information.
We may receive information about your business, your finances, expenses, invoices, financial statements, details of your financial transactions, payroll details, payment details, tax return details, details about your customers, vendors, or employees, income and wage information, and/or investment information.
Interactions with experts.
The Intuit Platform provides many opportunities for you to connect with live experts, including, for example, accountants or tax preparers. When you interact with these experts, we may receive information about the questions you ask, the details of your accounts, and the guidance provided to you.
Interactions with chatbots.
We may receive information from you through your use of chatbots, digital assistants, or other interactive bots across the Intuit Platform.
Device and contact data.
If you grant permission in your device settings, certain features may have access to your device and contacts.
Business connection data.
We may collect information about you when you interact with the Intuit Platform through our customers. If you are a customer, vendor or prospect of an Intuit customer and interact with the Intuit Platform (for example, to pay an invoice, make a purchase, interact with an email, provide contact details or complete a survey), we will use this information to make recommendations about you to our customers. Our customers may also provide business connection data directly about you to us; this is described below under ‘Other users’.
Third-party sources
The Intuit Platform is designed to help you connect with other people and businesses. As a result of those connections, others may be able to input personal information about you, including other customers using the Intuit Platform. For example, an Intuit customer may share personal information about you with us in order to use and benefit from the Intuit Platform. You also may be able to input or process personal information about others, for example, if you are an account administrator of one of our products or use Intuit to manage customer lists. If you input information about others into the Platform, you must only do so if you have first provided sufficient notice and received any required permissions, and have an appropriate legal basis if required by applicable law.
We may also receive personal information about you from other third parties where you have provided consent or where permitted by applicable law. We protect and process the personal information obtained from those third parties as described in this Privacy Statement, consistent with any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the information. Our third-party sources may vary over time and depend upon how you use the Intuit Platform. For example, we receive information from:
Linked third-party services.
If you choose to sync a non-Intuit account/service with your Intuit account, we will receive information from that account/service according to your settings with that account/service. This may include details of your bank account information, social media information, purchase history or your business’s sales records through a point of sale application.
Supplemental information and identity verification providers.
We work with certain third parties to help us verify your identity, the specifics of your business, and/or supplement the personal information you have provided and ensure the accuracy of your personal information. For example, we use third-party providers to validate your contact information (e.g., name, mailing address, email address, phone number) or to provide additional details about your business. These providers may include, for example, your financial institution, telecommunications provider, or email provider.
Customer support providers.
We receive personal information about you or your interaction with the Intuit Platform from certain third parties for troubleshooting purposes. For example, we may obtain information about your interaction(s) with customer support and information about technical issues you have raised, including call center recordings, call monitoring records, voicemails, photographs and chat records.
Credit bureaus and related third parties.
Many Intuit features rely on information we receive from credit bureaus and related third parties. For example, in some countries, we may offer free credit reports and credit scores. We request these reports and credit scores on your behalf from credit bureau partners, like TransUnion, Experian and Equifax. These partners may also provide personal information such as employment or income data, social security number, vehicle or driver information, or information about special offers available based on your credit profile so we can make more personalized recommendations for you.
Other users.
As described above, we may receive personal information about you from other Intuit Platform users, such as your accountant, bookkeeper, tax preparer, spouse, employer, or other business customers using the Intuit Platform (e.g., businesses from which you buy products or services, or with which you otherwise interact). We may also collect such personal information through features like member referral programs.
Risk management, cybersecurity & anti-fraud providers.
We may receive personal information from third parties that help us assess risks associated with our offerings, including to help combat fraud and illegal activity and to help protect your personal information.
Data providers.
We may receive information from information services and data licensors that provide demographic and preference information to us.
Content providers.
We may receive personal information from companies that make user-generated content from their service available to others, such as local business reviews or public social media posts.
Joint offering partners.
We may offer co-branded services or experiences or engage in joint-marketing activities with others, including through our conferences or live events.
Government agencies.
We receive information from government agencies, including from various tax agencies, such as your tax filing confirmation from the IRS.
Public information.
We collect individual and household demographic information and preference information from publicly available sources, such as open government databases, social media platforms, and others.
Automatic data collection
We, our service providers, and our business partners may automatically log personal information about you, your computer or mobile device, and your interaction over time with the Services, such as:
Device information.
We may collect information about your device(s) such as IP addresses, log information, error messages, device type, and unique device identifiers. For example, we may collect IP addresses from you as part of our sign in and security features.
Usage information.
We may collect information about your use of the Intuit Platform, such as the pages you viewed, the services and features you used or interacted with, your browser type, and details about any links or communications with which you interacted.
Location information.
Certain features in the Intuit Platform may collect your precise location information, device motion information, or both, if you or your organization grant(s) us permission to do so through your device settings (for example, if you use QuickBooks’ time-tracking service, participate in Karma Drive, or use CK Money to locate nearby ATMs).
Information stored locally.
Some of our web-enabled desktop services and offerings synchronize with the information on your computer. In doing so, we may collect information such as device information, product usage, and error reports. We may also store personal information locally on your device.
Communication interaction data.
We or our third-party service providers may collect information from email providers, communication providers and social networks, such as your interactions with our email, text or other communications (e.g., whether you open and/or forward emails) – we may do this through use of pixel tags (which are also known as clear GIFs), which may be embedded invisibly in our emails.
Online behavioral data
. We may automatically collect certain personal information about your use and interactions with our websites, customers’ websites or e-commerce stores, social media websites, and marketing campaigns that we or our customers organize, including device information (such as your IP address and unique device IDs), page view information and search results, links, and if you are a customer contact, whether or not a campaign presented or sent to you using our offerings has been viewed, delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it has bounced or was treated as spam.
Cookies and similar technologies
Intuit and our service providers may use commonly used tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels, local shared objects and similar technologies (collectively “cookies”) to collect information about you (“
Cookie Information
”) so we can provide the experiences you request, recognize your visit, track your interactions, and improve your and other customers’ experiences. For example, we may use session-replay technologies,
such as those provided by FullStory and Medallia, that employ software code to record users’ interactions with the Services in a manner that allows us to watch video replays of those user sessions. The replays include users’ clicks, mobile app touches, mouse movements, scrolls and keystrokes/key touches during those sessions. These replays help us diagnose usability problems and identify areas for improvement. You can learn more about FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/legal/privacy-policy
and you can opt-out of session recording by FullStory at
https://www.fullstory.com/optout/
. You can learn more about Medallia at
https://www.medallia.com/privacy-policy/
.
You have control over some of the information we collect from Cookies and how we use it. Please see Your Personal Information Rights and Choices section for more information. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies please see our
Intuit Cookie Policy
. For full details on how we use cookies and similar technologies when you use or interact with our Mailchimp offerings, please also see our
Mailchimp Cookie Statement.
Biometric Information
Certain parts of the Intuit Platform make use of biometric personal information (“
Biometric Information
“). We will not collect your Biometric Information without first providing notice and obtaining your consent. For more details about how we use Biometric Information, please see our
Biometric Notice
.
How we use personal information
We may use your personal information in a number of ways or as otherwise described at the time of collection:
Service delivery and operations. We may use your personal information to:
Provide you with the Intuit Platform, create your account and manage our relationship with you
Run and manage our business, including resolving billing and financial disputes
Evaluate your eligibility for marketing offers, products and services
Provide features to you, such as your free credit reports and scores
Provide a product or service that you have requested through the Intuit Platform
Connect you with experts and other users
Communicate with you, such as sending you electronic notifications concerning your financial privacy
Understand your needs and interests, and personalize your experience with the Services and our communications.
Provide you with support and resolve disputes
Authenticate your identity
Manage event registrations and attendance, including sending related communications to you
Register visitors to our offices for security reasons and manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign
Research and development. We may use your personal information to:
Improve and develop our products and services by analyzing how they are used and interacted with, by training our artificial intelligence models and other machine learning models, as well as by assessing the use of and interactions with our Platform and certain content our customers send or display through the Platform, including by conducting data analytics to develop insights about you, your needs, and your preferences, so we can make more informed predictions, recommendations, and products for our customers.
Please note any data obtained through Google Workspace APIs is not used to develop, improve, or train any generalized AI and/or ML models. Any data originating from the Google Workspace API is instead ingested only by Intuit’s and our third-party providers’ artificial intelligence tools to deliver services on the customer’s behalf and to ensure safety, not for model retraining.
Combine and anonymize information about your interactions with Intuit to create aggregate, anonymized statistics for use in research (including by contracting with academic institutions) and for marketing, promoting, improving, and developing our platform.
Marketing and advertising. We, our service providers and our third-party advertising partners may collect and use your personal information for marketing and advertising purposes to:
Market services, products and experiences, including to deliver gifts and promotional materials, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications via email, post, telephone, SMS or push notifications, in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Personalize your experience and tailor recommendations, advertising, and offers presented to you, including through the development of insights about you and your needs based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. These advertisements may be displayed to you on Intuit’s digital properties, including our websites and mobile apps, media platforms, connected devices, or other third-party platforms and channels.
Whistleblower Reporting.
When you report any concern of non-compliance, unethical conduct, or other alleged violation of our
Code of Conduct and Ethics
, personal information you provide will be processed as a part of the investigation of the allegations and retained in accordance with our internal policies until the investigation is complete. While we make every effort to maintain confidentiality, depending on the investigation, disclosing your identity to other individuals may be necessary.
Compliance and protection. We may use your personal information to:
Protect against misuse or abuse of our Services and ensure compliance with our Terms of Service, including in relation to content our customers send or display through the Platform
Comply with legal and regulatory requirements
Protect the rights, property, safety or security of the Intuit Platform, our customers, employees or others and prevent fraudulent or illegal activity
Exercise our rights in the course of judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceedings
Enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements
With your consent.
In some cases, we may specifically ask for your consent to use your personal information, such as when required by law.
We may process your personal information for other purposes that are compatible with the above purposes where permitted by applicable law.
Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Automated processing
When you use or interact with features on the Intuit Platform like chatbots, digital assistants, or other digital conversational experiences powered by artificial intelligence, we may process your personal information using automated and manual (human) methods. For example, when we use automated processing on your personal information to provide a more personalized and enhanced experience in the Intuit Platform, you may see instantly tailored recommendations and insights to manage your cash flow and grow your business. Or when we analyze personal information and transactions we have collected or received about you, we can provide you with personalized advice, predictions, recommendations and experiences, including showing your largest tax deductions, sharing how to get your largest tax refund, and providing personalized recommendations for credit products. Certain laws may provide you with the right to object to the automated processing of your personal information. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
How we share your personal information
When you interact with our services.
We may share your personal information in the following circumstances:
For certain product features
. We may use third party API services, such as YouTube and Twilio, for certain product features. If you choose to use those features, you acknowledge and agree that you are also bound by the third party’s privacy policy. You may manage your YouTube API data by visiting Google’s security settings page
here
. You may make choices about your Twilio API data by visiting Twilio’s privacy notice
here
.
When you connect with an Intuit Platform partner.
You may be provided with offers, products, and services from third-party companies who integrate with our Intuit Platform. If you choose to interact with a platform partner, apply for their services or offerings, or otherwise link or sync your account to a platform partner’s product or service, you consent and direct us to share your personal information to the platform partner providing the service or offering. For example, when we send your personal information to partners in order to generate offers for you to review, when we send your application information directly to our partners, or when we send you to the partner’s site for you to provide the information directly to them.
In some cases, if you click through to go to a platform partner’s site, you will automatically be sending your personal information to that platform partner. When this happens, you will still have to submit your application on the platform partner’s site. Remember that any information you provide to a platform partner, whether through us or on your own, will be subject to their privacy practices and terms and conditions.
When you connect to your social media account.
Some of our features enable you to connect to a social media account or share information on social media platforms, like Facebook and Twitter. Any information you choose to share on social media may potentially be visible to a global audience and will be subject to the social media provider’s privacy policies (not this Privacy Statement). You should take care only to share information on social media that you are comfortable sharing.
For joint features, sales, promotions and events.
With your consent we may share your personal information with third parties who are jointly providing features, sales initiatives, promotions or events with us.
When you publicly post the information.
We may provide opportunities for you to publicly post reviews, questions, comments, suggestions, or other content that may include personal information, such as your name or username. Anything you share in a public forum is public, and you should think carefully before you decide to share.
With your wireless carrier.
When you use your wireless device in connection with the Intuit Platform, you authorize your wireless carrier to use or disclose information about your account and your wireless device, if available, to Intuit or its service provider for the duration of your business relationship, solely to help them identify you or your wireless device and to prevent fraud.
When you participate in the short code program
. Personal information collected through the short code program (i.e., when you sign up for SMS texts), will not be shared, sold, or rented to affiliated or unaffiliated third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Other circumstances.
We also share your personal information with third parties in the following circumstances.
For research.
With appropriate controls, we may share information with third parties, such as academic institutions, government and non-profit organizations, for research purposes or to publish academic or policy-related materials. We only share information in a way that does not identify any individual.
With financial services providers.
In connection with our financial products, we may share personal information with collection agencies, credit bureaus and loan services providers, and payment card association members. We may also share your personal information with other companies, lawyers, credit bureaus, agents, government agencies, and card associations in connection with issues related to fraud, credit, defaults, or debt collection.
With service providers or agents.
We share personal information with our service providers or agents who provide services on our behalf for the purposes described in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents are required to implement reasonable privacy and information protection controls to maintain the privacy and security of information provided to them consistent with the privacy practices outlined in this Privacy Statement. Service providers or agents may include companies that assist us with our advertising, marketing, and sales efforts, help us with our technology offerings (such as a hosting, security or anti-fraud providers) and help us run our business. Service providers or agents also include AI providers, including generative AI providers.
For mergers and acquisitions.
If we are involved with a merger, asset sale, financing, liquidation, bankruptcy, or the acquisition of all or part of our business to another company, we may share your personal information with that company and its advisors before and after the transaction date.
With our affiliates and subsidiaries and your right to limit information sharing.
We may share your personal information with our affiliates and subsidiaries for everyday business purposes as described in this Statement, including for marketing purposes, for improving and developing our offerings, and for personalizing your experience on our Platform. Certain laws may provide you with the right to limit our information sharing activities in certain circumstances. Please review these rights in the “Region and state-specific terms” section below.
For advertising and analytics.
Intuit may use advertising networks and other providers to display advertising on our Intuit Platform or on other sites. Intuit may share personal information with advertising networks and other providers to tailor advertising and offers presented to you based on your interactions with the Intuit Platform’s products, services, and offerings. Our advertising partners may place cookies on unaffiliated websites in order to serve advertisements that may be relevant to you based on your browsing activities and interests and determine the effectiveness of such advertisements. See also the “Region and state-specific terms” section below for additional information.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) responds to the Global Privacy Control signal for US residents, as described further in the United States section below. However, we do not respond to “Do Not Track” signals because there is no formal “Do Not Track” standard.
For legal reasons.
We may share your personal information with third parties for legal reasons without your consent, and as permitted by law, including:
When we reasonably believe disclosure is required in order to comply with a subpoena, court order, or other applicable law, regulation or legal process;
To protect the rights, property, or safety of Intuit, TurboTax, the Intuit Platform, our customers or others;
To protect or defend against attacks;
To enforce, remedy, or apply our Terms of Service or other agreements;
To prevent fraud, cybersecurity attacks or illegal activity;
For debt collection; and
With regulatory agencies, including government tax agencies, as necessary to help detect and combat fraud and/or protect our customers, users and/or the Intuit Platform, or in required institutional risk control programs.
Your personal information rights and choices
Your choices
At Intuit, we believe that you have choices about information that pertains to you or your business.
We provide all customers, including those in the EU, UK (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland, with options to manage the privacy of their personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct certain personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Access your personal information.
You may download a copy of the personal information we have about you by visiting your account, the
Intuit Privacy Center
, or by calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Delete your personal information.
You may ask us to delete your personal information by visiting your account settings or the
Intuit Privacy Center
or calling us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
(for US members), the
Credit Karma UK Help Centre
(for Credit Karma UK members), or the
Credit Karma Canada Help Centre
(for Credit Karma Canada members). If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, please visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
NAI Opt-Out Page
or the
Choices Opt-Out Page
(or the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
, if you are based in Canada) or by visiting the
Intuit Privacy Center
. If you reside in California, Connecticut, Colorado, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, please refer to the relevant sections below under Region and state-specific terms for more information about opting out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes,or opting-out of sales and/or sharing.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or you may use the links below. You may also unsubscribe using the link found at the bottom of all marketing and promotional emails. If you receive marketing text messages from us through Intuit’s SMS shortcode program, you may opt out of receiving further marketing text messages from us by replying STOP to the message.
For more information, please visit:
Intuit
communications preferences
Credit Karma US
and
Credit Karma UK
communications preferences
Mailchimp
communications preferences
Your Rights
Depending on where you live, you may also have certain state- or country-specific rights with respect to your personal information. Please see the Region and state-specific terms section for your country, below.
Verification
To help protect privacy and the security of your personal information, you may be asked to provide additional information to verify your identity and/or ownership rights before we can fulfill your data rights request. If we cannot verify your identity or your ownership rights to the data, we may not be able to service your request until you provide proper documentation.
Data retention
Unless you specifically ask us to delete your personal information, we retain your personal information as long as it is necessary to comply with our data retention requirements and provide you with services and the benefits of the Intuit Platform and successfully run our business. Even if you submit a deletion request, we may be required to maintain your personal information for as long as necessary to:
comply with our legal or regulatory compliance needs (e.g., maintaining records of transactions you have made with us);
to exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and/or
to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our service.
This means we may keep different information for different periods. If your account is canceled because you haven’t used it for a long time, we may delete this information immediately.
There may be occasions where we are unable to fully delete, anonymize, or de-identify your personal information due to technical, legal, regulatory compliance, or other operational reasons. Where this is the case, we will take reasonable measures to securely isolate your personal information from any further processing until such time as we are able to delete, anonymize, or de-identify it.
International data transfers
Unless you have provided us with consent to transfer your personal information, US Tax Preparation Information shall be processed and stored in the United States in accordance with applicable law.
With the exception noted above, Intuit reserves the right to store and process your personal information in the United States and in any other country where Intuit or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers operate facilities in accordance with and as permitted by applicable laws and regulations. Some of these countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
When we transfer, store or process personal information outside of your jurisdiction (including to or in the United States, as described above), we take appropriate safeguards to require that your personal information remain protected in accordance with this Privacy Statement and applicable law.
Some of these recipients of your personal information are located in countries for which the European Commission, the UK (and Gibraltar) Government, and the Swiss Government (as and where applicable) have issued adequacy decisions, which means that these countries are recognized as providing an adequate level of data protection under applicable UK (and Gibraltar), European, and Swiss data protection laws and the transfer is therefore permitted under Article 45 of the GDPR.
Other recipients of your personal information are located in countries outside the EEA and/or the UK that are not the subject of an adequacy decision. In these cases, we may use the Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission or, as may be applicable, the International Data Transfer Agreement approved by the UK Government, to help ensure your personal information is protected. For more information on the transfer safeguards we rely on, please contact us by using the details in the “How to contact us” section below.
Intuit (excluding Credit Karma) and Mailchimp comply with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union (EU), the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar), and Switzerland to the United States. Intuit and Mailchimp rely on the EU-U.S. DPF to transfer data and will rely on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF once approved by the appropriate authorities. We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission. You can find more information about Intuit’s and Mailchimp’s Data Privacy Framework certification
here
.
Security of your personal information
We use reasonable physical, technical and organizational safeguards that are designed to protect your personal information. However, despite these controls, we cannot completely ensure or warrant the security of your personal information. You can find out more about how we protect your personal information
here
.
Changes to our Privacy Statements
From time to time we may change or update our Privacy Statement. We reserve the right to make changes or updates at any time. If we make material changes to the way we process your personal information, we will notify you by posting a notice in the Intuit Platform or on a community post; by sending you a notification; or by other means consistent with applicable law.
You can see when this Privacy Statement was last updated by checking the “last updated” date at the top of this Privacy Statement. Please review this Privacy Statement periodically to stay informed about how Intuit protects your privacy.
Children
Our services are not intended for or directed to children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect personal information from children. If you believe we may have information from a child, please contact us.
How to contact us
If you have questions or comments about this Privacy Statement or our practices, please contact us.
You can submit Intuit privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Credit Karma privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
You can submit Mailchimp privacy questions.
Submit your privacy question here
If you have an unresolved privacy or information use concern or complaint that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Region and state-specific terms
Additional terms may apply to you based upon the country you reside in or the products you use. Please click the region or state that applies to you to learn more about additional terms and rights that may apply to you.
Expand All
Collapse All
United States
If you are a resident of the United States, you may have the following rights and choices:
US Tax Preparation Information
Except as necessary to provide you with tax preparation services or as authorized by law, we will not use or disclose your Tax Preparation Information – including to Intuit’s affiliates and subsidiaries – unless you consent.
If you agree to share your Tax Preparation Information for purposes other than tax preparation services, including by sharing it with the Intuit Platform, your Tax Preparation Information will be handled in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act
Intuit is a financial institution subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA).
By using, accessing, or interacting with the Intuit Platform, you are consenting to receive notices about your financial privacy electronically.
Please find our GLBA Notice
here
.
California Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in our capacity as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) and your rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, the term “
Personal Information
” has the meaning given in the CCPA, but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the CCPA, such as information subject to the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA) and other data protection laws. In some cases, we may provide a different privacy notice to certain categories of California residents, such as employees and job applicants, in which case that notice will apply instead of this section.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose.
The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the categories of Personal Information specified in the CCPA, and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your California privacy rights. As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access.
You may request that we provide the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
○              the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you,
○              the sources from which that information was collected,
○              the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, and/or sharing your Personal Information,
○              the categories of personal information we shared or sold about you,
○              the categories of third parties to whom we shared or sold personal information about you,
○              the categories of personal information we disclosed for a business purpose, and
○              the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information about you for a business purpose.
Request a copy of your Personal Information.
You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of Sales and/or Sharing.
Like many companies, Intuit and Mailchimp use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you as described above. The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) may classify our use of some of these services as “sharing” your Personal Information with the advertising partners that provide the services. You can opt-out of the “sharing” of your personal information by visiting the “Your California Privacy Rights” link in the footer of the Intuit website.
In addition, if you have enabled a recognized opt-out mechanism on your browser, device, or platform, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharings” when you interact with our Services. Please go here to learn more about enabling one such preference signal, the Global Privacy Control:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
. Intuit and Mailchimp do not sell personal information under the CCPA. Credit Karma does not sell or share personal information subject to the CCPA, and therefore does not offer a “Your California Privacy Rights” link on its website. We do not knowingly sell or share the personal information of individuals under 16 years of age.
Limit processing of sensitive personal information.
Some of the personal information that we may collect are considered sensitive personal information under the CCPA. We collect sensitive personal information for the purposes allowed by law or with your consent. We only use sensitive personal information as necessary for our (1) Service delivery and operations, (2) compliance and protection, (3) research and development, or (4) Service improvement and analytics purposes in accordance with CCPA. If we use sensitive personal information outside the permitted purposes of the CCPA, we will provide you with the right to limit processing of sensitive personal information.
California Shine the Light.
Customers who are California residents may request certain information concerning the categories of personal information (if any) we disclose to third parties or affiliates for their direct marketing purposes. If you would like more information, please submit a written request to us using the contact information provided below.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination or retaliation related to your exercise of any of your California privacy rights.
Verification.
In order to protect your personal information from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Authorized agents.
You may use an authorized agent to submit a rights request. If you do so, the authorized agent must present signed written authorization to act on your behalf, and you will also be required to independently verify your own identity directly with us and confirm with us that you provided the authorized agent permission to submit the rights request. This verification process is not necessary if your authorized agent provides documentation showing that the authorized agent has power of attorney to act on your behalf under Cal. Prob. Code §§ 4121 to 4130.
Learn more about instructions for authorized agents.
We may deny a request from an agent that does not submit adequate proof that they have been authorized by you to act on your behalf.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia Residents
Scope.
This section applies only to the residents of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, and Virginia. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Data of state residents described in this subsection in our capacity as a business or controller under the corresponding state privacy laws, including Colorado Privacy Rights Act, Connecticut Data Privacy Act, Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act, Oregon Consumer Privacy Act, Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act, and Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (collectively, “Applicable State Privacy Laws”), and your rights with respect to that Personal Data. For purposes of this section, the term “Personal Data” has the meaning given in the Applicable State Privacy Laws but does not include information or entities exempted from the scope of the Applicable State Privacy Laws, such as those subject to GLBA. Please note that we may claim legal exemptions for certain types of personal information and certain Intuit companies from all or certain parts of the Applicable State Privacy Laws.
Personal Information that we collect, use, and disclose
. The chart
here
summarizes the Personal Information we collect and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Statement. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described in this chart.
Your privacy rights.
As a resident of Colorado, Connecticut, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah or Virginia, you may have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Access
. You may request a copy of the Personal Information in
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Correction
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
Deletion
. You may have the right, under certain circumstances, to request that we delete the personal information you have provided to us. You may delete your personal information in the Privacy section of
your Intuit account
or visit our
Intuit Privacy Center
or call us toll-free at 1 (877) 261-6470. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
or email us at
CCPArequests@creditkarma.com
.
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
.
Opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes
. You can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Manage Cookies” or “Privacy Settings” link in the footer of the Intuit website. For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
. Intuit, Mailchimp and Credit Karma do not otherwise “sell your Personal Data to third parties for monetary consideration.
Opt-out of profiling
. You can opt-out of the automated processing of your Personal Data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to your economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements, to the extent this results in decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects.
Sensitive Personal Data
. Some of the personal information that we may collect may be considered sensitive personal information under certain state privacy laws. We will not process your sensitive personal data without your consent.
Non-discrimination
. You have the right to be free from discrimination related to your exercise of any of your privacy rights.
Appeal
. If we decline to take action on any request that you submit in connection with the rights described above, you may ask that we reconsider our response by submitting a written request to us using the contact information provided below. We will inform you in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, we will also provide you with an online mechanism, if available, or other method through which you may contact your state attorney general’s office to submit a complaint.
Authentication.
In order to protect your Personal Data from unauthorized access or deletion, we may require you to verify your credentials before you can submit a rights request. If you do not have an account with us, or if we suspect that your account has been accessed without your authorization, we may ask you to provide additional personal information for verification. For Credit Karma members, we may require that you confirm certain pieces of personal information that we have on file and/or log into your Credit Karma account. If we are subsequently unable to confirm your identity, we may refuse your rights request.
Transparency matters.
Learn more about the requests we process by viewing our
Privacy Rights Transparency Report
.
United States contact information:
Intuit Inc.
Attention: Privacy
2800 E Commerce Center Place
Tucson, AZ 85706
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Legal Department
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
Mailchimp
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308
You can contact the Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
.
Australia
If you are a resident of Australia, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. To make a request for access or deletion of your personal information, contact us through the link below.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information, including for marketing purposes, or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information. To object to data processing or request a restriction, contact us through the link below. If you request that we stop processing some or all of your personal information or you withdraw (where applicable) your consent for our use or disclosure of your personal information for purposes set out in this privacy notice, we might not be able to provide you all of the Services and customer support offered to our users and authorized under this Notice.
Australia contact information:
Visit the QuickBooks Australia website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks Australia
Intuit Australia Pty. Limited
Level 34, 1 O'Connell St.
Sydney, NSW 2000 Australia
Canada
While we take steps to maintain protection of your personal information, your personal information may be disclosed in response to valid demands or requests from governments, regulators, courts and law enforcement authorities in those other jurisdictions or countries.
If you are a resident of Canada, you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of interest based advertising by visiting the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Opt-Out Page
and the
Choices Opt-Out Page
.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may make a request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information (provided we no longer have a business need to retain your personal information). You may request a copy of the Personal Information or delete the personal information in
your Intuit account
. If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, visit the
Credit Karma Help Center
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp,visit the
Mailchimp Privacy Rights Request Page
. You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services. Even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on the Intuit Platform. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in “Data Retention”.
Withdraw consent.
You can withdraw your consent at any time to collection, use and disclosure of your personal information. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with the applicable Privacy Commissioner about our collection and processing of your personal information.
Canada contact information:
Intuit Canada
Attention: Privacy
8 Spadina Ave.
Suite 1900
Toronto, Ontario
M5V 0S8
You can contact the Intuit Data Protection Officer
here
.
Credit Karma LLC
Attention: Privacy Officer
PO Box 30963
Oakland CA 94604
legal@creditkarma.com
If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma, you can visit the
Credit Karma Help Centre
.
You can also email the Credit Karma Canada Privacy Officer by writing to
legal@creditkarma.ca
.
The Rocket Science Group LLC d/b/a Mailchimp
Attn: Privacy Officer
405 North Angier Ave. NE,
Atlanta, GA 30308 USA
If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you can visit the
Mailchimp Help Centre
,
or submit a question
here
.
India
Where data of Indian individuals are involved, you hereby agree that the “reasonable security practices and procedures” under section 43A Explanation (ii) of the Information Technology Act, 2000 means this Intuit’s Privacy Statement and such data security procedures that Intuit may implement from time to time and which may, in Intuit’s discretion, be informed to you from time to time.
What you can do to manage your privacy
You have choices when it comes to managing the privacy of your personal information.
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings.
Correct your personal information.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
India contact information
Visit the QuickBooks India website to learn how to contact their support team.
Go to QuickBooks India
Intuit Technology Services Private Limited
Campus 4A, PrITech Park (Ecospace)
7th and 8th Floor, Belandur Village
Varthur Hobli, Bangalore East Taluk
Bangalore - 560 103 India
United Kingdom (and Gibraltar)(UK), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland
Personal Information
References to “personal information” in this Privacy Statement are equivalent to “personal data” governed by EU and UK data protection laws. Essentially, “personal data” is information about an individual, where that individual is either directly identified or can be identified. It does not include ‘anonymous data’ (i.e., information where the identity of an individual has been permanently removed).
Legal Basis of Processing
We use your personal information only as permitted by law. Applicable EEA, UK(and Gibraltar) and Swiss data protection law requires us to have a “legal basis” for each purpose for which we collect your personal information. Our legal basis for collecting and using the personal information described in this Privacy Statement will depend on the type of personal information and the specific context in which we collect it. However, we will normally process personal information from you when:
We have your consent to do so;
We have a contract with you and it is necessary to process your personal information to perform our contract with you, including to provide you with the benefits of the Intuit Platform and operate our business;
The processing is in our legitimate business interests, such as operating our businesses, improving and developing the Intuit Platform, communicating with you, marketing our offerings and services and personalizing your experience, and to detect illegal activities; and/or
To comply with legal requirements, including applicable laws and regulations.
For residents in the UK searching for financial or other products (including energy, internet, or mobile phone offers) through the Intuit Platform, we may share your personal information, including your contact details, date of birth, as well as the information you give us about your employment, income, and housing and employment expenses with third parties, including HD Decisions, Capital One, Monevo, CarFinance 247, and Decision Tech. You can find more information about their data protection practices in their privacy policies:
HD Decisions
Capital One
Monevo
CarFinance 247
Decision Tech
If you are a resident of the UK(and Gibraltar), the EEA or Switzerland you may have the following rights and choices:
Update your privacy settings.
You may update your privacy settings by visiting your account settings.
Access, Correction or Deletion.
You may request to access, to correct or to delete your personal information.
You may request a copy of your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU&Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request a copy of your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
.
You can edit and correct your personal information at any time by changing it directly in our products and services.
You may request for us to delete your personal information in the Privacy tab of your account or through our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). If your inquiry is specific to Credit Karma UK, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting Credit Karma’s
Help Centre
. If your inquiry is specific to Mailchimp, you may request for us to delete your personal information by visiting
Mailchimp’s Privacy Rights Request page
. Please note that even if you request for your personal information to be deleted, certain aspects may be retained for us to: meet our legal or regulatory compliance (e.g. maintaining records of transactions you have made with us); exercise, establish or defend legal claims; and to protect against fraudulent or abusive activity on our Service. Data retained for these purposes will be handled as described in the section “Data Retention”.
Objection and Restriction.
You may object to our processing of your personal information or ask us to restrict processing of your personal information.
Portability.
You may request portability of your personal information.
Withdraw Consent.
If we process your personal information with your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
File a complaint.
You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your personal information. You can find your data protection regulator
here
.
Manage marketing communications from us.
To update your marketing communication preferences, you can go to the marketing preference tools in your account settings or visit our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland) or
edit your email preferences for Mailchimp using the instructions found here.
. You may also click unsubscribe at the bottom of the marketing emails.
Cookies and other tracking technologies.
You may be able to opt-out of such interest-based advertising by visiting
Network Advertising Initiative
or
Your Online Choices
or by visiting our
GDPR Centre
(UK) or
GDPR Centre
(FR) or
GDPR Centre
(EU & Switzerland). For Mailchimp, you can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by visiting the “Cookie Preferences” link in the footer of the
Mailchimp website
.
UK, EEA and Swiss Representative
In the EEA: Intuit Inc., Intuit Limited and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit France SAS as its Representative in the European Union in accordance with Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the "GDPR") (contact details can be found in the section below).
In the UK: Intuit Inc., and Mailchimp have each appointed Intuit Limited as its Representative in the UK in accordance with UK GDPR (contact details can be found in the section below)
United Kingdom, EEA and Switzerland contact information
Intuit Limited
Attention: Intuit Data Protection Administration,
Cardinal Place, 80 Victoria Street, London,
United Kingdom, SW1E 5JL
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/uk/gdpr/
Credit Karma UK Limited
4th Floor
One New Oxford Street
London WC1A 1NU
Intuit France SAS
Intuit Data Protection Administration
﻿7 Rue Meyerbeer 75009 Paris, France
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/fr/gdpr/
or
https://quickbooks.intuit.com/eu/gdpr/
If you have questions or concerns that have not been addressed by this Privacy Statement, you can contact the Intuit and Mailchimp Data Protection Officer
here
,
the Credit Karma Data Protection Officer by writing to
dpo@creditkarma.com
.
Cookies and Tracking Technologies
Intuit digital properties use cookies, pixels, tags and similar technologies to provide you the best possible experience on and off our sites. You may opt-out of the use of cookies and trackers that may share some limited personal information with our third party advertising partners using the option below. For more information on how we use Cookies and Tracking Technologies, please review our
Cookies Policy.
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services and features  available through our site. Because these cookies are strictly necessary to deliver the site, you cannot refuse them without impacting how the site functions.
Advertising (Targeting) Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you and your interests. They also perform functions like preventing the same ad from continuously reappearing, ensuring that ads are properly displayed, and in some cases selecting advertisements that are based on your interests.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 5
https://www.salesforce.com/de/company/privacy/:
Überspringen, direkt zum Inhalt
Was ist Salesforce?
Salesforce Blog
Karriere bei Salesforce
Pressemitteilungen und Presseberichte
Datenschutzerklärung
Wesentliche Regelungen der Datenschutzerklärung
Central Europe Talent Ecosystem Programm
ÜBER UNS
Was ist Salesforce?
Salesforce Blog
Karriere bei Salesforce
Pressemitteilungen und Presseberichte
Datenschutzerklärung
- Wesentliche Regelungen der Datenschutzerklärung
Central Europe Talent Ecosystem Programm
Erfahren Sie mehr
Informationen zum Datenschutz in unserem Unternehmen.
Wesentliche Regelungen der Datenschutzerklärung ›
Salesforce's Notice of Data Privacy Framework Certification
Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten aus der EU an Services von Salesforce
Salesforce-Bekanntmachung zu APEC CBPR und PRP-Zertifizierungen
Wenn Sie unsere Websites oder Dienste nutzen bzw. mit ihnen interagieren, mit uns kommunizieren, unsere Geschäftsstellen besuchen oder an unseren Veranstaltungen wie auch an sonstigen, in der vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Aktivitäten teilnehmen, können wir Informationen über Sie („personenbezogene Daten“) erheben, verwenden, weitergeben und verarbeiten. Diese Highlights der Datenschutzerklärung fassen unsere Praktiken bezüglich der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten und Ihre diesbezüglichen Rechte zusammen.
Wichtige Informationen
Die vollständige Datenschutzerklärung von Salesforce enthält weitere Informationen über die Datenschutzpraktiken von Salesforce.
Verantwortliche Salesforce-Einheit
Salesforce, Inc. und/oder seine verbundenen Unternehmen ist/sind der/die Verantwortliche(n) hinsichtlich Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten und ist/sind für ihre Verarbeitung verantwortlich, insofern in unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung nichts anderes ausdrücklich angegeben ist. Es wird klargestellt, dass unsere Datenschutzerklärung nicht gilt, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten als Auftragsverarbeiter im Auftrag unserer Kunden verarbeiten. Ein Verweis auf „Salesforce“, „wir“, „uns“ oder das „Unternehmen“ ist ein Verweis auf Salesforce, Inc. und seine verbundenen Unternehmen, die an der Verarbeitung beteiligt sind. Eine Liste der verbundenen Unternehmen von Salesforce findet sich im Abschnitt “Liste der Tochtergesellschaften” des aktuellsten 10-K-Formulars von Salesforce, das im Reiter SEC-Einreichungen verfügbar ist, indem der Filter „Jährliche Einreichungen“ auf der Seite
hier
ausgewählt wird; Im nachstehenden Abschnitt „Kontaktieren Sie uns“ finden Sie unsere Kontaktinformationen und -details unseres Datenschutzbeauftragten (und in Indien unseres Grievance Officer).
Zwecke, für die wir Kundendaten verarbeiten
Wir erheben und verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten für verschiedene Zwecke, unter anderem:
um unsere Websites und markengeschützten Social-Media-Seiten bereitzustellen;
um personalisierte Werbung und personalisierte Inhalte anzuzeigen;
um die Anmeldung für und Teilnahme an Veranstaltungen zu verwalten (einschließlich der Gewährleistung der Gesundheit und Sicherheit unserer Besucher und Mitarbeiter);
um Mitteilungen zu versenden;
um Kontakt- und Benutzersupport-Anfragen handzuhaben:
um unsere Dienste zu erbringen und ihre Leistung zu verbessern und zu optimieren;
um unsere Dienste in Rechnung zu stellen und unsere Konten zu verwalten (einschließlich der Nutzungs- und Lizenzkonformität);
um die Sicherheit von Salesforce und seinen Diensten zu gewährleisten
um Umfragen zu verwalten und Forschungen durchzuführen; und
um unseren gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen.
Die Liste der Zwecke, für die wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, finden Sie in der vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung.
Wir erheben und verarbeiten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten ausschließlich, wenn dies notwendig ist, um diese Zwecke zu erfüllen, und, wir uns für diese Verarbeitung auf eine Rechtsgrundlage stützen können, wie in unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung angegeben. Falls erforderlich, werden wir Sie vor der Verarbeitung um Ihre Einwilligung bitten.
Weitere Informationen finden Sie in den Abschnitten „Welche personenbezogenen Daten erheben wir?“ und „Zwecke, für die wir personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten und die Rechtsgrundlagen, auf die wir uns stützen“ in unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung. Im Abschnitt „Wie lange speichern wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten?“ finden Sie ebenfalls Informationen darüber, wie lange wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten speichern.
An wen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter?
Wir können personenbezogene Daten an verschiedene Parteien weitergeben, darunter:
An unsere beauftragten Dienstleister, die in unserem Auftrag für IT und Systemverwaltung, Hosting, Kreditkartenabwicklung, Forschung und Analytik, Marketing, Kundensupport und Datenanreicherung personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten;
An verbundene Unternehmen innerhalb unserer aktuellen oder zukünftigen Unternehmensgruppe, die für Kundensupport, Marketing, Veranstaltungsmanagement, technische Abläufe und Kontomanagement personenbezogene Daten verarbeiten;
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste als autorisierter Benutzer verwenden, an den Kunden von Salesforce, der für Ihren Zugriff auf die Dienste verantwortlich ist, um Ihr Konto zu überprüfen und die Einhaltung unserer Nutzungsbedingungen und Richtlinien zu überprüfen;
An Sponsoren von Veranstaltungen, Webinaren oder Wettbewerben, für die Sie sich registrieren;
An Netzwerke und Websites Dritter, damit wir auf ihren Plattformen Werbungen anzeigen können;
Insbesondere in Bezug auf die AppExchange-Website, an unsere externen Partner, die sich bezüglich ihrer Produkte oder Dienste an Sie wenden können;
An professionelle Berater, die Beratungs-, Bank-, Rechts-, Versicherungs- und Buchhaltungsdienstleistungen anbieten; und
An öffentliche und staatliche Behörden, insofern wir dazu verpflichtet sind, personenbezogene Daten offenzulegen, um unsere gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen.
Die vollständige Liste und ausführlichere Informationen finden Sie im Abschnitt „An wen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter?“ in unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung.
Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten können von uns in den Vereinigten Staaten sowie von den (in der vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung angegebenen) verbundenen Unternehmen und Drittparteien in anderen Ländern erhoben, an uns übermittelt und von uns gespeichert werden. Ihre personenbezogenen Daten können daher außerhalb Ihres Lands oder Gerichtsstands und an Orten verarbeitet werden, die möglicherweise nicht denselben Standard an Datenschutz bieten. Wie im Abschnitt „Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten“ unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung beschrieben, haben wir Vorkehrungen getroffen, um einen angemessenen Standard an Schutz zu bieten, sollten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten übermittelt werden.
Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Nach Maßgabe lokaler Datenschutzgesetze verfügen Sie über bestimmte Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten. Je nach den geltenden Gesetzen kann dies folgende Rechte beinhalten:
Sie können Auskunft über Ihre von uns gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten erhalten;
Sie können mehr darüber erfahren, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten;
Sie können die Berichtigung unrichtiger personenbezogener Daten verlangen, wobei der Zweck der Verarbeitung der personenbezogenen Daten berücksichtigt wird, und sicherstellen, dass diese vollständig sind;
Sie können die Löschung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verlangen;
Sie können die Einschränkung der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten verlangen;
Sie können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an einen anderen Verantwortlichen übermitteln, soweit dies möglich ist;
Sie können Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten einlegen;
Sie können bestimmten Offenlegungen Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte ablehnen;
Sollten Sie unter 16 Jahre alt sein, oder jünger als ein sonstiges, zu Datenschutzzwecken geltendes Mündigkeitsalter in entsprechenden individuellen Gerichtsständen, können Sie bestimmten Offenlegungen Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte zustimmen;
Sie haben das Recht, für die Ausübung Ihrer oben beschriebenen Rechte nicht diskriminiert zu werden;
Sie haben das Recht, keiner Entscheidung ausgesetzt zu sein, die ausschließlich auf automatisierter Verarbeitung (einschließlich Profiling) beruht und rechtliche Wirkung hat; und
Sie können Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit widerrufen (insofern die Verarbeitung auf der Einwilligung beruht).
Ausführlichere Informationen über Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und wie Sie diese ausüben können, finden Sie im Abschnitt „Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten“ in unserer vollständigen Datenschutzerklärung.
Kontaktieren Sie uns
Um Ihre Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auszuüben oder wenn Sie Fragen zu unseren Datenschutzpraktiken haben, füllen Sie bitte
dieses Formular
aus, senden Sie uns eine E-Mail an
privacy@salesforce.com
oder
datasubjectrequest@salesforce.com
, kontaktieren Sie uns telefonisch unter 1-855-938-3410 oder wenden Sie sich schriftlich an uns:
Salesforce Data Protection Officer (Salesforce Privacy Team) (und in Indien ein Grievance Officer)
415 Mission St., 3rd Floor,
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
Wenn Sie sich an uns wenden, geben Sie bitte das Land und/oder Bundesland Ihres Wohnsitzes an.
Wenn Sie der Meinung sind, dass wir Ihnen bei Ihrer Beschwerde oder Ihrem Anliegen nicht helfen konnten, und Sie sich im EWR oder in Großbritannien befinden, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörde einzureichen. Wenn Sie in einem Land arbeiten oder wohnen, das Mitglied der Europäischen Union ist oder sich im EWR befindet, finden Sie die Kontaktdaten Ihrer zuständigen Datenschutzbehörde auf der folgenden
Website
.
Chatten Sie live mit einem unserer Mitarbeiter. Oder rufen Sie uns an unter +49 800 0010546.
Kontakt
We use cookies on our website to improve website performance, to analyze website usage and to tailor content and offers to your interests. 

Advertising and functional cookies are only placed with your consent. By clicking “Accept All Cookies”, you consent to us placing these cookies. By clicking “Do Not Accept”, you reject the usage of such cookies. We always place required cookies that do not require consent, which are necessary for the website to work properly.

For more information about the different cookies we are using, read the
Privacy Statement
. To change your cookie settings and preferences, click the Cookie Consent Manager button.
Do Not Accept
Accept All Cookies
Cookie Consent Manager
General Information
Required Cookies
Functional Cookies
Advertising Cookies
General Information
We use three kinds of cookies on our websites: required, functional, and advertising. You can choose whether functional and advertising cookies apply. Click on the different cookie categories to find out more about each category and to change the default settings.
Privacy Statement
Always Active
Required cookies are necessary for basic website functionality. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the website, authentication cookies, and security cookies.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance, and services on the website. Some examples include: cookies used to analyze site traffic, cookies used for market research, and cookies used to display advertising that is not directed to a particular individual.
Cookies Details‎
Advertising Cookies
Advertising cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a viewer’s interests, and direct them specific marketing. Some examples include: cookies used for remarketing, or interest-based advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Sub-policy 6
https://www.paypal.com/de/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Zurück zur Startseite
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
1. Übersicht
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Druckfähige PDF-Datei herunterladen
PayPal-Datenschutzerklärung
Letzte Aktualisierung 15. April 2024
Bitte kontaktieren Sie uns, wenn Sie Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung oder allgemeine Fragen zu Ihren personenbezogenen Daten haben. Ihre Daten werden verwendet, damit wir die Dienste bereitstellen können. Dies erfolgt im Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den maßgeblichen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
1. Übersicht
Diese Datenschutzerklärung zielt darauf ab, Ihnen ausreichende Informationen über die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu bieten, wenn Sie unsere Website besuchen und unsere Dienste nutzen (zusammenfassend die „
Dienste“)
. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese Datenschutzerklärung zu lesen und sie zu nutzen, um fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen.
Die Erläuterung wichtiger Begriffe, die in der Datenschutzerklärung ansonsten nicht definiert werden, finden Sie in Abschnitt 17 (
Begriffsbestimmungen
) am Ende dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
2. Die Aufgaben von PayPal als Datenverantwortlicher
Innerhalb des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums (EWR) ist
PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A.
Datenverantwortlicher für personenbezogene Daten, die beim Besuch unserer Website, während des Anmelde- und Antragsverfahrens sowie während Ihrer fortgesetzten Nutzung der Dienste erhoben und verarbeitet werden.
Bezugnahmen auf "wir", "unser", "uns", "
PayPal
" oder "
PayPal-Unternehmen
" in dieser Datenschutzerklärung bezeichnen PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. sowie die Gruppe der Unternehmen, die jeweils die einzelnen Unternehmen direkt oder indirekt kontrolliert, von ihnen kontrolliert wird oder sich mit ihnen in gemeinsamem Besitz befindet.
Einige der Dritten, an die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, sind unabhängige Datenverantwortliche. Das bedeutet, dass wir nicht diejenigen sind, die bestimmen, wie die von uns weitergegebenen Daten verarbeitet werden. Beispiele sind Behörden, Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute. Wenn Ihre Daten an unabhängige Datenverantwortliche weitergegeben werden, gelten deren Datenrichtlinien. Wir empfehlen Ihnen, ihre Datenschutzerklärungen zu lesen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte zu kennen, bevor Sie mit ihnen interagieren.
Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten bei der Übermittlung außerhalb des EWR, Großbritanniens und der Schweiz schützen, finden Sie in Abschnitt 8 (
Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
)
3. Nutzer ohne Konto
Der Zugriff auf unsere Dienste ist auch für Personen ohne PayPal-Konto oder PayPal-Profil möglich. Auch wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, ohne Inhaber eines Kontos zu sein, erheben wir personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein bei der Nutzung der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto", von markenlosen Zahlungsdiensten (wie z.B. Braintree) oder beim Empfang von Zahlungen von Kontoinhabern über unsere Dienste. Der Begriff "Nutzer" bezieht sich daher gleichermaßen auf Personen mit und ohne Konto. Haben Sie kein Konto, erfolgt die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zur Bereitstellung der Dienste und nach Maßgabe dieser Datenschutzerklärung und den jeweiligen
PayPal-Nutzungsbedingungen
.
4. Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben
Wir erheben die folgenden Datenkategorien über Sie, um unsere Dienste bereitzustellen, Ihre Benutzererfahrung kontinuierlich zu verbessern und unser Geschäft zu betreiben und weiterzuentwickeln. Die Arten von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie erheben, werden nachstehend erläutert.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Ihnen
erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihre Interaktionen mit uns und Ihre Nutzung der Dienste:
Anmelde- und Kontaktdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Ihren Namen, Ihre Postanschrift, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihr Einkommen, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihre Steuernummer, Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, Informationen über Ihren Beruf, Ihr Beschäftigungsverhältnis oder Ihr Geschäft sowie sonstige Informationen, die zur Einrichtung eines Kontos erforderlich sind.
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
. Je nach den von Ihnen gewählten Diensten erheben wir Daten, um Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Telefonnummer, Ihren amtlichen Ausweis, Ihr Alter und Ihre biometrischen Daten zu überprüfen sowie um Ihre elektronische Unterschrift zu erstellen und auszustellen.
Zahlungsinformationen
. Informationen, wie etwa der von Ihnen gesendete oder angeforderte Betrag, Ihr Zahlungsinstrument, Ihre in Verbindung mit den Diensten verwendete Karte oder Zahlungsquelle, einschließlich der Bezeichnung des Ausstellers, des Kartentyps, des Ländercodes, der Kontonummer des Zahlungskontos, des CVV, des Benutzernamens sowie IBAN-Informationen.
Informationen zu Ihren importierten Kontakten
. Wenn Sie sich entscheiden, Ihre Kontaktlisten zu importieren, erfassen wir Informationen, die Sie über Ihre Kontakte eingeben oder importieren, wie Name, Adresse, Telefonnummer, Bilder, E-Mail-Adresse oder Benutzernamen, die mit den importierten oder manuell eingegebenen Kontakten verknüpft sind.
Daten in Ihrem Kontoprofil.
Informationen, die Sie freiwillig eingeben, wie etwa Ihren Benutzernamen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Mobiltelefonnummer, Ihr Profilbild, Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder die Beschreibung Ihrer Person, die sensible personenbezogene Daten enthalten kann, welche Aufschluss über religiöse Überzeugungen, politische oder philosophische Ansichten, Behinderungen, sexuelle Orientierung sowie biometrische Daten geben. Sie können Ihr Profil jederzeit als "privat" kennzeichnen.
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
. Informationen, die Sie offenlegen, wenn Sie an Umfragen teilnehmen oder unsere Kundendienstteams kontaktieren, wie z. B. von Ihnen genutzte Dienste, aufgezeichnete Gespräche, Chat-Gespräche mit uns, E-Mail-Korrespondenz mit uns, Kontostatus, Rückzahlungsverlauf, Spracherkennung. Dies kann Informationen über andere beinhalten, wenn Sie diese mit uns teilen.
Gerätedaten.
Dies sind Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erhoben werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder die Dienste genutzt wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem der Typ, die Netzwerkverbindungen, der Name, die IP-Adresse und Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts sowie Informationen zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Abgeleitete Daten.
Wenn Sie die Dienste nutzen, können wir aus Ihren Transaktionen und personenbezogenen Daten gegebenenfalls weitere Daten ableiten. Dies erfolgt unter anderem, um Ihr Konto zu schützen und Sie bei der Nutzung der Dienste vor Betrug zu bewahren. Zu den abgeleiteten Daten können beispielsweise Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben, Browsing- und Kaufgewohnheiten sowie Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit gehören.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die
von Dritten
erhoben werden, einschließlich von Identitätsprüfern, Datenbrokern, Anbietern, die uns bei der Betrugserkennung helfen, Ihrer Bank, Händlern oder Drittanbieterplattformen, über die Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Daten aus den von Ihnen verknüpften Drittkonten
. Wenn Sie ein Finanzkonto oder ein Konto ohne Finanzbezug verknüpfen, wie z.B. Ihr persönliches E-Mail-Konto, Ihre Konten in sozialen Medien oder Ihre Bank- oder Kreditkonten, erheben wir Informationen, die mit dem angegebenen Zweck in Verbindung stehen, zu dem die Verknüpfung erfolgt ist. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise für die Teilnahme an
Open Banking
entscheiden, erheben wir von Ihren verknüpften Konten die Kontoanmeldedaten, Kontostände, Kontotransaktionen und Informationen über Ihre finanzielle Situation. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung zur Nutzung dieser Funktion jederzeit ändern und die Verknüpfung mit den betreffenden Konten aufheben.
Informationen von Auskunfteien
. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig, erfassen wir im Rahmen Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste kreditbezogene Informationen wie ausstehende und historische Schulden, Rückzahlungshistorie, frühere Kreditgenehmigungen, aktuelle Arbeitsverhältnisse und Beziehungen zu anderen Finanzinstituten.
Transaktionsdaten
. Informationen zu Ihren Bestelldetails und Einkäufen, wie z.B. Artikelbeschreibung, Menge, Preis, Währung, Lieferadresse, Online-Warenkorbinformationen, Verkäufer- und Käuferinformationen und Zahlungsinformationen. Dazu gehören Informationen aus Ihren Transaktionen, bei denen Sie unsere Dienste ohne ein PayPal-Konto nutzen (z. B. Zahlen ohne PayPal-Konto).
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
. In Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht (u.a. Gesetz zur Geldwäscheprävention) können dies Informationen aus externen Sanktionslisten wie Name, Geburtsdatum, Geburtsort, Beruf und der Grund, warum die betreffende Person auf der betreffenden Liste steht, umfassen.
Anwendungen von Drittanbietern
. Informationen von anderen aus Ihrer Nutzung von Anwendungen von Drittanbietern, wie dem Apple App Store oder Google Play Store, sozialen Netzwerken, wie Name, Ihre soziale Netzwerk-ID, Standortinformationen, E-Mail, Geräte-ID, Browser-ID und Profilbild. Ihre Nutzung von Anwendungen Dritter unterliegt der Datenschutzerklärung und den Nutzungsbedingungen für solche Anwendungen.
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die durch Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien sowie von Ihren Geräten automatisch über Sie erhoben werden, einschließlich durch Ihren Zugriff auf unsere Website oder PayPal-App:
Technische Nutzungsdaten
. Informationen über die Antwortzeit für Webseiten, Download-Fehler und Datum und Uhrzeit Ihrer Nutzung des Dienstes, wie z. B. Ihre IP-Adresse, Statistiken darüber, wie Seiten geladen oder angezeigt werden, die Websites, die Sie besucht haben, bevor Sie auf die Websites gelangten, und andere Nutzungs- und Browsing-Informationen, die durch Cookies erhoben werden ("
Technische Nutzungsdaten
").
Informationen von Ihrem Gerät
. Informationen über Ihre Spracheinstellungen, IP-Adresse, Browser-ID, Geräte-ID, Cookie-Einstellungen, Zeitzone, Betriebssystem, Plattform, Bildschirmauflösung und ähnliche Informationen über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen sowie Daten, die von Cookies oder anderen Tracking-Technologien erfasst werden,
Standortinformationen
. Informationen aus IP-basierter Geolokalisierung wie Breiten- und Längengraddaten und Global Positioning System (GPS)-Informationen, wenn Sie uns über Ihre Geräteeinstellungen die Erlaubnis erteilen.
Abgeleitete Daten
. Rückschlüsse, die gezogen werden, um ein Profil über Sie zu erstellen, das Verhaltensmuster und persönliche Vorlieben wie Geschlecht, Einkommen, Surf- und Kaufgewohnheiten und Kreditwürdigkeit widerspiegeln kann.
5. Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
Die
Verarbeitung
Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten kann aus einer Vielzahl von Gründen erfolgen, die nach dem maßgeblichen Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU), Großbritanniens und der Schweiz und unter Beachtung der nachstehenden Rechtsgrundlagen zulässig sind:
Wir erheben die folgenden personenbezogenen Daten, die wir für
erforderlich halten, um unsere vorvertraglichen und vertraglichen Verpflichtungen
Ihnen gegenüber zu erfüllen, und ohne die Sie die Dienste nicht nutzen können.
Zu diesen erforderlichen Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten gehören:
Informationen zu Ihrer Registrierung und Kontaktinformationen
Identifizierungs- und Unterschriftsdaten
Zahlungsinformationen
Informationen zu den gesetzlichen Vorschriften
Informationen, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie uns kontaktieren
Transaktionsdaten
Tracking von Paketen
Dienstspezifische personenbezogene Daten
Informationen von Auskunfteien und Finanzinstituten
Informationen aus Ihren verbundenen Finanzkonten
Daten aus Ihrer Nutzung der Dienste
Technische Nutzungsdaten
Gerätedaten
Standortdaten
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört
:
die Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden vertraglichen Verpflichtungen und die sonstige Betreuung unserer Geschäftsbeziehung zu Ihnen;
Ihre Zahlung für Produkte und die Kundenbeziehung zu verwalten.
Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer Bewerbung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität und Ihre Kontaktdaten zu bestätigen und Sie und andere vor Betrug zu schützen.
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch durch Verwendung von elektronischen Signaturen, und die Verifizierung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
nachzuweisen, dass Transaktionen ausgeführt wurden.
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
die Einhaltung interner Verfahren.
zu beurteilen, welche Zahlungsmöglichkeiten und Dienstleistungen wir Ihnen anbieten, beispielsweise durch die Durchführung interner und externer Bonitätsprüfungen.
Kundenanalyse, Verwaltung unserer Dienste und interne Vorgänge, z.B. Fehlerbehebung, Datenanalyse, Tests, Forschung und statistische Zwecke.
mit Ihnen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste zu kommunizieren.
geltende Gesetze der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten einzuhalten, wie z.B. Gesetze zur Geldwäscheprävention und Buchungsaufbewahrung sowie Vorschriften, die von unseren benannten Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken herausgegeben werden.
Wir haben ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, sicherzustellen, dass PayPal ein sicherer Finanzdienstleister bleibt und weiterhin Dienstleistungen anbietet, die innovativ und von Interesse für Sie sind. Wir tun dies,
sofern unsere berechtigten Interessen nicht durch Ihr Recht auf Nichtverarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu diesem Zweck überwiegen
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
sicherzustellen, dass Inhalte auf die für Sie und Ihr Gerät effektivste Weise dargestellt werden.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
die Ermittlung Ihrer Berechtigung zur Inanspruchnahme von Diensten, die für Sie von Interesse sein könnten, z.B. durch Vornahme interner Bonitätsprüfungen, und die damit verbundene Kommunikation mit Ihnen;
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
die Weiterentwicklung unserer Dienste sowie allgemeine Geschäftsentwicklungszwecke, wie z.B. die Optimierung von Risikomodellen zur Betrugsreduzierung, die Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen und die Erschließung neuer Geschäftsmöglichkeiten;
die fortlaufende Aktualisierung Ihrer Konto- und Finanzdaten;
Marketing-, Produkt- und Kundenanalysen, einschließlich Tests, dazu gehören beispielsweise die Verbesserung unserer Produktpalette und die Optimierung unseres Kundenangebots.
Einhaltung des geltenden Rechts, wie z.B. der Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie der aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und der von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Wir führen auch Sanktionsprüfungen durch, melden Steuerbehörden, Polizeivollzugsbehörden, Vollstreckungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden, wenn wir nicht durch EU-Recht und das Recht der Mitgliedstaaten dazu verpflichtet sind, aber wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen, dass die Weitergabe der Informationen erforderlich ist, um die geltenden Vorschriften einzuhalten.
die Ermöglichung Ihrer Teilnahme an Wettbewerben, Angeboten und Veranstaltungen;
Durchführung von Verpflichtungen zum Risikomanagement wie Kreditleistung und Qualität, Versicherungsrisiken und Erfüllung der Eigenkapitalanforderungen nach geltendem Recht.
die Verarbeitung von Daten über Ihre Kontakte, um Ihnen das Auffinden dieser Kontakte zu erleichtern und sich mit ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen, sowie die Verbesserung der Zahlungssicherheit;
indem Sie uns Daten über Ihre Kontakte übermitteln, erklären Sie, dass Sie befugt sind, diese Daten für die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Zwecke an PayPal weiterzugeben;
Ihnen Informationen, Nachrichten und Werbung über unsere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen, einschließlich wo wir uns mit anderen zusammengetan haben, um ähnliche Dienstleistungen anzubieten.
Informationen über Sie zu assoziieren, um Ihre Nutzung der Dienste ohne PayPal-Konto zu identifizieren (z. B. Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto) oder Markenlose Dienste (z.B. Braintree) und um solche Transaktionen mit Ihrem Konto zu verknüpfen, wenn Sie ein Konto haben oder später ein Konto einrichten.
die Speicherung Ihrer Präferenzen für die nächste Nutzung der Dienste, z.B. Ihre bevorzugte Zahlungsmethode oder ob Sie beim Bezahlen digitale Quittungen per E-Mail oder SMS erhalten möchten;
Wir sind nach dem EU- und dem Mitgliedstaaten-Recht gesetzlich dazu verpflichtet, bestimmte Verarbeitungstätigkeiten durchzuführen.
Wir tun dies, wenn dies erforderlich ist, um geltende Gesetze einzuhalten
.
Zu diesen Aktivitäten gehört:
die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste und Produkte;
die Bestätigung Ihrer Identität, auch zu Unterschriftszwecken, und die Überprüfung Ihrer persönlichen Angaben und Kontaktdaten;
die Begründung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung eines Rechtsanspruchs oder von Inkassoverfahren.
den Missbrauch unserer Dienste im Rahmen unserer Bemühungen, unsere Plattform sicher und geschützt zu halten, zu verhindern.
Risikoanalysen, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement durchzuführen.
geltendes Recht einzuhalten, wie z.B. die Gesetze zu Geldwäscheprävention und Buchführungspflichten sowie die aufsichtsrechtlichen Vorschriften über die Eigenkapitalanforderungen und die von unseren zuständigen Banken und relevanten Kartennetzwerken erlassenen Regeln. Zum Beispiel, wenn wir personenbezogene Daten zur Einhaltung der Know-Your-Customer-Voraussetzungen ("KYC") verarbeiten, um Geldwäsche, Terrorismusfinanzierung und Betrug zu vermeiden, zu erkennen und zu untersuchen. Ebenso führen wir Sanktionsprüfungen durch und machen Meldungen an Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden.
Wir stützen uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf Ihre ausdrückliche und freiwillige Einwilligung,
damit Sie in den Genuss bestimmter Funktionen kommen können, die zwar für die Nutzung der Dienste nicht notwendig, für Sie jedoch möglicherweise von Interesse sind, wie z.B. die Synchronisierung Ihrer Kontaktliste mit Ihrem Konto, die Bereitstellung von biometrischen Daten, gezielte Werbung, die Verknüpfung Ihres E-Mail-Kontos für das Tracking von Paketen oder die Verbindung mit einer Plattform Dritter. Sie können Ihre Entscheidung über die Nutzung dieser Funktionen jederzeit in Ihren Kontoeinstellungen ändern. Bitte beachten Sie, dass der Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung die Rechtmäßigkeit einer von uns vor dem Widerruf durchgeführten Verarbeitung nicht berührt. Weitere Informationen über Ihr Recht auf Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung finden Sie in Abschnitt 10 (“
Ihre Datenschutzrechte
”).
6. Unter welchen Umständen geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter
Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Dritte weiter, wenn eine Rechtsgrundlage dafür besteht.
Dies umfasst:
Andere PayPal-Unternehmen
, um Ihnen die Dienste bereitzustellen, sowie in unserem berechtigten Interesse an der Ausübung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit. Diese Interessen werden in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
näher erläutert. Das PayPal-Unternehmen, das Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhält, verarbeitet diese in Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Behörden
, soweit wir rechtlich dazu verpflichtet sind. Dazu zählen Steuerbehörden, Polizeibehörden, Strafverfolgungsbehörden und Aufsichtsbehörden in den jeweils maßgeblichen Ländern. Wir können auch verpflichtet sein, zuständigen Behörden, wie beispielsweise den Finanzbehörden, Informationen über Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen. Dies kann Ihren Namen, Ihre Adresse und Informationen zu Kartentransaktionen umfassen, die wir in Ihrem Auftrag über unsere Dienste abwickeln. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Einhaltung von Offenlegungspflichten, die sich aus dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten ergeben, ist die bestehende rechtliche Verpflichtung. Soweit die Offenlegung nicht auf dem Recht der EU und der Mitgliedstaaten beruht, ist die Rechtsgrundlage unser berechtigtes Interesse und die Einhaltung geltender Vorschriften zur Verhinderung widerrechtlichen Verhaltens.
Andere Finanzinstitute und Kartennetzwerke
, um die Zahlungsabwicklung zu erleichtern, gemeinsam ein Produkt anzubieten oder Karten Ihrer E-Börse hinzuzufügen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für die Offenlegung ist die Erfüllung des zwischen Ihnen und uns bestehenden Vertrags. Die betreffenden Parteien können auch für andere berechtigte Zwecke auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zugreifen, wie etwa Identitätsprüfung, Betrugsprävention und Risikomanagement. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Betrugsbekämpfungs- und Identitätsprüfungsbehörden
, zum Beispiel, um uns bei der Erkennung von Aktivitäten zu unterstützen, die auf Betrug hindeuten. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist das berechtigte Interesse von uns und unseren Partnern, betrügerisches und rechtswidriges Verhalten zu verhindern.
Inkassobüros
, beispielsweise um unbezahlte überfällige Forderungen durch Dritte wie ein Inkassobüro einzuziehen. Wir tun dies auf der Grundlage unseres berechtigten Interesses, Geschäfte zu tätigen und Schulden einzutreiben. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Datenschutzerklärung dieser Parteien für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten gilt, die Sie ihnen direkt mitteilen, und dass sie Ihre unbezahlten Schulden Kreditauskunfteien melden können, was Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit oder Ihre Fähigkeit zur Sicherung zukünftiger Kredite beeinträchtigen kann.
Dienstanbieter
, die in unserem Auftrag und nach unseren Weisungen Dienstleistungen erbringen, die wir an sie ausgelagert haben, wie z.B. Marketing, IT-Entwicklung, Wartung, Hosting und Support sowie Kundenserviceleistungen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten.
Andere Nutzer, soweit dies ausweislich Ihrer Kontoeinstellungen zulässig ist
. Über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen können Sie anderen Nutzern bestimmte Informationen wie Ihr Profilfoto, Ihren Vor- und Nachnamen, Ihren Benutzernamen oder Ihren Wohnort anzeigen oder zugänglich machen. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist Ihre Einwilligung. Bitte beachten Sie, dass Sie Ihre Profileinstellungen jederzeit und kostenfrei ändern können.
Finanzinstitute in Verbindung mit Ihrer Teilnahme an Open Banking
, z.B. wenn Sie eine Kontoverbindung mit einer anderen Bank, einem Kartenkonto oder einem Aggregator einleiten. Wir prüfen daher, ob Sie über genügend Geld verfügen, oder bestätigen, dass Sie der Inhaber des Kontos sind. Wenn Sie Ihr Konto verknüpfen, ist die Rechtsgrundlage für den Zugriff auf Ihre Kontodaten die Erfüllung unserer vertraglichen Verpflichtungen gegenüber Ihnen.
Partner und Händler, deren Dienstanbieter und sonstige Transaktionsbeteiligte
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise die Dienste nutzen, um Online-Einkäufe zu tätigen, Zahlungen an andere Nutzer vorzunehmen oder Waren zurückzugeben, können wir Informationen über Sie und Ihr Konto an die anderen Parteien weitergeben, die an der Abwicklung Ihrer Transaktionen beteiligt sind. Die Rechtsgrundlage für diese Verarbeitung ist die Erfüllung unserer gegenüber Ihnen bestehenden Vertragspflichten sowie unser berechtigtes Interesse. Bitte beachten Sie, dass für personenbezogene Daten, die an Partner und Händler (oder deren Dienstanbieter) weitergegeben werden, welche an einer Transaktion beteiligt sind, die eigenen Datenschutzerklärungen und Verfahren der Partner und Händler gelten.
Externe, unabhängige Datenverantwortliche
, wenn wir beispielsweise personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien, Erwerber und andere Finanzinstitute weitergeben oder an Sicherheitsprodukte, um zu verhindern, dass Bots auf unsere Dienste zugreifen können.
Bitte beachten Sie, dass für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie direkt an diese Parteien weitergeben, deren Datenschutzerklärungen gelten
. So verwenden wir beispielsweise reCAPTCHA von Google, um Missbrauch unserer Dienste zu verhindern, wenn Sie auf unsere PayPal-App zugreifen. Die
Datenschutzerklärung
und die
Nutzungsbedingungen
von Google gelten für die Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie an Google weitergeben. Weitere Informationen zu Kreditauskunfteien, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit zu bewerten, finden Sie in Abschnitt 12 (
Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
).
Käufer oder sonstige Weitergabe in Verbindung mit einer Geschäftsübertragung
. Wenn wir beispielsweise ein Geschäft oder Vermögenswerte veräußern, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an einen Käufer dieses Geschäfts oder dieser Vermögenswerte weitergeben. Ebenso können personenbezogene Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn PayPal oder ein wesentlicher Teil des PayPal-Vermögens von einer dritten Partei erworben wird. PayPal hat ein berechtigtes Interesse daran, derartige Transaktionen durchführen zu können.
7. Wie lange Ihre personenbezogenen Daten von PayPal gespeichert werden
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange, wie es im Rahmen des Zwecks, für den sie erhoben wurden, und in Übereinstimmung mit dem geltenden Recht benötigt oder zulässig ist.
Die Kriterien für die Bestimmung der Aufbewahrungsfrist lauten:
Personenbezogene Daten, die für die laufende Beziehung zwischen Ihnen und PayPal genutzt werden, werden für die Dauer der Beziehung zuzüglich eines Zeitraums von zehn Jahren gespeichert
Personenbezogene Daten in Bezug auf eine rechtliche Verpflichtung, der wir unterliegen, werden im Einklang mit geltendem Recht aufbewahrt, wie z.B. gemäß geltendem Insolvenzrecht und AML-Verpflichtungen.
Wir speichern personenbezogene Daten so lange wie nötig, wenn die Aufbewahrung angesichts von Rechtsstreitigkeiten, Ermittlungen, Audit- und Compliance-Praktiken oder zum Schutz vor Rechtsansprüchen ratsam ist.
8. Internationale Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Da wir in zahlreichen Ländern tätig sind, kann es vorkommen, dass wir (oder unsere Dienstanbieter) Ihre Daten außerhalb des Landes, in dem Sie leben, übermitteln und verarbeiten. Um Ihre Daten in den Vereinigten Staaten und anderen Ländern zu verarbeiten und zu speichern, setzen wir externe Dienstanbieter ein. In den betreffenden Ländern ist nicht immer ein gleichwertiger Datenschutz gegeben. Wir haben daher konkrete Maßnahmen in Übereinstimmung mit dem Datenschutzrecht der EU und Großbritanniens getroffen, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zu schützen. Bei der Übermittlung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zwischen PayPal-Unternehmen stützen wir uns auf von den zuständigen Aufsichtsbehörden genehmigte bindende Unternehmensregeln (abrufbar
hier
). Andere Übermittlungen erfolgen auf der Grundlage von Standardvertragsklauseln, die von der Europäischen Kommission genehmigt wurden, damit gewährleistet ist, dass Ihre Daten einen hohen Schutzstandard genießen und Ihre Datenschutzrechte gewahrt bleiben.
9. Wie wir Cookies und Tracking-Technologien verwenden
Wenn Sie mit unseren Diensten interagieren, E-Mails öffnen, die wir Ihnen senden, oder eine Website eines Drittanbieters besuchen, für die wir Dienste bereitstellen, verwenden wir und unsere Partner Cookies und andere Tracking-Technologien wie Pixel-Tags, Web-Beacons und Widgets (zusammen „
Cookies
“), um Sie als Benutzer zu erkennen, Ihre Online-Erfahrungen und Online-Inhalte anzupassen, einschließlich um Ihnen interessenbezogene Werbung bereitzustellen, Analysen durchzuführen, Risiken zu mindern und potenziellen Betrug zu verhindern und Vertrauen und Sicherheit auf unseren Websites und Diensten zu fördern. Bestimmte Aspekte und Funktionen unserer Dienste und Websites sind nur durch die Verwendung von Cookies verfügbar. Wenn Sie also bestimmte Cookies ablehnen, kann Ihre Nutzung der Websites und Dienste eingeschränkt oder nicht möglich sein.
Wir verwenden Cookies, um Ihre Geräteinformationen, Informationen zu Internetaktivitäten und Rückschlüsse wie oben beschrieben zu sammeln.
Cookies helfen uns, Folgendes zu tun:
Ihre Daten zu speichern, damit Sie sie nicht erneut eingeben müssen
Zu verfolgen und verstehen, wie Sie unsere Online-Dienste und E-Mails nutzen und mit ihnen interagieren
Unsere Online-Dienste an Ihre Einstellungen anzupassen
Zu messen, wie nützlich und effektiv unsere Dienste und Kommunikation für Sie sind
Unsere Produkte und Dienste zu verwalten und zu verbessern
Do Not Track (DNT) ist eine optionale Browser-Einstellung, mit der Sie Ihre Präferenzen bezüglich der Nachverfolgung Ihrer Handlungen im Internet durch Werbetreibende und andere Dritte festlegen können. Derzeit sind unsere Websites nicht darauf ausgelegt, auf DNT-Signale oder ähnliche Mechanismen von Browsern zu reagieren.
Näheres zu unserer Verwendung von Cookies erfahren Sie in unserer
Erklärung zu Cookies und Tracking-Technologien
.
10. Ihre Datenschutzrechte
Nach geltendem Datenschutzrecht haben Sie bestimmte Rechte, unsere Erfassung und Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu kontrollieren. Zu Ihren Rechten gehören:
Zugriff, Berichtigung, Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung Ihrer Informationen
Wir erkennen an, wie wichtig es ist, dass Sie die Kontrolle über die Verwendung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten haben. Daher bieten wir Ihnen verschiedene Möglichkeiten, Ihre Rechte auf Zugriff, Auskunft, Berichtigung (durch Korrektur oder Aktualisierung), Löschung, Widerspruch, Übertragbarkeit und Einschränkung der Verarbeitung ganz oder teilweise auszuüben.
Wenn Sie ein Konto haben, können Sie Ihre Datenschutzrechte ausüben, indem Sie in den Kontoeinstellungen der PayPal-App auf "Daten und Datenschutz" zugreifen. Auch ohne Konto (z.B. wenn Sie die Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" nutzen) können Sie in Bezug auf Daten zu Transaktionen, die mit der Funktion "Zahlung ohne PayPal-Konto" durchgeführt wurden, Auskunft, Änderung, Berichtigung oder Löschung verlangen. Ersuchen zu den Daten einer anderen Person können Sie einreichen, indem Sie sich mit uns in Verbindung setzen, sofern Sie ordnungsgemäß bevollmächtigt sind. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir von Ihnen gegebenenfalls zusätzliche Verifizierungsinformationen anfordern.
Ihr Recht, den automatisierten Entscheidungen und der Profilerstellung zu widersprechen
Falls Sie im Rahmen der unten beschriebenen automatisierten Entscheidungen nicht zugelassen sind, haben Sie keinen Zugang zu unseren Dienstleistungen, wie beispielsweise unseren Zahlungsmethoden. PayPal verfügt über verschiedene Sicherheitsmechanismen, um die Angemessenheit der Entscheidungen zu gewährleisten. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Überprüfungen unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und fallweise Stichproben. Wenn Sie bezüglich des Ergebnisses Bedenken haben, können Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir werden dann überprüfen, ob das Verfahren korrekt durchgeführt wurde.
Sie haben das Recht, einer automatisierten Entscheidung zu widersprechen, wenn deren Rechtsfolgen oder Ergebnisse geeignet sind, (zusammen mit dem entsprechenden Profiling) in sonstiger Weise erhebliche Auswirkungen auf Sie zu haben, indem Sie uns
kontaktieren
. Wir prüfen die Entscheidung sodann unter Berücksichtigung der zusätzlichen Umstände.
Zustimmung
Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Ihrer Zustimmung verwenden, haben Sie im Allgemeinen das Recht, Ihre Zustimmung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung aufgrund der Zustimmung vor ihrem Widerruf zu beeinträchtigen.
Die Rechtmäßigkeit einer Verarbeitung, die vor Ihrem Widerruf stattgefunden hat, wird durch den Widerruf Ihrer Einwilligung nicht berührt. Das gleiche gilt für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage eines anderen Rechtsgrundes als Ihrer Einwilligung.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen Direktmarketing
Sofern wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten für Direktmarketingzwecke verwenden, können Sie jederzeit Ihre Berechtigungseinstellungen ändern, widersprechen und sich über den Abmeldelink in elektronischen Mitteilungen bzw. über Ihre Kontoeinstellungen von zukünftigen Direktmarketingnachrichten abmelden.
Widerspruchsrecht gegen die Verarbeitung berechtigter Interessen
Verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zur Verfolgung berechtigter Interessen von uns oder einem Dritten, haben Sie das Recht, der Verwendung für diesen Zweck zu widersprechen. Näheres dazu finden Sie in Abschnitt 5 (
Welche personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden und auf welchen Rechtsgrundlagen dies beruht
)
Wie nehmen Sie Ihre Rechte wahr, und wie können Sie uns oder die Datenschutzbehörde kontaktieren?
Wenn Sie aus irgendeinem Grund mit unserer Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten unzufrieden sind, haben Sie das Recht, eine Beschwerde bei der Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz in Ihrem Land einzureichen.
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie online oder per Post unter PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie glauben, dass Ihre Rechte verletzt wurden, können Sie auch bei
den örtlichen Gerichten
Rechtsmittel einlegen.
Sie können auch bei der für uns zuständigen
führenden Aufsichtsbehörde für den Datenschutz
, der Nationalen Kommission für Datenschutz des Großherzogtums Luxemburg (CNPD), eine Beschwerde einreichen. Die betreffende Postanschrift lautet: Commission nationale pour la protection des données, Service des plaints, 15, Boulevard du Jazz, L-4370 Belvaux, Luxemburg.
Der Vertreter im Vereinigten Königreich kann per Post für alle Anfragen zum Datenschutz in Großbritannien bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP kontaktiert werden.
11. Nähere Informationen zu automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung und Profiling
"
Automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung
" ist der Prozess der vollautomatischen Entscheidungsfindung ohne menschliche Beteiligung. In einigen Fällen könnten diese Entscheidungen
rechtliche oder ähnlich erhebliche Auswirkungen
auf Sie als natürliche Person haben. "
Profiling
" bezeichnet Analysen der Persönlichkeit, des Verhaltens, des Interesses und der Gewohnheiten einer Person, um Vorhersagen oder Entscheidungen über sie zu treffen. Soweit dies nach dem Recht der EU oder der Mitgliedstaaten zulässig oder für den Abschluss oder die Erfüllung eines Vertrags erforderlich ist, können wir in einigen Fällen automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling für Entscheidungen verwenden. Ein Beispiel für unseren Einsatz automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung ist die Bewertung Ihrer Kreditwürdigkeit, um Ihre Eignung für bestimmte Kreditprodukte zu beurteilen.
Wir glauben, dass PayPal durch das automatische Treffen solcher Entscheidungen seine Objektivität und Transparenz bei der Entscheidung, welche Dienste Ihnen angeboten werden, erhöht. Wir setzen mehrere Sicherheitsmechanismen ein, um sicherzustellen, dass die Entscheidungen angemessen sind. Zu diesen Mechanismen gehören laufende Übersichten unserer Entscheidungsmodelle und Stichproben im Einzelfall. Sie können stattdessen jederzeit eine manuelle Entscheidungsfindung verlangen, Ihre Meinung äußern oder eine Entscheidungsfindung anfechten, die ausschließlich auf einer automatisierten Verarbeitung, einschließlich Profiling, beruht, wenn eine solche Entscheidung
rechtliche Wirkung entfaltet oder Sie in ähnlicher Weise erheblich beeinträchtigt
. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie Sie diesen Entscheidungen widersprechen können, finden Sie in Abschnitt 10
("Ihre Datenschutzrechte")
.
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr über die Nutzung von automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung oder Profiling erfahren möchten.
12. Warum wir personenbezogene Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben
Haben Sie einen Kredit beantragt oder nutzen Sie unsere Kreditdienste, können wir zur Bearbeitung Ihres Antrags Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an Kreditauskunfteien weitergeben, die uns Informationen über Sie geben, wie z.B. Ihre Finanzhistorie. Dies geschieht, um Kreditwürdigkeit und Produkteignung zu beurteilen, Ihre Identität zu überprüfen, offene Forderungen zu ermitteln und einzuziehen sowie kriminelle Handlungen zu verhindern.
Die Rechtsgrundlagen für diese Übermittlungen finden sich in Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe b (vertraglich) und Art. 6 Abs. 1 Buchstabe f (berechtigtes Interesse) der EU-Datenschutzgrundverordnung ("EU-DSGVO").
Wir werden auch weiterhin laufend Informationen über Sie mit Kreditauskunfteien austauschen, einschließlich über Ihre beglichenen Konten und alle Schulden, die nicht rechtzeitig vollständig zurückgezahlt wurden. Diese Informationen können von CRAs an andere Organisationen weitergegeben werden, um ähnliche Überprüfungen durchzuführen und Ihren Aufenthaltsort zu ermitteln und Schulden einzutreiben.
Ihre Daten werden auch mit den Daten aller gemeinsamen Bewerber oder anderer Finanzpartner verknüpft.
So erfahren Sie mehr
Wenden Sie sich
online
an unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten, wenn Sie mehr darüber erfahren möchten, welche Kreditauskunfteien wir für eine bestimmte Suche eingesetzt haben.
Hier
finden Sie die Liste der in Großbritannien und dem EWR genutzten Kreditauskunfteien, einschließlich der Identitäten der in den jeweiligen Ländern genutzten Kreditauskunfteien und eines Links zu deren Datenschutzerklärung, aus der Sie entnehmen können, wie diese personenbezogene Daten verwenden und weitergeben, einschließlich der Dauer der Speicherung dieser personenbezogenen Daten. Sie können sich an die Kreditauskunfteien, die im Land Ihres Wohnsitzes tätig sind, direkt wenden, wenn Sie Fragen zu deren Dienstleistungen, Ihrem Kreditscore oder zu den über Sie gespeicherten Daten haben. Das gleiche gilt, wenn Sie gegenüber den Kreditauskunfteien Ihre Rechte als betroffene Person ausüben möchten.
13. Wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten schützen
Wir führen technische, physische und administrative Sicherheitsmaßnahmen durch, um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten angemessen vor Verlust, Missbrauch, unbefugtem Zugriff, Weitergabe und Änderung zu schützen. Zu diesen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen gehören Firewalls, Datenverschlüsselung, physische Zugangsbeschränkungen für unsere Rechenzentren und Berechtigungskontrollen für den Zugriff auf Daten. Wir sorgen für die Sicherung unserer Systeme und Dienste. Für die Sicherheit und die Geheimhaltung Ihres Passworts bzw. Ihrer Passwörter und Ihres Kontoprofils bzw. Ihrer Anmeldedaten sind Sie jedoch selbst verantwortlich. Darüber hinaus liegt es in Ihrer Verantwortung zu prüfen, dass die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie besitzen, richtig und auf dem aktuellen Stand sind. Wir haften nicht für den Schutz personenbezogener Daten, die wir auf Grundlage einer von Ihnen autorisierten Kontoverknüpfung an Dritte weitergeben.
14. Können Kinder unsere Dienste nutzen?
Wir erfassen wissentlich keine Informationen, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten, von Kindern unter 16 Jahren oder anderen Personen, die rechtlich nicht in der Lage sind, unsere Websites und Dienste zu nutzen. Wenn wir tatsächliche Kenntnis davon erhalten, dass wir personenbezogene Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der unsere Dienste nicht nutzen darf, werden wir diese unverzüglich löschen, es sei denn, wir sind gesetzlich verpflichtet, diese Daten aufzubewahren.
Bitte
kontaktieren Sie uns
, wenn Sie glauben, dass wir irrtümlich oder unbeabsichtigt Daten von jemandem erhoben haben, der zur Nutzung unserer Dienste nicht berechtigt ist.
15. Aktualisierungen dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung wird von Zeit zu Zeit überarbeitet, um Änderungen an unserer Geschäftstätigkeit, unseren Diensten oder den geltenden Gesetzen Rechnung zu tragen. Wenn nach geltendem Recht auf die überarbeitete Fassung hinzuweisen ist, informieren wir Sie 30 Tage im Voraus durch Bekanntgabe der Änderung auf der Seite
AGB-Aktualisierungen
oder der Seite
Datenschutzerklärung
. Andernfalls wird die überarbeitete Datenschutzerklärung ab dem angegebenen Startdatum wirksam.
16. Hinweis zu Bankvorschriften für Nutzer im EWR und in Großbritannien
In der Regel verlangt das luxemburgische Recht, dem PayPal (in Bezug auf Datenschutz und Bankgeheimnis) unterliegt, einen höheren Grad an Transparenz als die meisten anderen Rechtsordnungen in der EU. Im Gegensatz zu den meisten Anbietern von Internet- oder Finanzdienstleistungen in der EU listen wir daher in dieser Datenschutzerklärung die Drittanbieter und Geschäftspartner, die Dienstleistungen für uns erbringen und denen gegenüber wir Ihre Daten offenlegen, sowie den Zweck der Offenlegung und die Art der offengelegten Daten auf. Einen Link zu diesen Drittanbietern finden Sie
hier
. Dadurch, dass Sie diese Datenschutzerklärung annehmen und ein Konto bei PayPal haben, willigen Sie ausdrücklich in die Übermittlung Ihrer Daten an diese Drittanbieter für die aufgeführten Zwecke ein.
PayPal kann die oben genannte Drittanbieterliste am ersten Werktag eines jeden Quartals (d.h. im Januar, April, Juli und Oktober) aktualisieren. PayPal beginnt erst 30 Tage nach dem Datum der Veröffentlichung der Liste innerhalb der Datenschutzerklärung mit der Übermittlung von Daten an eines der in der jeweiligen Aktualisierung neu aufgeführten Unternehmen oder für die dort neu aufgeführten Zwecke oder Datentypen. Sie sollten sich in jedem Quartal zu den oben genannten Terminen auf der PayPal-Website erneut mit der Liste vertraut machen. Wenn Sie der neuen Form der Datenübertragung nicht innerhalb von 30 Tagen nach Veröffentlichung der aktualisierten Drittanbieterliste widersprechen, gelten die Änderungen der Liste und dieser Datenschutzerklärung als von Ihnen angenommen. Sind Sie mit den Änderungen nicht einverstanden, steht es Ihnen frei, Ihr Konto zu schließen und unsere Dienste nicht mehr zu nutzen.
Um die PayPal-Dienste bereitstellen zu können, müssen wir möglicherweise bestimmte Daten, die wir (wie in dieser Datenschutzerklärung dargelegt) erhoben haben, an andere mit PayPal verbundene Unternehmen oder sonstige Stellen übermitteln, einschließlich solcher, die gemäß diesem Abschnitt eine Funktion als Zahlungsdienstleister, Zahlungsanbieter oder Kontoinhaber (oder ähnliche Funktionen) erfüllen. Sie erkennen an, dass diese Stellen in ihren jeweiligen Rechtsordnungen Gesetzen, Vorschriften, Untersuchungen, Ermittlungen oder Anordnungen unterworfen sein können, durch die sie zur Weitergabe von Daten an die zuständigen Behörden des betreffenden Landes verpflichtet sind. Durch die Nutzung der PayPal-Dienste willigen Sie in die Übermittlung solcher Daten durch uns zum Zweck der Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie ein.
Insbesondere stimmen Sie allen folgenden Datenverarbeitungsmaßnahmen zu und weisen PayPal an, diese vorzunehmen:
a. Offenlegung notwendiger Informationen gegenüber der Polizei und anderen Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Sicherheitskräften, zuständigen staatlichen, zwischenstaatlichen oder überstaatlichen Stellen, zuständigen Behörden, Abteilungen, Aufsichtsbehörden, Selbstregulierungsbehörden oder -organisationen (einschließlich der
hier
im Abschnitt "Behörden" der Drittanbieterliste genannten Stellen) und anderen Dritten, einschließlich Unternehmen der PayPal-Gruppe, (i) deren Weisungen wir gesetzlich verpflichtet und befugt sind, einzuhalten, unter anderem aufgrund der luxemburgischen Gesetze vom 24. Juli 2015 über das US-amerikanische Gesetz zur Einhaltung der Steuervorschriften für Auslandskonten ("FATCA-Gesetz") und vom 18. Dezember 2015 über die einvernehmlich festgelegten Standards für die Berichterstattung der OECD ("CRS-Gesetz"), (ii) bei denen wir Grund zu der Annahme haben, dass die Kooperation mit ihnen bei der Untersuchung von Betrugsfällen oder sonstigen tatsächlichen oder mutmaßlichen widerrechtlichen Aktivitäten geboten ist, oder (iii) zur Ermittlung von Verstößen gegen unsere Nutzungsbedingungen (dies gilt auch für Ihre Zahlungsquelle oder Ihren Kredit- oder Debitkartenanbieter).
Wenn Sie in den Geltungsbereich des FATCA- oder des CRS-Gesetzes fallen, sind wir dazu verpflichtet, Sie über die Weitergabe von Daten an die jeweiligen Behörden zu unterrichten. Informieren Sie sich über die Verpflichtungen von PayPal nach dem FATCA- und dem CRS-Gesetz sowie darüber, welche Auswirkungen diese Verpflichtungen für Sie haben können und welche Informationen wir gegebenenfalls im Zuge dieser Verpflichtungen weitergeben.
Wir und weitere Organisationen, einschließlich von Unternehmen, die Zahlungen über PayPal akzeptieren, können notwendige Daten (darunter auch Daten, die von Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen aufgezeichnet wurden, und Daten aus anderen Ländern) zum Zwecke der Bewertung und Verwaltung von Risiken (wie z.B. zur Verhinderung von Betrug, Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung) weitergeben, nutzen und auf sie zugreifen. Bitte wenden Sie sich an uns, wenn Sie weitere Informationen über die jeweiligen Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen wünschen. Klicken Sie
hier
, um weitere Informationen zu diesen Behörden, den Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen und sonstigen Dritten zu erhalten.
b. Offenlegung von Kontoinformationen gegenüber Inhabern von geistigem Eigentum, wenn diese nach dem maßgeblichen nationalen Recht eines EU-Mitgliedstaates einen außergerichtlichen Auskunftsanspruch gegen PayPal aufgrund einer Verletzung ihrer geistigen Eigentumsrechte haben, bei der PayPal-Dienste genutzt wurden (zum Beispiel § 19, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Markengesetzes oder § 101, Absatz 2, Unterabsatz 3 des deutschen Urheberrechtsgesetzes).
c. Obligatorische Offenlegung aufgrund von Kreditkartenbestimmungen oder in straf- oder zivilrechtlichen Verfahren.
d. Offenlegung Ihres Namens und PayPal-Links im PayPal-Benutzerverzeichnis. Ihre Daten werden anderen PayPal-Kunden angezeigt, wenn diese eine Suche anhand Ihres Namens, Ihrer E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer oder eines Teils dieser Angaben durchführen. Dadurch soll sichergestellt werden, dass Zahlungen an den richtigen Empfänger erfolgen. Diese Funktion kann in den PayPal-Profileinstellungen deaktiviert werden.
e. Nutzen Sie als Händler einen Dritten für den Zugriff auf PayPal oder die Integration von PayPal, können wir notwendige Informationen an diesen Dritten zur Umsetzung und Verwaltung der betreffenden Vereinbarungen weitergeben (darunter den Status Ihrer PayPal-Integration, ob Sie ein aktives PayPal-Konto haben und ob Sie bereits mit einem anderen PayPal-Integrationspartner arbeiten).
f. Offenlegung notwendiger Daten gegenüber Zahlungsanbietern, Wirtschaftsprüfern, Kundenservice-Anbietern, Kreditauskunfteien und Betrugsbekämpfungsstellen, Anbietern von Finanzprodukten, Handelspartnern, Marketing- und PR-Unternehmen, Anbietern von operativen Dienstleistungen, Konzerngesellschaften, Agenturen, Marktplätzen und sonstigen Dritten, die
hier
aufgeführt sind. Zweck der Offenlegung ist die Bereitstellung der PayPal-Dienste an Sie. In der Drittanbieterliste haben wir außerdem unter jeder Kategorie nicht abschließende Beispiele von Drittanbietern (einschließlich deren Abtretungsempfängern und Rechtsnachfolgern) aufgeführt, gegenüber denen eine Offenlegung Ihrer Kontoinformationen derzeit tatsächlich stattfindet oder in Betracht gezogen werden kann. Neben dem Zweck der Offenlegung haben wir auch die offengelegten Informationen angegeben (soweit nicht anders angegeben, ist es diesen Drittanbietern gesetzlich bzw. vertraglich untersagt, die Informationen für einen anderen als den vorgesehenen Zweck zu nutzen).
g. Offenlegung erforderlicher Daten gegenüber Ihren Vertretern bzw. Verfahrensbevollmächtigten (z.B. dem Inhaber einer von Ihnen erteilten Vollmacht oder einem für Sie bestellten Vormund).
h. Offenlegung von zusammengefassten Statistikdaten an unsere Geschäftspartner oder PR-Partner. Wir können beispielsweise offenlegen, dass ein bestimmter Prozentsatz unserer Kunden in einer bestimmten Stadt lebt. Diese zusammengefassten Daten enthalten keine personenbezogenen Daten.
i. Weitergabe notwendiger Kontoinformationen an nicht mit uns verbundene (
hier
aufgeführte) Drittanbieter zu folgenden Zwecken:
Betrugsprävention und Risikosteuerung: Prävention von Betrug sowie Bewertung und Steuerung von Risiken.
Kundenservice: zu Zwecken des Kundenservice, einschließlich der Betreuung Ihrer Konten oder zur Klärung von Konflikten (z.B. in Bezug auf Rechnungen oder Transaktionen).
Versand: im Zusammenhang mit dem Versand und darauf bezogenen Dienstleistungen bei Käufen, die mit PayPal getätigt wurden.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften: zur Unterstützung der Verifizierungsanforderungen bei der Bekämpfung von Geldwäsche und Terrorismusfinanzierung.
Dienstleister: um die mit uns vertraglich verbundenen Dienstleister in die Lage zu versetzen, uns bei geschäftlichen Vorgängen wie z.B. Betrugsprävention, Inkassomaßnahmen, Marketing, Kundenservice und Technologiedienstleistungen zu unterstützen. Diese Dienstleister werden von uns vertraglich verpflichtet, Ihre Daten nur für die Dienstleistungen zu verwenden, die sie für uns erbringen, nicht jedoch zu ihrem eigenen Nutzen.
17. Begriffsbestimmungen
Gerätedaten bezieht sich auf Daten, die automatisch von einem beliebigen Gerät erfasst werden können, das für den Zugriff auf die Seite oder Dienste verwendet wird. Zu diesen Daten gehören unter anderem Ihr Gerätetyp, die Netzwerkverbindungen Ihres Geräts, Name und IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, Informationen zum Webbrowser Ihres Geräts und zur Internetverbindung, mit denen Sie auf die Seiten oder Dienste zugreifen, Geolokalisierungsdaten, Informationen zu Apps, die auf Ihr Gerät heruntergeladen wurden, sowie biometrische Daten.
Geolokalisierungsinformationen sind Informationen, die Ihren Standort mit präziser Genauigkeit identifizieren, indem sie beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwenden, die Sie über Ihr GPS oder Ihre Geräteeinstellungen erhalten.
Standortinformationen sind Informationen, die mit angemessener Genauigkeit Ihren ungefähren Standort identifizieren, indem beispielsweise Längen- und Breitengradkoordinaten verwendet werden, die durch GPS oder Wi-Fi oder Triangulation von Mobilfunkstandorten erhalten werden.
Partner bezeichnet den Händler oder das Unternehmen, mit dem unsere Benutzer Geschäfte tätigen, um Waren oder Dienstleistungen zu erhalten.
Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto hat dieselbe Bedeutung wie in den
Nutzungsbedingungen für Zahlungen ohne PayPal-Konto
.
PayPal-Unternehmen bedeuten Unternehmen, die Sich im Besitz von PayPal befinden und personenbezogene Daten gemäß ihren Nutzungsbedingungen und Datenschutzrichtlinien verarbeiten. PayPal Unternehmen sind Honey Science LLC, Paidy Inc., Happy Returns, LLC, HyperWallet und Braintree.
Personenbezogene Daten bezeichnet Informationen, die einer identifizierten oder direkt oder indirekt identifizierbaren natürlichen Person zugeordnet werden können. Zu "personenbezogenen Daten" zählen beispielsweise Name, Postanschrift (einschließlich Rechnungs- und Lieferadresse), Telefonnummer, E-Mail-Adresse, Zahlungskartennummer, sonstige Kontoinformationen, Kontonummer, Geburtsdatum, Daten aus amtlichen Ausweisen (z.B. Führerscheinnummer, Personalausweisnummer, Reisepassnummer) und biometrische Daten.
Verarbeitung bezeichnet jede Methode oder Art und Weise, wie wir mit personenbezogenen Daten oder Sätzen personenbezogener Daten umgehen, sei es durch automatisierte Mittel, wie z.B. durch Erhebung, Aufzeichnung, Kategorisierung, Strukturierung, Speicherung, Anpassung oder Änderung, Abruf und Konsultation, Verwendung, Offenlegung durch Übertragung, Verbreitung oder anderweitige Bereitstellung, Abgleich oder Kombination, Einschränkung, Löschung oder Vernichtung von personenbezogenen Daten.
Dienste bezeichnet alle Zahlungsdienste mit oder ohne die Markenbezeichnung "PayPal", die Funktion "Bezahlen ohne PayPal-Konto", Kreditprodukte und -dienste, Inhalte, Merkmale, Technologien oder Funktionen sowie alle zugehörigen Websites, Anwendungen und Dienste, die Ihnen von PayPal angeboten werden. Zur Nutzung der Dienste zählt auch die Nutzung unserer Website.
Seiten bezieht sich auf die Websites, mobilen Apps, offiziellen Social-Media-Plattformen oder andere Online-Tools, über die PayPal die Dienste anbietet und die diese Datenschutzerklärung veröffentlicht haben oder mit ihr verlinkt sind.
Markenlose Zahlungsdienste bedeutet, dass Sie mit Händlern interagieren und Zahlungen an diese leisten, indem Sie unsere Kartenzahlungsdienste verwenden, die nicht die Marke PayPal tragen.
Nutzer ist jede Person, die die Dienste als Verbraucher für den persönlichen oder Haushaltsgebrauch nutzt. Für die Zwecke dieser Mitteilung enthält "Benutzer" "Sie" und "Ihr".
18. Unsere Kontaktdaten
Unseren Datenschutzbeauftragten erreichen Sie
online
oder offline unter PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxemburg.
Wenn Sie
Einwohner des Vereinigten Königreichs
sind, wenden Sie sich an unseren Vertreter bei Bird & Bird GDPR Representative UK, 12 New Fetter Lane, Holburn, London EC4A 1JP.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres PayPal-Kontos oder des PayPal-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Klicken Sie
hier
, um uns wegen Ihres Xoom-Kontos oder des Xoom-Kundenservices zu kontaktieren.
Sub-policy 7
https://stripe.com/privacy-center/legal#data-transfers:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorisations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programmes
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Welcome to the Stripe Privacy Center
Stripe respects the privacy of everyone that engages with our platform, and we are committed to being transparent about our privacy processes and policies. We are a platform that enables millions of businesses, and in order to provide our services to our Business Users and End Users, we collect and process personal data.
The Stripe Privacy Center contains the answers to frequently asked questions about how we collect and use personal data, the rights that individuals have in relation to personal data held by Stripe, and how Stripe complies with international data protection laws.
All materials have been prepared for general information purposes only. The information presented is not legal advice, is not to be acted on as such, may not be current and is subject to change without notice.
Below is a list of terms that will help “you” navigate the Privacy Center:
“YOU”
MEANING
STRIPE EXAMPLES
Business User
Stripe provides services to entities (“Business Users”) who directly and indirectly provide us with “End Customer” Personal Data in connection with those Business Users’ own business and activities.
Stripe user or merchant

Platform User

Connect Accounts
End Customer
When you do business with, or otherwise transact with, a Business User (typically a merchant using Stripe Checkout, e.g. when you buy a pair of shoes from a merchant that uses Stripe for payment processing) but are not directly doing business with Stripe, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Individual using Identity

Cardholder using Checkout
End User
When you directly use an End User Service (such as when you sign up for Link, or make a payment to Stripe Climate in your personal capacity), for your personal use, we refer to you as an “End User.”
User of Link

Personal contributor to Stripe Climate
Representative
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User (e.g. you are a founder of a company, or administering an account for a merchant who is a Business User), we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Beneficial owner

Shareholder, officer, director

Account representative
Visitor
When you visit a Site without being logged into a Stripe account or otherwise communicate with Stripe, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” (e.g. you send Stripe a message asking for more information because you are considering being a user of our products).
Stripe Sessions attendee

Stripe Site visitor
Contents
How We Collect, Disclose, and Use Personal Data
Is Stripe acting as a data controller or a data processor?
Which Stripe entities are involved?
What are your data controller activities?
How does Stripe use personal data to improve its products and services?
As a Stripe User and as a data controller, what does GDPR mean for me?
Who are Stripe’s sub-processors and how are they vetted?
From where does Stripe collect information used for fraud prevention and security purposes?
How does Stripe use and share data to authenticate my transactions?
How does Stripe use Personal Data to prevent fraud?
I heard that Stripe is collecting additional information about my account from a third party and/or my other Stripe account(s). Why is Stripe collecting this information?
Does Stripe collect precise location data?
In addition to its sub-processors, what other third parties does Stripe share information with?
What Business User and Representative data does Stripe share with a payment method to facilitate Business Users’ enabling the payment method?
What data about End-Customers and their transactions is used by Radar and what data does Stripe share with its Radar Business Users?
As a Business User, what notice do I provide to my End Customers about Stripe?
Are there any jurisdictional nuances to Stripe’s use of service providers in verifying the identity of Stripe’s business users?
Data Obtained from Third Parties
Does Stripe Record Calls?
How does Stripe collect information for phone verification?
How does Stripe use personal data for co-marketing End User Services?
U.S. Privacy Disclosures
Categories of Personal Information Collected and Disclosed Under the CCPA
What sensitive personal information under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) does Stripe collect and for what purposes does Stripe use that data?
Does Stripe “sell” or “share” my personal information under the CCPA?
How long will Stripe keep my data?
California Privacy Rights Metrics
Stripe Legal Bases Tables
What legal basis does Stripe rely on to process personal data as a data controller?
End Users
End Customers
Representatives
Visitors
Data Processing Agreement
What is a Data Processing Agreement (DPA) and how can I get one with Stripe?
Information about Stripe Products
How do you implement Privacy by Design at Stripe?
Stripe Identity
Stripe’s Card Image Verification
Stripe Connect At a Glance
I am a user with a Custom connected account. Does Stripe also collect information about my Custom connected account from a third party?
What responsibilities do Connect platforms with custom accounts have to allow their users to update or correct information associated with their accounts?
I am a user with a Custom connected account. Will data collected from a third party be visible to my customers?
What are Stripe ACS, Transaction Authentication, and Behavioral Biometrics?
Promotional Emails Feature
Stripe Delegated Authentication
Link
Stripe Capital
Financial Connections
Are there instances when Stripe receives non-Stripe transaction history?
Refunds to End Customer Bank Account
Stripe Frontier
Data Protection Officer
Does Stripe have a Data Protection Officer (DPO)?
Quebec Act
International Data Transfers
How is Stripe dealing with its international data transfers?
Is Stripe certified under the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework?
How does Stripe’s certification under the EU-U.S. DPF impact my organization?
How do the SCCs and UK Addendum impact my organization?
How to get a copy of the SCCs or UK Addendum?
What is CBPR and PRP and is Stripe certified?
Why is Stripe storing authentication and authorization data globally?
Your Rights and Choices
How do I exercise my data protection rights?
When does Stripe continue to process data after it has received a deletion request or objection to the processing?
What data may be shared or made available to enable me to see Stripe ads on other sites?
Does Stripe honor the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signal?
Can I turn off tracking and advanced fraud signals?
How do I delete my account?
How do I delete my Custom Connect account?
How do I delete my Express Connect account?
How long will Stripe keep my data?
What is the Privacy Policy for Stripe Media Services?
Does Stripe localize storage of data in India?
Where can I lodge my complaint on data handling in India?
Notification IT Rules 2021
Cookies & Other Technology
How does Stripe use cookies?
What is Stripe.js?
What are advanced fraud signals?
Why are advanced fraud signals not ad tracking?
What obligations should merchants keep in mind relating to cookie technology on their sites?
How does Stripe remember payment method details for Link?
What obligations should Link users keep in mind relating to cookie technology on their sites?
Does Stripe use CAPTCHA to protect its website from fraud and abuse?
Contact Us
Contact our Privacy Team
Where can I learn more about Stripe’s security practices?
How We Collect, Disclose, and Use Personal Data
Is Stripe acting as a data controller or a data processor?
The answer is both.
The “data controller” is the entity which determines the purposes and means of the data processing taking place. The “data processor” is an entity acting on behalf and under the instructions of a controller in processing personal data.
Stripe is a data controller when it determines the purposes and means of the processing taking place. These data processing activities include (1) providing the Stripe products and services, (2) monitoring, preventing and detecting fraudulent payment transactions and other fraudulent activity on the Stripe platform, (3) complying with legal or regulatory obligations applicable to the financial sector to which Stripe is subject, and (4) analyzing, developing and improving Stripe’s products and services. Please see this
Privacy Center article
for more information on Stripe’s controller activities.
Stripe is a data processor where it is facilitating payment transactions on behalf of and at the direction of a Business User. Our Business Users direct us to take payment from cardholders / End Customers.
Stripe is considered a processor when directed to process payments (i.e., Stripe receives instructions about whom to pay, how much to pay, when to pay).
As a platform provider, we need to ensure consistency across our platform, and that includes consistency with respect to the commitments that we give about how we operate our platform. We contract with all of our Business Users (including some of the world’s largest companies) on this basis.
Which Stripe entities are involved?
For most of our services, either Stripe, Inc., the US parent company operating under US law, or Stripe Payments Europe, Limited (“SPEL”), an Irish company operating under Irish law, is the data controller responsible for Personal Data collected and processed in relation to Stripe Services.
The Stripe entity responsible for your data will depend on your location, the product or service you use with us and whether Stripe is acting as a controller and/or data processor.
If you are located outside of the Americas (e.g., European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland or the United Kingdom, countries located in Asia Pacific (“APAC”)), SPEL is the primary entity responsible for the processing of your personal data. Some of the payment processing services offered by Stripe are services that may be only provided for by an authorised payment services provider or electronic money institution. In this case, SPEL and the Stripe local regulated entity (defined as those who are licensed, authorized or registered by a Local Regulatory Authority) will act as joint controllers of your Personal Data.
Please see our table below for more information on who is your controller in these jurisdictions:
LOCATION OF USER
PURPOSE OF PROCESSING
NAME OF STRIPE ENTITY
LOCATION OF STRIPE ENTITY
EEA
Provision of certain authorised payment services in the EEA and Switzerland
Please see
https://stripe.com/ie/ssa
Stripe Technology Europe, Limited (the e-money licensed entity with the Central Bank of Ireland)
Ireland
EEA
All other activities.
SPEL
Ireland
United Kingdom & Switzerland
Provision of authorised payment services in the UK.
Please see
https://stripe.com/gb/ssa
Stripe Payments UK, Ltd. (the e-money licensed entity with the UK FCA)
United Kingdom
United Kingdom & Switzerland
All other activities.
SPEL
Ireland
Stripe affiliates also provide local support services in certain countries where Stripe operates. These entities act as data processors on behalf of Stripe, Inc. or SPEL, depending on the jurisdiction. You will find the most up-to-date list of the Stripe affiliates on this
page
.
For certain products, Stripe may act as an independent controller (e.g. Stripe Capital), a data processor or both (e.g. Stripe Identity). Please see the Privacy Center article for each specific product for more information.
What are your data controller activities?
Providing the Stripe products and services to Business Users and End Users, including determining the third parties (banks and payment method providers) to be utilized;
Monitoring, preventing and detecting fraudulent payment transactions and other fraudulent activity on the Stripe platform;
Complying with legal or regulatory obligations applicable to the financial sector to which Stripe is subject, including applicable anti-money laundering screening and compliance with know-your-customer obligations; and
Analyzing, developing and improving Stripe’s products and services.
How does Stripe use personal data to improve its products and services?
Stripe collects data, including personal data, while providing services to its users.  Stripe uses some of the data it collects to improve its products and services, including by training the models it employs for fraud and loss prevention and to analyze the performance of Stripe’s products as permitted by applicable law and agreements.
Personal data is required to train Stripe’s fraud and loss prevention models, including those employed by Stripe Radar and Stripe Identity.  These products rely in part on their ability to recognize certain characteristics that help determine whether a transaction is fraudulent or unlikely to complete.  For example, they compare Personal Data presented in a specific transaction to Personal Data collected in the past to identify when a fraudster is attempting to perpetrate fraud, including to impersonate a Stripe User or their End Customers.
In addition to using Personal Data to train its fraud and loss prevention models, Stripe also uses transaction data to assess the functioning of its current products and proposed product improvements.  For instance, Stripe uses data collected by its java script library stripe.js to assess the performance of the checkout surfaces it provides to Business Users, and payment authorization data to evaluate ways to improve authorization rates for Business Users.
Stripe uses Personal Data, such as IP address, to identify which pages and features a user interacted with during a checkout session, so that it can assess the effect different features have on the outcome of a checkout session.
Stripe uses pseudonymized or aggregated transaction data for these purposes in certain circumstances.  When Stripe communicates the results of its product performance analytics to Business Users or for advertising purposes, it does so only in aggregated or de-identified form that does not permit third-parties outside of Stripe to associate that data with any particular End Customers.
You should consult your legal counsel regarding how best to disclose Stripe’s data usage to your customers.  But, here is a paragraph you could add to your privacy policy if it doesn’t already include such a disclosure:
We use Stripe for payments, analytics, and other business services.  Stripe may collect personal data including via cookies and similar technologies.  The personal data Stripe collects may include transactional data and identifying information about devices that connect to its services. Stripe uses this information to operate and improve the services it provides to us, including for fraud detection, loss prevention, authentication, and analytics related to the performance of its services.  You can learn more about Stripe and read its privacy policy at
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
As a Stripe User and as a data controller, what does GDPR mean for me?
As a data controller, Business Users are responsible for the relationship with the data subject (i.e., your End Customer). You may instruct a third party (like Stripe) to process the data, but it is your job to set the purpose (or objectives) and legal basis for the processing.
The GDPR requires data controllers to use third parties who agree to abide by certain contractual terms. To be sure of this, the data controller must have Data Processing Agreements (“DPAs”) with each third party. Our DPA has been designed to serve this purpose for you; it is strongly aligned with payment transactions, so it should establish that you are compliant with GDPR from a payments perspective.
Who are Stripe’s sub-processors and how are they vetted?
Please see our
service providers page
where we have a list of our most common sub-processors, service providers and affiliates. Stripe identifies, evaluates, and engages sub-processors through our vendor management program. We enter into a contract with each sub-processor prior to sharing data with the sub-processor, and each contract contains terms that provide for monitoring and audit. In addition, all potential vendors are vetted and approved through Stripe’s security review process before we begin using their services.
From where does Stripe collect information used for fraud prevention and security purposes?
To prevent fraud and strengthen our security, we may collect information from Business Users, End Customers, End Users, financial parties, and in some cases third parties. For example, we collect and analyze information that helps us identify bad actors and bots, including both transactional data (such as amount, customer shipping address, date, and so on) and advanced fraud detection signals (device and activity signals).
Learn more
.
Stripe also receives information from third parties to prevent and respond to security incidents, and for protecting against other fraudulent activity. For example, we may receive information from third parties about IP addresses that malicious actors have compromised. Stripe may use Representatives' Personal Data provided at onboarding to query third party databases regarding fraud and risk signals associated with that data.  The third party providers operating these databases may use Stripe’s experience with the Personal Data queried to inform their fraud and risk signals.
How does Stripe use and share data to authenticate my transactions?
To help prevent fraudulent transactions when you use your debit or credit card to pay a Business User, we may share data related to you and your transaction with your card issuer, bank, and payment method provider so that they can verify your identity and authenticate your payment method.  The data we share to enable this process may include personal data such as your name, email address and phone number, and payment-specific data like your billing and shipping address.
Issuers and payment method providers may use the information we share to verify you through a process called 3D Secure Authentication or 3DS.  3DS is an authentication standard designed by the major card networks which aims to reduce fraud and provide added security by providing an additional layer of authentication to online card payments. 3DS is often known by its branded names like Visa Secure, Mastercard Identity Check, or American Express SafeKey. It works by comparing the information you provide at the time of the transaction with the information that your issuer and payment method provider already have on file, to help reduce the risk that someone else may use your card for an unauthorized transaction.
Additionally, we may share contextual data, such as your device ID and previous transaction history. The process may take place as part of the checkout flow, which may involve you being redirected to another page where your bank asks you for a code or password to approve the purchase.
3DS is frequently used in Europe in support of Strong Customer Authentication requirements under the Payment Services Directive (PSD2) and to comply with similar regulations in other countries including the UK, India and Australia.  When we act as a service provider to your bank under our Stripe Issuing program we and our service providers may use personal data such as your card number, contact information, payment-specific data, like your billing and shipping address, and contextual data such as your device ID and transaction history to facilitate 3DS authentication.
How does Stripe use Personal Data to prevent fraud?
The Stripe products that use Personal Data to enable Stripe’s Business Users to detect and prevent fraud include Stripe Radar, Stripe Identity, and Stripe Merchant Risk Tooling.  Stripe also employs internal risk models and other product features, such as 3D Secure incorporated into Stripe’s Issuing product, to prevent its products and services from being used for fraudulent activity.
Stripe Radar processes personal data as described
here
using its machine learning model to produce scores indicating the likelihood that a payment method is being offered by someone other than an authorized user.  These scores are designed to identify fraudulent transactions, they do not rate the character or creditworthiness of the individuals involved in a particular transaction.  Based on the service selected by the Business User, Stripe may provide the Radar scores to its Business Users to help them to combat fraud and provide a mechanism for them to set rules to better manage transactions based on Radar scores and other indicators of fraud.
Stripe Identity uses Personal Data, as described
here
, to combat fraud by enabling Business Users to verify whether the person they are transacting with is who they say they are. Identity compares biometric identifiers in a selfie against government issued ID. Identity can also validate Personal Data, such as name, date of birth, and government ID number, that an End Customer types into a web form against government and third-party databases to determine if the identity presented matches the government issued ID number.
Stripe’s internal risk models seek to combat fraud by recognizing when a fraudster is attempting to use Stripe’s services for fraudulent purposes. For instance, Stripe uses Radar scores internally to determine whether a payment method offered to Stripe products such as Link, Frontier, Crypto Onramp, and Bill Pay should be accepted or rejected as likely fraudulent.  Stripe’s internal risk models also use aggregated cardholder features to recognize when a large number of transactions are likely being conducted by the same individual for purposes of testing or cashing out stolen payment methods. Where Stripe recognizes such activity, it will block transactions to prevent harm to itself, its users, and others.
Stripe Merchant Risk Tooling leverages Stripe’s internal risk models to help Stripe Connect Platforms identify indicators of potential fraud associated with their Connected Accounts. Merchant Risk Tooling produces reasoned scores that identify to Platform’s internal fraud teams when there are indicators consistent with a Connected Account attempting to use the Platform’s services (and Stripe) for fraudulent purposes. These scores are designed to supplement the Platforms’ due diligence related to their Connected Accounts and their business activities.  They do not score the character or creditworthiness of the individuals involved in the Connected Accounts’ operations. The data factored into Merchant Risk Tooling includes payments transaction data, business representative details (such as IP address, physical address, and e-mail address) business website content, and other information regarding the businesses Business Users operate on Stripe.
Along with attempting to combat fraud at the merchant and Stripe-wide levels as described above, Stripe also incorporates features in its individual products that use Personal Data to  prevent fraud. One such feature is 3D Secure authentication, incorporated in Stripe Issuing.  This feature is required by law in certain jurisdictions and requires cardholders to authenticate using one or more factors before they can complete an online transaction.  Stripe and its service providers use and store personal data including cardholder PANs, contact information, and transaction history to authenticate cardholders using one time passcodes and knowledge of past transactions. These measures help combat fraud by increasing the likelihood that the person offering a card for payment is an authorized user.
I heard that Stripe is collecting additional information about my account from a third party and/or my other Stripe account. Why is Stripe collecting this information?
Stripe may collect additional information about your account to allow Stripe and its financial partners to detect fraud and/or fulfill financial compliance requirements. These requirements come from our financial partners or regulatory obligations and are intended to prevent abuse of the financial system. Examples of missing data fields include your address, phone number, social security number, date of birth, employer identification number, or website URL. Stripe may be able to fill in some of this information by leveraging data we have collected from one of your other Stripe accounts or by obtaining data from a third party. We will show Business Users the information that we are associating with their account on your dashboard, and Business Users may update or correct that information via your dashboard. Please see Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
for additional information.
Does Stripe collect precise location data?
Devices such as mobile phones or computers may collect precise location data using GPS technology.  Stripe does not collect GPS data from devices and browsers.
Depending on the Services you use and the Business Users’ implementation of our Business Services, we will collect information (including IP addresses) through cookies and similar technology. We will collect your IP address when you visit our Sites. Please see our
Cookie Policy
to learn more.  Stripe may use location information, including approximate latitude and longitude, derived from End Customers IP addresses to detect potentially fraudulent transactions.
We also receive approximate location information (such as country, city or state) from third party providers such as
MaxMind
to help us determine the approximate location of visitors to our website for marketing purposes (for example, inviting you to local Stripe events).
In addition to its sub-processors, what other third parties does Stripe share information with?
When we work with service providers in our capacity as a data processor for our Business Users’ and End Users’ personal data, the GDPR calls these third-party service providers a sub-processor. Sub-processors are service providers who have or potentially will have access to or process personal data on behalf of Stripe. These third parties are disclosed on our
Stripe Service Providers
List.
In addition to Stripe’s sub-processors, we may also share Business Users’ onboarding data and payment instrument information with third party business partners when this is necessary to provide our services to our Business Users. We do so, for example, for the purposes of offering payment processing services to our Business Users or facilitating payment settlements.
Third parties to whom we may disclose personal data for this purpose are banks, payment method providers and payment processors, including, but not limited to, the following entities:
American Express Payment Services Limited and American Express Payments Europe S.L.
Banking Circle S.A.
Barclays Bank PLC
Citibank Europe plc
Credit Mutuel Arkea and Arkea Banking Services
Currence iDEAL B.V.
Klarna AB
Mastercard Europe S.A.
Polski Standard Płatności
PPRO Financial Ltd.
Swisscard AECS GmbH
Visa Europe Limited
The data shared with payment method providers will depend on the payment method(s) enabled on the Business User’s account.
In addition, Stripe shares personal data as we believe necessary to, among other things, protect Stripe’s services, rights, privacy, safety and property of Stripe, our users or others. For example, to protect our services, Stripe may receive or disclose information about IP addresses that malicious actors have compromised.
Please note that if you provide us with your payment method information (e.g., a card number and expiration date) to store on file or otherwise in connection with a transaction, Stripe may update your card information if your information has changed or been updated to ensure your transactions go through smoothly, including by working with your card issuer or payment card network. If you would prefer to not have your updated payment method details shared with us, please reach out to your card issuing bank.
Transfer
Stripe will pass on personal data to affiliates and service providers or sub-processors, if deemed strictly necessary to carry out contractual obligations or for the data to be processed. Depending on the enabled payment method(s), data may be transferred to the jurisdiction(s) of the respective payment method(s). Before we engage any third party, we perform due diligence, including a vendor security assessment. All of our service providers are subject to contract terms designed to ensure that these service providers process personal data only for the purposes of providing services to Stripe and in accordance with our commitments to Users and applicable data protection laws. Moreover, Stripe maintains and enforces a security program that addresses the management of security and the security controls employed by Stripe, which includes third party risk management. In addition, Stripe employees, agents, and contractors acknowledge their data security and privacy responsibilities under Stripe’s policies.
Financial Connections
If you are an End Customer who has been asked to link your financial account using Stripe, please visit the support webpage
here
to learn more about our privacy practices. Or you can jump to the specific topics linked here:
Linking my financial account and consent
Data collected, stored, and shared from my linked account
How Stripe accesses data from my linked account
Relationship between Stripe and its service providers
Data security
Who can access data from my linked account and for what purposes
Who will obtain my login credentials
Requesting disconnection or data deletion
Correcting my financial account information
What Business User and Representative data does Stripe share with a payment method to facilitate Business Users’ enabling the payment method?
Stripe makes it possible for its Business Users to enable payment methods including card networks such as Visa and MasterCard, mobile and online payment methods such as WeChat Pay and Alipay, and buy now pay later providers such as Klarna and Afterpay.  Certain payment methods are enabled by default when you onboard with Stripe. After onboarding, for eligible users, Stripe may enable additional payment methods after notifying you. Your Stripe dashboard allows you to enable or disable payment methods at any time.
Stripe may share information regarding a Business User and the Business User’s Representative with a payment method provider when a payment method is enabled and when Stripe processes transactions involving the payment method. The payment method provider may require Business Users’ and their Representatives' Personal Data for a number of purposes, including complying with know your customer (KYC), anti-money laundering, and other legal and compliance requirements, preventing fraud, facilitating transactions, providing services to Business Users, and servicing the payment method’s platform. For these purposes, Stripe may provide payment method providers with Business User data, including but not limited to business name, business type, merchant category codes, merchant ID, transaction history, bank account information, and other transaction specific information such as product type and tax amount that Stripe ascertains from that data.  Stripe may also provide payment methods with Business Users’ Representatives’ personal data, including name, address, contact information, date of birth, tax identification number, and other government issued ID information.  The information Stripe shares with payment method providers is data that Stripe has collected from the merchant or ascertained from data provided by the merchant.
What data about End-Customers and their transactions is used by Radar and what data does Stripe share with its Radar Business Users?
When processing payments, it’s valuable to Stripe, Business Users and End Customers to enable legitimate transactions while also trying to prevent fraudulent transactions, making online purchases safer for everyone involved.
Radar
helps detect potentially fraudulent transactions for Stripe’s Business Users (i.e., merchants) through
machine learning
and other techniques. To do this, Radar leverages data collected across our Services.
Radar’s machine learning model produces transaction “scores” indicating the model’s assessment of the likelihood that a transaction is fraudulent.  Business Users can leverage this score and use it to implement automated rules to determine whether to allow, block, or flag transactions for additional review. Business Users can use Radar as one of multiple inputs in making decisions with respect to the potential for fraud in a transaction.
Radar uses data collected about the End Customer from various sources, including payments transaction data,
advanced fraud detection
data, Bank Connections data, IP address, and physical address information. Radar uses this data to assess whether the payment method offered by the End Customer is likely unauthorized.
Stripe may share with the Business User and allow them to export (where allowed by Law) certain information relevant to fraud detection, including:
a transaction score that assesses the likelihood of the transaction becoming a fraudulent charge-back,
risk insights
for that transaction,
related payments
made by the End-Customer to the Business User,
other transaction data
related to that End-Customer’s transaction with that Business User (e.g., cardholder name, card information, and the payment amount and date),
device and browser information for the device used to make the transaction with that Business User, and
aggregated benchmarks
.
As a Business User, what notice do I provide to my End Customers about Stripe?
Under the terms of our agreements, Business Users are required to provide all necessary notices and obtain all necessary rights and consents from their End Customers to enable Stripe to lawfully collect, use, retain and disclose the Personal Data as part of the Stripe Services. Business Users, as data controllers, are responsible for the contents of their privacy notice and cookie banner. As an example, here is a paragraph that you can consider adding to your privacy notice (if you don’t already have such a disclosure):
We use Stripe for payments, analytics, and other business services. Stripe may collect personal data including via cookies and similar technologies. The personal data Stripe collects may include transactional data and identifying information about devices that connect to its services. Stripe uses this information to operate and improve the services it provides to us, including for fraud detection, loss prevention, authentication, and analytics related to the performance of its services. You can learn more about Stripe and read its privacy policy at
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
Please be aware that the disclosure above is for illustrative purposes only and is not legal advice. Please talk to your legal advisor to understand how to comply with your obligations under applicable law.
To comply with our transparency obligations, we explain how our cookies are used in our
Cookie Policy
and our
Cookies Settings Dashboard
sets out our list of cookies. We remind our Business Users to review the cookies placed on their website and to update their cookie banners accordingly.
Are there any jurisdictional nuances to Stripe’s use of service providers in verifying the identity of Stripe’s business users?
Germany
Stripe, through its service providers, may use information from infoscore Consumer Data GmbH to verify the identity of Stripe Business Users in Germany.  Information about infoscore Consumer Data GmbH is available
here
.
Data Obtained from Third Parties
If you have been notified by Stripe that we obtained your data from a third party, the following applies:
Your Personal Data will be processed in accordance with Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
, which describes:
the identity and the contact details of Stripe;
the contact details of Stripe’s
Data Protection Officer
;
the purposes of the processing for which the Personal Data are intended as well as the legal basis for the processing, which includes prospecting and direct marketing, as permitted under applicable law;
the recipients or categories of recipients of the Personal Data. In addition to the recipients mentioned in the Stripe Privacy Policy, Personal Data may be shared with Salesloft, Inc. as a processor of Stripe;
that Stripe intends to transfer Personal Data to a recipient in a third country and a reference to the appropriate or suitable safeguards and the means to obtain a copy of them or where they have been made available (see
here
and
here
for more information);
the period for which the Personal Data will be stored and/or the criteria used to determine that period;
the existence of the right to request from Stripe access to and rectification or erasure of Personal Data or restriction of processing concerning the data subject and to object to processing as well as the right to data portability or any other applicable rights under data protection laws (see also
here
);
the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
We may have obtained the following Personal Data from third parties: name, business contact details (e.g., email, phone number, social media handle), business address, company/employer information, role and position, and industry.
We use a number of  third parties to obtain Personal Data from, including Cognism Limited, ZoomInfo Technologies Inc., API Hub, Inc. dba Clearbit, Crunchbase Inc., PitchBook Data, Inc., infoAnalytica, Inc., People Data Labs, Inc., and Dealroom.co. These third parties collect Personal Data as separate controllers in accordance with their own privacy policies. If you wish to have your data removed from their respective database(s), please contact those parties directly. Some of these parties may have obtained your data from publicly accessible sources.
We do not use Personal Data we have obtained from third parties for automated decision-making.
Where Stripe relies on legitimate interest to process your Personal Data, such legitimate interest may be:
B2B market research and analysis;
B2B prospecting and selling; and
B2B marketing and advertising.
Does Stripe Record Calls?
In some situations, we may record voice or video calls we have with you. At the start of the call, we disclose the fact that a call is being recorded and, unless we are required to record the call, will ask for your consent to record the call and/or offer you the option to decline the call being recorded. We may use third-party systems to record calls, including Zoom and Salesloft.
The call recordings will be processed for the purposes stated at the start of the call, typically for quality and training purposes, and in accordance with Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
. We enable you to exercise your rights as a data subject under applicable law with respect to these recordings as set out in Stripe’s Privacy Policy. In the event that you request a copy of the recording, Stripe may provide you with a redacted copy of the recording, or a (redacted) transcript of the recording, where appropriate, and as permitted under applicable law.
We normally retain call recordings for up to 1 year, and for Zoom recordings, 180 days. User support related phone calls are normally retained for 5 years as Stripe is under a legal obligation to keep this data for 5 years.
Collection related call recordings are kept for 5 years.
After this, call recordings will be deleted, unless we have a valid legal ground to keep the call recordings for a longer period of time.
How does Stripe collect information for phone verification?
When you use Stripe services, we may need to verify your identity to comply with legal requirements or ensure that we are dealing with you and not a fraudster attempting to impersonate you.  We may also verify your identity as a service to the Business Users with which you choose to transact.  One of the data points we may consider for these purposes is whether your phone number is associated with the other information you have provided while seeking services from us or our Business Users.  We may rely on third-party services providers to assist us in performing such verification checks.  In particular, your wireless carrier may disclose information about your account and your wireless device, if available, to Stripe or our service providers for the duration of your business relationship, to help us identify you or your wireless device, to prevent fraud, and as otherwise described in our Privacy Policy.
How does Stripe use personal data for co-marketing End User Services?
If you have a Link account, Stripe may review your Link Transaction Data to determine which businesses you transact with and which additional services you may benefit from. We may also, where permitted by law, use your personal data (such as your email address, device information, and transaction history) to send you marketing information about our Services or co-marketing communications about how you can use our Services with Business Users you transact or interact with. We do not share your Transaction Data or other Personal Data with these Business Users to facilitate these marketing activities.
U.S. Privacy Disclosures
Categories of Personal Information Collected and Disclosed Under the CCPA
Below are the categories of data we collect and how that information is used in the last 12 months.  We also disclosed this data for a business purpose within the preceding 12 months.
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL INFORMATION COLLECTED
PURPOSES:
DISCLOSED FOR A BUSINESS PURPOSE WITHIN THE PRECEDING 12 MONTHS TO:
Identifiers (e.g., a device identifier)
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, to provide and advertise our services, and to comply with law.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers, financial partners servicing the financial product), third parties like ad partners that help us advertise our products and services,  the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law (e.g., gender and age noted in ID documents that you submit so that Stripe can verify your identity on behalf of your merchant - a.k.a. our business user)
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, to provide our services, and to comply with law.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers and financial partners servicing the financial product), the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Commercial information (e.g., the merchant that you choose to do business with - a.k.a. our business user may receive your transaction data)
Fraud prevention and security, to provide our services, to comply with law, enforce our terms of services, and for other purposes consistent with your consent and applicable law.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers and financial partners servicing the financial product), the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Biometric information (e.g., biometric identifiers from photo IDs used to confirm your identity)
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, and for other purposes consistent with your consent and applicable law, such as to improve our verification systems.
Learn more
.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: a service provider - i.e., Amazon Web Services ("AWS"), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Online activity information (e.g., information about devices and browsers across certain business user sites that use Stripe and IP addresses associated with those devices and browsers, and usage data)
Fraud detection and security, to comply with law, and to provide and advertise our services.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers, financial partners servicing the financial product), third parties like ad partners that help us advertise our products and services, the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Location Data (
Learn more
)
Fraud detection and security, in furtherance of compliance with legal obligations, and to provide and advertise our services.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers, financial partners servicing the financial product), third parties like ad partners that help us advertise our products and services,  the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Audiovisual (e.g., visual, audio, or similar information, like photos you submit so that Stripe can verify your identity on behalf of your merchant – a.k.a. our business user)
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, to provide our services, and to comply with legal obligations.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service providers, the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Professional or Employment-Related Information
Recruiting and employment, and to comply with legal obligations.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service providers, an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
Categories of personal information described in Cal. Civ. Code 1798.80(e)(such as name, address, telephone number, credit card or debit card number)
See above.  Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, to provide and advertise our services, and to comply with legal obligations.
We may disclose the data, pursuant to applicable law, to: service enablers (including service providers and financial partners servicing the financial product), the merchant that you do business with (a.k.a. our business user), an entity engaged in a business transfer/merger, law enforcement, courts, governments and regulatory agencies.
What sensitive personal information under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) does Stripe collect and for what purposes does Stripe use that data?
Stripe only processes sensitive personal information for the purposes specified in section 7027(m) of the California Consumer Privacy Act Regulations, or without the purpose of inferring characteristics about a consumer.
Sensitive Personal Information Categories
Purposes include:
Identification documents, including driver’s license, passport, and social security (including any underlying sensitive information in the identity card, such as racial or ethnic origin)
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, to provide our services, and to comply with legal obligations.
Biometric information
Identity verification, fraud prevention and security, and for other purposes consistent with your consent and applicable law, such as to improve our verification systems.
Learn more
.
Location Data
Learn more
.
Fraud detection and security, to comply with law, and to provide our services.
Learn more
.
Account log-in, financial account in combination with any required security access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account
To provide our services (e.g.,
Financial Connections
), comply with law, enforce our terms of services, and for other purposes consistent with your consent and applicable law.
Does Stripe “sell” or “share” my personal information under the CCPA?
We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide your personal data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes (such as to improve their ad delivery), Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. To our knowledge, Stripe does not sell personal information of minors under 16 years of age.
Within the past 12 months, the following categories of Personal Information described in section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code have been “sold” or “shared” (as defined under the CCPA) to third parties (including advertising partners) who assist us in advertising our services:
Identifiers (e.g., a device identifier)
Online activity information (e.g., information about devices and browsers across certain business user sites that use Stripe and IP addresses associated with those devices and browsers, and usage data)
Geolocation Data (e.g., IP addresses)
You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing”
here.
How long will Stripe keep my data?
Stripe keeps Personal Data as necessary to achieve the purposes listed
here
. To determine the appropriate retention periods for different categories of Personal Data, we consider various criteria such as the jurisdiction you are located in, the nature of our relationship with you, the types of products or services being offered or provided to you, the nature and sensitivity of your Personal Data, retention requirements under applicable laws and regulations, and other legitimate interests we may pursue through retaining your Personal Data, including detecting and preventing fraud and financial crimes, enforcing and defending our legal rights, complying with valid legal process requests from courts or competent authorities, improving the quality of our services, and promoting our products and services as appropriate and as permitted by applicable law and agreements.
For most jurisdictions, Stripe will generally keep Personal Data we obtain from our Business Users for a period of five or more years from the end of the business relationship with you, or the date of the last transaction, whichever is later.
The table below outlines different categories of personal data collected, along with the retention period or the criteria used to determine that period.
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED
RETENTION PERIOD OR THE CRITERIA USED TO DETERMINE THAT PERIOD
Non-sensitive Identifiers (e.g., name, postal address, email address, account name)
Categories of personal information described in Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e) (such as name, address, telephone number, credit card or debit card number)
Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law (e.g., gender and age noted in ID documents that you submit so that Stripe can verify your identity on behalf of your merchant - a.k.a. our business user)
Commercial information (e.g., transaction data that the merchant you choose to do business with - a.k.a. our business user - may receive)
Online activity information (e.g., certain information about devices and browsers across certain business user sites that use Stripe, and usage data)
Audiovisual (e.g., visual, audio, or similar information, like photos you submit so that Stripe can verify your identity on behalf of your merchant – a.k.a. our business user)
For the duration necessary for Stripe to: (1) comply with law; (2) provide the Stripe services, and; (3) pursue our legitimate interests, including detecting and preventing fraud and financial crimes, enforcing and defending our legal rights, complying with valid legal process requests from courts or competent authorities, improving the quality of our services, and promoting our products and services as appropriate and as permitted by applicable law and agreements.
Biometric information (e.g., biometric identifiers from photo IDs and selfies used to confirm your identity)
No longer than 1 year, or upon revocation of your consent, whichever is earlier.
Geolocation Data (e.g., IP addresses)
For the duration necessary for Stripe to: (1) comply with law; (2) provide the Stripe services, and; (3) pursue our legitimate interests, including detecting and preventing fraud and financial crimes, enforcing and defending our legal rights, and complying with valid legal process requests from courts or competent authorities.
Professional or Employment-Related Information
Education information that is not publicly available as defined in the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g)
For the duration necessary for Stripe to: (1) comply with  law; (2) make certain employment and performance-related decisions; (3) address future hiring needs; (4) ensure health and safety in the workplace; (5) conduct certain administrative tasks, including to administer benefits; and (6) pursue our legitimate interests, including enforcing and defending our legal rights and complying with valid legal process requests from courts or competent authorities.
Sensitive personal information, as defined by California law (
Learn More
)
For information regarding your government IDs (including the sensitive data therein) and your location data, Stripe will retain that data for the duration necessary to: (1) comply with law; (2) provide the Stripe services, and; (3) pursue our legitimate interests, including detecting and preventing fraud and financial crimes, enforcing and defending our legal rights, complying with valid legal process requests from courts or competent authorities. For biometric data, see above.
Where we rely on consent to collect your other sensitive personal information (e.g, financial account login credentials), Stripe will no longer retain this data upon your revocation of consent.
California Privacy Rights Metrics
The following includes aggregate metrics of data subject rights requests received in the 2023 calendar year. This data reflects requests received from individuals in California and may also include requests from individuals who do not reside in California.
Number of “request to know” received and complied with in whole or in part: 7
Number of “requests to delete” received and complied with in whole or in part: 7719
Number of “request to correct” received: 0
Average number of days taken to respond to a request to know or delete: 1
Due to the nature of Stripe’s products and services, when we receive a general “request to delete,” our process is to direct the requestor to a
page
to action their request depending upon the relationship they have with Stripe. We also offer data subjects the opportunity to
contact us
, should they have any questions or concerns.
Stripe may retain personal data where permitted by law, including to comply with our legal obligations. For example, as a provider of payment services, Stripe is required to comply with many regulations, including anti-terrorism and anti-money laundering laws. These laws require Stripe to retain certain information associated with Stripe users for a prescribed period of time after account closure. Learn more about our retention obligations in our
Privacy Policy
.
Stripe Legal Bases Tables
What legal basis does Stripe rely on to process personal data as a data controller?
We rely upon a number of legal grounds to enable our use of your Personal Data. In short, we use Personal Data to facilitate the business relationships we have with our Business Users and End Users, to comply with our financial regulatory and other legal obligations, and to pursue our legitimate business interests. We also use Personal Data to complete transactions and to provide payment-related services to our Business Users.
The table below provides a detailed overview of why and how we use your Personal Data.
For the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation, we rely upon a number of legal bases to enable our processing of your Personal Data.
End Users
When you directly use an End User Service (such as when you sign up for Link, or make a payment to Stripe Climate in your personal capacity), for your personal use, we refer to you as an “End User.”
PROCESSING PURPOSE
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA
LEGAL BASES
Provide our Services.
To provide services to you, including delivery, support, personalization and messages related to the service.
Your name, contact information, payment information including Bank Account Information and Bank Payments, and/or payment card number, CVC code and expiration date.
Our
contractual necessity
to perform our contractual relationship with you, under applicable data protection laws.
For the provision of our services
including Link, Atlas and Identity. When we process data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on such consent before the consent is withdrawn.
If you choose to use Link you agree to let Stripe store your payment method and related information so that you can more readily make purchases with Business Users who use Stripe to provide payment processing services (e.g. Stripe Checkout).
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Card Products and Financial Products including Issuing and Treasury Direct Services.
We use your Personal Data to offer you card products and financial products and services under the Stripe brand and/or under the brand of a Business User.
Your name, email address, phone number, postal address, transaction information, password, PIN or similar credentials, card PANs, age, DOB, credit card number, drivers license number, tax ID, cookie data, tags and beacons, IP address.
Our
legitimate interests
in promoting our products and in determining eligibility for and offer new Stripe products and services.
Provide cryptocurrency-related services, including enabling End Users with Link accounts to purchase cryptocurrency from  licensed third-party cryptocurrency exchange providers using a variety of payment methods and save certain personal information  to facilitate subsequent cryptocurrency-related transactions.
Your name, email address, date of birth, billing address, IP address, information related to your cryptocurrency wallet (including wallet identifier, access times, and IP address used to create and access the wallet), and information related to your cryptocurrency purchases, including your transaction history.
Based on consent in processing this personal information.
Offer our Services and Alert you of Changes to our Services.
For example, through Stripe Capital we work with Financial Partners to offer financing to certain users who can satisfy particular criteria and will process your data to help determine if you qualify for financing or not. Certain information will be processed by Stripe prior to the offer of financing in order to determine eligibility.
The name and other identifying details and contact information of a Business User’s Representatives, physical address of Business User, and the Business User's Stripe ID and information related to the Business User’s performance on Stripe or off of Stripe if the Business User chooses to provide such information.
Our
legitimate interests
in promoting our products and in determining eligibility for and offer new Stripe products and services.
Fraud Detection Services.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services (e.g. Stripe Radar) to detect and prevent fraud against us, our Business Users and financial partners, including to detect unauthorized log-ins using your online activity.
Transaction information
. This includes: name, email address, billing and/or shipping address, payment method information (such as credit or debit card number, bank account information or payment card image), merchant and location, purchase amount, date of purchase, and in some cases, some information about what you have purchased, phone number and tax-related ID.
This includes web browsing information, usage data, referring URLs, location, cookies data, device data and identifiers.
IP address and physical address.
Our
legitimate interests
in monitoring and detecting fraud to ensure we detect activity that can have a harmful effect on our End Users.
Marketing and Advertising.
We may use your Personal Data to assess your eligibility for and offer you other Services. We use End User Personal Data for interest-based advertising and marketing purposes. We do not share End Customer Personal Data to third parties for their marketing purposes unless you give us or the third party permission to do so.
Contact information including: name, email address, work phone number, and job title.
Connection data such as IP address, and web behavior (page visited, length on page, etc.)
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Our
legitimate interest
in undertaking marketing activities to offer you products or services that may be of interest to you.
Compliance and Harm Prevention.
We process and share Personal Data as we believe necessary: (i) to comply with applicable law, (ii) for compliance with rules imposed by payment method in connection with use of that payment method (e.g. network rules for Visa); (iii) to enforce our contractual rights; (iv) to secure or protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety and property of Stripe, you or others, including against other malicious or fraudulent activity and security incidents; and (v) to respond to valid legal process requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
Any Personal Data we process, including information necessary for identity verification such as government-issued IDs or selfie images.
Where these processing activities or disclosures are necessary to comply with our legal obligations, for the protection of a person's vital interests, for reasons of public interest, for reasons of substantial public interest, or for the purposes of Stripe’s or a third party’s
legitimate interest
in keeping Stripe secure, preventing a breach of the law, harm or crime, enforcing or defending legal rights, claims, or obligations, facilitating the collection of taxes and prevention of tax fraud or preventing loss or damage.
End Customers
When you do business with, or otherwise transact with, a Business User (typically a merchant using
Stripe Checkout
, e.g. when you buy a pair of shoes from a merchant that uses Stripe for payment processing) but are not directly doing business with Stripe, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
PROCESSING PURPOSE
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA
LEGAL BASES
Provide our Services to Business Users
, including to process online payment transactions or in-person checkout, to calculate applicable sales tax, to invoice and bill, and to calculate their revenue.
If you are an End Customer, when you make payments to, send shopping cart reminders, get refunds from, begin a purchase or otherwise transact with a Business User through Stripe’s Services or a Stripe-provided device, Stripe will receive your transaction information. Depending on how the Business User has integrated our Business Services, we may receive this information directly from you, the Business User or another service provider to you or the Business User.
Transaction Information (including from Checkout, Payment Processing and Treasury/Issuing Use)
. Your name, email, billing and/or shipping address, payment method information (such as credit or debit card number, bank account information or payment card image), merchant and location, purchase amount, date of purchase, and in some cases, some information about what you have purchased, phone number and tax-related ID. The payment method information that we collect will depend upon the payment method that you choose to use from the list of available payment methods offered by the Business User as part of the “checkout” process for your purchase. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Transaction-Related Information / Purchase Interests.
Information typed into a checkout field that is not ultimately submitted to the Business User.
Our
legitimate interests
in providing the Stripe products and services. Stripe processes this personal data given its legitimate interest in improving the Services and where it is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract with the Business Users.
Provide our Services to Business Users
, to order payment methods on a per-customer basis on behalf of the Business User, to implement fraud thresholds chosen by the Business User, and to verify your payment method.
Verification Information
. Your age (when purchasing age restricted goods) or information about you being the person who is authorized to use a payment method.
The information collected will be the information that you choose to share for these purposes, which may include your government ID, your photo, your live image, and Personal Data apparent from the physical payment method (e.g. credit card image).
Our
legal obligations
in respect of our financial and regulatory obligations.
Reduce fraud and enhance security.
We will use Personal Data about your identity, including information that you provide, to perform verification Services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are doing business with and to reduce fraud and enhance security.
In some cases you may provide a “selfie” along with an image of your identity document, and we will use technology to compare and calculate whether they match and can be “verified.” We will use information from our service providers and our Services to help verify your identity and fraud prevention.
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Our
legitimate interests
in detecting, monitoring and preventing fraud and unauthorized payment transactions.
Radar and Card Verification Services.
We use Personal Data of End Customers to detect and prevent fraud for Business Users, including to detect fraudulent payment cards using payment card images and unauthorized log-ins using online activity. In providing such services, we may provide Business Users that have requested such services with limited Personal Data about End Customers so that the Business Users can assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction by its End Customer. We may also use payment card images to improve our Business Services.
Transaction information
. This includes: name, email address, billing and/or shipping address, payment method information (such as credit or debit card number, bank account information or payment card image), merchant and location, purchase amount, date of purchase, and in some cases, some information about what you have purchased, phone number and tax-related ID.
This includes web browsing information, usage data, referring URLs, location, cookies data, device data and identifiers.
IP address and physical address
.
Our
legitimate interests
in detecting, monitoring and preventing fraud and unauthorized payment transactions.
Compliance and Harm Prevention.
We share Personal Data as we believe necessary: (i) to comply with applicable law, (ii) to comply with rules imposed by payment method in connection with use of that payment method; (iii) to enforce our contractual rights; (iv) to secure or protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety and property of Stripe, you or others, including against other malicious or fraudulent activity and security incidents; and (v) to respond to valid legal process requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
Any Personal Data we process.
Our
legal obligations
where disclosures are necessary to comply with our legal obligations.
Our
legitimate interest
in keeping Stripe secure, preventing a breach of the law, harm or crime, enforcing or defending legal rights, claims, or obligations, facilitating the collection of taxes and prevention of fraud or preventing loss or damage.
Representatives
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User (e.g. you are a founder of a company, or administering an account for a merchant who is a Business User), we refer to you as a “Representative.”
PROCESSING PURPOSE
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA
LEGAL BASES
Reduce fraud and enhance security.
We will use Personal Data about your identity, including information that you provide, to perform verification Services for Stripe.
Onboarding and verification information that you choose to share for these purposes, which may include your government ID, photo, live image, and Personal Data apparent from the physical payment method (e.g. credit card image).
Our
legal obligations
in respect of our financial and regulatory obligations. We process Personal Data to verify the identity of the Representatives of our Business Users in order to comply with fraud monitoring, prevention and detection obligations, laws associated with the identification and reporting of illegal and illicit activity, such as AML (Anti-Money Laundering) and KYC (Know-Your-Customer) obligations, and financial reporting obligations.
Advertising.
We may use and share Representative Personal Data with others so that we may advertise and market our products and services to you, including through interest-based advertising subject to any consent requirements under applicable law.
Contact information including: name, email address, work phone number, and job title.
Connection data such as IP address, and web behavior (page visited, length on page, etc.)
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Communications.
We may send you email marketing communications about Stripe products and services, invite you to participate in our events or surveys, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, provided that we do so in accordance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements.
Contact information such as your name, email address, phone number.
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Our
legitimate interests
in responding to inquiries, sending Service notices, ensuring compliance with applicable laws, preventing fraud, improving our services and providing customer support.
Tax and Atlas (Incorporation) Services.
We may use your Personal Data to file taxes on behalf of your associated Business User. If your Business User uses Atlas, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and to file documents with other governmental authorities.
Your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address; and financial and personal information about you, such as your ownership interest in the Business User, your date of birth and government identifiers associated with you and your organization (such as your social security number, tax number, or Employer Identification Number). You may also choose to provide bank account information.
Our compliance
with legal obligations
in respect of our financial and regulatory obligations. We process Personal Data to verify the identity of the Representatives of our Business Users in order to comply with fraud monitoring, prevention and detection obligations, laws associated with the identification and reporting of illegal and illicit activity, such as AML (Anti-Money Laundering) and KYC (Know-Your-Customer) obligations, and financial reporting obligations.
Our
contractual necessity
to perform our contractual relationship with you, under applicable data protection laws.
Visitors
When you visit a Site without being logged into a Stripe account or otherwise communicate with Stripe, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” (e.g. you send Stripe a message asking for more information because you are considering being a user of our products).
PROCESSING PURPOSE
CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA
LEGAL BASES
Communications.
We use any contact information that you provide to us to respond to any inquiries or requests for information you made; and if you have asked about us or our Services, to send you marketing emails by either asking for your consent or providing you an opt out in any messages we send.
Contact information such as your name, email address, phone number.
Information you have provided to us, such as the products you are interested in.
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Our
legitimate interests
in responding to inquiries, sending Service notices and providing customer support.
Advertising.
When you visit our Sites, we (and our service providers) may use Personal Data collected from you and your device to target advertisements for Stripe Services to you on our Sites and other sites you visit (“interest-based advertising”).
Information collected from cookies such as your device, browser ID, and pages on our website which you have visited.
Based on
consent
in processing this personal information.
Our
legitimate interest
in undertaking marketing activities to offer you products or services that may be of interest to you.
Fraud Detection.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent fraud against Stripe, our Business Users and financial partners.
Advanced Fraud Signals information collected via cookies.
This includes web browsing information, usage data, referring URLs, location, cookies data, device data and identifiers.
Our
legitimate interests
in detecting, monitoring and preventing fraud and unauthorized payment transactions.
Data Processing Agreement
What is a Data Processing Agreement (DPA) and how can I get one with Stripe?
A Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”) is a contract between a data controller and a data processor that describes the roles and responsibilities of the parties when personal data is processed. If you are a Business User, please visit our FAQs page
here
to learn more about our DPA. Please
contact us
or your account manager if you have any questions.
Information about Stripe Products
How do you implement Privacy by Design at Stripe?
Privacy by design aims at building privacy and data protection up front and into the design specifications and architecture of information and communication systems and technologies to facilitate compliance with privacy and data protection principles. We rely on our internal privacy team and a review process for any new product launch. We are dedicated at every level of product development —from engineering to product management—to making privacy a key consideration. This helps ensure that people can trust the Stripe products that they enjoy every day.
Stripe Identity
End Customers
If you have been asked to verify your identity or have verified your identity using Stripe Identity, please visit the support web pages
here
and
here
to learn more about our privacy practices for Stripe Identity. Alternatively, you can jump to the specific topics linked here:
Stripe’s role in controlling and processing identity data in the US
Understanding Stripe Identity
Biometric verification
Consent to use my identity information
Security of my identity data
What data is collected
Identity data retention
How I delete my identity data
Business User That Requested Verification
If you are a Business User that is using or intends to use Stripe Identity, please visit the support web page
here
for additional guidance on what you can tell your users and
here
and
here
for additional guidance on privacy considerations for your business.
Stripe’s Card Image Verification
If you have been asked by your merchant (i.e., a Stripe Business User) to scan your credit card before completing your requested transaction, please visit the support webpage
here
to learn more about Stripe’s Card Image Verification.
Stripe Connect At a Glance
Description
Stripe Connect is a payment software your third party platform provider (Platform) may use to enable you to receive Stripe services (including payment processing) and/or receive payouts.
Data Controller/ Data Processor
Stripe acts as both a data controller and data processor for the Platform. The Stripe entity that acts as data controller/ data processor for data processed in Europe is Stripe Payments Europe Limited (“SPEL”).
Personal Data
The personal data transmitted to Stripe usually involves first name, last name, address, identification number, e-mail address, IP address, telephone number, and other data necessary for payment processing.
Purpose
The transmission of the data is aimed at payment processing, ledger management, and fraud prevention. The Business User / Platform will transfer personal data to Stripe. The personal data exchanged between Stripe and the Business User / Platform may be transmitted to verification agencies, and Business User data may be shared with Platforms. This transmission is intended for the Platform to manage its ledger and for Stripe to conduct identity and risk checks.
Transfer
Stripe will pass on personal data to affiliates and service providers or sub-processors, if deemed necessary to carry out contractual obligations or for the data to be processed.
Privacy Policy
For full details please see the applicable
Privacy Policy
of Stripe.
I am a user with a Custom connected account. Does Stripe also collect information about my Custom connected account from a third party?
If you are a user with a Custom connected account, Stripe may collect additional information about your account to enable fraud detection and fulfill financial compliance requirements. These requirements for additional information come from our regulators or financial partners and are intended to prevent abuse of the financial system. Examples of missing data fields include your address, phone number, social security number, date of birth, employer identification number, or website URL. Stripe may leverage data we already have from one of your Stripe accounts or Stripe may fill in some of this information by receiving data from a third party. You may view the information that we are associating with your account and update or correct that information by contacting the platform or business that created your Stripe payment account. Please see Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
for additional information.
What responsibilities do Connect platforms with custom accounts have to allow their users to update or correct information associated with their accounts?
You, the Platform, are responsible for all interactions with your Custom accounts and for collecting all of the information needed to verify the Custom account-holders. Since Custom account holders cannot log into Stripe, it is up to you to build the user dashboard and communication channels. You are responsible for actioning any request by a user to update or correct their Stripe Custom account information.
I am a user with a Custom connected account. Will data collected from a third party be visible to my customers?
Card networks and issuers use statement descriptors to identify payments on a cardholder’s bank statement. Statement descriptors usually include information about the payment, such as the name and phone number of the seller. However, the exact information displayed is ultimately up to a cardholder’s bank. If Stripe updates your account’s business address, phone number, or email address, these fields may be displayed on the statement descriptor within the cardholder’s bank statement. However, the exact information displayed is ultimately up to the card network or the cardholder’s bank. If any information is incorrect, please reach out to the platform through which you receive charges to ensure you have provided them with the most accurate information about you and your business.
What are Stripe ACS, Transaction Authentication, and Behavioral Biometrics?
What is Stripe ACS?
Stripe ACS is Stripe’s transaction authentication solution for card issuers (e.g., banks). Stripe ACS helps card issuers to authenticate transactions of cardholders when they are making payments online using their cards.
What is behavioral biometrics?
Behavioral biometrics is an innovative technology that can be used for the purpose of preventing fraud and identifying legitimate transactions. Behavioral biometrics leverages a combination of personal data and device characteristics to distinguish between legitimate customers and fraudsters or bots.
How is behavioral biometrics data collected and used in Stripe ACS?
This processing is designed to verify a cardholder’s identity based on their behavioral biometric data which is modeled based on data collected during each authentication attempt.
This type of transaction authentication will typically observe interactions within a system or device to verify a cardholder’s identity for the purposes of authenticating online payments. The following elements may be processed during the authentication process:
Length of text field inputs
Location of mouse pointer
Modifier key details (e.g., CTRL, SHIFT)
Timing and location of mouse clicks
Timing and location of touch events
Timing between keystrokes
Window scroll position
For the purpose of fraud risk mitigation, this processing involves use of a device identifier cookie (Ndcd, Device ID, DID) that aims to accurately analyze biometrics data observed on a specific device. This cookie facilitates device detection in order to enhance fraud detection and prevention as well as to identify suspicious devices or devices that are behaving abnormally. For more information on how we use cookies, please see
Stripe’s Cookie Policy
.
Purpose of processing and Stripe’s role
Stripe may process biometric data relating to cardholders in order to assist card issuers to authenticate payment transactions. This is done as part of Stripe’s payment transaction authentication services provided to card issuers (including for the purposes of meeting
Strong Customer Authentication
requirements).
In providing these services to card issuers, Stripe acts as a data controller in relation to cardholder data. Please see Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
to learn more about our use of personal data.
As part of providing this authentication services to card issuers, Stripe engages with a third party provider, Mastercard, which also acts as a data controller. See
Mastercard’s Privacy Notice
for details on Mastercard’s processing activities in this context.
Customers rights and choices
Upon initiating a transaction, cardholders will have the option of providing their consent to processing their behavioral biometrics data as part of the transaction authentication flow. This will be presented to the cardholder during the checkout flow on the merchant’s website or app when authentication is requested from the card issuer. Cardholders will have the option to withdraw their consent during each subsequent transaction flow.
To withdraw consent outside of a transaction flow, you can email
privacy-acs@stripe.com
with the subject matter line “Stripe ACS -
withdraw consent
”. In your email to withdraw consent, please provide: (a) the first 6 digits of your card number as this enables Stripe to identify your issuing bank (please do not provide any digits other than the first 6 digits); and (b) the phone number (including the country code) registered with your bank account that is used for one-time passcodes.
We will action this withdrawal request as soon as possible after it is verified, but please note that this can take up to 10 working days as we may need to verify the request with your card issuer. You may also contact the card issuer in order for the issuer to implement this withdrawal of consent by engaging with Stripe.
To submit a request to exercise any of the other
rights
described in our Privacy Policy, you may contact Stripe at
privacy-acs@stripe.com
.
Promotional Emails Feature
For End Customers and prospective End Customers of our Business Users
What is the Promotional Emails feature?
Promotional Emails is a feature that gives Business Users who use “Stripe Checkout” services a new tool to enable sending email promotional content to their customers and prospective customers. When you visit a Business User’s checkout page (that is powered by Stripe Checkout services), the Promotional Email feature will enable Stripe to collect information about your preferences to receive promotional emails from that merchant.
Promotional email preferences are collected whether or not you complete the purchase or are just a prospective End Customer. “Prospective End Customer” means you visited a Business User’s site and expressed an intent to make a purchase by starting a purchase on the Business User’s checkout page, but did not complete that purchase during that session. To be a “prospective End Customer” for the promotional email feature, you also need to have started to input your contact information into the checkout form, and then not delete that information prior to the end of the session.
If you, prospective End Customer, indicate permission to receive news and personalized offers by virtue of the opt-in/opt-out checkbox on your Business User’s checkout form, the following personal data is provided to your Business User so that your Business User can contact you to remind you of the items you left in the checkout or to provide you news and personalized offers:
Email (if provided by you).
Items in your cart with that merchant (if any).
“Personalized offers” means promotional or marketing materials tailored to you, such as coupons or advertisements based on the items in your cart or (in some cases) your prior purchases from that Business User. Even if you opt-out of personalized offers by a Business User, if you do business with that Business User, they may still need to contact you in order to enable a purchase (e.g., for delivery or billing purposes) or in connection with customer support. Please see your Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
What is Stripe’s role (Data Processor/Controller) in the processing of my Personal Data?
For the Promotional Emails feature, Stripe acts as a
data processor
or service provider, meaning that Stripe is acting at the direction of the Business User that has implemented this Stripe provided feature. The Stripe entity that acts as a data processor for personal data is:
Stripe Inc. in the United States.
Stripe Payments Europe Limited outside of the United States, including Europe
What Personal Data Is Stripe Collecting?
Stripe’s
Privacy Policy
describes in more detail the personal data that Stripe collects in connection with payment transactions.
What Personal Data is Shared by Stripe with the Business Users I use?
Whenever you complete a transaction on a Business User’s website that uses Stripe services, as a service provider to that Business User, Stripe will share your contact information with that Business User. Business Users use the information that Stripe provides in accordance with its own privacy policy, including in connection with your purchase.
With the Promotional Emails feature:
If you complete a purchase with a Business User, in addition to the transaction-related information identified in our
Privacy Policy
(e.g., your contact and billing information and the details of your transaction), Stripe will also share with your Business User your personalized offers and news preferences as determined by the opt-in/opt-out checkbox from your checkout form.
If you are a prospective
End Customer
(you start a purchase with your Business User on their checkout form but do not complete that purchase), the personal data that we share with your Business User depends on the following:
If you have not inputted any personal data into your Business User’s checkout form, then we will not share any personal data with that Business User.
If you have inputted personal data into your Business User’s checkout form:
If the checkbox for receiving news and personalized offers is not enabled when you leave your Business User’s checkout session, we will not share any of that personal data.
If the checkbox for receiving news and personalized offers is enabled when you leave your Business User’s checkout session, we will share the following information with that Business User:
Email (if provided by you).
Items in your cart with that merchant (if any).
End Customers and prospective End customers should always review the privacy policy or notice of the Business Users they visit and do business with for information about the Business User’s data collection practices and purposes outside of this Stripe feature.
Does Stripe share my personal data with other Business Users?
No. Stripe does not share personal data collected in connection with purchases (or attempted purchases) from one Business User’s checkout with another Business User. Please see our Privacy Policy to learn more about our practices.
How do I stop promotional emails from a merchant?
Any offers or promotional emails that you receive as a result of a Business User’s use of the Promotional Emails feature are sent by Business Users (or others identified in the message), and not by Stripe. I If you do not find value in receiving these emails, please contact the Business User you are receiving the messages from. Stripe requires that Business Users that choose to implement the Promotional Email feature also provide the option to unsubscribe or opt-out of receiving further promotional messages. It would be a breach of Stripe’s terms of service for a Business User to not promptly comply with opt-out requests.
How Does the Data Collection and Transfer Work?
The Promotional Email feature does not use cookies or track you across Business Users. Information collected from the Business User’s checkout page is transferred only to the Business User via API calls or webhooks. Webhooks are a way for Stripe to send the information to the Business User automatically upon their request. Your information provided at checkout is encrypted in transit using HTTPS and TLS. See
Security at Stripe
for more information.
How do I stop the sale of my personal data in connection with this feature?
Stripe does not sell your personal data. See our Privacy Policy for more information. The Promotional Emails feature is not the sale of personal data. Rather, Stripe acts as a processor (or service provider) to Business Users for the Promotional Email feature. Please contact your Business User to learn about their personal data practices and how you can exercise rights to stop the sale or processing of personal data provided under applicable law and/or their privacy policy.
Stripe requires that Business Users that choose to implement the Promotional Email feature also provide the option to unsubscribe or opt-out of receiving further promotional messages. It would be a breach of Stripe’s terms of service for a Business User to not promptly comply with opt-out requests.
For Business Users
How to Use this Service as a Business User
If you are a business that is using or intends to use Stripe’s Promotional Emails feature, please visit the
support webpage
for tips and guidance on information to share with your End Customers and prospective End Customers regarding privacy considerations in connection with the Promotional Emails feature for your business.
Stripe Delegated Authentication
Cardholders
You may be given the option to enable on-device biometric verification and provide your consent for Stripe to store your payment method details for future transactions that use the same card. Please visit our
support site
to learn more about our privacy practices for Stripe Delegated Authentication. Alternatively, you can jump to a specific topic here:
Why does the cardholder see Stripe when asked to authenticate a payment?
What is Stripe Delegated Authentication?
How is personal data used in Stripe Delegated Authentication?
How can cardholders provide and withdraw their consent for the storage of their payment method details?
Link
We offer you the opportunity to store your payment methods with us so that you can conveniently use it across certain merchants who are our Business Users – we call this “Link” (formerly known as “Remember Me”). When you choose to use Link, you agree to let us store your payment method so that you can more readily make purchases through Link with Business Users of our payment processing Business Services (e.g., name, card number, cvc, and expiration date). We will also collect other Transaction Data, including billing address, shipping address, email and phone number. Your payment method data is secured using PCI-DSS standards.
Should you not have used Link and receive an SMS in error due to an inaccurate number being inserted at the authentication flow stage you can opt out
here
and your personal data will be deleted.
Stripe Capital
Stripe Capital
provides Business Users with access to fast, flexible funding so businesses can manage cash flows and invest in growth. Depending on your business's corporate structure and jurisdiction, you may be eligible for different types of financing. Financing for Business Users located in the US is provided by Celtic Bank or Youlend in partnership with Stripe Capital. Financing for Business Users located in the EU or UK is provided by Youlend Ltd or Banking Circle S.A.
What information does Stripe process for Stripe Capital?
We use existing data linked to your Stripe Account to evaluate your business’s
eligibility
for Stripe Capital. You may also be asked to link additional data sources, such as business bank accounts or business credit information, in order to receive financing through Stripe Capital. The following information may be considered prior to the offer of financing in order to determine eligibility, including:
Payment processing volume
Payment processing growth
Chargeback rate
Customer base
Duration of relationship with Stripe
Bank account balances
Transaction history
Business credit history
Where Stripe is satisfied that a Business User meets particular criteria established by Stripe and our Financial Partners (as applicable), we will send the Business User an email and dashboard notification notifying them of their business’s eligibility for potential financing and invite them to apply.
If you are a Business User located in the U.S., once you have received an offer and submitted an application to receive your financing, we will use the above listed information to verify your business’s eligibility and where your application is approved, to disburse the loan or the MCA to your linked bank account.
If you are a Business User located in Europe and/or the U.K. and you wish to apply for financing, when you submit an application to receive your financing, your information will be shared with YouLend, who will evaluate your eligibility for financing. If your application is approved, YouLend will disburse the financing to your linked bank account.
The legal basis for using your information
We will process your personal data where its use is in accordance with our legitimate business interests. Analysis of our Business User’s information helps us to manage our business for our legitimate interests. It allows us to:
Verify the identity of our Business Users in order to comply with fraud monitoring, prevention and detection obligations, applicable laws associated with the identification and reporting of illegal and illicit activity, such as AML (Anti-Money Laundering) and KYC (Know-Your-Customer) obligations, and financial reporting obligations.
Assess the level of financial risk to us, Financial Partners and to Business Users involved in offering Business Users financing.
Enhance our machine learning models to allow us to better tailor financing to, and decrease the risk to, you and other Business Users.
We will also process your data where it is necessary for financing agreement that you have entered into or because you have submitted an application to receive funding and to determine eligibility to enter into a financing agreement with us or with our Financial Partners.
We may send you email marketing communications about Stripe Capital offers, provided we do so in accordance with applicable law, including any consent requirements.
Who does Stripe share information with?
Stripe may share your Personal Data with its Financial Partners in order to determine your eligibility for financing you have requested or as necessary complete and/or service transactions with Financial Partners who in some cases may purchase the right to receive repayment on your financing.
What is Stripe’s role?
The Stripe entity responsible for your data will depend on the location of your business.
If your business is based in the US, Stripe, Inc. is the data controller responsible for Personal Data collected and processed in relation to the financing that business receives through Stripe Capital. If your business is based in the EU or UK, Stripe Payments Europe, Limited (“SPEL”), is the data controller responsible for Personal Data collected and processed in relation to Stripe Capital.
How do I opt-out of receiving Capital offers?
Business Users have the option to unsubscribe or opt-out of receiving Capital offers via the link included in Stripe Capital emails.  Business Users may also opt-out of dashboard notifications via the settings page of the Stripe Dashboard. If you have any questions, please
contact us
.
Financial Connections
If you are an End Customer who has been asked to link your financial account using Stripe, please visit the support webpage
here
to learn more about our privacy practices. Or you can jump to the specific topics linked here:
Linking my financial account and consent
Data collected, stored, and shared from my linked account
How Stripe accesses data from my linked account
Relationship between Stripe and its service providers
Data security
Who can access data from my linked account and for what purposes
Who will obtain my login credentials
Requesting disconnection or data deletion
Correcting my financial account information
Are there instances when Stripe receives non-Stripe transaction history?
Yes. For example, Stripe enables the Business User to import non-Stripe data through the Stripe Dashboard to consolidate their revenue data in one place.
Learn more
. Separately, Stripe may also obtain your account transactions from your financial account with your consent.
Learn more
.
Refunds to End Customer Bank Account
End Customers
If you have been asked to provide your bank account and other information to process a refund on behalf of your merchant (i.e., our Business User), please visit the
webpage here
to learn more about our privacy practices for end customer bank account refunds.
Business User that uses Stripe to Process Refunds
If you are a Business User that is using or intends to use Stripe to process refunds, please visit the
webpage here
for additional guidance on privacy considerations for your business.
Stripe Frontier
What is Stripe Frontier?
Frontier is an
advance market commitment
(AMC) that aims to accelerate the development of carbon removal technologies by guaranteeing future demand for them. It facilitates purchases from high-potential carbon removal companies on behalf of buyers. Learn more at
https://frontierclimate.com/
.
What information does Stripe Frontier collect?
We will collect any information you choose to provide to us, for example, through support tickets, emails or social media. When you respond to Stripe emails or surveys, we collect your email address, name and any other information you choose to include in the body of your email or responses. If you contact us by phone, we will collect the phone number you use to call Stripe, as well as other information you may provide during the call. We will also collect your engagement data such as your registration for, attendance of, or viewing of Stripe events and other interaction with Stripe personnel. See our
privacy policy
for more information.
What is the legal basis for processing Stripe Frontier information?
We rely on consent to process your data. Where you proactively reach out to Stripe and provide your data, Stripe will process your data based on Stripe’s
legitimate business interests
(e.g. help answer your queries, and provide customer support). With your permission or where allowed by law, we use your personal data to market our services to you, invite you to participate in our events or surveys, or otherwise communicate with you for our marketing purposes, provided that we do so in accordance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements.
Is my data relating to Stripe Frontier transferred?
We are a global business. Personal Data may be stored and processed in any country where we do business. We may transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own country, including to the United States. These countries may have data protection rules that are different from your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from Officials (such as law enforcement or security authorities). See our
privacy policy
for more information.
What are my rights and choices with respect to the information collected for Stripe Frontier?
You may have choices regarding our collection, use and disclosure of your Personal Data. If you no longer want to receive marketing-related emails from us, you may opt-out via the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We will try to comply with your request(s) as soon as reasonably practicable. Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights described
here
with regard to the Personal Data we control about you.
How do I exercise my rights as to Stripe Frontier?
EEA and UK
. To exercise your rights, you may contact our DPO. If you are a resident of the EEA or we have identified Stripe Payments Europe Limited as your data controller, and believe we process your information within the scope of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, you may direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office.
California
. If you are a consumer located in California, please review the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) section of our
Privacy Policy
.
See our
privacy policy
for additional jurisdiction-specific provisions.
Any questions about Stripe Frontier and the processing of your data?
If you have any questions or complaints, please contact us.
Data Protection Officer
Does Stripe have a Data Protection Officer (DPO)?
Yes, Stripe has appointed a Data Protection Officer (“DPO”), who can and they can be reached via
email
.
Quebec Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information
Who is Stripe’s person in charge of personal information under the Quebec Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, and how do I contact them?
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information. You may contact them via
email
.
We are committed to protecting personal information and have established policies and procedures that govern our treatment of personal information. These policies and procedures include, among other things, the following:
policies and procedures to protect personal information in our custody and control from unauthorized access, use or disclosure.
processes to respond to data subject requests and complaints in a timely and effective manner.
a framework for the retention and destruction of personal information to ensure compliance with legal obligations, and to securely destroy personal information once no longer required.
a privacy framework that defines the roles and responsibilities for our employees with respect to the treatment of personal information.
providing our employees with regular privacy training and awareness.
International Data Transfers
The detail below is provided for informational purposes. It is not intended to provide legal advice. Stripe urges Business Users to consult with counsel to familiarize themselves with the requirements that govern their specific situations.
How is Stripe dealing with its international data transfers?
As a global business, Personal Data may be transferred to, and processed, in any country where we do business, where our service providers do business or if you use an international payment method or financial partner service, the countries in which that payment method or financial partner operates.
We may transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own country, including to the United States. Stripe relies on a number of data transfer mechanisms to legalize the transfer of Personal Data around the globe.
Stripe continues to have appropriate safeguards and compliance measures to ensure an adequate level of protection of Personal Data transferred outside the UK, EEA and Switzerland. Stripe’s measures may include:
Transferring Personal Data from the originating to a country or recipient that has been deemed to have an adequate level of data protection by relevant privacy authorities, including the European Commission.
The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), which allows personal data to flow freely between the EEA and certified organizations in the U.S. The European Commission has adopted an adequacy decision confirming that personal data can be transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) to certified U.S. organizations. The UK Government similarly confirmed that organizations can rely on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (“UK Extension”) to transfer data from the UK to certified U.S. organizations. The Swiss Federal Council has confirmed that organizations can rely on the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) to transfer data from Switzerland to certified US companies and it has adopted an adequacy decision for the U.S. in this respect. Stripe’s parent entity, Stripe, Inc, is certified under the EU-U.S DPF, Swiss-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension. Stripe relies on the Data Privacy Framework to transfer personal data from respectively the EEA, the UK and Switzerland to the US. To learn more about the DPF program, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
, and to view our certification, please see
here
.
The Standard Contractual Clauses (“SCCs”) approved by the European Commission. SCCs are a transfer mechanism (in the form of a legal contract) used by Stripe to provide a legal mechanism to transfer EU personal data outside of the EEA/UK. These are required under EU data protection law (known as the GDPR) and are incorporated into our agreements.
The UK International Data Transfer Addendum (“UK Addendum”) issued by the UK’s Information Commissioner’s Office to provide a legal mechanism to transfer Personal Data from the UK. This mechanism is required under UK data protection law (known as UK GDPR) and is incorporated into our agreements.
Other alternative data transfer mechanisms approved by relevant privacy authorities to enable the transfer of Personal Data to a third country.
Stripe respects the privacy of everyone that engages with our products and services, and we are committed to being transparent about our privacy processes and policies. To learn more about our commitment to privacy and data security, please see our
Privacy Policy
, the rest of the
Stripe Privacy Center
, and the
Stripe Security Center
.
We also want to highlight some of our supplementary measures to protect our Business Users’ data from unauthorized access.
Stripe employs security controls and maintains and enforces a security program that addresses the management of security. We also perform risk assessments and implement and maintain controls for risk identification, analysis, monitoring, reporting, and corrective action. Stripe maintains and enforces an asset management program that appropriately classifies and controls hardware and software assets throughout their life cycle. In addition, Stripe employees, agents, and contractors acknowledge their data security and privacy responsibilities under Stripe’s policies.
Stripe applies technical and organizational measures that include the following:
Virtual access control to prevent data processing systems from being used by unauthorized persons.
Data access control to ensure that persons entitled to use a data processing system gain access only to such Personal Data in accordance with their access rights, and that Personal Data cannot be read, copied, modified or deleted without authorization.
Disclosure control to ensure that Personal Data cannot be read, copied, modified or deleted without authorization during electronic transmission, transport or storage on storage media (manual or electronic), and that it can be verified to which companies or other legal entities Personal Data are disclosed.
Entry control to audit whether data have been entered, changed or removed (deleted), and by whom, from data processing systems.
Stripe relies on third party service providers to host its production infrastructure. Those third parties apply physical access control to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to the data processing systems available at premises and facilities (including databases, application servers, and related hardware), where Personal Data are processed.
Availability control to ensure that Personal Data are protected against accidental destruction or loss (physical/logical).
Separation control to ensure that Personal Data collected for different purposes can be processed separately.
By default, Stripe encrypts data at rest and data in transit. We further protect your data with tools like audit logs, access management policies and certifications as described on our
Payments
page in the section “Security and compliance at the core”. Security controls implemented at Stripe include TLS 1.2 configuration of endpoints for data in transit, TLS and/or SSL encryption for HTTPS and regular testing of infrastructure components. Two-step authentication is available for an extra layer of security at Dashboard login.
We get requests for access to data from law enforcement, and we review each request with the goal of responding with the minimum amount of required information in response to legitimate, legally mandated requests.
If you have any questions, please
contact us
.
Is Stripe certified under the EU-U.S Data Privacy Framework?
Stripe has certified its participation in the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. Stripe relies on the DPF to enable international transfers. In case the DPF is invalidated or Stripe is otherwise prevented from relying on the DPF, we incorporate multiple transfer mechanisms to ensure that data transfers can continue. If more than one data transfer mechanism applies, the DPF takes precedence. You can learn more about our certification and read the Stripe Data Privacy Framework Policy at
https://stripe.com/legal/data-privacy-framework
.
How does Stripe’s certification under the EU-U.S. DPF impact my organization?
The EU-U.S. DPF is a legal framework that allows organizations to transfer EEA Personal Data  to certified organizations in the U.S. Stripe’s
Data Transfers Addendum
sets out the data transfer mechanisms that Stripe may rely on to carry out international transfers of personal data, including the EU-U.S. DPF. You can learn more about our certification and read the Stripe Data Privacy Framework Policy at
https://stripe.com/legal/data-privacy-framework
. If you are a Business User and would like to transfer data to us under the DPF, please
contact us
or your account manager if you have any questions.
How do the SCCs and UK Addendum impact my organization?
SCCs are legal contracts entered into between parties that are transferring EEA Personal Data outside of the EEA. Stripe may rely on the SCCs for transfers of EEA data in our services. We have updated our Data Transfer Addendum and agreements to incorporate the SCCs (where applicable).
How to get a copy of the SCCs or UK Addendum?
You can review our Data Transfers Addendum which includes the latest data transfer mechanisms, including the SCCs, the UK addendum and the Swiss addendum
here
.
What is CBPR and PRP and is Stripe certified?
Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPR) and Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) schemes are frameworks designed to facilitate data privacy harmonization across international boundaries, primarily within the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC) region. CBPR is aimed at organizations handling personal data as a data controller, ensuring compliance with APEC’s privacy standards and enabling secure cross-border data flow. It requires certified organizations to develop privacy policies that meet APEC's criteria and undergo independent certification. PRP, on the other hand, is tailored for data processors, establishing standards for how processors manage and secure data on behalf of data controllers. It provides a mechanism for demonstrating compliance with global privacy requirements, promoting trust and accountability.
Stripe’s privacy practices comply with CBPR and PRP systems as evidenced by the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained.
Why is Stripe storing authentication and authorization data globally?
We have integrated a robust, multi-region infrastructure dedicated to optimizing authentication, authorization, and identity management. This infrastructure spans multiple geographic regions, specifically including our data centers located in the United States and India. By adopting this global approach, we have significantly enhanced the speed and reliability of our services, allowing users to benefit from faster and more consistent access to their data, regardless of their location. This advancement results in a superior and seamless service experience with reduced latency, which is essential for maintaining high standards of user satisfaction.
Our focus on global data storage centers around particular categories of Personal Data, strictly limited to aspects of user authentication and security. The specific types of data stored globally include Representative identifying information such as name, location, email address, phone number, date of birth, IP address, and device ID. These elements are integral to various facets of our operations, including login credentials and settings for multi-factor authentication, as well as device information and security challenges relevant to account security. Additionally, session management data, user roles and permissions, team invitations and management, and Single Sign-On (SSO) configurations fall under this umbrella of globally stored data.
Importantly, this global storage strategy does not extend to any transactional information or other data related to End Customers.
Your Rights and Choices
How do I exercise my data protection rights?
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights:
Right to confirmation of processing
Right to access
Right of rectification/correction
Right to data portability
Right to restrict processing
Right to object to processing
Right to withdraw consent (where it is relied upon)
Right to erasure/deletion
Right to opt-out of processing for targeted advertising
Right to opt-out from profiling for certain decisions with legal or similarly significant effect
Right to opt-out of receiving electronic communications from us
Right to non-discrimination for exercising your rights
Right to opt-out from a sale of personal information
Right to opt-out of “sharing” under California privacy law (
learn more
)
Right to confirm the third parties or categories of third parties to which personal data has been disclosed
Right to limit the use or sharing of sensitive personal information (
learn more
)
Right to appeal Stripe’s response to your data subject request
Please read this section to find out more about specific rights. To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please reach out to us by
email
, or via our
form
or by physical addresses listed in
Contact Us
.
You have the right to complain to your local data protection authority if you are unhappy with our privacy practices.
Which privacy rights are available in my state?
Laws in the various U.S. states may provide different privacy rights.  For more information on which rights may be available under the laws in your state, consult the following table:
Right to confirmation of processing
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to access
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to correction
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Virginia
Right to data portability
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to deletion
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to opt-out of processing for targeted advertising
Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to opt-out from a sale of personal data
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to opt-out from profiling for certain decisions with legal or similarly significant effect
Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Virginia
Right to non-discrimination for exercising your rights
California, Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Right to appeal the refusal of a request to exercise your rights
Colorado, Connecticut, Delaware, Iowa, Montana, Nebraska, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Oregon, Texas, Virginia
Right to confirm the third parties or categories of third parties to which personal data has been disclosed
Delaware, Oregon
Right to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal data
California
Right to opt-out from Sharing for cross-context behavioral advertising
California
How do I access my data?
If you are a Business User or Representative, you may login in to the Stripe Dashboard to view personal information shared with Stripe.
If you are the End Customer of a Business User that uses Stripe services, the Business User would be the correct party to respond to a data subject access request related to your transactional information.
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the right to request confirmation of whether Stripe processes Personal Data relating to you, and if so, to request a copy of that Personal Data. If you are an End User or otherwise have a direct relationship with us, you may submit your access request by
email
, or through our
form
. Please note that we may need to verify your identity and your relationship with us before we can proceed with your request.
In addition, Stripe's
Data Access Tool
provides self-service access to some of the data from integrated Stripe products.
How do I unsubscribe from marketing emails?
If you are a Business User or Visitor, you may unsubscribe from Stripe marketing emails
here
. If you have any questions about how to opt-out of Stripe marketing communications, please contact us
here
.
If you are a Link user, you may opt-out from marketing-related emails by using the unsubscribe link in any marketing email you receive, or by managing your subscription preferences in the Link website. To manage your preferences log into your
Link account
, then navigate to your account settings. Turn “Marketing emails - Receive updates and deals from Link and its partners” on or off. Your email address will be opted out of email marketing communications as soon as possible.
When does Stripe continue to process data after it has received a deletion request or objection to the processing?
In certain circumstances, Stripe may be required by law to retain and process your Personal Data  even after a deletion request or objection to the processing.  For instance, Stripe is required to retain certain Personal Data it receives from its Business Users to satisfy legal obligations under Know Your Customer (KYC) and Anti-Money Laundering (AML) laws.
Stripe may also rely on compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing your Personal Data. Stripe may act on such grounds, for instance, when it takes steps to prevent fraud and financial crimes.  When Personal Data is necessary to enable or maintain the integrity of Stripe’s fraud detection and financial models, Stripe may not be able to honor requests to delete or stop processing that data.  If Stripe honored such requests, fraudsters might take advantage of its willingness to do so to seek deletion of data related to their past fraudulent activities.  Without such data, Stripe would be less able to recognize similar activities in the future.
What data may be shared or made available to enable me to see Stripe ads on other sites?
To enable visitors of Stripe.com to see Stripe ads on other sites, we use advertising APIs and server-side pixels. The data that Stripe shares or makes available to enable this advertising include identifiers, internet or other similar network activity, IP addresses, and device characteristics. Any potentially personally identifying details are hashed through cryptographic SHA-256 hashing. Click the below links to learn more about the data that may be shared or made available to enable this feature.  You can disable the toggle in the “advertising” section of our
cookie settings
page at any time.
Third party service
Data that we may share or make available
Service description
Learn more
Meta
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email, first name, last name.
The Meta Conversions API is a Meta business tool that creates a direct connection between your
marketing data and the Meta technologies that optimize ad performance. This helps you to
use your own marketing data to optimize ad targeting, decrease cost per action and see a
more complete picture of campaign outcomes while respecting people’s privacy.
https://www.facebook.com/business/tools/facebook-conversions-api
https://developers.facebook.com/docs/marketing-api/conversions-api/
Linkedin
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email, first name,) last name.
With the Linkedin Conversions API, you can connect both your online and offline data to LinkedIn so you can see how your campaigns influenced actions taken on your website, sales completed over the phone, or leads collected in-person at an event.
https://www.linkedin.com/help/lms/answer/a1655394
Reddit
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email, first name, last name.
The Reddit Conversions API is a server-to-server solution that shares your conversion data directly to Reddit’s platform without needing website code. By building a sustainable server-side connection, this integration is more resilient to signal loss and will help deliver stronger campaign performance via improved measurement, targeting, and optimization.
https://business.reddithelp.com/helpcenter/s/article/Conversions-API
X
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email, first name, last name.
The X Conversions API is a server-to-server solution that shares your conversion data directly to X’s platform. By building a sustainable server-side connection, this integration is more resilient to signal loss and will help deliver stronger campaign performance via improved measurement, targeting, and optimization.
https://developer.twitter.com/en/docs/twitter-ads-api/measurement/web-conversions/conversion-api
Line
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email, first name, last name.
Line Conversions API is a server-to-server solution that shares your conversion data directly to Line’s platform. By building a sustainable server-side connection, this integration is more resilient to signal loss and will help deliver stronger campaign performance via improved measurement, targeting, and optimization.
https://conversion-api-docs.linebiz.com/en/
Google
Sign-up information and interactions with Stripe and our products, website activity, IP address, device and browser characteristics, timestamps of visits, cryptographically hashed (SHA-256) email.
The Google Tag is a tracking tag for Google’s advertising products (Search, Display, YouTube, GA4) enabling advertisers to serve a more personalised ad experience across Google’s advertising products. Combined with Google’s API solutions, advertisers can share conversion data to enhance on-site activity with offline customer interactions to improve measurement, targeting, and optimization.
https://developers.google.com/tag-platform/tag-manager/server-side/overview
https://support.google.com/google-ads/answer/11347292?sjid=13132835489466327554-NC
Demandbase
IP address, timestamps of visit, referrer, page URL, cookie ID, Sign-up information, device and browser characteristics
The Demandbase tag reads the IP address and cookie of each visitor and passes that information to our identification API, which determines which company the visitor works for. In this way, we're able to measure visitors' interest in your company.
https://support.demandbase.com/hc/en-us/articles/115005051743-Understanding-the-Demandbase-Tag
Does Stripe honor the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signal?
Yes.  Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a signal that is sent by a web browser on your behalf that communicates your choice to opt-out of sharing for targeted advertisements.  If you have enabled GPC on your browser, you will automatically be opted out of any “sharing” when you interact with our site.  You can learn more about how to use opt-out preference signals by visiting the
Global Privacy Control website
.
Can I turn off tracking and advanced fraud signals?
Your web browser may allow you to manage your cookie preferences, including deleting or disabling Stripe cookies. If you choose to disable cookies, keep in mind that some features of our Site or Services may not operate as intended. Disabling cookies will not disable the collection of advanced fraud signals, which we use to prevent fraud on Stripe. The collection of this data is controlled by the Business User that integrated with Stripe. If a Business User seeks to disable this data collection, they can find instructions to do so through Stripe’s documentation. You can take a look at the help section of your web browser or follow the links below to understand your options for disabling cookies.
Google Chrome
Microsoft Internet Explorer
Microsoft Edge
Safari
Firefox
Opera
You can learn more about how businesses can disable collection of advanced fraud signals in our documentation for
disabling advanced fraud detection
.
How do I delete my account?
You can close your Stripe account from the Settings page on the Dashboard. You can read more about that on our support page:
Close a Stripe account
.
Please be aware that we will delete some, but not all, of the information that we hold, for the reasons explained below.
As a provider of payment services, Stripe is required to comply with many regulations, including anti-terrorism and anti-money laundering laws. These regulations and laws may require Stripe to retain transactional records associated with Business Users for a prescribed period of time after the close of the business relationship. You can read more about our underwriting obligations in our
Privacy Policy
.
How do I delete my Custom Connect account?
If you have a Custom Connect account, your account is managed by a Platform / Business User. They are the party responsible for managing payments for you and responding to your query; therefore we recommend reaching out to them for assistance.
How do I delete my Express Connect account?
If you have an Express Connect account, your account is managed by a Platform / Business User. They are the party responsible for managing payments for you and responding to your query; therefore we recommend reaching out to them for assistance.
What is the Privacy Policy for Stripe Media Services?
The Privacy Policy for Stripe Media Services (Media Privacy Policy) describes how Stripe collects and processes personal data in order to provide the Stripe Media Services, including Stripe Press, Increment, and Works in Progress. We encourage you to read our
Media Privacy Policy
to learn more.
Does Stripe localize storage of data in India?
Personal Data may be processed either locally in India or in any other country where we have operations or where we engage service providers, to the extent permitted under applicable laws of India. The entire payment system data will be stored only in India in accordance with the RBI data localization guidelines.
Where can I lodge my complaint on data handling in India?
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the treatment of your Personal Data in India, please contact our Nodal Officer and Grievance Officer:
Name - Yogender Singh
Email Address - complaints-in@stripe.com
Address - Prestige Tech Pacific Park, 10th Floor, Building 2, Kadubeesanahalli Village, Varthur Hobli, Bangalore East Taluk, Bangalore-560103 Karnataka, India
For more information about complaint handling, please visit
here
.
Separately, for law enforcement requests, please contact
LERequests@stripe.com
.
Notification IT Rules 2021
We are required to inform you that in case of non-compliance with rules and regulations, our Privacy Policy or user agreement, we have the right to terminate your access or usage rights immediately or remove non-compliant information or both, as the case may be.
Cookies & Other Technology
How does Stripe use cookies?
We use cookies to (1) ensure that our services function properly, (2) prevent and detect fraud and violations of our terms of service, (3) understand how visitors use and engage with our website and (4) analyze and improve our services. Depending on your relationship with Stripe and the domain you are visiting, different cookies apply. For instance some cookies are set on a public Stripe or Link domain, some on the Stripe Dashboard or a Link settings page, and some on the payment page available to end users who make payments using Stripe services, including Link.
Cookies play an important role in helping Stripe provide personal, effective and safe services. Please be mindful that we change the cookies periodically as we improve or add to our services. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
What is Stripe.js?
Stripe.js is a JavaScript library that businesses use to integrate Stripe and accept online payments (corresponding iOS and Android SDKs enable the same use cases). Stripe uses Stripe.js to facilitate fraud prevention technologies and the use of its Link payment services on the websites of Business Users.
For fraud detection, Stripe.js uses cookies, including `__stripe_mid`, `__stripe_sid`, and `m`, to collect signals differentiating legitimate behavior from fraudulent behavior.  For example, fraudsters and bots often spend less time on Business Users’ pages than legitimate End Customers. We are able to detect this behavior and use it in evaluating the risk that a transaction is fraudulent.
When you visit a site that uses Stripe, you might see this fraud prevention activity in a privacy report or tracker list on your web browser. Stripe doesn’t—and won’t—share or sell the fraud data it collects using Stripe.js to advertisers. Stripe works to keep this fraud detection data  secure and ensure it does not leave Stripe infrastructure. It is exchanged between the following Stripe-controlled hosts:js.stripe.com, m.stripe.network, and m.stripe.com, and access to this data is tightly restricted to a small number of Stripe employees whose security permissions are regularly reviewed. You can read more about how Stripe uses data for fraud prevention in our
Privacy Policy
.
Stripe also uses the Stripe.js library to implement cookies and similar technology such as `pay_sid`, `link.auth_session_client_secret`, and `elements_session` to enable Link to remember users’ information for faster checkout across Stripe merchant sites and to collect analytics related to Link’s implementation on checkout pages.
You should regularly review the Stripe cookies that are placed on your website and other data collected by Stripe.js. You should consult your counsel regarding how best to disclose this data collection to your customers, including by updating your cookie banner. But, here is a paragraph you could add to your privacy disclosures if they do not already include such information:
We use Stripe for payments, analytics, and other business services. Stripe may collect personal data including via cookies and similar technologies. The personal data Stripe collects may include transactional data and identifying information about devices that connect to its services. Stripe uses this information to operate and improve the services it provides to us, including for fraud detection, loss prevention, authentication, and analytics related to the performance of its services. You can learn more about Stripe and read its privacy policy at
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
What are advanced fraud signals?
Stripe’s advanced fraud detection looks at signals about device characteristics and user activity indicators that help distinguish between legitimate and fraudulent transactions. These signals are highly indicative of fraud and power Stripe’s fraud prevention systems, such as Radar. The signals are securely transmitted to Stripe’s backend by periodically making requests to the m.stripe.com endpoint.
You can learn more in our documentation for
advanced fraud detection
.
Why are advanced fraud signals not ad tracking?
Stripe only uses these advanced fraud detection signals to enable secure payments and prevent fraud. We don’t use this data to build individual profiles or share or sell it to third-party advertisers.
You can read more about how we use this data in our
Privacy Policy
.
What obligations should merchants keep in mind relating to cookie technology on their sites?
This article aims to provide information about the use of cookies and similar technologies (“cookies”) on the websites where you as a merchant may use Stripe services and how the cookies support the functions and features of Stripe's services for merchants. For example, your use of certain Stripe services may load stripe.js. Stripe.js is a javascript library provided by Stripe, and in one of its functions it uses cookies for various purposes including fraud prevention, authentication, and analytics (for the avoidance of doubt, the elements_session analytics cookie is only set in some US states). Please refer to
https://stripe.com/cookie-settings
for more information. The specific cookies used by stripe.js depend on your configuration with the related Stripe products.
For example, one of the key features of stripe.js is the fraud prevention system provided by Stripe's Radar product. Radar uses cookies to help businesses reduce chargebacks and losses from fraudulent transactions.
Please note that the use of cookies may have legal implications depending on the geographical location of your business and customers. As a result, you may need to take appropriate action to ensure compliance with local regulatory requirements related to cookies.
You should regularly review the Stripe cookies that are placed on your website to ensure that your own privacy disclosures tell your end users about this type of data collection, and also update your cookie disclosure and/or consent banner accordingly after reviewing the cookies placed on your website.
Here is a paragraph you could add to your privacy disclosures if it does not already include such a disclosure:
We use Stripe for payments, analytics, and other business services. Stripe may collect personal data including via cookies and similar technologies. The personal data Stripe collects may include transactional data and identifying information about devices that connect to its services. Stripe uses this information to operate and improve the services it provides to us, including for fraud detection, loss prevention, authentication, and analytics related to the performance of its services. You can learn more about Stripe and read its privacy policy at
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
Below is an overview of the specific cookies associated with each product and their respective functions for Embeddable Checkout, Elements, Radar, and Link.
Cookie Name
Category
Description
Cookie in use when using:
m
Fraud Prevention
Set for fraud prevention purposes and helps us assess the risk associated with an attempted transaction.
Learn more
about advanced fraud detection.
Radar
__stripe_mid
Fraud Prevention
Set for fraud prevention purposes and helps us assess the risk associated with an attempted transaction.
Learn more
about advanced fraud detection.
Radar
__stripe_sid
Fraud Prevention
Set for fraud prevention purposes and helps us assess the risk associated with an attempted transaction.
Learn more
about advanced fraud detection.
Radar
pay_sid
Authentication
Provide a logged-in experience when a consumer uses link.com to make purchases on a merchant site.
Link, Embeddable Checkout, Checkout & Elements
__Host-LinkSession
Authentication
Stores consumer credentials to provide a one-click payment experience at checkout.
Link & Elements
link.auth_session_client_secret
Authentication
Provide a logged-in experience when a consumer uses Stripe-hosted payment UIs to make purchases and Crypto Onramp to purchase crypto.
Link
elements_session
Analytics
The `elements_session` US-only cookie allows us to measure the result of changes we make to the Stripe Elements product and ensure that the performance of the product continues to improve over time.
Embeddable Checkout, Elements & Link
How does Stripe remember payment method details for Link?
Link (formerly known as “Remember Me”) lets end users save and reuse their payment information for faster checkout at thousands of online businesses that use Stripe. When an end user makes a purchase via a Business User (i.e., merchant) that enables Link, the end user can ask Stripe to remember their payment method details, such as credit and debit card details. If an individual chooses to be remembered, Stripe will remember the end user’s email address, phone number, shipping address, and payment method details for future Link transactions.
The payment method details for future transactions may be remembered across multiple Stripe Business Users. Generally, once the cookie is set, the end user may make “1-click” purchases using Link when you check out, which means that Stripe will automatically populate the end user’s saved information into their checkout on their behalf, and use the information to complete the transaction faster.
If the end user enters their phone number or email address during a future Link transaction, Stripe will authenticate the end user by sending the end user a One Time Passcode (OTP), e.g. via an SMS message or email. If the end user correctly enters the OTP, Stripe or the Business User will set a cookie in the end user’s browser, indicating that the end user has been authenticated. If the end user does not enter the OTP, or elects to “log out” of their Link session then the cookie won’t remember the end user.
A cookie is only stored in a specific browser on a specific device. If an end user wishes to make 1-click purchases in a different browser or on a different device, they must go through the OTP authentication process for the new browser or device combination.
After 90 days, it will be necessary for the end user to re-complete the OTP process. The end user may also proactively remove the cookie by clearing cookies in their browser or by selecting the “log out” option when this option is presented in checkout.
If an end user no longer wishes for Stripe to remember their payment method details when they check out in the future, the end user may use the
self-service deletion tool
. Alternatively, the end user may also contact Stripe support to make this request.
The description above describes how an end user may control how their information is stored and used to check out. However, this does not affect the other contexts in which Stripe may store and use end user information. In particular, Stripe may store and use such information as described elsewhere on this Privacy Center - including for purposes such as for advanced fraud detection.
What obligations should Link users keep in mind relating to cookie technology on their sites?
Based on your integration choice (e.g., for Link in Elements), you may have legal responsibilities associated with cookies and similar technology that Stripe uses for fraud detection and/or authentication purposes.
You should always check with your legal counsel to understand how you should comply with applicable legal obligations with setting cookies and similar technology. This section has information to keep in mind.
Stripe cookies or similar technology are set on your domain (e.g. on your checkout flow) from the Stripe.js library. The current Stripe cookies from the Stripe.js library include fraud prevention cookies like `
__stripe_mid`
, `
__stripe_sid`
, and `
m`
, and also end-user authentication cookies like`
pay_sid`
and `
__Host-LinkSession`
.
You should regularly review the Stripe cookies that are placed on your website to ensure that your own privacy disclosures tell your end users about this type of data collection, and also update your cookie banner accordingly after reviewing the cookies placed on your website. Here is a paragraph you could add to your privacy disclosures if it does not already include such a disclosure:
We use Stripe for payments, analytics, and other business services. Stripe may collect personal data including via cookies and similar technologies. The personal data Stripe collects may include transactional data and identifying information about devices that connect to its services. Stripe uses this information to operate and improve the services it provides to us, including for fraud detection, loss prevention, authentication, and analytics related to the performance of its services. You can learn more about Stripe and read its privacy policy at
https://stripe.com/privacy
.
Does Stripe use CAPTCHA to protect its website from fraud and abuse?
Yes, some of the Stripe sites may implement Google
reCAPTCHA
Enterprise to help prevent fraud and abuse. Information collected by Google is used to provide and improve reCAPTCHA Enterprise and for general security purposes. Use of reCAPTCHA Enterprise is subject to Google’s
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
We may also use
hCAPTCHA Enterprise
to help protect Stripe’s sites and services from fraud and abuse, including by bots impersonating human beings.  When you access Stripe’s sites and services protected by hCAPTCHA, we may share data, including browser features and certain hashed identifiers with our hCAPTCHA provider Intuition Machines, Inc.  To the extent that this data is Personal Data, Intuition Machines processes it on Stripe’s behalf as a Data Processor.
Contact Us
Contact our Privacy team
If you have any outstanding privacy questions after reviewing the privacy policy, please don’t hesitate to reach out to us by
email
, or through our
form
.
If you’d like to send us physical mail, please send to:
Stripe, Inc.
354 Oyster Point Boulevard
South San Francisco, California, 94080, USA
Attention: Stripe Legal
Stripe Payments Europe Limited
1 Grand Canal Street Lower, Grand Canal Dock, Dublin, D02 H210, Ireland
Attention: Stripe Legal
Where can I learn more about Stripe’s security practices?
Visit our
security page
to learn more about Stripe’s security practices. You should
contact us
immediately if you become aware of any unauthorized use or any other breach of security regarding the Stripe services.
Sub-policy 8
https://stripe.com/de/privacy#translation:
Stripe-Rahmenvertrag
Stripe Connect
Plattformvereinbarung
Kontovereinbarung
Produkte und Programme
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate-Nutzungsbedingungen
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe-Kundenportal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe-Ecosystem für Partner
Stripe Radar
Stripe-Prämien
Stripe-Verifizierungen
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal-Einkaufskonditionen
Terminal-Konditionen für Wiederverkäufer
EULA für Stripe Terminal-Gerät
Stripe Treasury – verbundene Konten
Stripe Treasury – Plattformen
Stripe Tresor und Forward
Finanzbedingungen
Offenlegung durch Acquirer (Händlerbank)
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Konditionen für Zahlungsmethoden
Eingeschränkte und untersagte Geschäfte
Datenschutz
Datenschutzerklärung
Cookie-Richtlinie
Datenschutz-Framework
Dienstanbieterliste
Datenverarbeitungsvereinbarung
Internationale Datenübermittlung – Nachtrag
Datenschutzcenter von Stripe
Geistiges Eigentum
Geistiges Eigentum – Hinweis
Marks-Nutzung
Stripe-Apps
Vereinbarung für App-Entwickler/innen
App-Marktplatz-Vereinbarung
Lizenzen
Bedingungen für Verbraucher/innen
Dies ist eine ausschließlich zu Informationszwecken bereitgestellte Übersetzung der Datenschutzerklärung. Rechtliche Gültigkeit besitzt einzig und allein die Originalerklärung, die in englischer Sprache vorliegt.
Zuletzt aktualisiert:  16. Januar 2024.
Unsere Zusammenfassung der Aktualisierungen finden Sie hier.
Diese Datenschutzrichtlinie enthält wichtige Informationen über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten und wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese sorgfältig zu lesen.
Willkommen
Wir stellen die Finanzinfrastruktur für das Internet bereit. Einzelpersonen und Unternehmen jeder Größe nutzen unsere Technologie und Dienstleistungen, um Einkäufe zu vereinfachen, Zahlungen zu akzeptieren, Auszahlungen vorzunehmen und das Online-Geschäft zu verwalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung („Erklärung“) beschreibt die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir erheben, wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben, sowie Einzelheiten darüber, wie Sie sich bei Fragen zum Datenschutz an uns wenden können. Darüber hinaus werden in der Erklärung Ihre Rechte als betroffene Person und die Ihnen zur Verfügung stehenden Wahlmöglichkeiten dargelegt, einschließlich des Rechts, bestimmten Verwendungen Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns zu widersprechen. Weitere Informationen über unsere Datenschutzpraktiken, einschließlich unserer ergänzenden US-Hinweise, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
In dieser Erklärung bezieht sich „Stripe“, „wir“, „unser“ oder „uns“ auf das Stripe-Unternehmen, das für die Erhebung, Nutzung und Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten wie in diesem Dokument beschrieben verantwortlich ist. Das für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortliche Stripe-Unternehmen kann je nach Rechtsordnung variieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
„Personenbezogene Daten“ bezieht sich auf alle Informationen, die mit einer identifizierten oder identifizierbaren Person assoziiert sind, einschließlich der Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und die wir über Sie während Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Diensten erheben (beispielsweise Geräteinformationen, IP-Adresse usw.).
„Dienste“ bezieht sich auf die von Stripe gemäß dem Stripe-Rahmenvertrag und den Nutzungsbedingungen für Verbraucher/innen bereitgestellten Produkte und Dienste. Dies kann Geräte und Anwendungen umfassen, die von Stripe bereitgestellt werden. Unsere „Geschäftsdienstleistungen“ sind Dienstleistungen, die wir für Unternehmen („Geschäftskunden“) erbringen, die uns direkt und indirekt personenbezogene Daten von „Endkundinnen“ und „Endkunden“ in Verbindung mit ihren eigenen Geschäftsabläufen und Aktivitäten liefern. Unsere „Endkundendienste“ richten sich direkt an Einzelpersonen zur persönlichen Nutzung. „Websites“ bezieht sich auf Stripe.com, Link.com und andere Websites, Anwendungen und Online-Dienste von Stripe. Zusammenfassend bezeichnen wir Websites, Geschäftsdienstleistungen und Endkundendienste als „Dienste“.
„Finanzpartner“ sind Finanzinstitute, Banken und andere Partner wie Acquirer von Zahlungsmethoden, Zahlungsdienstleister und Kartennetzwerke, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Dienste bereitzustellen.
Je nach Kontext bedeutet „Sie“ Endkundin/Endkunde, Endnutzer/in, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in:
Wenn Sie einen Endkundendienst für Ihren persönlichen Gebrauch nutzen, beispielsweise wenn Sie sich für Link anmelden, bezeichnen wir Sie als „Endnutzer/in”.
Wenn Sie mit einem Geschäftskunden in Geschäftsbeziehung treten oder anderweitig eine Transaktion mit einem Geschäftskunden durchführen, indem Sie beispielsweise ein Paar Schuhe von einem Geschäftskunden kaufen, der Stripe Checkout für die Zahlungsabwicklung nutzt, aber keine direkte Transaktion mit Stripe durchführen, bezeichnen wir Sie als „Endkundin/Endkunde.”
Wenn Sie im Namen eines bestehenden oder potenziellen Geschäftskunden handeln (beispielsweise als Unternehmensgründer, Kontoverwalter für einen Geschäftskunden oder als Empfänger einer Mitarbeiter-Kreditkarte eines Geschäftskunden über Stripe Issuing), kategorisieren wir Sie als „Vertreter/in”.
Wenn Sie mit Stripe durch den Besuch einer Website interagieren, ohne in einem Stripe-Konto angemeldet zu sein, oder wenn Sie an Ihrer Interaktion mit Stripe nicht als Endnutzer/in, Endkunde/Endkundin oder Vertreter/in beteiligt sind, betrachten wir Sie als „Besucher/in“. Sie sind zum Beispiel Besucher/in, wenn Sie eine Nachricht an Stripe senden und um weitere Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen bitten.
In dieser Erklärung bezieht sich „Transaktionsdaten“ auf Daten, die von Stripe erhoben und verwendet werden, um von Ihnen gewünschte Transaktionen auszuführen. Bei bestimmten Transaktionsdaten handelt es sich um personenbezogene Daten, die Folgendes umfassen können: Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihre Kontaktnummer, Ihre Rechnungs- und Versandadresse, Informationen zur Zahlungsmethode (beispielsweise Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer, Bankverbindung oder das von Ihnen gewählte Zahlungskartenbild), Angaben zum Händler und zum Standort, Betrag und Datum des Kaufs sowie in einigen Fällen Informationen über den gekauften Artikel.
Je nach Aktivität übernimmt Stripe die Rolle eines „Datenverantwortlichen“ und/oder „Auftragsverarbeiters“ (oder „Dienstleisters“) aufgrund dieser Aktivität. Zusätzliche Informationen zu unserer Rolle, zu dem für diese Erklärung verantwortlichen Stripe-Unternehmen und zu unseren Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erheben, und wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten
Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten
Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Internationale Datenübermittlung
Aktualisierungen und Benachrichtigungen
Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
Kontakt
Datenschutzhinweise für US-Verbraucher/innen
1. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir erheben, und wie wir sie verwenden und weitergeben
Unsere Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten unterscheidet sich je nachdem, ob Sie Endnutzer/in, Endkundin/Endkunde, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, und je nachdem, welchen Dienst Sie in Anspruch nehmen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Einzelunternehmer/in sind und unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen in Anspruch nehmen möchten, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erheben, um Ihr Unternehmen zum Onboarding einzuladen; gleichzeitig könnten Sie auch Endkundin/Endkunde sein, wenn Sie Waren von einem anderen Geschäftskunden gekauft haben, der unsere Dienste zur Zahlungsabwicklung nutzt. Sie könnten Endnutzer/in sein, wenn Sie unseren Endkundendienst, wie beispielsweise Link, für diese Transaktionen genutzt haben.
1.1 Endnutzer/innen
Wir erbringen Endkundendienste, wenn wir Ihnen unsere Dienste direkt für Ihre persönliche Nutzung zur Verfügung stellen (beispielsweise Link). Weitere Einzelheiten zu unserer Erhebung, Verwendung und Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten von Endnutzerinnen und Endnutzern, einschließlich der
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung solcher Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Endnutzer/innen erheben
Verwendung von Link oder Verbindung mit Ihrem Bankkonto.
Stripe bietet Ihnen den Dienst „Link“ an, mit dem Sie Ihre Zahlungsmethoden bei Stripe hinterlegen können, um sie bequem zur Zahlung bei unseren Geschäftskunden zu nutzen. Wenn Sie sich bei Link anmelden, erklären Sie sich damit einverstanden, dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (wie Name, Kontaktinformationen, Zahlungsmethode) bei Stripe gespeichert werden. Dies ermöglicht effizientere Kauferfahrungen bei der künftigen Nutzung von Link. Wenn Sie sich für die Bezahlung mit Link entscheiden, erheben wir auch die mit Ihren Transaktionen assoziierten Transaktionsdaten.
Mehr erfahren
.
Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, uns Ihre Bankverbindung mitzuteilen (auch um Zahlungen über Ihr Bankkonto via Link zu leisten), erhebt und verarbeitet Stripe in regelmäßigen Abständen Ihre Kontoinformationen (beispielsweise Angaben zu Bankkontoinhaber/in, Kontostände, Kontonummer und -daten, Kontotransaktionen und in einigen Fällen auch Anmelde-/Zugangsdaten). Sie können uns jederzeit auffordern, die Erhebung dieser Daten einzustellen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sie können auch Ausweisdokumente (beispielsweise Ihren Führerschein) bei Link hinterlegen, um diese künftig an andere Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben.
Bezahlung von Stripe.
Wenn Sie Waren oder Dienstleistungen direkt bei Stripe kaufen, erhalten wir Ihre Transaktionsdaten. Wenn Sie beispielsweise eine Zahlung an Stripe Climate leisten, erheben wir Informationen zur Transaktion, sowie Ihre Kontaktdaten und Angaben zur Zahlungsmethode.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdienste.
Wir bieten einen Dienst zur Identitätsverifizierung an, der den Abgleich Ihres Ausweisdokuments (z. B. Führerschein) mit Ihrem Bild (z. B. Selfie) automatisiert. Sie können der Verwendung Ihrer biometrischen Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Verifizierungstechnologie separat zustimmen, was Sie jederzeit widerrufen können.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Endnutzer erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten und Ihrer Nutzung unserer Endkundendienste, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten unserer Endnutzer/innen verwenden und weitergeben
Dienste
Wir verwenden und geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiter, um Ihnen die Endkundendienste bereitzustellen. Dazu gehören Support, Personalisierung (beispielsweise Sprachpräferenzen und Einstellungsmöglichkeiten) und Mitteilungen über unsere Endkundendienste (beispielsweise Benachrichtigung über Richtlinienaktualisierungen und Informationen über unsere Dienste). Beispielsweise könnte Stripe Cookies und vergleichbare Technologien oder die Daten, die Sie unseren Geschäftskunden zur Verfügung stellen (beispielsweise wenn Sie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse auf der Website eines Geschäftskunden eingeben), verwenden, um Sie zu erkennen und Ihnen zu helfen, Link beim Besuch der Website unseres Geschäftskunden zu verwenden. Weitere Informationen zu unserer Verwendung von Cookies und vergleichbaren Technologien finden Sie in der
Cookie Policy
von Stripe.
Unsere Geschäftskunden.
Wenn Sie Link für Zahlungen verwenden, geben wir Ihre Transaktionsdaten an die Geschäftskunden weiter, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten möchten.
Mehr erfahren
. Darüber hinaus können Sie Ihr Bankkonto mit Stripe verbinden, und Stripe anweisen, Ihre Kontodaten an Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass diese Geschäftskunden über eigene Datenschutz-Erklärungen verfügen, in denen sie beschreiben, wie sie die an sie weitergegebenen Informationen verwenden.
Transaktionen.
Wenn Sie Link für Zahlungen nutzen, verwenden wir Ihre bei uns gespeicherten personenbezogenen Daten (wie Name, Kontaktinformationen, Zahlungsmethode), um Transaktionen mit Geschäftskunden von Stripe durchzuführen. Wir stellen diese Daten Geschäftskunden und anderen, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, zur Verfügung und verarbeiten sie gemäß Abschnitt 1.2 dieser Erklärung als Datenverarbeiter für diese Geschäftskunden.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über unsere Dienste (beispielsweise Stripe Radar) erheben, um Betrug zu erkennen und um finanziellen Verlusten für Sie, uns und unsere Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner vorzubeugen, einschließlich der Erkennung nicht autorisierter Käufe. Wir können Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartnern, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugsprävention nutzen, personenbezogene Daten über Sie (einschließlich Ihrer versuchten Transaktionen) zur Verfügung stellen, damit diese das mit der Transaktion verbundene Betrugs- oder Verlustrisiko beurteilen können. Weitere Informationen zu unserem Einsatz von Technologien zur Beurteilung des mit einer versuchten Transaktion verbundenen Betrugsrisikos und zu den Informationen, die wir an Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner weitergeben, finden Sie
hier
und
hier
.
Werbung.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um Ihre Eignung für weitere Endnutzer-Dienste zu prüfen und Ihnen diese anzubieten oder bestehende Endkundendienste zu bewerben. Soweit gesetzlich zulässig (einschließlich Ihrer gegebenenfalls erforderlichen Einwilligung), verwenden wir personenbezogene Daten von Endnutzerinnen und Endnutzern und geben diese an andere weiter, damit wir unsere Endkundendienste an Sie vermarkten können, auch durch interessenbasierte Werbung. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Dritte weiter, aber wir können Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Endnutzer/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.2 Endkundinnen und Endkunden
Stripe erbringt verschiedene Geschäftsdienstleistungen für seine Geschäftskunden. Dazu zählen persönliche oder Online-Zahlungen oder Auszahlungen für diese Geschäftskunden. Wenn wir als Dienstleister eines Geschäftskunden agieren (auch „Datenverarbeiter“ genannt), verarbeiten wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden gemäß unserer Vereinbarung mit dem Geschäftskunden und seinen rechtmäßigen Anweisungen. Dies geschieht zum Beispiel, wenn wir eine Zahlung für einen Geschäftskunden abwickeln, weil Sie etwas bei ihm gekauft haben oder wenn er uns anweist, Ihnen Gelder zu schicken.
Geschäftskunden sind für die Einhaltung der Datenschutzrechte ihrer Endkunden verantwortlich, einschließlich der Einholung angemessener Einwilligungen und der Offenlegung ihrer eigenen Datenerhebung und -verwendung im Zusammenhang mit ihren Produkten und Dienstleistungen. Wenn Sie Endkundin/Endkunde sind, lesen Sie bitte die Datenschutzerklärung des Geschäftskunden, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, um sich über seine Datenschutzpraktiken, Wahlmöglichkeiten und Kontrollen zu informieren.
Weitere umfassende Informationen über die Erhebung, Verwendung und Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten von Endkunden und Endkundinnen finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
, einschließlich der
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten stützen.
a. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Endkundinnen und Endkunden erheben
Transaktionsdaten.
Wir erhalten Ihre Transaktionsdaten, wenn Sie als Endkundin oder Endkunde Zahlungen an unseren Geschäftskunden leisten, Rückerstattungen von ihm erhalten, einen Kauf oder eine Spende veranlassen oder anderweitig mit unserem Geschäftskunden in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, ob persönlich oder online. Wir können auch Ihren Transaktionsverlauf vom Geschäftskunden erhalten.
Mehr erfahren
. Außerdem können wir die Daten erheben, die Sie bei einem Bezahlvorgang eingeben, auch wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, das Ausfüllen des Formulars abzubrechen oder keine Transaktion mit dem Geschäftskunden vorzunehmen.
Mehr erfahren
. Ein Geschäftskunde, der den Terminal-Dienst von Stripe nutzt, um seine Waren oder Dienstleistungen an Endkundinnen und Endkunden zu vertreiben, kann den Terminal-Dienst nutzen, um personenbezogene Daten der Endkundinnen und Endkunden (wie Name, E-Mail, Telefonnummer, Adresse, Unterschrift oder Alter) entsprechend seiner eigenen Datenschutzerklärung zu erheben.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdaten.
Stripe bietet einen Verifizierungs- und Betrugspräventionsdienst an, den unsere Geschäftskunden nutzen können, um personenbezogene Daten über Sie zu verifizieren, wie beispielsweise Ihre Autorisierung zur Nutzung einer bestimmten Zahlungsmethode. Während dieses Prozesses werden Sie aufgefordert, uns bestimmte personenbezogene Daten mitzuteilen (beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis und ein Selfie zur biometrischen Verifizierung, von Ihnen eingegebene personenbezogene Daten oder personenbezogene Daten, die aus der physischen Zahlungsmethode hervorgehen, wie das Bild auf der Kreditkarte). Zum Schutz vor Betrug und um festzustellen, ob jemand versucht, Ihre Identität vorzutäuschen, können wir diese Daten mit Informationen über Sie abgleichen, die wir von Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartnern, verbundenen Unternehmen, Identitätsprüfungsdiensten, öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen und anderen Dienstleistern und Quellen von Drittparteien erheben.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Endkundinnen und Endkunden erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden verwenden und weitergeben
Um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen für unsere Geschäftskunden zu erbringen, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden und geben diese an sie weiter. Soweit zulässig, verwenden wir personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden auch für eigene Zwecke von Stripe, beispielsweise zur Stärkung der Sicherheit, zur Verbesserung und zum Angebot unserer Geschäftsdienstleistungen sowie zur Verhinderung von Betrug, Verlust und anderen Schäden, wie weiter unten beschrieben.
Zahlungsabwicklung und Buchhaltung.
Wir verwenden Ihre Transaktionsdaten, um für Geschäftskunden zahlungsbezogene Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen, darunter die Abwicklung von Online-Zahlungen, die Berechnung der Verkaufssteuer, die Bearbeitung von Rechnungen und Durchführung von Abrechnungen, sowie die Unterstützung bei der Ermittlung von Umsatzzahlen, der Begleichung von Rechnungen und der Erledigung von Buchhaltungsaufgaben.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch verwenden, um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen und zu verbessern.
Bei Zahlungstransaktionen werden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten im Zuge der Abwicklung Ihrer Transaktion an verschiedene Stellen weitergegeben. Als Dienstleister oder Auftragsverarbeiter geben wir personenbezogene Daten weiter, um Transaktionen auf Weisung von Geschäftskunden abzuwickeln. Wenn Sie beispielsweise eine Zahlungsmethode für Ihre Transaktion wählen, sei es eine Kreditkarte, eine Debitkarte, „Jetzt kaufen, später bezahlen“ oder ein Lastschriftverfahren, kann Ihr Zahlungsmethodenanbieter die Transaktionsdaten Ihrer über Stripe abgewickelten Transaktionen erhalten. Der Geschäftskunde, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten möchten, erhält ebenfalls Transaktionsdaten und kann diese Daten an andere weitergeben. Weitere Informationen über die Verwendung und Weitergabe Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch Geschäftskunden entnehmen Sie bitte deren Datenschutzerklärungen
Finanzdienstleistungen.
Einige Geschäftskunden nutzen unsere Dienste, um Ihnen Finanzdienstleistungen über Stripe oder unsere Finanzpartner anzubieten. Beispielsweise kann ein Geschäftskunde ein Kartenprodukt ausgeben, mit dem Sie Waren und Dienstleistungen kaufen können. Solche Karten könnten die Marke von Stripe, vom Bankpartner und/oder vom Geschäftskunden tragen. Zusätzlich zu den Transaktionsdaten, die wir durch die Verwendung dieser Karten bei Käufen generieren oder empfangen, erheben und verwenden wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch, um diese Produkte bereitzustellen und zu verwalten, einschließlich der Unterstützung unserer Geschäftskunden bei der Verhinderung des Missbrauchs der Karten. Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärungen des Geschäftskunden und, falls zutreffend, die Datenschutzerklärungen unserer mit der Finanzdienstleistung assoziierten Bankpartner (deren Marken möglicherweise auf der Karte angegeben sind), um weitere Informationen zu erhalten.
Identitäts-/Verifizierungsdienste.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten Ihrer Identität, einschließlich der von Ihnen und unseren Dienstleistern bereitgestellten Informationen, um Verifizierungsdienste für Stripe oder für die Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, zu erbringen, um Betrug verhindern und die Sicherheit zu erhöhen. Falls Sie ein Selfie zusammen mit einem Foto Ihres Ausweisdokuments übermitteln, setzen wir biometrische Technologien zum Abgleich und zur Berechnung der Übereinstimmung ein, um Sie zu verifizieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über unsere Dienste erheben, um Verluste für Sie, uns, unsere Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner zu erkennen und zu verhindern. Wir können Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartnern, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugsprävention nutzen, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (einschließlich Ihrer versuchten Transaktionen) zur Verfügung stellen, damit diese das mit der Transaktion verbundene Betrugs- oder Verlustrisiko beurteilen können. Weitere Informationen zu unserem Einsatz von Technologien zur Beurteilung des mit einer versuchten Transaktion verbundenen Betrugsrisikos und zu den Informationen, die wir an Geschäftskunden und Finanzpartner weitergeben, finden Sie
hier
und
hier
.
Unsere Geschäftskunden (und deren autorisierte Drittparteien).
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten von Endkundinnen und Endkunden an ihre jeweiligen Geschäftskunden und an Parteien weiter, die von diesen Geschäftskunden direkt autorisiert wurden, solche Daten zu erhalten. Hier einige Beispiele für eine solche Weitergabe:
Wenn ein Geschäftskunde Stripe anweist, einem anderen Geschäftskunden über Stripe Connect Zugang zu seinem Stripe-Konto, einschließlich der Daten seiner Endkunden, zu gewähren.
Weitergabe von Informationen, die Sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt haben, damit wir im Namen eines Geschäftskunden Zahlungen an Sie senden können.
Weitergabe von Informationen, Dokumenten oder Bildern, die von Endkunden zur Verfügung gestellt werden, an Geschäftskunden, wenn letztere Stripe Identity, unseren Identitätsverifizierungsdienst zur Überprüfung der Identität des Endkunden, nutzen.
Die Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung treten, können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch an Dritte weitergeben (beispielsweise an andere Dienstleister als Stripe). Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärung der Geschäftskunden, um weitere Informationen zu erhalten.
Werbung durch Geschäftskunden.
Wenn Sie einen Kauf bei einem Geschäftskunden einleiten, erhält der Geschäftskunde von uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten im Zusammenhang mit der Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, auch wenn Sie Ihren Kauf nicht abschließen. Dieser Geschäftskunde kann Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um seine Produkte oder Dienste zu vermarkten und zu bewerben, und zwar gemäß den Bedingungen seiner Datenschutzerklärung. Bitte lesen Sie die Datenschutzerklärung des Geschäftskunden, um weitere Informationen zu erhalten, einschließlich Ihrer Rechte, die Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu Marketingzwecken zu unterbinden.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Endkundinnen und Endkunden verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.3 Vertreter/innen
Wir erheben, verwenden und teilen personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern von Geschäftskunden (beispielsweise von Unternehmensinhabern), um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu erbringen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern erheben, verwenden und weitergeben, sowie über die
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Welche personenbezogenen Daten wir über Vertreter/innen erheben
Anmeldung und Kontaktinformationen.
Wenn Sie sich für ein Stripe-Konto für einen Geschäftskunden (einschließlich Unternehmensgründung) registrieren, erheben wir Ihren Namen und Ihre Zugangsdaten. Wenn Sie sich für eine von Stripe organisierte Veranstaltung registrieren oder daran teilnehmen oder sich für den Erhalt von Benachrichtigungen von Stripe anmelden, erheben wir Ihre Registrierungs- und Profildaten. Über Sie als Vertreter/in können wir unter Umständen personenbezogene Daten von Drittparteien, einschließlich Datenanbietern, erheben, um Ihnen Werbung und Angebote zukommen zu lassen und um mit Ihnen zu kommunizieren, wie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
beschrieben. Darüber hinaus können wir möglicherweise einen Standort mit Ihnen verknüpfen, um die Dienste oder Informationen effektiv auf Ihre Bedürfnisse zuzuschneiden.
Mehr erfahren
.
Identifizierungsinformationen
Als aktueller oder potenzieller Geschäftskunde, als Inhaber/in eines Geschäftskunden oder als Anteilseigner/in, leitende(r) Angestellte(r) oder Vorstandsmitglied eines Geschäftskunden benötigen wir Ihre Kontaktdaten, beispielsweise Name, Postanschrift, Telefonnummer und E-Mail-Adresse, um die Anforderungen unserer Finanzpartner und die gesetzlichen Vorschriften zu erfüllen, Ihre Identität zu verifizieren und betrügerische Aktivitäten und Schäden an der Stripe-Plattform zu verhindern. Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, wie beispielsweise Eigentumsanteile am Geschäftskunden, Geburtsdatum, Ausweispapiere und zugehörige Identifikatoren sowie etwaige Betrugs- oder Missbrauchsfälle direkt von Ihnen und/oder von Drittparteien wie Kreditauskunfteien und über die von uns angebotenen Dienste.
Mehr erfahren
. Sie haben auch die Möglichkeit, uns Ihre Bankverbindung mitzuteilen.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir über Vertreter/innen erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern verwenden und weitergeben
Im Allgemeinen verwenden wir die personenbezogenen Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern, um die Geschäftsdienstleistungen für die entsprechenden Geschäftskunden zu erbringen. Die Art und Weise, wie wir diese Daten verwenden und weitergeben, wird weiter unten beschrieben.
Geschäftsdienstleistungen.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern und geben sie an Geschäftskunden weiter, um die von Ihnen oder von dem von Ihnen vertretenen Geschäftskunden angeforderten Dienstleistungen zu erbringen.
In bestimmten Fällen müssen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an eine staatliche Stelle übermitteln, um unsere Geschäftsdienstleistung zu erbringen, beispielsweise für die Unternehmensgründung oder die Berechnung und Zahlung der geltenden Verkaufssteuer. Für unsere steuerbezogenen Geschäftsdienstleistungen können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um im Namen des Geschäftskunden, den Sie vertreten, Steuererklärungen einzureichen. Für unsere Atlas-Geschäftsgründungsdienste können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um in Ihrem Namen Formulare bei der US-Steuerbehörde IRS und Dokumente bei anderen Regierungsbehörden einzureichen, beispielsweise die Gründungsurkunde im Gründungsstaat.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern an Parteien weiter, die vom jeweiligen Geschäftskunden ausdrücklich autorisiert wurden, beispielsweise an Finanzpartner, die ein Finanzprodukt vertreiben, oder Drittpartei-Apps oder -Dienste, die der Geschäftskunde neben unseren Geschäftsdienstleistungen nutzen möchte. Hier einige Beispiele für eine solche Weitergabe:
Anbieter von Zahlungsmethoden wie Visa oder WeChat Pay benötigen Informationen über Geschäftskunden und ihre Vertreter, die ihre Zahlungsmethoden akzeptieren. Diese Informationen werden in der Regel während des Onboarding-Prozesses oder zur Bearbeitung von Transaktionen für diese Geschäftskunden benötigt.
Mehr erfahren
.
Ein Geschäftskunde kann Stripe autorisieren, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an andere Geschäftskunden weiterzugeben, um die Bereitstellung von Dienstleistungen über Stripe Connect zu erleichtern.
Die Verwendung personenbezogener Daten durch eine von einem Geschäftskunden autorisierte Drittpartei unterliegt der Datenschutzerklärung der Drittpartei.
Wenn Sie ein Geschäftskunde sind und Ihr Unternehmen einen Namen trägt, der personenbezogene Daten enthält (beispielsweise ein Einzelunternehmen oder einen Familiennamen als Firmennamen), werden wir diese Daten für die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste in der gleichen Weise verwenden und weitergeben, wie wir es mit jedem anderen Firmennamen tun. Dies kann bedeuten, dass er auf Quittungen und anderen Transaktionsbeschreibungen erscheint.
Betrugserkennung und Verlustprävention.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern, um Risiken zu erkennen und zu steuern, wonach unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen für betrügerische Aktivitäten genutzt werden könnten, die Stripe, Endnutzer/innen, Endkunden, Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartner und andere schädigen. Darüber hinaus verwenden wir Informationen über Sie, die wir von Drittparteien wie Kreditauskunfteien und von unseren Diensten erhalten, um solche Risiken zu vermeiden, einschließlich der Ermittlung von Missbrauchsmustern und der Überwachung von Verstößen gegen die Nutzungsbedingungen. Stripe kann personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern an Geschäftskunden, unsere Finanzpartner und Drittpartei-Dienstleister weitergeben, um die von Ihnen bereitgestellten Informationen zu überprüfen und Risikoindikatoren zu identifizieren.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern auch zur Durchführung von Due-Diligence-Prüfungen, einschließlich der Durchführung von Anti-Geldwäsche- und Sanktionsprüfungen in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht, und geben sie weiter.
Werbung.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Vertreterinnen und Vertretern und geben diese an Drittparteien weiter, damit wir unsere Dienste bewerben und vermarkten können. Vorbehaltlich geltenden Rechts – einschließlich etwaiger Einwilligungserfordernisse – können wir mit interessenbezogener Werbung werben und die Wirksamkeit derartiger Werbung verfolgen. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
. Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, einschließlich der Aktivitäten in Ihrem Stripe-Konto, auch dazu verwenden, Ihre Eignung für Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu beurteilen und Ihnen diese anzubieten oder bestehende Geschäftsdienstleistungen zu bewerben.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten über Vertreter/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
1.4 Besucher/innen
Wir erheben, verwenden und teilen personenbezogene Daten von Besucher/innen. Weitere Einzelheiten darüber, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern erheben, verwenden und weitergeben, sowie über die
Rechtsgrundlagen
, auf die wir uns bei der Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten stützen, finden Sie in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
.
a. Welche personenbezogenen Daten wir über Besucher/innen erfassen
Wenn Sie auf unseren Websites surfen, erhalten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten entweder direkt von Ihnen oder durch die Verwendung von Cookies und vergleichbaren Technologien. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
, um mehr zu erfahren. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, ein Formular auf unserer oder auf der Website Dritter auszufüllen, auf denen unsere Werbeanzeigen erscheinen (wie LinkedIn oder Facebook), erheben wir die Informationen, die Sie in das Formular eingeben. Dies kann Ihre Kontaktinformationen und andere Informationen zu Ihren Fragen über unsere Dienstleistungen umfassen. Wir können Ihren Besuch auch mit einem Standort assoziieren.
Mehr erfahren
.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über sonstige Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir von Besucher/innen erheben können, einschließlich Ihrer Online-Aktivitäten, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
b. Wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern verwenden und weitergeben
Personalisierung.
Wir verwenden die Daten, die wir mit Hilfe von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien über Sie erheben, um das Nutzer/innen-Engagement bezüglich der Inhalte der Websites zu messen, die Relevanz und Navigation zu verbessern, Ihre Erfahrungen anzupassen (beispielsweise Sprachpräferenzen und regionsspezifische Inhalte) und auf Sie zugeschnittene Inhalte über Stripe und unsere Dienste zu erstellen. Da zum Beispiel nicht alle unsere Dienste global verfügbar sind, können wir unsere Antworten auf Ihre Region abstimmen.
Werbung.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, nutzen wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucherinnen und Besuchern und geben diese an Drittparteien weiter, damit wir unsere Dienste bewerben und vermarkten können. Vorbehaltlich geltenden Rechts – einschließlich etwaiger Einwilligungserfordernisse – können wir mit interessenbezogener Werbung werben und die Wirksamkeit derartiger Werbung verfolgen. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
. Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Engagement
. Bei Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Websites verwenden wir die Daten, die wir über Ihre Geräte erheben, um Ihnen Möglichkeiten für weitere Interaktionen zu bieten, beispielsweise Diskussionen über Dienste oder Interaktionen mit Chatbots, um Ihre Fragen zu beantworten.
Sonstiges.
Weitere Informationen über zusätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten von Besucher/innen verwenden und weitergeben können, finden Sie im folgenden Abschnitt
Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
.
2. Weitere Möglichkeiten, wie wir personenbezogene Daten erheben, verwenden und weitergeben
Zusätzlich zu den oben beschriebenen Arten verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten folgendermaßen:
a. Erhebung personenbezogener Daten
Online-Aktivität.
Abhängig vom genutzten Dienst und der Art und Weise, wie unsere Geschäftsdienstleistung von den Geschäftskunden implementiert wird, können wir Daten erheben, die sich auf Folgendes beziehen:
Die Geräte und Browser, die Sie auf unseren Websites und für Websites, Apps und sonstige Online-Dienste von Drittparteien („Drittpartei-Websites“) verwenden.
Nutzungsdaten, die mit diesen Geräten und Browsern und Ihrer Nutzung unserer Dienste assoziiert sind, einschließlich Daten wie IP-Adresse, Plug-ins, Spracheinstellungen, auf den Websites und den Websites Dritter verbrachte Zeit, besuchte Seiten, angeklickte Links, verwendete Zahlungsmethoden und die Seiten, die Sie zu unseren Websites und den Websites Dritter geführt haben. Wir sammeln auch Aktivitätsindikatoren, wie zum Beispiel Mausaktivitätsindikatoren, die uns helfen, Betrug aufzudecken.
Mehr erfahren
. Werfen Sie einen Blick in unsere
Cookie Policy
.
Informationen zu Kommunikation und Nutzung.
Des Weiteren erheben wir Informationen, die Sie uns über verschiedene Kanäle zur Verfügung stellen, beispielsweise über Support Tickets, E-Mails oder Social Media. Wenn Sie auf E-Mails oder Umfragen von Stripe antworten, erheben wir Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, Ihren Namen und alle anderen Daten, die Sie in Ihrer E-Mail oder Ihren Antworten angeben. Wenn Sie telefonisch mit uns Kontakt aufnehmen, zeichnen wir Ihre Telefonnummer und alle weiteren Informationen, die Sie im Laufe des Gesprächs angeben, auf. Darüber hinaus erheben wir Daten über Ihre Nutzung, wie beispielsweise Ihre Anmeldung für, Anwesenheit bei oder Besuch von Stripe-Veranstaltungen und alle weiteren Interaktionen mit Mitarbeitern und Mitarbeiterinnen von Stripe.
Foren und Diskussionsgruppen.
Sofern unsere Websites das Posten von Inhalten gestatten, erheben wir personenbezogene Daten, die Sie im Zusammenhang mit ihrem Beitrag bereitstellen.
b. Verwendung personenbezogener Daten.
Zusätzlich zu der oben beschriebenen Verwendung personenbezogener Daten verwenden wir diese auf die im Folgenden aufgeführten Arten:
Verbesserung und Entwicklung unserer Dienstleistungen.
Auf unseren Websites verwenden wir Analysewerkzeuge zum Verständnis Ihrer Nutzung unserer Websites und Dienste und zur Diagnose technischer Probleme. Weitere Informationen zu Ihrer Kontrolle über die Verwendung von Cookies und Drittpartei-Analysen finden Sie in unserer
Cookie Policy
. Darüber hinaus erfassen und verarbeiten wir personenbezogene Daten auch über unsere verschiedenen Dienste, unabhängig davon, ob Sie Endnutzer/in, Endkundin oder Endkunde, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, um unsere Dienste zu verbessern, neue Dienste zu entwickeln und um uns dabei zu unterstützen, unsere Dienste für Sie relevanter und sinnvoller zu gestalten.
Mehr erfahren
.
Kommunikation.
Wir verwenden Ihre Kontaktinformationen zur Erbringung unserer Dienstleistungen, was auch den Versand von Codes per SMS zu Ihrer Authentifizierung beinhalten kann.
Mehr erfahren
. Wenn Sie Endnutzer/in, Vertreter/in oder Besucher/in sind, werden wir mit Ihnen mit Hilfe der Kontaktdaten, die uns über Sie vorliegen, kommunizieren, um Ihnen Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen und die unserer Partner zukommen zu lassen, Sie zur Teilnahme an unseren Veranstaltungen, Umfragen oder Nutzer-Research einzuladen oder anderweitig mit Ihnen in Übereinstimmung mit geltendem Recht für Marketingzwecke zu kommunizieren, einschließlich jeglicher Zustimmungs- oder Opt-out-Erfordernisse. Wenn Sie uns beispielsweise Ihre Kontaktdaten zur Verfügung stellen oder wenn wir Ihre geschäftlichen Kontaktdaten durch Ihre Teilnahme an Messen oder anderen Veranstaltungen erheben, können wir diese Daten verwenden, um mit Ihnen bezüglich einer Veranstaltung in Kontakt zu treten, Ihnen die angeforderten Informationen über unsere Dienstleistungen zur Verfügung zu stellen und Sie in unsere Marketing-Informationskampagnen einzubeziehen. Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, können wir unsere Gespräche mit Ihnen aufzeichnen, um unsere Dienste zu erbringen, unseren rechtlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen, Forschung und Qualitätssicherung zu betreiben und darüber hinaus zu Schulungszwecken.
Social Media und Werbeaktionen
. Wenn Sie personenbezogene Daten übermitteln, um ein Angebot, ein Programm oder eine Werbeaktion in Anspruch zu nehmen, verwenden wir die von Ihnen bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten zur Verwaltung des Angebots, des Programms oder der Werbeaktion. Wir verwenden die von Ihnen bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten zusammen mit den personenbezogenen Daten, die Sie auf Social-Media-Plattformen zur Verfügung stellen, auch für Marketingzwecke, es sei denn, wir sind dazu nicht berechtigt.
Betrugsprävention und Sicherheit.
Wir erheben und verwenden personenbezogene Daten, um betrügerische oder schädigende Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten zu erkennen und zu steuern, unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen zur Betrugserkennung bereitzustellen und um unsere Dienste und Transaktionen vor unbefugtem Zugriff, unbefugter Nutzung, Manipulation oder Veruntreuung von personenbezogenen Daten, Informationen und Geldern zu schützen. Wir erheben Daten von Dritten (beispielsweise Kreditauskunfteien) und über die von uns angebotenen Dienste im Rahmen der Betrugsprävention, Betrugserkennung, Sicherheitsüberwachung und Compliance-Maßnahmen für Stripe und seine Geschäftskunden. In bestimmten Fällen können wir auch Daten über Sie direkt von Ihnen oder von unseren Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartnern und anderen Dritten zu denselben Zwecken erheben. Darüber hinaus können wir zum Schutz unserer Dienste Informationen wie IP-Adressen und andere identifizierende Daten über potenzielle Sicherheitsbedrohungen von Drittparteien beziehen.
Mehr erfahren
. Derartige Informationen helfen uns bei Identitätsverifizierungen und Bonitätsprüfungen, soweit dies gesetzlich zulässig ist, sowie bei der Betrugsprävention. Darüber hinaus können wir Technologien einsetzen, um das potenzielle Betrugsrisiko bei Personen zu bewerten, die unsere Geschäftsdienstleistungen in Anspruch nehmen wollen, oder das Risiko, das sich aus versuchten Transaktionen von Endkundinnen/Endkunden oder Endnutzerinnen/Endnutzern mit unseren Geschäftskunden oder Finanzpartnern ergibt.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Verpflichtungen.
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten, um unsere vertraglichen und gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen zur Geldwäschebekämpfung, zur KYC-Gesetzgebung (Know-Your-Customer), zur Terrorismusbekämpfung, zum Schutz gefährdeter Kunden, zur Exportkontrolle und zum Verbot von Geschäften mit eingeschränkten Personen oder in bestimmten Geschäftsbereichen sowie andere gesetzliche Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen. Zum Beispiel können wir Transaktionsmuster und andere Online-Signale analysieren und diese Erkenntnisse nutzen, um Betrug, Geldwäsche und andere unlautere Aktivitäten zu erkennen, die Stripe, unsere Finanzpartner, Endnutzer/innen, unsere Geschäftskunden und andere betreffen könnten.
Mehr erfahren
. Sicherheit und Rechtskonformität unserer Dienste haben für uns oberste Priorität. Die Erhebung und Verwendung personenbezogener Daten ist für diese Zwecke unerlässlich.
Minderjährige.
Unsere Dienste richten sich nicht an Kinder unter 13 Jahren. Deshalb bitten wir diese, keine personenbezogenen Daten an uns zu übermitteln, um Dienste direkt von Stripe zu beziehen. In bestimmten Ländern können wir nach geltendem Recht auch höhere Altersgrenzen festlegen.
c. Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten.
Zusätzlich zu der oben beschriebenen Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten geben wir diese auf die im Folgenden aufgeführten Arten weiter:
Mit Stripe verbundene Unternehmen.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an andere mit Stripe verbundene Unternehmen für die in dieser Erklärung genannten Zwecke weiter.
Dienstleister oder Auftragsverarbeiter.
Um unsere Dienste bereitstellen, bekannt machen, vermarkten und bewerben zu können, arbeiten wir mit Dienstleistern zusammen. Diese Dienstleister erbringen wichtige Leistungen – von der Bereitstellung der Cloud-Infrastruktur über die analytische Auswertung von Geschwindigkeit, Genauigkeit und/oder Sicherheit unserer Dienste und die Identitätsverifizierung bis hin zu Kundenservice und Audit-Funktionen. Diesen Dienstleistern ist die Verwendung oder Offenlegung der von uns bereitgestellten personenbezogenen Daten gestattet, um Dienstleistungen in unserem Namen zu erbringen und die einschlägigen rechtlichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen. Zudem werden diese Dienstleister von uns vertraglich verpflichtet, die Sicherheit und Vertraulichkeit der personenbezogenen Daten, die sie in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten, zu gewährleisten. Die Mehrheit der Dienstleister, deren Dienste wir in Anspruch nehmen, befindet sich in der EU, den Vereinigten Staaten und in Indien.
Mehr erfahren
.
Finanzpartner.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an bestimmte Finanzpartner weiter, um Geschäftskunden, die solche Dienste in Anspruch nehmen möchten, Dienste anbieten zu können, und um bestimmte Dienste in Verbindung mit diesen Finanzpartnern anzubieten. So geben wir beispielsweise bestimmte personenbezogene Daten über Vertreter/innen, wie Kreditrückzahlungsdaten und Kontaktinformationen, an institutionelle Anleger weiter, die Kredite kaufen oder anbieten, die durch die von uns gewährten Kapitaldarlehen an die Geschäftskunden, mit denen sie assoziiert sind, gesichert sind.
Andere mit Einwilligung.
In manchen Fällen bieten wir eine Dienstleistung nicht an, sondern verweisen Sie stattdessen an andere (wie beispielsweise professionelle Dienstleistungsunternehmen, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um den Atlas-Dienst zu realisieren). In diesen Fällen werden wir die Identität der Drittpartei und die Informationen, die an diese weitergegeben werden sollen, offenlegen und Sie um Ihre Einwilligung bitten, diese Informationen weiterzugeben.
Unternehmenstransaktionen.
Im Rahmen einer vollständigen oder teilweisen tatsächlichen oder beabsichtigten Umstrukturierung unseres Unternehmens durch Sanierung, Fusion, Verkauf, Joint-Venture, Abtretung, Übertragung oder Führungswechsel oder im Fall einer vollständigen oder teilweisen Veräußerung unseres Unternehmens, unserer Vermögenswerte oder Aktienbestände können wir personenbezogene Daten an Dritte weitergeben. Wird Stripe ganz oder teilweise von einem anderen Unternehmen erworben, ist dieses Unternehmen dazu berechtigt, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin zu verwenden. Dies darf jedoch nur in Einklang mit dieser Datenschutzerklärung geschehen.
Einhaltung gesetzlicher Vorschriften und Schadensabwehr.
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten weiter, wenn wir der Meinung sind, dass dies notwendig ist, um geltendes Recht einzuhalten, um die von den Finanzpartnern im Zusammenhang mit der Nutzung ihrer Zahlungsmethode auferlegten Regeln einzuhalten, um unsere vertraglichen Rechte durchzusetzen, um die Dienste, Rechte, den Datenschutz, die Sicherheit und das Eigentum von Stripe, Ihnen und anderen zu sichern und zu schützen, einschließlich gegen unlautere oder betrügerische Aktivitäten, und um auf rechtmäßige Anfragen von Gerichten, Strafverfolgungsbehörden, Aufsichtsbehörden und anderen öffentlichen und staatlichen Stellen zu reagieren, zu denen auch Stellen außerhalb Ihres Wohnsitzlandes gehören können.
3. Rechtsgrundlagen für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten
Für die Zwecke der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung und anderer geltender Datenschutzgesetze stützen wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf eine Reihe von Rechtsgrundlagen.
Mehr erfahren
. In bestimmten Rechtsordnungen können zusätzliche Rechtsgrundlagen gelten, die im Abschnitt
Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
weiter unten erläutert werden.
a. Vertragliche und vorvertragliche Geschäftsbeziehungen.
Wir verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten, um Geschäftsbeziehungen mit potenziellen Geschäftskunden und Endnutzerinnen/Endnutzern einzugehen und unsere jeweiligen vertraglichen Verpflichtungen mit ihnen zu erfüllen. Zu diesen Verarbeitungstätigkeiten zählen:
Erstellung und Verwaltung von Stripe-Konten und Anmeldedaten für Stripe-Konten, einschließlich der Prüfung von Anfragen zur erstmaligen oder erweiterten Nutzung der von uns erbrachten Dienste;
Erstellung und Verwaltung von Stripe Checkout-Konten;
Aktivitäten im Rahmen von Buchhaltung, Auditing und Abrechnung; sowie
Zahlungsabwicklung und damit zusammenhängende Aktivitäten wie Betrugserkennung, Verlustprävention, Transaktionsoptimierung, Mitteilungen über solche Zahlungen und damit zusammenhängende Kundendienstaktivitäten.
b. Rechtskonformität.
Wir verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten, um die Identität von natürlichen und juristischen Personen zu verifizieren, um Verpflichtungen im Zusammenhang mit Betrugsüberwachung, -prävention und -erkennung, Gesetzen im Zusammenhang mit der Identifizierung und Meldung illegaler und rechtswidriger Aktivitäten, beispielsweise im Rahmen der Vorschriften zur Geldwäschebekämpfung (AML – Anti-Money Laundering) und zur Kundenidentifizierung (KYC – Know-Your-Customer), sowie Finanzberichterstattungspflichten nachzukommen. So kann es beispielsweise erforderlich sein, die Identität eines Geschäftskunden zu erfassen und zu überprüfen, um Vorschriften zur Verhinderung von Geldwäsche, Betrug und Finanzkriminalität einzuhalten. Diese Rechtsvorschriften können uns dazu verpflichten, Rechenschaft gegenüber Dritten abzulegen und uns Prüfungen durch Dritte zu unterziehen.
c. Berechtigte Interessen.
Soweit nach geltendem Recht zulässig, stützen wir uns bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf unsere berechtigten Geschäftsinteressen. Die folgende Liste enthält Beispiele für Geschäftszwecke, für die wir ein berechtigtes Interesse an der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten haben:
Erkennung, Verfolgung und Verhinderung von betrügerischen Handlungen und nicht autorisierten Zahlungsvorgängen;
Minimierung finanzieller Verluste, Ansprüche, Verbindlichkeiten oder anderer Schäden für Endkundinnen/Endkunden, Endnutzer/innen, Geschäftskunden, Finanzpartner und Stripe;
Feststellung der Eignung für neue Stripe-Dienstleistungen sowie deren Angebot (
Mehr erfahren
);
Beantwortung von Anfragen, Zustellung von Servicemeldungen und Erbringung von Kundensupport;
Vermarktung, Analyse, Änderung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste, Systeme und Tools sowie die Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Dienste, einschließlich der Verbesserung der Zuverlässigkeit der Dienste;
Verwaltung, Betrieb und Verbesserung der Leistung unserer Websites und Dienste mithilfe von Informationen über ihre Effektivität und die Optimierung unserer digitalen Ressourcen;
Analyse und Werbung für unsere Dienste und damit verbundene Verbesserungen;
Gesamtanalysen und Entwicklung von Business-Intelligence-Lösungen, die uns dabei unterstützen, unsere Geschäftstätigkeiten auszuführen und zu schützen, fundierte Entscheidungen zu treffen und über die Leistung unseres Unternehmens zu berichten;
Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an die Drittpartei-Dienstleister, die in unserem Namen Dienste anbieten, und an Geschäftspartner, die uns bei der Ausübung und Optimierung unserer Geschäftstätigkeit unterstützen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Gewährleistung der Netzwerk- und Informationssicherheit bei Stripe und den von Stripe erbrachten Diensten; sowie
Weitergabe personenbezogener Daten an unsere verbundenen Unternehmen.
d. Einwilligung.
Bei der Erhebung und Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten in Bezug auf unsere Interaktionen mit Ihnen und die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste wie Link, Financial Connections, Atlas und Identity können wir uns auf Ihre Einwilligung bzw. ausdrückliche Einwilligung stützen. Wenn wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auf Grundlage Ihrer Einwilligung verarbeiten, haben Sie das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen, ohne dass dies Auswirkungen auf die Rechtmäßigkeit der Verarbeitung hat, die auf der Grundlage der Einwilligung vor deren Widerruf erfolgt ist.
e. Erhebliches öffentliches Interesse.
Wir können besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten im Sinne der DSGVO verarbeiten, wenn eine solche Verarbeitung aus Gründen eines wichtigen öffentlichen Interesses und im Einklang mit geltendem Recht erforderlich ist, beispielsweise wenn wir Überprüfungen politisch exponierter Personen vornehmen. Ferner können wir auch personenbezogene Daten im Zusammenhang mit strafrechtlichen Verurteilungen und Straftaten verarbeiten, wenn eine solche Verarbeitung durch geltendes Recht autorisiert ist, beispielsweise wenn wir ein Sanktionsscreening durchführen, um den AML- und KYC-Verpflichtungen nachzukommen.
4. Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten
Je nach Standort und geltendem Recht haben Sie im Hinblick auf unsere Erhebung, Verwendung und Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten bestimmte Wahlmöglichkeiten:
a. Abmeldung von der elektronischen Kommunikation mit uns.
Wenn Sie keine marketingbezogenen E-Mails mehr von uns erhalten möchten, können Sie sich abmelden, indem Sie auf den in diesen E-Mails enthaltenen Abmeldelink klicken oder wie
hier
beschrieben. Wir werden versuchen, Ihre Anfrage schnellstmöglich zu bearbeiten. Bitte beachten Sie, dass wir uns das Recht vorbehalten, mit Ihnen über die von Ihnen in Anspruch genommenen Dienste zu kommunizieren (beispielsweise über Support und wichtige rechtliche Hinweise), auch wenn Sie sich gegen den Erhalt marketingbezogener E-Mails von uns entscheiden. Trotzdem können Geschäftskunden Ihnen Nachrichten schicken oder uns anweisen, Ihnen in ihrem Namen Nachrichten zu schicken.
b. Ihre Datenschutzrechte.
Je nach Ihrem Standort und den dort geltenden Gesetzen haben Sie unter Umständen folgende Rechte in Bezug auf die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie gespeichert haben:
Das Recht auf Auskunft darüber, ob Stripe personenbezogene Daten verarbeitet, die mit Ihnen assoziiert sind, und wenn ja, Zugang zu diesen personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, Stripe zur Berichtigung und Aktualisierung von falschen, unvollständigen oder veralteten personenbezogenen Daten aufzufordern;
Das Recht darauf, unter bestimmten, gesetzlich festgelegten Umständen von Stripe die Löschung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu verlangen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, Stripe unter bestimmten Umständen (beispielsweise während der Bearbeitung eines anderen von Ihnen eingebrachten Antrags wie etwa eines Antrags auf Berichtigung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten) zur Einschränkung der Nutzung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten aufzufordern;
Das Recht darauf, dass wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die wir vorhalten, an ein anderes Unternehmen exportieren, sofern dies technisch möglich ist;
Das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung zu widerrufen, wenn die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten auf der Grundlage Ihrer früheren Einwilligung erfolgt;
Das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu widersprechen, wenn wir Ihre Daten auf der Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen verarbeiten; sofern keine zwingenden berechtigten Gründe vorliegen oder die Verarbeitung aus rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist, werden wir die Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten nach Erhalt Ihres Widerspruchs einstellen (
Mehr erfahren
);
Das Recht darauf, wegen der Ausübung dieser Rechte nicht diskriminiert zu werden; und
Das Recht darauf, gegen jede diese Rechte betreffende Entscheidung von Stripe Widerspruch einzulegen, indem Sie sich an die Datenschutzbeauftragten von Stripe („DSB“) unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden.
Je nach geltendem Recht haben Sie möglicherweise weitergehende Rechte in Bezug auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten. Beispiele finden Sie im Abschnitt „Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen“ unter „Vereinigte Staaten“ weiter unten.
c. Verfahren zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte
Besuchen Sie zur Ausübung Ihrer Datenschutzrechte unser
Datenschutzcenter
oder kontaktieren Sie uns wie unten beschrieben.
5. Sicherheit und Aufbewahrung
Wir treffen geeignete Vorkehrungen, um ein Schutzniveau zu gewährleisten, das dem Risiko bei der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten angemessen ist. Dazu setzen wir organisatorische, technische und administrative Maßnahmen ein, um die personenbezogenen Daten, die unter diese Erklärung fallen, vor unbefugtem Zugriff, Zerstörung, Verlust, Veränderung oder Missbrauch zu schützen.
Mehr erfahren
. Leider ist kein Datenübertragungs- oder Speichersystem absolut sicher.
Wir empfehlen, uns beim Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten zu unterstützen. Wenn Sie ein Stripe-Konto besitzen, können Sie dies durch die Verwendung eines sicheren Passworts, den Schutz Ihres Passworts vor unbefugter Nutzung und die Vermeidung der mehrfachen Verwendung der Anmeldedaten für Ihr Stripe-Konto auch bei anderen Diensten oder Konten tun. Wenn Sie den Verdacht haben, dass Ihre Interaktionen mit uns nicht mehr sicher sind (z. B. wenn Sie glauben, dass die Sicherheit Ihres Stripe-Kontos nicht mehr gewährleistet ist),
kontaktieren Sie uns
bitte umgehend.
Wir halten Ihre personenbezogenen Daten so lange vor, wie wir Ihnen oder unseren Geschäftskunden die Dienste zur Verfügung stellen, oder für einen Zeitraum, bei dem wir vernünftigerweise davon ausgehen, dass wir die Dienste weiterhin anbieten. Auch nachdem wir die Bereitstellung von Diensten für Sie oder einen Geschäftskunden, mit dem Sie in Geschäftsbeziehung stehen, eingestellt haben, und auch nachdem Sie Ihr Stripe-Konto geschlossen oder eine Transaktion mit einem Geschäftskunden abgeschlossen haben, können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weiterhin aufbewahren, um:
unseren rechtlichen und regulatorischen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen,
Aktivitäten zur Betrugsüberwachung, -aufdeckung und Verlustprävention zu ermöglichen, und
zur Erfüllung unserer steuerlichen, buchhalterischen und finanzwirtschaftlichen Berichtspflichten, einschließlich der Fälle, in denen eine solche Aufbewahrung durch unsere vertraglichen Vereinbarungen mit unseren Finanzpartnern vorgeschrieben ist (und in denen die Aufbewahrung von Daten durch die von Ihnen verwendeten Zahlungsmethoden vorgeschrieben ist).
In den Fällen, in denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten aufbewahren, tun wir dies in Übereinstimmung mit allen Verjährungsfristen und Aufzeichnungspflichten, die uns durch geltendes Recht auferlegt werden.
Mehr erfahren
.
6. Internationale Datenübermittlung
Für uns als globales Unternehmen ist es manchmal notwendig, Ihre personenbezogenen Daten in andere Länder als Ihr eigenes zu übermitteln, einschließlich der Vereinigten Staaten. In diesen Ländern gelten unter Umständen andere Datenschutzbestimmungen als in Ihrem Land. Bei der grenzüberschreitenden Übermittlung von Daten ergreifen wir Maßnahmen zur Einhaltung geltender Datenschutzrechte in Bezug auf eine solche Übermittlung. In bestimmten Situationen kann es erforderlich sein, dass wir personenbezogene Daten auf rechtmäßige Anfrage von Behörden (beispielsweise Strafverfolgungs- oder Sicherheitsbehörden) hin offenlegen müssen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Wenn Sie im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum („EWR“), im Vereinigten Königreich („UK“) oder in der Schweiz ansässig sind, finden Sie weitere Informationen in unserem
Datenschutzcenter
. Wenn das geltende Recht einen Datenübertragungsmechanismus verlangt, verwenden wir einen oder mehrere der folgenden Mechanismen:
Übermittlungen in bestimmte Länder oder an Empfänger, die nach geltendem Recht anerkanntermaßen ein angemessenes Schutzniveau für personenbezogene Daten bieten.
Die von der Europäischen Kommission genehmigten EU-Standardvertragsklauseln und das vom UK Information Commissioner's Office herausgegebene Zusatzprotokoll zum internationalen Datentransfer. Sie können ein Exemplar der einschlägigen Standardvertragsklauseln erhalten. Weitere Informationen.
Mehr erfahren
.
Weitere rechtmäßige Methoden, die uns nach geltendem Recht zur Verfügung stehen.
Stripe, Inc. hält sich an das EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework („EU-U.S. DPF“), die UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF und das Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, wie vom U.S. Department of Commerce festgelegt und soweit anwendbar.
Mehr erfahren
.
7. Aktualisierungen und Benachrichtigungen
Wir können diese Richtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit ändern, um neue Dienste, Änderungen unserer Datenschutzpraktiken oder der relevanten Gesetze widerzuspiegeln. Die Legende „Letzte Aktualisierung“ oben in dieser Richtlinie zeigt an, wann diese Richtlinie zuletzt überarbeitet wurde. Alle Änderungen treten in Kraft, sobald wir die überarbeitete Richtlinie zu den Diensten veröffentlicht oder auf andere Weise über die Aktualisierung informiert haben, wie dies gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist, je nachdem, welcher der Zeitpunkt später ist.
Wir können Ihnen Offenlegungen und Warnungen bezüglich der Richtlinie oder erhobener personenbezogener Daten durch Veröffentlichung auf unserer Website und, wenn Sie ein Endnutzer oder Vertreter sind, durch Kontaktaufnahme mit Ihnen über Ihr Stripe Dashboard, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und/oder die in Ihrem Stripe-Konto angegebene physische Adresse zukommen lassen.
8. Zuständigkeitsabhängige Bestimmungen
Australien.
Sollten Sie in Australien ansässig sein und mit unserer Bearbeitung von Beschwerden, die Sie im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung vorbringen, unzufrieden sein, können Sie sich an das Office of the Australian Information Commissioner wenden.
Brasilien.
Zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. In Brasilien ansässige Personen, für die das Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais („LGPD“) gilt, haben die in Artikel 18 des LGPD festgelegten Rechte.
Kanada.
In dieser Erklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (PIPEDA), den Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63 in British Columbia, den Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5 in Alberta und den Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Data in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (Quebec Private Sector Act) in Quebec. „Personenbezogene Daten“ umfasst „persönliche Informationen“ gemäß der Definition in diesen Gesetzen.
Quebec.
Der Chief Privacy Officer von Stripe ist für personenbezogene Daten im Sinne des Quebec Private Sector Act verantwortlich. Sie können per E-Mail unter privacy@stripe.com mit ihm Kontakt aufnehmen. Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten von in Quebec ansässigen Personen erheben, können wir diese Daten an Datenzentren in den Vereinigten Staaten übertragen. Dienstleister, die wir zur Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten einsetzen, können auch außerhalb von Quebec ansässig sein.
Sie haben das Recht, Zugang zu den personenbezogenen Daten, die wir über Sie speichern, sowie ihre Berichtigung zu verlangen oder Ihre Einwilligung in die Verarbeitung dieser personenbezogenen Daten zu widerrufen. Sie können diese Rechte ausüben, indem Sie sich unter privacy@stripe.com an den Chief Privacy Officer von Stripe wenden. Wenn Sie ein Endkunde sind, sollten Sie sich zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte an den Geschäftskunden wenden, mit dem Sie Geschäfte getätigt haben.
EWR und Vereinigtes Königreich.
Zur Wahrnehmung Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. Wenn Sie im EWR ansässig sind oder wenn Stripe Payments Europe Limited als Ihr Datenverantwortlicher identifiziert wird und Sie glauben, dass unsere Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung (DSGVO) widerspricht, können Sie Ihre Fragen oder Beschwerden an die irische Datenschutzkommission richten. Wenn Sie im Vereinigten Königreich ansässig sind, richten Sie Ihre Fragen oder Bedenken an das UK Information Commissioner's Office. Wenn personenbezogene Daten für regulierte Finanzaktivitäten in Europa verwendet werden, gelten Stripe Payments Europe Limited und die lokalen regulierten Unternehmen von Stripe als gemeinsam Verantwortliche.
Mehr erfahren
. Außerdem haben Sie zusätzliche Rechte gemäß EU-U.S. DPF und UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Mehr erfahren
.
Indien.
In dieser Erklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Digital Personal Data Protection Act (DPDPA), sobald dieser in Kraft getreten ist. Darüber hinaus schließt der Begriff „Datenverantwortlicher“ auch „Datentreuhänder“ und der Begriff „betroffene Person“ auch „Auftraggeber“ ein, jeweils gemäß der Definition im DPDPA.
In einigen Fällen können wir uns auf die „berechtigte Verwendung“ als Rechtsgrundlage berufen, sofern dies nach DPDPA zulässig ist. Dies ist zum Beispiel der Fall, wenn Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen. „Consent Manager“ im Sinne des DPDPA können einen Antrag auf Widerruf oder Erteilung der Einwilligung stellen, indem sie die im folgenden Abschnitt „Kontakt“ beschriebenen Methoden verwenden, oder wie im folgenden Absatz beschrieben, oder über andere Mittel, die Stripe in Zukunft zur Verfügung stellt. Bevor wir eine solche Anfrage bearbeiten, können wir einen Autorisierungs- und Identitätsnachweis verlangen.
In bestimmten Fällen können Sie aufgefordert werden, der Erhebung und Verarbeitung Ihrer Aadhaar-Nummer durch Stripe India Private Limited und/oder seine(n) Verifizierungspartner zuzustimmen. Der Zweck dieser Erhebung besteht darin, das nach geltendem Recht vorgeschriebene Identifikationsverifizierungsverfahren zu erleichtern. Die Angabe Ihrer Aadhaar-Daten ist freiwillig. Sie können auch andere Identifikationsdokumente bereitstellen, sofern diese von uns akzeptiert werden. Ihnen wird kein Dienst verweigert werden, wenn Sie keine Aadhaar-Angaben machen.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden bezüglich der Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten in Indien haben oder wenn Sie diese Erklärung erhalten oder mit uns über den Datenschutz in einer der indischen Amtssprachen kommunizieren möchten,
wenden Sie sich bitte an unseren Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Mehr erfahren
. Alternativ können Sie sich an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten unter
dpo@stripe.com
wenden. Falls wir nicht in der Lage sind, auf Ihre Beschwerde oder Ihr Anliegen einzugehen, haben Sie das Recht, die Angelegenheit zum Data Protection Board of India weiterzuleiten.
Indonesien.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ das Gesetz Nr. 11 aus dem Jahr 2008, geändert durch das Gesetz Nr. 19 aus dem Jahr 2016 über elektronische Informationen und Transaktionen, die Regierungsverordnung Nr. 71 aus dem Jahr 2019 über die Einführung elektronischer Systeme und Transaktionen sowie die Verordnung des Ministers für Kommunikation und Informatik Nr. 20 aus dem Jahr 2016 über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten in elektronischen Systemen und ab September 2024 das Gesetz Nr. 27 aus dem Jahr 2022 über den Schutz personenbezogener Daten (PDP-Gesetz). Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Japan.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Act on the Protection of Personal Information (APPI). Wenn wir personenbezogene Daten betroffener Personen in Japan in Länder übermitteln, die von der Kommission für den Schutz personenbezogener Daten nicht als „angemessen“ anerkannt sind, schließen wir schriftliche Verträge mit Drittparteien ab, die sich außerhalb Japans befinden. Diese schriftlichen Verträge sehen Rechte und Pflichten vor, die denen des japanischen Act on the Protection of Personal Information entsprechen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir sicherstellen, dass Drittparteien Ihre Daten schützen und wo sich Ihre Daten befinden, erhalten Sie oben oder von uns wie unten beschrieben. Eine Beschreibung ausländischer Systeme und Rahmenwerke, welche die Implementierung gleichwertiger Maßnahmen durch die Drittpartei beeinflussen können, finden Sie
hier
.
In einigen Fällen und soweit nach dem APPI zulässig, können wir uns auf das „öffentliche Interesse“ als Rechtsgrundlage berufen, wie beispielsweise bei der Aufdeckung von Betrug und der Verhinderung von Verlusten.
Malaysia.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Singapur.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ den Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (PDPA) (Nr. 26 von 2012) in seiner jeweils gültigen Fassung. In einigen Fällen und soweit nach dem PDPA zulässig, können wir uns auf eine „mutmaßliche Einwilligung“ als Rechtsgrundlage stützen. Dies ist zum Beispiel der Fall, wenn Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten freiwillig zur Verfügung stellen.
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Schweiz.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „geltendes Recht“ das Bundesgesetz über den Datenschutz (DSG) in seiner revidierten Fassung. Zur Ausübung Ihrer Rechte nach dem DSG wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten. Möglicherweise haben Sie auch zusätzliche Rechte im Rahmen des Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, sobald dieses in Kraft tritt.
Mehr erfahren
.
Thailand.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung umfasst der Begriff „anwendbares Recht“ den Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (PDPA). Sind wir auf bestimmte Rechtsgrundlagen angewiesen (beispielsweise „gesetzliche Verpflichtung“ oder „vertragliche Notwendigkeit“) und stellen Sie uns Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht zur Verfügung, können wir Ihnen möglicherweise unsere Dienste nicht rechtmäßig anbieten. Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben, wenden Sie sich bitte unter
dpo@stripe.com
an unsere Datenschutzbeauftragten.
Vereinigte Staaten.
Wenn Sie ein/e in den Vereinigten Staaten („USA“) ansässige/r Verbraucher/in sind, verarbeiten wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gemäß den US-amerikanischen Datenschutzgesetzen, einschließlich des California Consumer Privacy Act („CCPA“), Colorado Privacy Act, Connecticut Act Concerning Personal Data Privacy and Online Monitoring, Florida Digital Bill of Rights, Montana Consumer Data Privacy Act, Oregon Consumer Privacy Act, Texas Data Privacy and Security Act, Utah Consumer Privacy Act sowie des Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act. Weitere Einzelheiten finden Sie
hier
. Die Verwendung von Cookies durch Stripe, einschließlich Werbe-Cookies, ist in unserer
Cookie Policy
beschrieben.
Ihre Rechte und Wahlmöglichkeiten.
Als Verbraucher in den Vereinigten Staaten haben Sie – vorbehaltlich bestimmter Einschränkungen durch die Datenschutzgesetze der Vereinigten Staaten – gegebenenfalls Wahlmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die Verwendung und Offenlegung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten durch uns (
Weitere Informationen
über die Metriken für die Rechte betroffener Personen). Zusätzlich zu den
oben genannten Rechten
:
Ausübung des Auskunftsrechts: Sie haben das Recht, zusätzliche Informationen über die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten anzufordern, die erhoben, verkauft, offengelegt oder weitergegeben wurden; über die Zwecke, für die diese personenbezogenen Daten erhoben, verkauft oder weitergegeben wurden; über die Kategorien der Quellen personenbezogener Daten; und über die Kategorien von Drittparteien, denen gegenüber wir diese personenbezogenen Daten offengelegt oder an sie weitergegeben haben.
Ausübung des Rechts, den Verkauf oder die Weitergabe abzulehnen: Wir geben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht gegen Zahlung an Drittparteien weiter. Allerdings können wir Ihre Daten, wie oben angemerkt, an Drittparteien weitergeben, beispielsweise an Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Produkte und Dienste unterstützen. Da diese Drittparteien die von Stripe gelieferten Daten für ihre eigenen Zwecke verwenden können, könnte die Lieferung von Daten durch Stripe an diese Parteien als „Verkauf“ oder „Weitergabe“ von Daten im Sinne des CCPA und anderer geltender US-Datenschutzgesetze betrachtet werden. Sie können sich
hier
gegen gezielte Werbung und den damit verbundenen „Verkauf“ bzw. die „Weitergabe“ von Daten entscheiden.
Ausübung des Rechts, die Nutzung oder Weitergabe sensibler personenbezogener Daten einzuschränken: Wir verkaufen keine sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten im Sinne der US-Datenschutzgesetze und haben dies auch in den letzten 12 Monaten nicht getan. Weitere Informationen zu unserer Erhebung und Verwendung sensibler personenbezogener Daten in den letzten 12 Monaten finden Sie
hier
.
Um einen Antrag zur Ausübung eines der oben beschriebenen Rechte zu stellen, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte anhand der im Abschnitt „Kontakt“ unten beschriebenen Methoden. Bitte beachten Sie, dass die Rechte nach einigen Gesetzen der US-Bundesstaaten nicht für personenbezogene Daten gelten, die wir erheben, verarbeiten und weitergeben, wenn Sie als Verbraucher/in handeln, um Finanzprodukte oder -dienstleistungen von Stripe für private Zwecke zu beziehen. Der bundesweite Gramm-Leach Bliley Act kann regeln, wie Stripe diese Daten stattdessen weitergibt und schützt. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserer
Datenschutzerklärung für US-Verbraucher/innen
.
Wir werden Ihre Anfrage verifizieren, indem wir Sie bitten, sie von der in Ihrem Konto hinterlegten E-Mail-Adresse aus zu senden, oder indem wir Informationen von Ihnen verlangen, die zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität erforderlich sind, einschließlich Name, Adresse, Transaktionshistorie, Lichtbildausweis und sonstige mit Ihrem Konto verbundene Informationen.
Sie können schriftlich oder durch eine Vollmacht eine bevollmächtigte Vertreterin/einen bevollmächtigten Vertreter benennen, die/der in Ihrem Namen Anfragen einreicht, um Ihre Rechte gemäß dem CCPA auszuüben. Ihre Vertreterin/Ihr Vertreter kann eine Anfrage in Ihrem Namen einreichen, indem er/sie sich mit uns über die im Abschnitt „Kontaktaufnahme“ beschriebenen Wege in Verbindung setzt. Wir können Sie trotzdem auffordern, Ihre Identität direkt zu verifizieren und zu bestätigen, dass Sie der bevollmächtigten Vertreterin/dem bevollmächtigten Vertreter die Berechtigung erteilt haben, Ihre Anfrage zu übermitteln.
Global-Privacy-Control-Signale.
Stripe beachtet die Signale der Global Privacy Control (GPC) zur Opt-out-Einstellung.
Mehr erfahren
9. Kontakt
Wenn Sie Fragen oder Beschwerden zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben,
kontaktieren Sie uns
bitte. Wenn Sie eine Endkundin oder ein Endkunde sind (d. h. eine Einzelperson, die mit einem Geschäftskunden geschäftlich zu tun hat oder Transaktionen tätigt), lesen Sie bitte die Datenschutzerklärungen oder -hinweise des Geschäftskunden, um sich über seine Datenschutzpraktiken, Wahlmöglichkeiten und Kontrollen zu informieren, oder wenden Sie sich direkt an den Geschäftskunden.
10. Datenschutzhinweise für US-Verbraucher/innen
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise für Verbraucher/innen gelten für Sie, wenn Sie eine natürliche Person mit Wohnsitz in den Vereinigten Staaten sind und Finanzdienstleistungen von Stripe in erster Linie für Ihre eigenen privaten Zwecke in Familie und Haushalt nutzen.
Letzte Aktualisierung: 16. Januar 2024
FAKTEN
WAS MACHT STRIPE MIT IHREN PERSONENBEZOGENEN DATEN?
Warum?
Finanzunternehmen entscheiden, wie sie Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben.  Bundesgesetze berechtigen Verbraucher/innen, einige, aber nicht alle Formen der Weitergabe einzuschränken.  Darüber hinaus sind wir durch Bundesgesetze dazu verpflichtet, Sie darüber zu informieren, wie wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erheben, weitergeben und schützen.  Bitte lesen Sie diese Hinweise sorgfältig durch, um sich über unsere Tätigkeit zu informieren.
Was?
Die Arten personenbezogener Daten, die wir erheben und weitergeben, hängen vom Produkt oder Dienst ab, den Sie bei uns in Anspruch nehmen. Diese Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Sozialversicherungsnummer
Kontaktangaben
Kontostand und Transaktionsverlauf
Details und Verlauf von Zahlungen, Transaktionen und Käufen
Wenn Sie
nicht länger
unsere Kundin/unser Kunde sind, geben wir Ihre Daten weiterhin wie in diesen Hinweisen beschrieben weiter.
Wie?
Alle Finanzunternehmen müssen zur Abwicklung ihrer Geschäfte personenbezogene Daten ihrer Kunden weitergeben. Im folgenden Abschnitt führen wir die Gründe auf, aus denen Finanzunternehmen personenbezogene Daten ihrer Kunden weitergeben können, die Gründe, aus denen Stripe sich für eine Weitergabe entscheidet, und ob Sie diese Weitergabe einschränken können.
Gründe, aus denen wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten weitergeben können
Weitergabe durch Stripe?
Können Sie die Weitergabe einschränken?
Für unsere laufenden Geschäftszwecke, z. B. um Ihre Transaktionen zu bearbeiten, Ihre Konten zu führen, auf gerichtliche Anordnungen und Ermittlungen zu reagieren oder um an Kreditauskunfteien zu berichten
Ja
Nein
Für unsere Marketingzwecke: um Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen anzubieten
Ja
Nein
Für die gemeinsame Vermarktung mit weiteren Unternehmen der Finanzbranche
Ja
Nein
Für die laufenden Geschäftszwecke unserer verbundenen Unternehmen: Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen und Erfahrungen
Ja
Nein
Für die laufenden Geschäftszwecke unserer verbundenen Unternehmen: Informationen über Ihre Bonität
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Für unsere verbundenen Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Für nicht verbundene Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten, wenn Sie Link-Nutzer/in sind
Ja
Ja
Für nicht verbundene Unternehmen, um an Sie zu vermarkten, wenn Sie Nutzer/in von Financial Connections sind
Nein
Keine Weitergabe durch uns
Zur Einschränkung unserer Weitergabe
Besuchen Sie uns online unter
https://support.link.com
Bitte beachten Sie:
Wenn Sie eine Neukundin/ein Neukunde sind, dürfen wir mit der Weitergabe Ihrer Daten 30 Tage nach dem Versand dieser Hinweise beginnen. Wenn Sie nicht länger unsere Kundin/unser Kunde sind, setzen wir die Weitergabe Ihrer Daten wie in diesen Hinweisen beschrieben fort.
Sie können sich jedoch jederzeit an uns wenden, um unsere Weitergabe einzuschränken.
Fragen?
Sie können uns jederzeit unter
privacy@stripe.com
kontaktieren oder auf
https://support.link.com
besuchen
Wer wir sind
Wer gibt diese Hinweise?
Stripe, Inc. und Stripe Payments Company sowie deren verbundene Unternehmen, die in den USA Zahlungen für Verbraucher/innen anbieten.
Was wir tun
Wie schützt Stripe meine personenbezogenen Daten?
Um Ihre personenbezogenen Daten vor unbefugtem Zugriff, Zerstörung, Verlust, Veränderung oder Missbrauch zu schützen, setzen wir im Einklang mit dem US-Bundesrecht entsprechende Sicherheitsmaßnahmen ein.  Zu diesen Maßnahmen zählen Computerschutzmaßnahmen sowie gesicherte Unterlagen und Gebäude.  Wir kontrollieren den Zugang und führen eine ständige Überwachung durch, um Datenmissbrauch zu verhindern. Von unseren Dienstleistern verlangen wir, dass sie vergleichbare Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihrer Daten ergreifen.
Wie erhebt Stripe meine personenbezogenen Daten?
Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten zum Beispiel, wenn Sie
ein Link-Konto eröffnen;
Stripe mit der Abwicklung einer Zahlung für Waren oder Dienstleistungen beauftragen;
Stripe über Financial Connections Bankkontodaten zur Verfügung stellen.
Wir erheben Ihre personenbezogenen Daten auch von anderen, beispielsweise von verbundenen oder anderen Unternehmen.
Warum kann ich nicht die gesamte Weitergabe einschränken?
Das Bundesrecht erlaubt Ihnen nur,
die Weitergabe von Bonitätsangaben für die laufenden Geschäfte der verbundenen Unternehmen zu beschränken,
die Verwendung Ihrer Daten durch verbundene Unternehmen zu beschränken, die an Sie vermarkten,
die Weitergabe an nicht verbundene Unternehmen einzuschränken, die an Sie vermarkten.
Bundesstaatliche Gesetze und einzelne Unternehmen können Ihnen zusätzliche Rechte zur Einschränkung der Weitergabe einräumen. Im nachfolgenden Abschnitt „Weitere wichtige Informationen“ finden Sie weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten nach bundesstaatlichem Recht.
Was geschieht, wenn ich die Weitergabe für ein Konto einschränke, das ich gemeinsam mit einer anderen Person unterhalte?
Die von Ihnen getroffenen Entscheidungen gelten für alle Kontoinhaber/innen.
Definitionen
Verbundene Unternehmen
Unternehmen, die durch gemeinsames Eigentum oder gemeinsame Beherrschung verbunden sind. Dies können sowohl Finanz- als auch Nichtfinanz-Unternehmen sein.
Zu unseren verbundenen Unternehmen zählen solche, die unter dem Namen Stripe agieren, wie Stripe Payments Europe, Limited und Stripe Payments UK Ltd.
Nicht verbundene Unternehmen
Unternehmen, die nicht durch gemeinsames Eigentum oder gemeinsame Beherrschung verbunden sind.  Dies können sowohl Finanz- als auch Nichtfinanz-Unternehmen sein.
Zu den nicht verbundenen Unternehmen, an die wir personenbezogene Daten weitergeben, gehören Dienstleister, die in unserem Auftrag Dienste oder Funktionen erbringen, Geschäftskunden, mit denen Sie Transaktionen durchführen, Partner, mit denen wir Daten austauschen, um Ihnen Dienste bereitzustellen, sowie Werbepartner, Analyseanbieter und soziale Netzwerke, die uns bei der Werbung für unsere Dienste unterstützen.
Gemeinsames Marketing
Eine förmliche Vereinbarung zwischen nicht verbundenen Finanzunternehmen, die gemeinsam Finanzprodukte oder -dienstleistungen an Sie vermarkten.
Zu unseren Partnern für gemeinsames Marketing gehören Unternehmen aus der Finanzbranche, mit denen wir zusammenarbeiten, um Ihnen Finanzdienstleistungen anzubieten.
Weitere wichtige Informationen
Vermont: Wenn Ihr Konto bei uns mit einer Rechnungsadresse in Vermont verknüpft ist, werden wir keine Informationen über Ihre Kreditwürdigkeit an unsere verbundenen Unternehmen weitergeben und Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, Ihre Kreditauskunft oder Ihre Gesundheitsinformationen nicht an nicht verbundene Dritte weitergeben, um an Sie zu vermarkten – es sei denn, dies ist nach dem Gesetz von Vermont zulässig, oder Sie ermächtigen uns, diese Offenlegungen vorzunehmen.  Für gemeinsames Marketing geben wir nur Ihren Namen, Ihre Kontaktinformationen und Informationen über Ihre Transaktionen weiter.  Weitere Informationen zu unseren Datenschutzbestimmungen finden Sie in unserer
Datenschutzerklärung
und
Datenschutzcenter
.
Kalifornien: Wenn Ihr Konto bei uns mit einer Rechnungsadresse in Kalifornien verknüpft ist, geben wir personenbezogene Daten, die wir über Sie erheben, nur in dem Umfang weiter, der nach kalifornischem Recht zulässig ist.  Beispielsweise können wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten offenlegen, soweit dies erforderlich ist, um Transaktionen zu verarbeiten oder von Ihnen angeforderte Produkte und Dienstleistungen auf Ihre Anfrage hin bereitzustellen, wenn dies zur Risikokontrolle des Finanzinstituts erforderlich ist, und um uns gegen Betrug, Identitätsdiebstahl und nicht autorisierte Transaktionen zu schützen.
Weitere Informationen über unsere Datenschutzpraktiken finden Sie im
Stripe-Datenschutzcenter
.
Sub-policy 9
https://help.disqus.com/terms-and-policies/disqus-privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
Sub-policy 10
https://www.logmeininc.com/de/legal/privacy:
Back to Legal
GoTo Privacy Policy
GoTo Privacy Policy
GoTo DPF Notice
Your Choices Regarding Cookies on this Site
We use cookies and other technologies to optimize functionality, gain valuable feedback,  and to ensure that your interactions with our websites and services are simple, secure, and meaningful. To learn more about how we use cookies, please refer to our
Privacy Policy
. You have the ability to manage your cookie settings and preferences by clicking "Cookie Settings". Otherwise, clicking on the website, closing the banner, or clicking "Accept All" indicates you agree to our use of cookies on your device.
Change Settings
Accept All
Reject Optional
Sub-policy 11
https://www.daily.co/privacy:
This website stores cookies on your machine. These cookies are used to collect information about how you interact with our website and allow us to remember you. We use this information in order to improve and customize your browsing experience and for analytics and metrics about our visitors both on this website and other media. To find out more about the cookies we use, see our Privacy Policy
If you decline, your information won’t be tracked when you visit this website. A single cookie will be used in your browser to remember your preference not to be tracked.
Cookies settings
Accept
Decline
Security & Compliance
Secure Infrastructure
Security Controls
Secure Calls
Data Protection
GDPR Compliance
Legal docs
Privacy Policy
Responsible Disclosure Policy
Terms of Service
Sub-Processors
Cookie Policy
Data Processing Addendum
Related links
HIPAA compliance
Data Privacy Framework
← Security center
Privacy Policy
Download a PDF of this document
Sub-policy 12
https://vimeo.com/privacy:
Solutions
Video marketing
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Event marketing
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Employee communication
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Video monetization
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Create
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Manage
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Grow
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
DEMO VIDEOS
Get to know everything Vimeo can do for your business.
Watch now
Resources
Learn
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Connect
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Best of the Year
Browse Videos
Staff Picks
Categories
Channels
On Demand
Pricing
Contact Sales
Log in
Join
Help
Pricing
Log in
Join
Settings
Language
Mature content filter
Watch
More
Vimeo OTT
On Demand
Stock
Vimeo Experts
For Hire
Referrals
Legal
Terms
Privacy
U.S. State Privacy
Copyright
Cookies
Log in
Join
Login
Solutions
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
Resources
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Pricing
Contact Sales
Search
Search
Upload
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Copyright
Cookies
Desktop site
Language
English
Español
Deutsch
Français
日本語
Português
한국어
FAQ
Help
TM + © 2025 Vimeo.com, Inc.
Vimeo Privacy Policy
Last Updated: March 11, 2025
This Privacy Policy explains the information that Vimeo collects when you use our products and services or otherwise interact with us, how that information is used, with whom it may be shared, and your privacy choices.
Introduction
Children's Privacy
Data We Collect About You
How We Use Your Data
With Whom We Share Your Data
Legal and Safety-Related Disclosures
Data Retention
Account and Video Privacy Settings
Communications from Us
Protecting Your Information
Your Responsibilities
Third-Party Services
Location of Data and Data Processing
Your Privacy Rights
﻿How to Contact Us
1. Introduction
Who we are and what we do
This Privacy Policy covers Vimeo.com, Inc. (collectively, “
Vimeo
,” “
we
,” “
us
,” or “
our
”). We provide online video hosting, sharing and related services through our owned-and-operated websites, including Vimeo.com and Livestream.com, our branded applications for mobile and connected devices, and our embeddable video players (collectively, the “
services
”).
Acceptance and Changes
By registering for, downloading, or using our services, you accept this Privacy Policy, which is part of our
Terms of Service
. We may modify this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will post any modified version of our Privacy Policy at
https://vimeo.com/privacy
. If we change the Privacy Policy in a way that materially lessens our commitments to you, we will provide notice to registered users by email or other methods.
2. Children's Privacy
We do not knowingly collect personal information from individuals who are under the minimum required ages specified herein. You must be at least 16 years old or the age of majority in your jurisdiction, whichever is greater, to use our services. Individuals under the applicable age may use our services only through a parent or legal guardian's account and with their involvement. If you are a parent or legal guardian who believes your child has provided personal information to Vimeo without your consent, you may ask us to delete such information by contacting us at
privacy@vimeo.com
.
3. Data We Collect About You
We collect information about you when you use our services. In addition, third parties may collect information about you when you use our services. Collected information may include or reflect personal information that could identify you, as well as non-personal information. We refer to your information as
"your data"
for short.
Account Information
To create an account, you must provide a valid email address and password. If you choose to sign-up and/or authenticate using a third-party account (e.g., Facebook, Google), you authorize us to obtain account information from the third-party platform.
Financial Information
To make a purchase, you may need to provide a valid payment method (e.g., credit card or PayPal account) and billing address. Your payment information will be collected and processed by our authorized payment vendors. We do not directly collect or store credit or debit card numbers ourselves in the ordinary course of processing transactions. If we allow purchase through a third-party platform (i.e. in-app purchase), the payment method stored with the third-party platform will be charged. If you choose to make a purchase via bank transfer, you must provide the relevant bank account details.
If you offer content for sale using our services, you must provide an account to receive funds and tax information, which may include your name, address, and taxpayer identification number. In some jurisdictions, you may also be required to verify your identity with our third-party provider, which involves providing a government-issued identification, your physical address, phone number, and email address.
Content You Submit
You may upload and create content such as videos, text, photographs, and artwork. Your account profile may display information about you and your activities. This information may be accessed by others. Your videos may be viewed and otherwise accessed by others, and associated metadata (e.g., titles, closed captions, descriptions, tags, etc.) may be viewable by others. You may choose to limit the availability of your profile and videos. For more details, see
Section 8
.
Your interactions during events such as live streams and webinars, or with other users (e.g., comments, "likes," poll responses) may be seen by others.
If you use Vimeo AI to translate the audio track of your video, we collect data about your voice in order to provide those services.
Registration Forms
You may submit information through a registration form set up by a video owner or event host. This information will be received by both Vimeo and the video owner and is subject to both Vimeo's Privacy Policy as well as the video owner's privacy policy. Except where Vimeo is the video owner, Vimeo will not use any information you submit through such forms for direct marketing purposes.
Other Information You May Submit
You may submit data to us for limited purposes, such as requesting customer support; participating in a study or survey; entering contests or sweepstakes; applying for a job; or signing up to receive communications from us or another user.
Automatically Collected Information
We automatically collect certain types of data when you use our services, regardless of whether you have an account. This data includes your IP address, rough geolocation derived from IP address, technical information about your device (e.g., browser type, operating system, basic device information), the web page you visited or search query you entered before reaching us, and your activities. We may track your activities using cookies and similar technologies. By using our services, you agree to our use of these methods as set forth in our
Cookie Policy
.
Information Collected by Third Parties
Some third parties may collect data about you when you use our services. This may include data you submit (such as payment information) or automatically collected information (in the case of third-party analytics providers and advertising partners).
We may obtain data from third parties about you. We may combine that data with information that we have collected. For example, some advertisers or advertising platforms may allow us to determine what other online services you might use so that we may place relevant ads on those services.
4. How We Use Your Data
We may use your data for the following purposes:
Identification and authentication:
We use your data to authenticate you as the owner of your account when you interact with customer support. We may also use your data to verify your identity if you offer content for sale using our services.
Operating our services:
We use your data to provide our services, process and fulfill orders, provide customer support, and to otherwise comply with our contractual obligations to you. We (and/or our third-party vendors) use your financial information to process purchases made by you and to pay you amounts you have earned.
Communicating with you:
We use your data when we communicate with you (e.g., when we respond to a customer support or other inquiry).
Improving our services:
We use your data to understand how our services are being used and how we can improve them.
Customizing your experience:
We use your data to personalize the service to you. This may include remembering your preferences for language or volume or displaying videos that you might enjoy, based upon your viewing choices. This may also include restricting access to certain features or content due to applicable law in your location.
Marketing and advertising:
We use your data to show you ads on third-party sites, and to measure the effectiveness of those ads. We may also use your data to contact you about products, services, or resources that might interest you.
Protecting our services:
We use your data to secure our platform, prevent abuse of our services, and enforce our Terms of Service. For example, we use tools that process data to detect and prevent fraud in transactions and content that violates our Acceptable Use Policy.
Legal compliance:
We use your data where we are legally required to do so. For example, we may need to gather your data to respond to a subpoena or court order.
Protecting your information:
Where appropriate, we may anonymize, backup, and delete certain data.
We may use algorithms, machine learning, and other automated means to implement any of the above.
Whenever we process your data for one of these purposes, we have determined that one or more of the following lawful bases apply:
Performance of a contract;
Legitimate commercial interest;
Compliance with a legal obligation; or
Consent
When Vimeo relies on legitimate interest as a lawful basis of processing, we undertake a balancing test to ensure that the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the data subject are not outweighed by Vimeo’s interest.
5. With Whom We Share Your Data
We share data with third parties as follows:
As you instruct:
We may make your profile and videos available to others as you instruct in using our services. We may share your data with persons to whom you have granted account-level access.
With your consent:
We may share your data with third parties where we have obtained your express consent to do so.
Authorized vendors:
We may share your data with third-party vendors that help us operate and improve our services, process orders, and comply with your instructions and our contractual obligations. This includes payment processors, content delivery networks (CDNs), cloud-based hosting services, monitoring services, email service providers, quality assurance and testing vendors, fraud and abuse prevention vendors, customer relations management (CRM) vendors, chatbot providers, and shipment vendors.
Advertising:
We may share your data with advertising companies to display relevant ads to you, and to measure the effectiveness of those ads.
Analytics:
We may share your data with analytics providers which help us understand how customers are using our services. We may also share individually identifying analytics information with the hosts of live events you attend, the owners of recorded video you view (where you have provided your consent to share such information), and the administrator(s) of your Enterprise Account (see below for more details).
Affiliates and advisors:
We may share your data with our auditors and advisors for planning, financial reporting, accounting, auditing, tax filings, and legal compliance. We may share your data with our affiliates to the extent necessary to provide you with the services ordered.
Certain legal situations:
We may share your data where we believe disclosure is necessary to comply with a legal obligation or in connection with a corporate transaction as discussed in
Section 6
.
Aggregated or anonymized information:
We may publicly disclose non-personal aggregated or anonymized information such as our number of visitors and registered users.
We use reasonable efforts to vet vendors for their privacy and data security practices. We require that all vendors agree to protect the data we share.
Enterprise Accounts
If you create a Vimeo account using an email address provided or assigned to you by an organization (such as your work email address):
Vimeo may share your personal information (e.g., name, email address) with such organization; and
The organization may establish a direct relationship with us and migrate your data to the organization's account (an "
Enterprise Account
").
When you use an Enterprise Account, the administrators of the Enterprise Account may:
Access information about your Enterprise Account activity, including your video viewing history;
Manage and change the content within your account, including profile information;
Control your ability to view, edit, or delete content; and
Delete your account.
The organizational owner of the Enterprise Account, not Vimeo, is responsible for the accounts it controls and its use of its account users' data. Your use of our services is subject to such organization’s privacy policies, which may differ from Vimeo’s. If you do not want an organization to access or otherwise control your account, use a personal email address and do not use an organizational email address when creating an account. If your account has not yet joined an Enterprise Account, you may update your email address in your account settings to prevent automatically joining in the future.
6. Legal and Safety-Related Disclosures
We may disclose your data in response to official requests (e.g., court orders, subpoenas, search warrants, national security requests, etc.) ("
requests
") that we receive from government authorities or parties to legal proceedings. We direct law enforcement agencies to our
Law Enforcement Guidelines
page.
We handle U.S. requests in accordance with U.S. law. If the request originates from a foreign jurisdiction, we will typically disclose information where we in good faith believe that disclosure is permitted by both U.S. law and local law. In all cases, we may raise or waive any legal objection or right available to us, in our sole discretion.
We may disclose user data where we reasonably believe that someone's life is at risk. For example, if we become aware of a person threatening to commit suicide, we may share that person's data with appropriate entities that may have the ability to help.
We may disclose user data to report suspected crimes. We report content suspected of exploiting minors to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC) along with the data identifying the uploading user.
We may disclose user data in situations involving legal claims against us or one of our users. If you submit a
Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA)
or other takedown notice, we may share that notice with the affected user. If you challenge such a notice, we may share your response with the complainant.
We may share your data with potential transaction partners, advisors, and others in the event our company is, in whole or part, acquired by a third party. In such case, we will use reasonable efforts to require the acquiring entity to comply with this Privacy Policy.
7. Data Retention
We retain your data for as long as you have an account. When you close an account, we will delete your data. We may retain logs of automatically collected information (for internal analytics and security purposes); your email address; your tax information; communications with you; and your transactional information (for auditing, tax, and financial purposes). When we no longer have a business reason for retaining your data, we will delete or anonymize it.
We retain deleted videos on our servers for a short period in case you wish to reverse deletion. Once we delete a video, we may not be able to recover it. If you have previously made a video public, the video or its thumbnail may continue to be discoverable in a search engine's cache for a time.
If we receive legal process pertaining to your account, we will retain your data for as long as we in good faith believe is necessary to comply with the legal process. Similarly, if we believe that your account has been involved in wrongdoing, we may preserve your data to defend or assert our rights.
8. Account and Video Privacy Settings
As part of our services, we offer you the ability to limit the distribution of your content, including your videos. This section explains some of your choices.
Profile
Some of our online subscription plans enable you to "hide" your profile or otherwise make it inaccessible on our website. Your profile will, however, remain accessible to persons who have access to your account or content.
Team Members
Some of our subscription plans enable you to grant account-level access rights to others. Persons with such access ("
Team Members
") may be able to see and potentially alter your data. You may revoke or downgrade Team Member access at any time.
Videos
We enable you to manage the privacy settings of your videos.
Learn more
about available privacy settings. You may change a video's privacy settings at any time. Changes will be applied on a go-forward basis.
You may create a sharable link to your video for the purpose of sharing your video with others or embedding your video on a third-party website (including your own). Creating such a sharable link will override your privacy settings and will allow anyone who enters the link in a browser to view your video without restriction. Similarly, embedding your video on a publicly available website will allow the public to view your video regardless of your privacy settings.
You should exercise caution in granting access to others (whether through link sharing or passwords). Once you have granted access to someone else, you lose a degree of control over the distribution of your video as those persons may share the password and/or link with other people.
Regardless of your profile or video privacy settings, Vimeo reserves the right to inspect them for compliance with its
Terms of Service
, to provide customer support, or to address technical issues.
9. Communications from Us
Emails
If you create an account or request information about Vimeo's services, you may receive commercial emails from us. You may always opt out from receiving commercial messages in your account settings or through the unsubscribe link included at the bottom of each email. Please note that any opt-out request may take several days to process and you will continue to receive transactional emails from us (e.g., emails confirming transactions and/or providing information about your account).
Mobile Device Communications
We may, with your consent, send push notifications in our apps. You may disable these by declining them or changing the app's settings. To the extent provided, we may, with your consent, send SMS messages to your mobile telephone for authentication and security purposes. You may opt out of receiving such messages at any time.
10. Protecting Your Information
We use physical, technical, and organizational security measures to safeguard your data from unauthorized or accidental disclosure. Despite these efforts, no information system can be 100% secure, so we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your information. Users also have a role to play in keeping their data safe. We encourage you to use a unique and hard-to-guess password for your account and to not share it with others. You should only grant access rights to people who you know and trust, and, even then, you should be careful in granting all access rights. You should monitor your account regularly. If you believe that someone has gained access to your account without your permission, please contact us immediately so that we can investigate.
11. Your Responsibilities
You may receive other people's data in using our service. If you receive information from other users, you must process that information in compliance with your published privacy policy and all applicable laws, including those concerning privacy, data security, and online marketing.
12. Third-Party Services
We may provide access to online services that we do not own or operate via hyperlinks or integrations. These services fall outside of this Privacy Policy and we have no control over the data they collect. Once on a third-party site, your data may be collected by others. We encourage you to read our
Third-Part
y Service Addendum
and the privacy policies of such services before using them.
You may use our service through third-party sites. For example, you may watch a video that is embedded on a third-party site or use one of our apps on a third-party platform. This Privacy Policy covers our apps and video players, but does not cover any third-party site or any third-party video player.
13. Location of Data and Data Processing
Vimeo is based in the United States. We provide services globally using computer systems, servers, and databases located in the U.S. and other countries. When you use our services from outside of the U.S., your information may be transferred to and processed in the U.S. In accordance with applicable international data protection laws, we may transfer your personal information from your home country to the U.S. (or other countries) based upon the following legal bases:
Legitimate business interests: We could not provide our services or comply with our legal obligations without transferring your personal information to the U.S.
Our use of Standard Contractual Clauses (also known as "Model Clauses") where appropriate.
The EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Vimeo complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information from the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, respectively. Vimeo has certified that it adheres to the DPF Principles. The following Vimeo subsidiaries also adhere to the DPF Principles: Livestream LLC and VideoJi, Inc. Vimeo remains responsible for any of your personal information that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for external processing on our behalf. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, visit the
DPF website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF certification, we encourage you to contact us at the address listed in
Section 15
. Vimeo is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the DPF Principles
. You may contact
JAMS
, our U.S.-based alternative dispute resolution provider, for more information or to file a complaint, at no cost to you.
14. Your Privacy Rights
We enable you to make numerous choices about your data:
You may choose not to provide us with certain information. For example, you may choose not to create an account or not to provide optional account information.
You may change your account and video privacy settings. See
Section 8
for more details.
You may change or correct information voluntarily submitted to us. We encourage you to keep your data current by viewing your settings page.
You may opt out of receiving commercial emails from us. See
Section 9
for more details.
You may limit the use of cookies. See
our
Cookie Policy
for options.
You may close your account (which will delete all videos) or delete certain videos.
In addition, depending on where you reside, you may have certain privacy rights. These may include the right to: access, correct, delete, erase, restrict, or object to our use of your personal information; port your data; and withdraw consents. We enable exercise of these rights primarily through our services (which we reserve the right to modify). For example, we allow users to change their information, download their videos, and close their accounts. We also fulfill our obligations in response to direct requests. We will endeavor to process requests within one month. Please note that we may not be able to comply with requests to the extent that they would cause us to violate any law or infringe any other person's rights. We reserve the right to request appropriate identification. We will process requests free of charge unless they would impose an unreasonable cost on us.
Additional details about Vimeo’s data collection, use, and third-party disclosures can be found in our
U.S. State Privacy Notice
.
15. How to Contact Us
For any questions, inquiries, or complaints relating to your privacy, please contact us at:
Vimeo.com, Inc.
Attention: Data Protection Officer
330 West 34th Street, 10th Floor
New York, New York 10001
privacy@vimeo.com
Alternatively, if you are in the EU, EEA, or Switzerland and would like to exercise your rights or have questions about our processing of personal information, you may contact our local representative.
For the EU/EEA:
European Data Protection Office via the online request form at
https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request
or by writing to EDPO at Avenue Huart Hamoir 71, 1030 Brussels, Belgium.
For Switzerland:
EDPO Switzerland Sàrl via the online request form at
https://edpo.com/swiss-data-request
or by writing to EDPO Switzerland at Rue de Lausanne 37, 1201 Geneva, Switzerland.
Sub-policy 13
https://www.google.de/intl/de/policies/privacy:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 14
https://miro.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Product
Solutions
Resources
Pricing
Contact Sales
Login
Sign up free
Miro legal information
Table of contents
Table of contents
AI Features Addendum
Code of Conduct
Cookies Policy
Customer Data Processing Addendum
Current Subprocessors List
Developer Terms of Use
Master Cloud Agreement
Miro Imprint
Miro Marketplace Terms of Use
Miro Master Cloud Agreement Guide
Online Community Terms of Use
Open Source Software - Client
Open Source Software - Site
Prior Master Cloud Agreement "MCA" Versions
Privacy Policy
Recruitment Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Vendor Data Processing Addendum
Vendor Information Security Schedule
Solutions Partner Program Agreement
DMCA Policy
Miro Supplier Code of Conduct
Cookie List
Miro Modern Slavery Statement
Privacy Policy
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
We have updated our Privacy Policy. We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework. Section 10 ("International Transfers") now includes our company's commitment to the Data Privacy Framework Principles applicable to transfers of Personal Data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to the US.
Effective Date:  August 23, 2024
This Privacy Policy describes how RealtimeBoard, Inc. dba Miro, including its affiliates and subsidiaries (collectively,
Miro
and also referred to as
our
,
us
and
we
) collects, uses and discloses information from or about an identified or identifiable person, including information that we can associate with an individual person (“
Personal Data
”), as well as any choices you have with respect to your Personal Data.
1. Applicability of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy applies to Miro’s online collaboration tools and platform, including the associated Miro mobile and desktop applications (collectively, the “
Services
”), miro.com and other Miro websites (collectively, the “
Websites
”) and other interactions (e.g. customer support, the Miro Community, etc.) you may have with Miro, including the processing of any messages, text, files, images, video or audio recordings, or other content submitted through our Services (collectively, “
Customer Content
”). This Privacy Policy does not apply to any third-party applications or software that integrate with our Services (“
Third-Party Services
”), or any other third-party products, services or businesses.
You, the organization (e.g., your employer or another entity or person) controlling the use of the Services (“
Organization
”) and any associated Customer Content, and any individuals who are granted access to the Services by an Organization (“
Users
” and, collectively with you and an Organization, “
Customer
”) are also bound by the the
Terms of Service
or the
Master Cloud Agreement
, as applicable, and any product-specific Terms (together, the “
Customer Agreement”
).
If you have any questions about specific Organization settings and privacy practices, please contact the Customer whose Organization you use. If you have received an invitation to join an Organization but have not yet created an account, you should request assistance from the Customer that sent the invitation.
2. Identifying the Data Controller and Processor
Data protection law in certain jurisdictions differentiates between the “controller” and “processor” of Personal Data. Whether Miro or Customer is the controller or processor of Personal Data depends on the type of data used and the purposes for such use.
Customer is the controller for all Customer Content that is also Personal Data. As the controller, Customer may, for example, use the Services to grant and remove access to an Organization, assign roles and configure settings, access, modify, export, share and remove information and otherwise apply its policies to the Services. As the processor for Customer Content, Miro processes Customer Content that is Personal Data only on Customer’s request and in accordance with Customer’s written instructions, including the applicable terms in the Customer Agreement, Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law. For more information about how Customer Content is processed (such as how your Personal Data is processed, the purpose and legal basis for processing, and your data subject rights), we refer you to the relevant Customer’s privacy notice.
Miro is the controller for Services Data as defined in Section 3.
3. The types of Personal Data we collect
Your Personal Data is provided by you, obtained from third parties, and/or created by us when you use the Services.
Customer Content.
Customers routinely submit Customer Content to Miro when using the Services.
Services Data.
Miro also collects, generates and/or receives the following types of Personal Data, other than Customer Content, through and in connection with Miro’s provision of the Services (the “Services Data”):
Organization and account information.
To create or update an Organization account, you or the relevant Customer (e.g. you or your employer) will supply Miro with an email address, phone number, password, domain and/or similar account details. We may also receive your email address and name from Slack or other organizations with whom our platform has integrations through which you may sign up to use our Services.
Billing information.
Customers that purchase a paid version of the Services may provide Miro (or its payment processors) with billing details such as credit card information, banking information and/or a billing address.
Service metadata.
When a User interacts with the Services, metadata is generated to provide additional context about their use of the Services. For example, Miro logs the Organizations, boards, people, features, content and links that you view or interact with, as well the types of files shared and any Third-Party Services that you use.
Log data.
Like most websites and services delivered over the Internet, our servers automatically collect information when you access or use our Websites or Services, recording this information in log files. This log data may include the Internet Protocol (IP) address, the address of the web page visited before using the Website or Services, your browser type and settings, the date and time the Services were used, information about browser configuration and plugins, and language preferences.
Device data.
Miro collects information about devices accessing the Services, including the type of device, operating system used, device settings, application IDs, unique device identifiers and crash data. Whether we collect some or all of this Services Data often depends on the type of device used and its settings.
Location data.
We receive information from you, the relevant Customer and other third-parties that helps us approximate your location. We may, for example, use a business address submitted by your employer or an IP address received from your browser or device to determine approximate location. Miro may also collect location information from devices in accordance with the consent provided by your device.
Third-party data.
Miro may receive data about organizations, industries, lists of companies that are customers, Website visitors, marketing campaigns and other matters relevant to our business from parent corporations, affiliates and subsidiaries, our partners, or other third parties that we use to make our own information more useful. This data may be combined and may include aggregate-level data. For example, information about how well an online marketing or email campaign performed, or to create a business contacts directory.
Marketing and communications Data.
Miro may obtain marketing information, including your preferences in receiving marketing from us and our third parties and your communication preferences.
Cookie data.
Miro uses a variety of cookies and similar technologies in our Websites and Services to help us collect Services Data. For more details about how we use these technologies, as well as your opt-out opportunities and other options, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Email performance data.
Miro uses a ‘clear image’ (gif) in email communications in order to track engagement and performance metrics. Much of this data is aggregated and does not contain Personal Data. If you wish to turn off this tracking, you can do so by turning off images in the email itself.
Third-Party Services data.
A Customer may choose to use Third-Party Services. If Customer enables Third-Party Services, Miro may access and exchange Customer Content and Services Data with the Third-Party on Customer’s behalf, in accordance with our agreement with the Third-Party Services and any permissions granted by the Customer (including its User(s)).
Contact
data.
In accordance with the consent provided by your device or other third-party API, we process any contact information that a User chooses to import when using the Services.
Community data
. We also receive Services Data when submitted to our Websites or in other ways, such as if you participate in the Miro Community, Miro Academy, or Miroverse. This data is either submitted directly to the Services, or collected during Forums, Programs, contests, activities, events, or educational programs hosted by Miro (or a vendor).
Call data.
Our Customer Success team may record video or telephone calls with Customers for the purposes of training and quality assurance. You will be notified of this when a recording is made, and can request that Miro does not record these calls.
Additional data provided to Miro.
If you use Miro’s AI features pursuant to our Terms of Service, Services Data also includes data associated with your interaction with these technologies.  We also receive Services Data when submitted to our Websites or in other ways, such as when you request support, interact with our social media accounts or otherwise communicate with Miro.
Business data
. Miro may receive information about individuals from organizations, industries, Customers, (potential) partners, parent corporations, affiliates and subsidiaries, and our partners for cooperation and communication purposes.
Generally, no one is under a statutory or contractual obligation to provide any Personal Data. However, certain Personal Data is collected automatically and, if some Personal Data, such as Organization setup details, is not provided, we may be unable to provide the Services.
4. How we use Personal Data
Customer Content.
Customer Content that is Personal Data will be used by Miro in accordance with Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law.
Services Data.
Miro uses Services Data for the purposes of our legitimate interests in operating our Services, Websites and business. More specifically, Miro uses Services Data:
To provide, update, maintain and protect our Services, Websites and business.
This includes the use of Services Data to support delivery of the Services under a Customer Agreement, including to create or update an Organization, to prevent or address service errors, security or technical issues, and to analyze and monitor usage of the product and its features, trends and other activities.
To provide, update, maintain and otherwise operate the Miro Community, Miro Academy and Miroverse.
This includes facilitating collaboration and interaction between Users when engaging with the Miro Community or Miroverse, and/or recording learners’ progress and certifications in Miro Academy.
To develop and improve products and Services
, including AI features, provided you have not opted out.
To comply with applicable law, legal process or regulation.
To support and communicate with you by responding to your requests, comments and questions.
If you contact us, we may use your Services Data to respond.
To develop, test and provide search, learning and productivity tools and additional features.
Miro tries to make the Services as useful as possible. For example, we make Services suggestions based on historical use and predictive models, identify organizational trends and insights, customize your experience of the Services, or to create and develop new features and products.
To conduct market and user research.
To improve our Services and troubleshoot new products and features, we may carry out research. For example we may survey Customers (including Admins, Users and other contacts) or third parties about customer satisfaction, user experience, the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns, and their broader interests.
To send emails and other communications.
Transactional
: As part of our services, we provide users with certain communications and updates, We may send you service, transactional, technical and other administrative communications, such as communications about your account, our Service offerings, changes to the Services, and important Services-related notices, such as security and fraud notices. We consider these communications as part of our Services to you.
Soft opt-in / Legitimate Interests
: In addition, where you are a non-enterprise user or you if you have opted-in as an enterprise user, we sometimes send emails about new product features, recommendations and promotional communications, or other news about Miro. You can opt-out of these messages at any time by using the unsubscribe link included in all of these communications.
For billing, account management and other administrative matters.
Miro may need to contact you for invoicing, account management, and similar reasons and we use account data to administer accounts and keep track of billing and payments.
To investigate and help prevent security issues and abuse.
To manage and to contact you with regard to involvement.
We may need to manage and contact you with regard to your involvement and participation in the Miro Community (such as the Forums, Programs, Miroverse, contests, activities, events or educational programs hosted by Miro or a vendor).
If information is aggregated or pseudonymized so that it can no longer reasonably be associated with an identified or identifiable natural person, Miro may use it for any business purpose.
5. Data Retention
Miro will retain Customer Content and Personal Data in accordance with a Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and Customer’s use of the Services, and as required by applicable law. The deletion of Customer’s Personal Data may result in the deletion and/or pseudonymization of an account and certain associated Services Data. Miro may retain Services Data for as long as necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Further, note that we may keep certain types of Services Data after the deactivation of an account for the period needed for Miro to pursue legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with (and demonstrate compliance with) legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
6. How we share and disclose Personal Data
This section describes how Miro may share and disclose Personal Data. Customers determine their own policies and practices for the sharing and disclosure of Personal Data. Miro does not control how they or any other third party chooses to share or disclose Personal Data.
Miro may share and disclose Personal Data in accordance with a Customer’s instructions, including any applicable terms in the Customer Agreement and the Customer’s use of the Services and in compliance with applicable law. Where necessary, may only share Personal Data with third parties where we have obtained consent to do so.
We may share Personal Data as follows:
Displaying the Services
. When a User submits Customer Content (including Personal Data), it may be displayed to other Users that have access to the same Miro Board. For example, an User’s name and Miro profile may be displayed. Please consult the Help Center for more information on this functionality.
Customer access
. Owners, administrators, Users, and other Customer representatives and personnel may be able to access, modify, or restrict access to Personal Data. This may include, for example, your employer using Service features to export logs of your activity or accessing or modifying your profile details..
Subprocessors.
We may engage third-parties as sub-processors to process Personal Data. These third parties may, for example, provide virtual computing and storage services, or we may share business information to develop strategic partnerships to support our Customers. Please see more information on our subprocessors
here
.
Third-Party Services
. Customers may enable Third-Party Services. When enabled, Miro may access and exchange Customer Content with the provider of a Third-Party Service on Customer’s behalf. For example, the AI features may share limited data with Microsoft in connection with the use of the AI features and to monitor compliance with codes of conduct. Third-Party Services are not owned or controlled by Miro and third parties that have been granted access to Personal Data may have their own policies and practices for its collection, use, and sharing. Please check the permissions, privacy settings, and notices for these Third-Party Services or contact the relevant provider with any questions.
Partners.
We may share Personal Data with developers, partners and others we engage to create Miro applications and/or integrating Miro features.
Forums
. The information you choose to provide in a community forum, including Personal Data, will be publicly available.
Corporate Affiliates
. Miro may share Personal Data with its corporate affiliates, parents and/or subsidiaries for business continuity purposes.
During a change to Miro’s business
. If Miro engages in a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, sale of some or all of Miro’s assets or stock, financing, public offering of securities, acquisition of all or a portion of our business, a similar transaction or proceeding, or steps in contemplation of such activities, some or all Personal Data may be shared or transferred, subject to standard confidentiality arrangements.
To comply with laws.
If we receive a request for Personal Data, we may disclose Personal Data if we reasonably believe disclosure is in accordance with or required by any applicable law, regulation, or legal process.
To enforce our rights, prevent fraud, and for safety.
To protect and defend the rights, property or safety of Miro, its users, or third parties, including enforcing its contracts or policies, or in connection with investigating and preventing illegal activity, fraud, or security issues, including to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
7. Security
Miro takes the security of Personal Data seriously. Miro strives to protect Personal Data from unauthorized access or disclosure. Miro cannot guarantee that Personal Data stored or sent to Miro will be completely safe and encourages you to use caution. To the maximum extent allowed by applicable law, you agree and acknowledge that Miro will not be liable or responsible if any information about you is intercepted, accessed, and/or used by an unintended recipient.
8. Our responsibility for third party links
Our Services may contain links to websites and services operated by third parties, which we do not own or control. This Privacy Statement does not apply to your use of such third party websites, and you should read the relevant privacy notices and terms and conditions before using such websites or services.
9. Age Restriction
Miro does not allow use of our Services and Websites by anyone younger than 16 years old (“
Minor
”). If you learn that a Minor has unlawfully provided us with Personal Data, please contact us and we will take steps to delete this information.
By using our Services and Websites, you represent and warrant that you are not a Minor as of the date of first access to our Services and Websites.
10. International Transfers
RealtimeBoard Inc. has an international corporate presence, as such our collection of Personal Data necessarily involves the transmission of data on an international basis. If you are an individual located outside of the United States, please be aware that information we collect may be transferred to and processed in the United States and elsewhere outside the United States. As more fully described in the Customer Agreement terms between you and RealtimeBoard Inc., Personal Data may be transferred across international borders, including without limitation from the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK to the United States. Any cross-border transfers of Personal Data are supported by an approved adequacy mechanism where required by applicable law, such as the EU Standard Contractual Clauses.
RealtimeBoard Inc. complies with the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-US DPF
”), the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-US DPF
”) as set forth by the US Department of Commerce. RealtimeBoard Inc. has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
EU-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-US DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. RealtimeBoard Inc. has certified to the US Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
Swiss-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-US DPF. With respect to onward transfers of Personal Data to the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US DPF, we remain liable for processing such transfers in accordance with the Principles. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-US DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-US DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please
visit the US Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website by clicking here or visiting
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
RealtimeBoard Inc. may disclose your Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. If you have a question or complaint related to participation by RealtimeBoard Inc. in the DPF program, we encourage you to contact us
online
. For any complaints related to the DPF that RealtimeBoard Inc. cannot resolve directly, we have chosen to cooperate with the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, or a panel established by the European data protection authorities, for resolving disputes with EU individuals, the UK Information Commissioner (ICO) for resolving disputes with UK individuals, and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals. Please contact us if you’d like us to direct you to your data protection authority contacts. As further explained in the Principles, binding arbitration is available to address residual complaints not resolved by other means. RealtimeBoard Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the United States Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
If we share your Personal Data with any RealtimeBoard Inc. affiliates or third parties located in countries outside the European Economic Area, Switzerland, the UK, or the United States we take steps to ensure that appropriate safeguards are in place to guarantee the continued protection of your Personal Data, such as by entering into the EU Standard Contractual Clauses adopted by the European Commission (article 46(2)(c) GDPR), which are available
here
, and which were also adopted by the UK Government under section 119A of the UK Data Protection Act 2018.
11. Your Rights
Where we are the controller of your Personal Data, and subject to the privacy rights granted to you under the law in your country, you have the following rights:
Access.
You can request access to your Personal Data, subject to applicable law.
Portability.
You can request a copy of your Personal Data that we process on the basis of consent or in order to perform a contract with you.
Erasure.
You can request to erase your Personal Data that we are not required to process for compliance with law or in connection with legal claims. Where we rely on an exemption, we will inform you about this.
C
orrection.
You can request that we correct inaccurate information we maintain about you.
Objection and restriction of processing.
You can use the "unsubscribe" link in our marketing communications to stop us from using your information for that direct marketing.  You can object to our processing of your Personal Data where we rely on legitimate interests or perform a task in the public interest. We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including reasonable expectations of Miro customers, the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing, which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms, or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld and we will cease processing your Personal Data.
Withdrawal of consent
. Where you have provided your consent to our processing of your Personal Data, you can withdraw your consent at any time. If you do withdraw consent, it will not affect the lawfulness of what we have done with your Personal Data before you withdrew consent.
To exercise your rights or ask us any questions pertaining to your rights, please contact us using the details set out in Section 14 below. Please note that we may request you to provide us with additional information in order to confirm your identity and ensure that you are entitled to access the relevant personal information.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
12. Certain United States-specific Rights
Categories of Personal Data we receive
. We may collect, or process on behalf of our customers, the categories of Personal Data described in Section 3 above.
Sources
. For information regarding the categories of sources from which we collect your Personal Data, please see Sections 3 and 4 above.
Our business and commercial purposes for use
. For information regarding the specific purposes for which we collect and disclose your Personal Data, please see Sections 4 and 7 above.
Retention
. Information about our retention of Personal Data is described in Section 5 above. We only use and disclose sensitive personal information for the purposes specified in applicable law or otherwise with your consent.
Depending on where you live in the United States, you may have the following rights:
Access
.
You can request access to the Personal Data we hold about you, how we use it and who we share it with.
Deletion.
You can request that we delete any of your Personal Data that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions.
Correction
. You can request that we correct inaccurate information we maintain about you.
Opt out of “Sale” and “Sharing”
. While we do not sell your Personal Data in the conventional sense, we may use advertising and analytics services that are intended to analyze your use of our Services based on information obtained from cookies or other trackers, including for delivering advertising to you (such as interest-based, targeted, or cross-context behavioral advertising). You can opt out of the use of cookies and other trackers on our website by setting your preferences on our homepage. You will need to set your preferences from each device and each web browser from which you wish to opt out. This feature uses a cookie to remember your preference, so if you clear all cookies from your browser, you will need to re-select your preferred settings. We do not have actual knowledge that we “sell” or “share” the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Portability
. You can request that we transfer to you a copy of the Personal Data we hold about you.
Withdrawal of Consen
t. Where we rely on consent to process your Personal Data, you may have the right to withdraw this consent at any time. If you confirm that you wish to withdraw your consent, we will delete your information from our systems. However, you acknowledge this may limit our ability to provide you with the best possible products and services.
You can exercise your rights as described above by contacting us as set out in Section 14. Only you, or a person or business entity registered with the California Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf (an “authorized agent”), may make the requests set forth above. You may also make a request on behalf of your minor child. The request should include your contact information and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it. In addition, you should provide adequate information that we can reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected the personal information (including information that enables us to verify the identifying information we possibly maintain about you).
We will respond to consumer requests in a reasonably timely manner. If we require extra time to respond, we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. In order to protect the security of your Personal Data, we will not honor a request if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Data relates to you. The method used to verify your identity will depend on the type, sensitivity and value of the information, including the risk of harm to you posed by any authorized access or deletion. Generally speaking, verification will be performed by matching the identifying information provided by you to the Personal Data that we already have.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding our receipt of your request (and will not be made more than twice in a 12-month period). If we cannot comply with a request, or cannot fully comply with a request, the response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights based on California data protection laws, including, but not limited to, by:
Denying you goods or services.
Charging you different prices or rates for goods or services, including through granting discounts or other benefits, or imposing penalties.
Providing you a different level or quality of goods or services.
Suggesting that you may receive a different price or rate for goods or services or a different level or quality of goods or services.
13. Changes to this Privacy Policy
Miro may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. Laws, regulations, and industry standards evolve, which may make those changes necessary, or we may make changes to our services or business. We will post the changes to this page and we encourage you to review our Privacy Policy to stay informed. If we make material changes to the Privacy Policy, Miro will take commercially reasonable efforts to notify you and take additional steps as required by law. If you disagree with the changes to this Privacy Policy, you should deactivate your account and discontinue your use of the Services. Contact the relevant Customer if you wish to request the removal of your Personal Data under their control.
14. How to contact Miro
If you have questions about this Privacy Policy, or regarding your Personal Data, you can contact us
online
, or by mail at:
RealtimeBoard, Inc. dba Miro
ATTN: Privacy Team
201 Spear St
Suite 1100
94105
San Francisco, USA
Our representative in the European Union:
RealtimeBoard BV
ATTN: Data Protection Team
Singel 542
1017 AZ
Amsterdam, NL
Product
Online whiteboard
Apps & Integrations
Templates
Miroverse
Miro Developer Platform
Miro for Devices
Enterprise Guard
Accessibility
Changelog
Product
Online whiteboard
Apps & Integrations
Templates
Miroverse
Miro Developer Platform
Miro for Devices
Enterprise Guard
Accessibility
Changelog
Solutions
Meetings and Workshops
Brainstorming & Ideation
Agile practices
Diagramming
Research & Design
Strategy & Planning
Mind Map
Concept Map
Online Sticky Notes
Flowchart Maker
Wireframe
Solutions
Meetings and Workshops
Brainstorming & Ideation
Agile practices
Diagramming
Research & Design
Strategy & Planning
Mind Map
Concept Map
Online Sticky Notes
Flowchart Maker
Wireframe
Resources
Miro Academy
Help Center
Blog
Status
Miro Community
Miro Events
Resources
Miro Academy
Help Center
Blog
Status
Miro Community
Miro Events
Company
About us
Careers 🚀
Miro in the News
Customer Stories
Company
About us
Careers 🚀
Miro in the News
Customer Stories
Plans and Pricing
Pricing
Business
Enterprise
Consultants
Education
Startups
NPOs
Contact sales
Plans and Pricing
Pricing
Business
Enterprise
Consultants
Education
Startups
NPOs
Contact sales
English
Miro ©
2025
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Manage Cookies
Sub-policy 15
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
1. Introduction
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
5. Data Retention
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
7. Security
8. Minors
9. Data Transfers
10. Who is my data controller?
11. Your rights
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
13. Information specific to other services
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Privacy Notice
Versions:
December 5, 2024 (current)
November 7, 2024
July 15, 2024
February 15, 2024
November 1, 2023
September 22, 2023
August 1, 2023
June 15, 2023
October 10, 2022
August 16, 2021
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
August 6, 2020
July 7, 2020
November 20, 2019
September 26, 2019
January 2, 2019
April 11, 2018
LAST UPDATED: December 5, 2024
1. Introduction
1.1 Scope
This Privacy Notice applies to all the products, services, websites and apps offered by  SurveyMonkey Inc., SurveyMonkey Europe UC, SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda., SurveyMonkey Netherlands B.V., and other SurveyMonkey affiliates (collectively “SurveyMonkey”), except where otherwise noted. The services include SurveyMonkey, SurveyMonkey Apply, SurveyMonkey Audience, SurveyMonkey Rewards, SurveyMonkey Contribute, Wufoo, TechValidate, GetFeedback Direct, and GetFeedback Digital. We refer to those products, services, websites, and apps collectively as the “services” in this Privacy Notice. Unless otherwise noted in your contract, our services are provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. inside of the United States, by SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda. inside of Brazil, and by SurveyMonkey Europe UC everywhere else.
US residents: Please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information on our privacy practices specific to individual states.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees or job applicants in their capacity as employees or candidates. Employees and candidates should refer to our Employee Privacy Notice or
Candidate Privacy Notice
, respectively.
1.2
Quick Links
If you want to identify your data controller please see the “
Who is my data controller?
” section below.
For a quick snapshot of how SurveyMonkey treats personal information see our
Privacy Basics
.
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
2.1 What do we mean by 'Personal Data'?
References in this Privacy Notice to data, personal information, or information, are all references to Personal Data. Personal Data means information relating to a living individual (a "Data Subject") who is, or can be, reasonably identified from the information, either alone or in conjunction with other information.
2.2 Who do we collect data about?
We group consumers or businesses into the following categories:
Creator
: the business or consumer that holds an account within a SurveyMonkey service that either directly creates surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires or that can collaborate, commenting, or review surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires within an account.
Respondent
: the individual that receives a survey, form, application, or questionnaire powered by a SurveyMonkey service.
Panelist
: the individual that uses Contribute or Rewards to take surveys sent by SurveyMonkey on behalf of Creators, or an individual that receives surveys through a third party panel provider. Privacy information specific to panelists can be found in our
Contribute Privacy Notice
,
Rewards Privacy Notice
, and
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
.
Visitor
: you are just visiting one of our websites because you are curious,  have been invited to review a survey as a guest, or you have heard about us from our marketing and sales channels!
2.3 Types of Personal Data We Collect
(a) Contact information.
You might provide us with your contact information (for example: name or email address), whether through use of our services, a form on our website, an interaction with our sales or customer support team, or a response to one of SurveyMonkey’s own surveys or forms.
(b) Cookie information.
We use first party and third party cookies and tracking services that employ cookies and page tags (also known as
web beacons
) to collect data about visitors to our websites. This data includes usage and user statistics. Emails sent by SurveyMonkey or by users through our services also include page tags that allow the sender to collect information about who opened those emails and clicked on links in them. We provide more information on cookies in our
Cookies Notice.
(c) Customer support information.
We collect information submitted through our Customer Support portal, such as name, email, and message text. We also record the content of Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales calls.
(d) Usage information.
We collect usage information about you whenever you interact with our websites and services. This includes which webpages you visit, what you click on, when you perform those actions, what language preference you have, what you buy and so on.
(e) Device and browser data.
We collect information from the device and application you use to access our services. Device data mainly means your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, browser type, and other device, network and browser signals. If you are on a mobile device we also collect the UUID for that device. We also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
(f) Event data.
Like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files contain data about the nature of each access, including originating IP addresses, internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type and timestamps.
(g) Referral information.
If you arrive at a SurveyMonkey website from an external source (such as a link on another website or in an email) or have been invited to review a survey as a guest, we record information about the source that referred you to us.
(h) Integration data.
We collect information from third parties with whom SurveyMonkey enables integrations in order to allow you to use both services.
(i) Account information.
Registration information.
You need a SurveyMonkey account before you can use SurveyMonkey services. When you register for an account, we collect your first and last name, username, password and email address.
Billing information.
If you make a payment to SurveyMonkey, we require you to provide your billing details, a name, address, email address and financial information corresponding to your selected method of payment (e.g., a credit card number and expiration date or a bank account number). If you provide a billing address, we will regard that as the location of the account holder to determine the SurveyMonkey entity with whom you contract and the sales tax, if applicable, to be applied to your purchase.
Account settings.
You can set various preferences and personal details on pages like your
account settings page
(or on your account settings page for our other products as applicable). These may include, for example, your default language, time zone and communication preferences (e.g., opting in or out of receiving marketing communications from SurveyMonkey).
(j) Address book information.
We may allow you to import email addresses and other contact information into an
Address Book
so you can easily invite people to take your surveys or fill in your form via our collectors. We do not use this data for our own purposes or to contact anyone, except at your direction.
(k) Survey/form/application data.
We store your survey/form/application data (questions and responses) for you and provide analysis tools for you to use with respect to this data.
(l) First party profile information.
When you sign up for our services you are asked to provide us with information about yourself and to give us more detailed insights into who you are. If you are in a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account this may include providing your photo so your administrator(s) and colleagues can identify you.
(m) Third party profile information.
We may combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn, ZoomInfo, and other data brokers) with information we hold about you to create a user profile.
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
3.1 Creator
We process Personal Data about you as a Creator where:
You have consented;
We need to
f
ulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interes
t; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.1.1
Consent
We rely on your consent to process the following data elements:
(a)
Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with collect data from and advertising cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses. We use this data to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices. We may do so, for instance, to tailor ads, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. You can withdraw your consent at any time.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
To learn more about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out of it, please see our
Cookies Notice
in Section 6. By clearing your cookies in your browser settings, you will no longer see personalized messages in this way but you continue to see ads over the internet that are not based on the information you provided to SurveyMonkey. Depending on your geographic location you can also withdraw your consent using our in-product cookie management tools.
(b) Contact information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries, send you information as part of the services, and send you marketing information. In jurisdictions where opt-in is required, we will only send you marketing materials based on your consent.
3.1.2
Contract
We collect and use the following data elements on the basis that we have to use this information in order to fulfill our contract with you:
(a) Account information.
We need to use your account information to run your account, provide you with services, bill you for our services, resolve disputes such as chargebacks and refund requests, provide you with customer support, and contact you or your organization about your service or account. These communications are of a transactional nature (e.g., service-related announcements, billing-related matters, changes to our services or policies, a welcome email when you first register). You cannot opt out of these communications since they are required to provide our services to you.
We may also use billing information in aggregate to adjust or manage pricing at the individual level or across all service users.
(b) Customer support information.
We will use information submitted through our Customer Support emails, chats, or phone calls, such as name, email, and message content, in order to provide you with customer support.
(c) Usage information.
We use data about how you use our services and how our services are performing to ensure that we’re meeting our service-level agreements (SLAs) or other contractual obligations to you.
(d) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it. We will also use this data to facilitate account verification and sign in and to enforce our password sharing and security policies. We collect this to help us improve your service experience through a specific device/browser by optimizing how the website looks in a particular browser, how your screen brightness affects your experience and to ensure the service operates optimally and as it should on different devices and browsers.
(e) Integration data.
We collect and use information from third parties and integration partners, where applicable to one of our services, to:
Ensure you can sign-up to our service from a third party integration like Facebook/LinkedIn/Microsoft/Google/SSO;
Ensure you can use our service in conjunction with other services.
See further information
here
on our API partners – for other SurveyMonkey services see below or on the website for that service.
(f) Survey questions and survey responses.
We use machine learning techniques on survey data in order to provide users with useful statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. For example, if you have used open text questions in a survey, our machine learning may provide you with useful insights into sentiment and/or the trends in responses to that question in our Analyze survey tool. You have a choice as regards whether or not to use some of these features. For further information see our Respondent Section.
(g) Aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses.
We use aggregated or de-identified information to provide users with useful benchmarking statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services.
We also use this data to enforce our agreements, where applicable.
3.1.3
Legitimate interests
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Contact information.
Where consent is not required, we use contact information to send you marketing information based on our legitimate interests for as long as you do not opt out. You can opt out of marketing communications at any time by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in emails or changing the relevant setting on your
My Account
page.
(b) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for you. This data is de-identified where possible.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our other services.
For example: We collect information about the types of surveys/forms/applications you create (e.g., HR surveys), the types of plans you purchase and your account transactional behavior to build a profile about you so as to help direct you and your organization to other relevant features and services we offer and to optimize user experience, for example by making recommendations to you or your organization.
We may also use usage information such as levels and nature of activity in your account and number of responses you are receiving to personalize the features and services we highlight for you and your organization in our Sites, improve user experience and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our services through our sales and marketing efforts.
(d) Event data.
We use events contained in log data for many different business purposes to include:
To create new services, features, content or make recommendations.
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services.
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
To investigate security issues.
For example: Your IP address is used to determine where an unknown/unauthorized access may have occurred in your account (abuse monitoring).
(e) First party information.
We process other aspects of your account information (like the personal information you provide about your job, your job title, and your marketing preferences) as well as information obtained from public sources, to provide you with a personalized experience and relevant and useful marketing information as well as to make other product, feature and service recommendations to you and your organization to optimize the use of the services we offer (where permitted by law).
You can object to us using your information as described above but in some cases, our ability to fully and properly provide our services to you may be impacted if you do not want us to collect or use the above data. Furthermore, if you are a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holder, your organization controls some of the data which you include in your profile and they can also edit or remove that information through the primary administrator(s) of that account.
(f) Third party information.
We combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn and ZoomInfo) with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve your service experience.
(g) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes.
(h) End page data.
If you use our survey tool, depending on the package you are on and the settings you have selected, your Respondents may reach the standard
survey end page
on completion of a survey. The end page is part of the SurveyMonkey website. We may include our own
research surveys
and polling on this end page. These surveys are optional for any Respondent to take or skip.
(i) De-identified Device Data.
We use aggregated or de-identified Device Data to extract usage patterns and to improve our services.
(j) De-identified Survey Data.
We use machine learning techniques on aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses to understand usage and improve our services.
3.1.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to use and disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or (where possible) de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.2 Respondent
We process Personal Data about you as a Respondent where:
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility to deliver the services to the Creator of the survey;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.2.1
Contract
(a) Contact information.
We only use contact information to respond to an inquiry on behalf of a Customer if you, as a Respondent, contact us.
(b) Cookies.
We use required cookies to ensure the operation of a Creator’s survey, form, application, or other SurveyMonkey product. These cookies are used to ensure that all aspects of the survey operate appropriately and optimally. For more information please read our
Cookies section below
and our
Respondent Cookies Notice
.
Examples: We use page tags to allow the email sender (for a survey or form for example) to measure the performance of email messaging and to learn how to improve email deliverability and open rates. We also use cookies to ensure a respondent can only take a survey once (where the Creator has set this function) and to track completion rates of surveys.
After completion of a survey, in most cases, you will be redirected to our website and treated as a website visitor where other cookies may be used so you should read our Website Visitor section if this is of interest to you.
(c) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
We use your device and browser data to provide our services to the Creator. For example: your IP address is used to ensure that you do not complete the same survey, form, application or questionnaire twice if the creator has included settings to avoid this (ballot stuffing).
(d) Inferred geographic location.
We also may infer your geographic location based on your IP address. This allows Creators to filter responses by inferred geographic location. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(e) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To create and improve services, features, content or make recommendations;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(f) Third parties and integration data.
We will collect and use information from third parties and integration partners to facilitate Creators in sending surveys/forms/applications/questionnaires to you.
(g) Survey response data.
SurveyMonkey may use first party machine learning or third party artificial intelligence tools on data around the type of survey the Creator has sent you, the question type, survey responses (at an aggregated and de-identified/pseudonymized level only), and device and event data associated with responses to  fulfill our contract with Creators and provide Creators with useful and relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. Specifically, we use machine learning on survey data to help Creators by:
identifying trends in their responses;
ongoing training of models to optimize responses;
making product recommendations and providing guidance on which products and services work best in different scenarios (For an example of this check out how SurveyMonkey Genius works here);
Extracting and analyzing usage patterns, for example, we might identify when respondents prefer multiple choice versus open text questions and make predictive response suggestions when certain question types are selected. We might also use this data to help improve analysis of responses;
undertaking personalization for survey Creators;
improving user experience (for example, by collecting and using device and browser information from Respondents to improve how our survey service operates on those devices and in those browsers or by altering questions to match the responses being provided by a Respondent); and
identify insightful data trends (which do not disclose Personal Data) and make recommendations to Creators based on those trends.
A Creator has some controls over how we use responses and may have opted-out of applying machine learning to responses where it is
linked to a specific product feature
in some cases.
3.2.2
Legitimate Interest
s
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to our customers about usage of our services.
For example: We collect information about the types of questions you answer. This data will be aggregated and/or de-identified where possible, so we can examine patterns in terms of respondent preferences when submitting responses. We collect and use all this data to help us improve our product so that questions are easier to answer and to help improve the completion rates on surveys/forms.
We will also use information such as the type of survey, form, questionnaire or application that you answered to personalize products we show you on completion of a survey and to understand trends in our service adoption. See more about
Customizing Survey End Page here
).
(b) Responses (in aggregated and/or de-identified form).
To build new product features.
(c) Inferred geographic location.
We may infer your geographic location based on your IP address to produce aggregated data around Respondent location trends. We will use this information to compare and look at trends on how our service operates and how you interact with surveys, on different browsers and devices. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(d) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present personalized advertisements such as display, videos, and content on the web or connected devices. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(e) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for our Customer. This data is de-identified where possible.
3.2.3
Legal obligation
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity . For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.3 Visitor
We process Personal Data about you as a Visitor where:
You have consented;
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
In some cases, as a former website visitor, we may not have any personal information about you (for example if you have not interacted with our site or have cleared your cookies).
3.3.1
Consent
When you have consented, we collect and use the following information about you:
(a) Contact Information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries or send you information about our services, either where you have agreed to this at the point of providing your information or where you operate in a business which may be interested in our services and for as long as you do not opt-out. opt-out of this marketing at any time.
(b) Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with may use or combine multiple technologies, such as non-required cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices such as tablets, browsers, and mobile phones. We may do so to tailor ads to users, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. We use this data to personalize online marketing campaigns to be relevant to you and your interests in our services. You can withdraw your consent at any time on our Cookie Banner.
If you do not want SurveyMonkey to use this information to serve you targeted ads about our services, you may indicate your preferences at
https://www.aboutads.info
,
https://preferences-mgr.truste.com/
or, if you are located in the European Union, at
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may continue to receive ads over the internet that are not based on information you provided to SurveyMonkey.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
3.3.2
Contract
(a) Device and event data.
We use device data to fix bugs and troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
(b) Comments/Content.
Any comments or content linked to you which you share if you are a guest invited to collaborate on a survey.
3.3.3
Legitimate Interest
s
We also carry out the following processing for legitimate business interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Third party profile information.
Where permitted by law, we combine information about you from third party sources with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve our marketing/sales campaigns and website experience
(b) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you have interacted with our websites to improve our website services for you and all users. Some examples relevant to you:
Examples: We collect information about the webpages you have visited and your activity on our sites at an aggregate level. We collect this information so that we can track the most visited and most useful parts of our website to identify what are our most popular services.
(d) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To monitor abuse and troubleshoot;
To track your preferences and create new services, features, content or make recommendations personalized for you;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(e) Customer Support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support. This data is de-identified where possible.
(f) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes. For example, if you clicked on an advertisement for one of our brands, presented by one of our partners on the web, which brought you to one of our websites, we will record this information to help us track the success of advertising campaigns.
3.3.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use event data:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To prevent potentially illegal activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
4.1 Information you share
Many of our services let you share information with others. Remember that when you share information publicly, it can be indexable by search engines. Our services provide you with different options on sharing and deleting your content but we cannot delete content from search engines so you need to be careful about information you make public.
4.2 Information we share
We do not share your information or data with third parties outside SurveyMonkey except in the following limited circumstances:
(a)
If you are a Creator that is part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your account information and data will be shared with the primary administrator(s) and your survey data may also be visible to other members in your team with whom you share your surveys or with whom you collaborate. Your administrator(s) will be able to view your account data, change your passwords, suspend, transfer or terminate your account or restrict your settings. Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(b)
If you are the primary administrator of a SurveyMonkey team plan, the team name and the domain of the email address on your account may be shared with an individual who has been invited to preview a survey created by one of the members of your team in order to facilitate their request to join the team. You can learn more about how to adjust Team Discovery settings
here.
(c)
If you are part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your plan’s administrator(s) can transfer your survey questions and responses to, or share them with, other members in your team, including your plan’s administrator(s) themselves.  Your plan’s administrator(s) can also delete your survey questions and responses.  Your plan’s administrator(s) may also have the ability to make changes to any aspects of your survey questions and analysis.  Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(d)
If your organization has purchased a SurveyMonkey Enterprise plan and you are using an email address on a domain owned by your employer or organization linked to your individual account, you may be asked to migrate to the SurveyMonkey Enterprise Account and your email address, name and account data will subsequently be visible to the primary administrator(s) for that account once you have been migrated. You may be notified in advance of this migration and given an opportunity to change the email address linked to your account if you are not using your account for business purposes.
(e)
To help us provide certain aspects of our services we use our affiliates and trusted key partners – in particular, we engage third parties to:
facilitate our collectors for sending surveys by email or text to Respondents. For email delivery, we use
SparkPost
and for text/SMS services we use
Twilio
. We share the relevant contact information for respondents (email address or phone number as applicable) with these third parties.
facilitate Creators in making
payments
.
to facilitate the delivery of certain features, for example if you use the “Create a survey using AI” we will send your survey prompts to our AI vendor. We recommend that you do not include Personal Data in these prompts but if you do they will be shared with the AI vendor.
to detect fraud (to include, for example, performing identify checks or verify malicious IPs).
deliver and help us track our marketing and advertising content.
help us track website conversion success metrics.
manage our sales and customer support services to you, including for resolving any disputes.
We enter into confidentiality and data processing terms with partners to ensure they comply with high levels of confidentiality and best practices in privacy and security standards and we regularly review these standards and practices. You can find more information in our
Subprocessor Statement
.
(f)
On your instructions, we share your information or data if you choose to use an integration in conjunction with SurveyMonkey services, to the extent necessary to facilitate that use. See further information
here
on our API partners.
(g)
We also may have to share information or data for the following purposes:
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request;
To enforce applicable policies, including investigation of potential violations;
To detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues;
To protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of our users, the public or to SurveyMonkey and/or as required or permitted by law; and
To facilitate a sale, merger or change in control of all or any part of our company or business or in preparation for any of these events.
5. Data retention
If you are a Creator, we generally do not delete the data in your account as long as your account is active – you are responsible for and control the time periods for which you retain this data. You can read about this
here
for account use. Here are some exceptions:
If you are a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) user on our platforms and you have not engaged with the service actively for some time, we reserve the right to delete your account and data in accordance with our data retention policy.
If you have exceeded your response limit as a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) account holder, we will delete the overages if you do not upgrade within a fixed timeframe.
We also encourage Creators to actively review their data retention practices in their account and take care to retain data only as long as is strictly necessary.
We also describe the expiry periods for cookies on our websites in our
Cookies Notice
.
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
We and our partners use cookies and similar technologies on our websites. For more information see our
Cookies Notice
. For information about cookies used in our surveys please see
Cookies used on Survey Pages
. If you are a customer of SurveyMonkey and separately use cookies or similar technologies in conjunction with any of our products and services, then you yourself will be responsible for complying with any laws related to the use of those technologies and this Privacy Notice is not applicable to that use by you.
You can also choose to remove or disable cookies via your
browser settings
and, depending on your geographic location you can withdraw consent to non-essential cookies using the in-product cookie preferences tool.
You can opt-out from direct marketing in your account and we provide opt-out options in all direct marketing emails. Finally, if you do not wish to see personalized marketing content on the web related to our service you can clear the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article on how to do this
here
.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
7. Security
We have a security statement related to our self-serve businesses (SurveyMonkey and Wufoo) available to view
here
. For information about security related to our other business lines you can speak to a sales representative by completing the form
here
.
8. Safety of Minors
Our services (including creating and responding to surveys) are not intended for and may not be used by minors. “
Minors
” are individuals under the age of 16 (or under a higher age as provided in certain countries or territories). SurveyMonkey does not knowingly collect Personal Data from Minors or allow them to register. If it comes to our attention that we have collected Personal Data from a Minor, we may delete this information without notice. If you have reason to believe that this has occurred, please contact customer support.
9. Data Transfers
Your information and data may be processed in and transferred or disclosed in the United States and countries in which our affiliates are located and in which our service providers are located or have servers. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. You can also read about data that is stored in our other data centers here in our
International Data Center Overview
. We ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection, for instance by entering into the appropriate back-to-back agreements with standard contractual clauses or other transfer mechanisms as approved by the European Commission or relevant data protection authority.
We have also provided a
help article
which answers some additional questions about data transfers to the US.
9.1
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles.
SurveyMonkey Inc. has self-certified its compliance under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. is committed to subjecting all personal information received from the European Union (EU) member countries, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the Framework’s applicable Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
SurveyMonkey Inc. also complies with the onward transfer liability provisions of the DPF.
When SurveyMonkey Inc. receives personal information under the DPF and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as agent on SurveyMonkey Inc.'s behalf, SurveyMonkey Inc. has certain liability under the DPF if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF and (ii) SurveyMonkey Inc. is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. In certain situations, SurveyMonkey Inc. may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the DPF, SurveyMonkey Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.  Please contact SurveyMonkey Inc. as described in Section 11 below if you have any concerns or complaints of any nature. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/How-to-Submit-a-Complaint-Relating-to-a-Participating-Organization-s-Compliance-with-the-DPF-Principles-dpf
, you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
10. Who is my data controller?
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback to a Creator using SurveyMonkey services, that Creator is the controller of your data, and SurveyMonkey is the processor of that data.
For SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holders, your organization’s primary administrator controls some basic account level information which you input when setting up your account like name, email address, and profile photo.
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback directly to SurveyMonkey, then SurveyMonkey is the controller and our use of that data is described by this Notice and in our
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
.
If you are a Creator and have received more responses than your plan allows (“overage data”), SurveyMonkey is the controller over the overage data until you change your plan type, or the overage data is deleted in accordance with section 12.4 of our
Terms of Use
or per the terms of your negotiated contract.
SurveyMonkey is a controller for the account-level data provided by its Creators and panelists from Contribute and Rewards. More information can be found in section 13.6 of this Privacy Notice.
11. Your rights
You may wish to exercise a right to obtain information about yourself or to correct, update or delete that information. For more information about these rights you can read about it
here
. Some of these rights may be subject to some exceptions or limitations in local law. Please note your rights and choices vary depending upon your location. We will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and we will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time (and in all cases within 30 days of receiving a request) subject to the below for specific categories of person.
11.1
Apply Applicants
For SurveyMonkey Apply users please see
information on how to exercise your rights here
.
11. 2 Creator
Where you hold an account with any SurveyMonkey service, you are entitled to a copy of all Personal Data which we hold in relation to you. You also may be entitled to request that we restrict how we use your data or object to some aspect of our treatment of your data. You can access a lot of your data in your own account when you log in. If you want to exercise your rights, please contact us
here
.
Depending on your plan type, SurveyMonkey also enables you to export your own response data from our system in a variety of formats so that you can back it up or use it with other applications. Alternatively, for assistance in exporting or deleting responses, you can contact us.
11.3 Respondent
Where you have responded to a survey, form, questionnaire or application sent to you by a Creator using a SurveyMonkey service, you will need to reach out directly to that individual or organization to discuss managing, deleting, accessing, restricting access to or otherwise withdrawing consent for use of the information which you provided to them in your responses. SurveyMonkey does not control your response data and, accordingly, is not in a position to directly handle these requests in relation to that data. If you are having difficulties finding this Creator or if you have any other questions after reading this Privacy Notice, you can
contact us
through
our support team
and we will try our best to help you.
11.4 Panelist
If you have created a Rewards or Contribute account with us, you can request a copy of your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, or correct it.
11.5 Visitor
Where you have visited our website and you want to exercise any of the above rights please contact our support team
here
. Alternatively, if your request is for the right to be forgotten as it relates only to our use of cookies you can achieve this by clearing the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article describing how to do this
here
.
11.6 Authorized Agent
If you are a third party organization acting on behalf of a data subject (or class of data subjects) to exercise data subject rights, we do work with you. In this case:
We ask you to follow our process outlined in this Privacy Notice for security reasons so that we can independently verify the Creator (if it is a Creator) making any requests to exercise their rights.
Where applicable, we directly interact with a Creator’s registered email address, because we authenticate users with username and unique password and not with other identifying information (e.g., photo ID or similar).
Please do not share other forms of personal identification for data subjects with us when submitting requests.
11.7
Other rights and choices
For rights and choices specific to US consumers, please refer to our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of your request as described in that Notice.
11.8
Contact
Except as explicitly provided herein, please use the following contact information for privacy inquiries
SurveyMonkey Inc.
910 Park Pl, Suite 300
San Mateo, California 94403
United States
Or contact us
here
.
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Ella House, Suite 40.4
40 Merrion Square East
Dublin 2
D02 NP96
Ireland
Or contact us
here
.
Data Protection Officer
: SurveyMonkey's Data Protection Officer is registered with the Irish Data Protection Commission.  Contact our DPO at
dpo@surveymonkey.com
.
Note that our contact form is the
best
way to make a rights request with us.
11.9
Complaints
If you are a resident in the European Union and you are dissatisfied with how we have managed a complaint you have submitted to us, you are entitled to contact your local data protection supervisory authority. As SurveyMonkey Europe UC operates its business in Ireland, it operates under the remit of the Irish Office of the Data Protection Commissioner (see:
IDPC Website
).
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
We can make changes to the
Privacy Basics
and this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will identify the changes we have made on
this page
. In circumstances where a change will materially change the way in which we collect or use your personal information or data, we will send a notice of this change to all of our account holders.
13. Privacy information specific to other services
Although this Privacy Notice applies to all our Services, some information may be specific to individual Services. Please see below for more information
13.1
TechValidate
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our TechValidate users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.1.1
TechFacts
TechFacts are published on an anonymous basis – that is, no Respondent Personal Information is displayed in a TechFact unless your Respondents authorize the use of their name and company affiliation. You are able to see the individual respondent’s identity in your account and, if you give a SurveyMonkey employee permission to view that response, then SurveyMonkey will also see this. However, we never publish or disseminate this information (unless you explicitly ask us to do so).
We assign a unique identification number to each TechFact. The ID will appear on each copy of the TechFact. Our site is designed so that visitors may look up and view TechFacts without the collection of any personal information (except for such visitor's internet protocol (IP) address).
13.2
SurveyMonkey Apply
SurveyMonkey Apply is an online application system that helps organizations collect applications, manage subscriptions and facilitate reviews. Our main Privacy Notice applies to
apply.surveymonkey.com
(“SurveyMonkey Apply”) except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is applicable only to our survey tool. Responses and Respondents in this section are intended as reference to applicants and their applications for the purposes of use of SurveyMonkey Apply.
When an applicant submits an application through SurveyMonkey Apply, their login information can be used for multiple applications across the SurveyMonkey Apply site.
If you have any questions about your personal information in the context of our SurveyMonkey Apply service, you can contact us
here
.
13.3
Wufoo
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our Wufoo users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.3.1
Your control over your form data
We store your form data (form content and responses) for you. You have the following controls over your form data:
Download/backup your form data. We provide you with the ability to export, share and publish your form data in a variety of formats. This allows you to create your own backups or work with your data offline. See
here
for data exporting instructions.
Delete your form data. You can delete your form data (including parts of forms, entire forms, and responses to forms) through your account's user interface. See
here
for how to delete form entries.
Cancel your Wufoo account. You can cancel your Wufoo account at any time through your account management page. Any cancellation of your Wufoo account will result in the deletion of your account and all form data stored in it. This data cannot be recovered once your account is cancelled. Please be aware that we may for a time retain residual information in our backup and/or archival copies of our database for up to 90 days.
We would like to emphasize that we will not use your form data to compete with you, market to your clients, or contact them for any other means of profit. We will also not sell your form data to anyone.
13.4
GetFeedback Digital (formerly Usabilla)
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Digital users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Digital’s service, in which case this Section takes precedence.
Information about GetFeedback Digital APIs is provided
here
.
Information about GetFeedback Digital partners is provided
here
.
We do not delete customer data unless the customer has instructed us to do so. You can delete your data at any time. You can also set a data retention period between 1-36 months after which data is automatically deleted.
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
To adjust your preferences and settings around data and information you must be logged into your account and/or can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com for assistance or you can read about this more
here
.
To exercise your data rights (as described in our main Privacy NoticeSection 14 above) you can use our
contact form
(please specify that this is a GetFeedback Digital request) or you can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com.
13.5
GetFeedback Direct
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Direct users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Direct's service, in which case this section takes precedence. If you are part of any of our early adopter programs our main Privacy Notice will apply to you.
13.5.1
Sentiment Analysis
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
13.5.2
Salesforce
GetFeedback Direct is a Salesforce ISVforce partner. If you have created a GetFeedback Direct account, the registration information you provide will be disclosed to Salesforce.com, Inc. and will be used by Salesforce.com, Inc. pursuant to its privacy policy (see
Salesforce Privacy Policy
). More information about how to automate emails in GetFeedback Direct using Salesforce is available
here
. Information about displaying a Post Chat Survey in Salesforce Chat can be found
here
.
13.5.3
Suppression Lists
You can manage your suppression lists and map these to Salesforce so as to ensure you comply with unsubscribe requests from your Respondents by following the steps outlined
here
. For clarity, we are not responsible for how you manage your suppression lists.
13.5.4
Contact Us
To exercise your rights (as described in Section 11 of the Privacy Notice), please contact the GetFeedback Direct support team at
help@getfeedback.com
.
13.6
Audience
If you are a panelist using our Rewards or Contribute apps, please read the following notices as they apply to your use of those Services:
SurveyMonkey Contribute Privacy Notice
SurveyMonkey Rewards Privacy Notice
If you are a panelist responding to a SurveyMonkey survey through a third party, please read the following notice as it applies to your use of those Services:
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 16
https://openjsf.org/privacy:
Privacy Policy
The OpenJS Foundation’s core purpose is to foster an ecosystem that supports the collaborative and public development of free and open source software projects (each, a “Project”).
The OpenJS Foundation’s core purpose is to foster an ecosystem that supports the collaborative and public development of free and open source software projects (each, a “Project”).  This privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) describes our policies and procedures about the collection, use, disclosure and sharing, or other processing of your personal information when you use OpenJS Foundation websites (e.g., openjsf.org) ), or participate in or use our Project sites (collectively, the “Sites”), as well as when you interact with or participate in our events, programs, trainings and our other services and offerings (collectively, the “Services”).
For purposes of the GDPR, the OpenJS Foundation (sometimes referred to by “we” or “our” below) is the controller of your personal information. Where processing of personal information is undertaken on our behalf by The Linux Foundation, they are a joint controller with the OpenJS Foundation for your personal information
Capitalized terms that are not defined in this Privacy Policy have the meaning given them in our Terms of Use (as applicable, the “Terms”), available at
https://terms-of-use.openjsf.org
.  In this Privacy Policy, “personal information” includes references to “personal data” as defined under applicable laws. Your use of our Sites and Services, and any dispute over privacy, is subject to this Policy and the relevant Terms, including the applicable limitations on damages and the resolution of disputes.  The Terms are incorporated by reference into this Policy.
The most recent version of this document can be found at
https://privacy-policy.openjsf.org
.
Personal Information That OpenJS Foundation Collects
We collect personal information directly from individuals, from third parties, and automatically through the Sites and Services. You do not have to provide us your personal information. However, if you choose not to disclose certain information, we will not be able to provide you with access to certain services or features, including account registration, event registration, training and certification programs, or participation in certain aspects of our open source projects.
Registration Information.
We collect personal information when you register for an account, a conference or other events or programs:
System ID, Account and Profile Information.
Users may sign up for, request, or order our Services and may register to receive materials on our Sites. Users may also be asked to create a “Linux Foundation ID”, which is a single sign-on account which is used for common access to many of our Services. Personal information collected on the Sites includes community forum content, profiles, photographs, names, unique identifiers (e.g., social media handles or usernames), contact and billing information (e.g., email address, postal address, telephone, fax), and transaction information. In order to access certain personalized services on the Sites, you may be asked to also create and store a username and password for an account from The Linux Foundation.  Also, in order to tailor subsequent communications to users and continuously improve the Sites’ operations and services, OpenJS Foundationmay also ask users to provide additional optional information regarding their interests, demographics, experience and detailed contact preferences.
Events Registration.
When you register for one of our events (e.g., conferences and summits) to participate as an attendee, a speaker or a sponsor, we collect personal information that includes name, company, contact information, and other information. We may also collect other optional personal information such as likes, interests, dietary restriction, size preferences for conference attire gifts and other background information.  In addition, if you provide it, we may collect (1) personal information about disabilities, medical conditions and allergies in order to provide appropriate accommodations for attendees, and (2) personal information about your citizenship, date of birth, and passport details if you request assistance from us with obtaining a visa letter to travel to one of our events.
Training and Certification Exam Registration.
When you participate in one of our training or certification programs, we collect registration-related personal information that includes name, company, certifications, contact information, and other information depending on the circumstances.
Registration for Project Resources and OpenJS Foundation Resources.
You can register to receive access to various resources provided by OpenJS Foundation and its Projects regarding the open source ecosystem, open source project development, collaboration and best practices. This includes providing us with personal information such as your email address and name to receive newsletters, mailing list postings and social media postings, to view webinars, and to access other resources made available by OpenJS Foundation and its Projects.
Your Contributions to Open Source Projects.
Attribution, Provenance and Integrity. When you contribute source code, documentation or other content to one of our Projects (whether on your own behalf or through contributions made as part of your employment services to your employer), we collect and store the information and content that you contribute. This includes the contents of those contributions, as well as information required to confirm the provenance of intellectual property contained in those contributions, and personal information that you make publicly available in the record of the contribution pursuant to sign-offs under the Developer Certificate of Origin (
https://developercertificate.org/
). Some Projects require additional agreements or information pursuant to their intellectual property policies; in such cases we collect and store information related to your acceptance of those agreements. We may also collect information relating to your participation in technical, governance or other Project-related meetings.
Other Project-related Content. The content you provide in relation to Projects also includes materials that you make publicly available in connection with Project development, collaboration and communication, such as on mailing lists, blogs, Project wiki pages and issue trackers, and related services.
Applicants for OpenJS Foundation Internships or Employment. We collect and store personal information relating to individuals who apply to participate in one or more of our Project-related internships. The personal information collected and stored for Project-related internships, may include your name, address, or other contact information. In addition, if you choose to provide it, we may collect personal information regarding your membership in a diverse or underrepresented group.
Your Content. We collect and store the information and content that you post to the Sites, including your questions, answers, comments, forum postings, and responses to surveys. Please see the section on Publicly Available Information for how the information you post will be viewed on our Sites.
Communications. When you communicate with us (via email, phone, through the Sites or otherwise), we may maintain a record of your communication.
Payment Information. To purchase Services (including registering for events, training and certification exams), users may be asked to be directed to a third-party site, such as Stripe, to pay for their purchases. If applicable, the third-party site may collect payment information directly to facilitate a transaction. OpenJS Foundation generally only records the result of the transaction and any references to the transaction record provided by the third-party site.
Automatically Collected Information. In addition, OpenJS Foundation may automatically collect the following information about users’ use of the Sites or Services through cookies, web beacons, and other technologies: your domain name; your browser type and operating system; web pages you view; links you click; your IP address; the length of time you visit our Sites and or use our Services; and the referring URL, or the webpage that led you to our Sites.  We may combine this information with other information that we have collected about you, including, where applicable, your user name, name, and other personal information. Please see our
Cookie Policy
for more information about our use of cookies.
De-identified Information. We may de-identify and aggregate certain personal information we collect such that the information no longer identifies or can be linked to a particular user or an individual data subject (“De-identified Information”), subject to the terms of any applicable user agreements. We may use this information to improve our Services, analyze trends, publish market research, and for other marketing, research or statistical purposes, and may disclose such information to third parties for these specific purposes.
Purposes and Legal Bases for Our Using of Your Personal Information
Purposes and Legitimate Interests
OpenJS Foundation and the Linux Foundation use the personal information we collect for our legitimate business interests, which include the following purposes:
Providing our Sites and Services. To provide the Services and our Sites (including Project Sites), to communicate with you about your use of our Sites and Services, to respond to your inquiries, provide troubleshooting of the Sites and for other purposes to support users and the community.
Operating our Open Source Projects. To enable communication between and among open source developers in the community; to facilitate and document Project governance and technical decision-making; to maintain, and make publicly available on a perpetual basis, records regarding intellectual property provenance and license compliance for Project contributions; and for related activities to further our core purpose of fostering an ecosystem that supports the collaborative and public development of free and open source software projects. See the “Attribution, Provenance and Integrity” section above for more information.
Maintain our Training and Certification Programs. To maintain records about who has attended or registered to attend training programs, take certification exams and received certain certifications.
Event Administration. To plan, organize, and facilitate access to events and related services and activities, and to carry out informative and safe events for participants, including attendees, speakers and sponsors.  If you provide us information about disabilities, medical conditions and allergies, we will use this information in order to provide appropriate accommodations for attendees and to ensure their health and safety; we will not use this information for other purposes, unless required by law or as necessary to defend our legal rights. If you request assistance from us for obtaining a visa letter to travel to one of our events and provide us with information required for such assistance (such as your citizenship, date of birth, and passport details), we will use this information in order to assist with providing you a visa letter; we will not use this information for other purposes, unless required by law or as necessary to defend our legal rights.
Internship Applications. To select participants for our Project-related internship programs, including the evaluation and selection of interns and employees from among applicants. If you choose to provide information regarding your membership in a diverse or underrepresented group, we will use this information in connection with internship diversity programs we may operate; we will not use this information for other purposes, unless required by law or as necessary to defend our legal rights.
Personalization. To tailor the content and information that we may send or display to you on our Sites and in our Services, to offer location customization and personalized help and instructions and to otherwise personalize your experiences.
Marketing and Promotions. For marketing and promotional purposes, such as to send you news and newsletters, special offers, and promotions, or to otherwise contact you about Projects, Services, events, trainings or other information we think may interest you related to OpenJS Foundation, and, subject to applicable law, our service providers.
Advertising.  For targeting advertising to you on our Sites and third-party sites and measuring the effectiveness and reach of ads and services (through third-party ad networks and services).
Analytics.  To gather metrics to better understand how users access and use our Sites and Services and participate in our Projects; to evaluate and improve the Sites, including personalization, to develop new services; and to understand metrics regarding the community health of our Projects. If a user voluntary provides and explicitly consents to our processing of personal information regarding their demographics and socioeconomics, we process such personal information for the specific purposes for which you have consented, which may include for the purpose of compiling, analyzing and disclosing aggregate statistics regarding diversity of participation in open source projects and communities, to help track progress towards meeting OpenJS Foundation’s commitment to diversity initiatives and subject to your consent.
Compliance. To comply with legal obligations and requests. For example, to comply with laws that compel us to disclose information to public authorities, courts, law enforcement or regulators, maintain records for a certain period, or maintain records demonstrating enforcement and sublicensing of our trademarks and those of our Projects.
Business and Legal Operations. As part of our general business and legal operations (e.g., accounting, record keeping, and for other business administration purposes), and as necessary to establish, exercise and defend (actual and potential) legal claims.
Prevent Misuse. Where we believe necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person or violations of the relevant Terms or this Privacy Policy.
Purposes and Legal Bases
Purposes of Processing
(see above)
Legal Bases of Processing (EU Users)
Providing our Sites and Services
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where Necessary to Enter into or Perform a Contract with You (upon your request, or as necessary to make the Services available)
Compliance with Law
Where permitted, with Your Consent (where we process any sensitive personal information you voluntarily provide – e.g., for diversity-related purposes)
Operating our Open Source Projects
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where Necessary to Enter into or Perform a Contract with You (upon your request, or as necessary to enable your participation in the Projects or to make the Services available)
Compliance with Law
As Necessary to Establish, Exercise and Defend Legal Claims
Internship and Employment Applications
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where Necessary to Enter into or Perform a Contract with You (upon your request, or as necessary relating to Your application for an internship)
Compliance with Law
Where permitted, with Your Consent (where we process any sensitive personal information you voluntarily provide – e.g., for diversity-related purposes)
Event Administration
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where Necessary to Enter into or Perform a Contract with You (upon your request, or as necessary to make the Services available)
Compliance with Law
With Your Consent (in particular regarding your sensitive personal information – e.g., disability and medical conditions and information related to a visa letter request)
Offer Training and Certification Programs
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where Necessary to Enter into or Perform a Contract with You (upon your request, or as necessary to make the Services available)
Personalization
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Marketing and Promotions
Our Legitimate Business Interests, and those of the Linux Foundation
With Your Consent
Advertising
Our Legitimate Business Interests
With Your Consent
Analytics
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Where permitted, with Your Consent (where we process any sensitive personal information you voluntarily provide – e.g., for diversity-related purposes)
Compliance
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Compliance with Law
As Necessary to Establish, Exercise and Defend Legal Claims
Business and Legal Operations
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Compliance with Law
As Necessary to Establish, Exercise and Defend Legal Claims
Prevent Misuse
Our Legitimate Business Interests
Compliance with Law
As Necessary to Establish, Exercise and Defend Legal Claims
Sharing of Personal Information
We disclose personal information as set forth below, and where individuals have otherwise consented:
Publicly Available Information, including Your Contributions to Open Source Projects. User names, other user ids, email addresses and other attribution information related to the information and contributions that a User posts in conjunction with or subject to an Open Source license are publicly available in the relevant Project source code repositories. Your contributions to Open Source Projects, and certain of your other Content such as comments and messages posted to public forums, are available to other participants and users of our Projects and of our Services, and may be viewed publicly. In some cases you may be able to provide Project or contribution-related information directly to third-party sites and services; these third parties are independent data controllers and their use of your personal information is subject to their own policies.
Service Providers. We may share your information with third party service providers who use this information to perform services for us, such as payment processors, hosting providers, auditors, advisors, contractors and consultants. In addition, The Linux Foundation performs services for OPenJS Foundation as a managed services provider with regards to our Projects. In such cases, we may share with The Linux Foundation the same types of data as described above, doing so in the furtherance of performing Services for those Projects. The Linux Foundation’s privacy policy is available at
https://www.linuxfoundation.org/privacy/
.
Organizational Events. We may disclose or transfer information, including personal information, as part of any merger, sale, and transfer of our assets, or restructuring of all or part of our business operations, bankruptcy, or similar event, including in negotiations, due diligence, and integrations related to such transactions.
Event Participants. If you register for an event, we may ask for your consent to share your personal information with third party sponsors and other participants; for example, to facilitate your ability to swipe your badge to easily sign up for or participate in activities, events and gifts offered by third parties participating in the event, or to give you the option to be listed on the attendee list that is available to other attendee, sponsors and participants.  We will not share your event information with third parties without your consent, and in particular you have the choice whether or not to permit your badge to be swiped by any third party participating in the event.
Training and Program Sponsors. If you participate in one of our certification or training programs that a third party has sponsored or engaged us to provide to you and others (e.g., your employers), we may receive attendee list information from them and may share information about your completion of the program, including confirmation of your participation and your certification exam results, as applicable; these third parties are independent data controllers and their use of your personal information is subject to their own policies. You may also elect to provide third parties (e.g., your employers or your prospective employers) with information that will enable them to look up your certification exam status; if you do so, we may share your certification exam status with such third parties.
Legally Required. We may disclose your information if we are required to do so by law (including to law enforcement in the U.S. and other jurisdictions).
Protection of Rights. We may disclose information where we believe it necessary to respond to claims asserted against us or, comply with legal process (e.g., subpoenas or warrants), enforce or administer our agreements and terms, for fraud prevention, risk assessment, investigation, and protect the rights, property or safety of OpenJS Foundation, its Users, participants in its events or Projects, or others.
Anonymized and Aggregated Information. We may share aggregate or De-identified information with third parties for research, marketing, analytics and other purposes, provided such information does not identify a particular individual.
Cookies, Tracking, and Interest-Based Ads
We and our third-party providers use cookies, clear GIFs/pixel tags, JavaScript, local storage, log files, and other mechanisms to automatically collect and record information about your usage and browsing activities on our Site and across third party sites or online services. We may combine this information with other information we collect about users. Below, we provide a brief summary of these activities. For more detailed information about these mechanisms and how we collect activity information, see our
Cookie Policy
.
Cookies. These are small files with a unique identifier that are transferred to your browser through our websites. They allow us to remember users who are logged in, to understand how users navigate through and use the Sites, and to display personalized content and targeted ads (including on third party sites and applications).
Pixels, web beacons, clear GIFs. These are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies, which we track browsing activities. We use these as part of our Training Affiliate Program. We also use these in our emails to let us know when they have been opened or forwarded, so we can gauge the effectiveness of our communications.
Analytics Tools. We may use internal and third-party analytics tools, including
Google Analytics
. The third-party analytics companies we work with may combine the information collected with other information they have independently collected from other websites and/or other online products and services. Their collection and use of information is subject to their own privacy policies.
Please note that OpenJS Foundation does not respond to browser “do not track” signals or other similar mechanisms intended.
Targeted Ads.  As discussed in our Cookie Policy, we may work with third party advertisers to display more relevant ads on our website and on third party sites; these third parties may display ads to you based on your visit to our Sites and other third party sites.  For more information about this and how you can opt out of such ads, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Data Security
We have implemented commercially reasonable precautions designed to protect the information we collect from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction. Please be aware that despite our best efforts, no data security measures can guarantee 100% security.
You should take steps to protect against unauthorized access to your passwords, phone, and computer by, among other things, signing off after using a shared computer, choosing robust passwords that nobody else knows or can easily guess, not using a password for more than one site or service, and keeping your log-ins and passwords private. We are not responsible for any lost, stolen, or compromised passwords or for any activity on your account via unauthorized password activity.  We ask you to promptly notify us if you become aware that any information provided by or submitted to our Sites or through our Services is lost, stolen, or used without permission at privacy@openjsf.org.
Marketing Choices
You may opt out of or withdraw your consent to receive direct marketing emails from us by using the unsubscribe or opt out mechanisms included in our marketing emails or by emailing privacy@openjsf.org. You may also unsubscribe from mailing lists via the applicable mailing list’s subscription website or, in some cases, by using the unsubscribe mechanisms included in such emails.
Retention of Your Personal Information
We generally keep personal information only for as long as required to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected. However, in some circumstances, we may retain personal information for other periods of time, for instance where we are required to do so in accordance with legal, tax and accounting requirements, or if required to do so by a legal process, legal authority, or other governmental entity having authority to make the request, for so long as required.  In specific circumstances, we may also retain your personal information for longer periods of time corresponding to a statute of limitation, so that we have an accurate record of your dealings with us in the event of any complaints or challenges.
International Transfers
If you are located within the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom or Switzerland, you should note that your personal information will be transferred to countries outside these jurisdictions, including the United States where OpenJS Foundation is located.  The U.S. is deemed by the European Union to provide inadequate data protection.  However, we have put in place European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses to provide for adequate safeguards to protect personal information transferred outside these jurisdictions, including between OpenJS Foundation and service providers.  In addition, if personal information is transferred to third party service providers located outside these jurisdictions, we will take steps to ensure that your personal information receives the same level of protection as if it remained within these jurisdictions, including by entering into data transfer agreements, using the European Commission approved Standard Contractual Clauses or other safeguards as approved by the European Commission. You have a right to obtain details of the mechanism under which your personal information is transferred outside of the EU by emailing gdpr@openjsf.org.
Children’s Privacy
Except as specifically indicated within a Site, we do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from anyone under the age of sixteen (16), or knowingly allow such persons to register. If we become aware that we have collected personal information from a child under the relevant age without parental consent, we take steps to delete that information. Where we specifically indicate that we collect personal information from children under 16, we will obtain the parent or guardian’s consent and provide adequate notice.
Links to Third Party Sites and Services
The Sites may contain links to third party sites or online services. Please refer to the privacy policies of the relevant third party websites or services to find out more about how they process and handle personal information.
Your Rights
Access and Amendment. You may contact our privacy coordinator, as set forth below, to access or amend your personal information.
Additional Rights. Individuals in the European Economic Area (and other jurisdictions where applicable) have additional rights under applicable law:
to obtain a copy of your personal information together with information about how and on what legal basis that personal information is processed;
to rectify inaccurate personal information (including to have incomplete personal information completed);
to erase your personal information (in limited circumstances, such as where it is no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which it was collected or processed);
to restrict processing of your personal information under certain circumstances;
to export certain personal information in machine-readable format to a third party (or to you) when we justify our processing on the basis of your consent or the performance of a contract with you and the processing is carried out by automated means;
to withdraw your consent to our processing of your personal information (where that processing is based on your consent, without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal);
to obtain, or see a copy of the appropriate safeguards under which your personal information is transferred to a third country or international organization; and
to object to our use and processing of your personal information that is conducted on the basis of our legitimate interest. You also have the right to object at any time to any processing of your personal information for direct marketing purposes, including profiling for marketing purposes.
Lodging a Complaint. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with your local supervisory authority for data protection, or privacy regulator. A list of data protection supervisory authorities is available
here
.
Submitting a Request. To exercise the above rights or contact us with questions or complaints regarding our treatment of your personal information, contact us at gdpr@openjsf.org. Please note that we may request proof of identity, and we reserve the right to charge a fee where permitted by law, especially if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive. We will respond to your request within the applicable timeframes set out by law.
California Privacy Rights
California law permits users who are California residents to request and obtain from us once a year, free of charge, a list of the third parties to whom we have disclosed their personal information (if any) for their direct marketing purposes in the prior calendar year, as well as the types of personal information disclosed to those parties. If you are a California resident and would like to request this information, please submit your request in an email to privacy@openjsf.org. We may ask you to verify your California residency.
Contact Us
If you have any questions about our practices or this Privacy Policy, please contact us at privacy@openjsf.org, or write to us at: OpenJS Foundation, Attn: Legal Department, 1 Letterman Drive, Building D, Suite D4700, San Francisco, CA 94129.
Changes to the Privacy Policy
This Policy is current as of the effective date set forth above. If we change our privacy policies and procedures, we will post those changes on this page and/or continue to provide access to a copy of the prior version. If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy that materially change how we treat your personal information, we will endeavor to provide you with reasonable notice of such changes, such as via prominent notice on our Sites or to your email address of record, and where required by law, we will obtain your consent or give you the opportunity to opt out of such changes.
Last updated 11-21-2019
Sub-policy 17
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Sub-policy 18
https://fontawesome.com/privacy:
Last
updated:
November 11, 2024
Privacy Policy
Dive into the data Font Awesome collects about you. Here we explain what we collect and when we collect it. You can also learn about how it's used -
          and as importantly, how it's not used. Lastly, let's walk through how you can control and manage this data.
On This Page
What is Font Awesome?
How does Font Awesome collect data about me?
What data does Font Awesome collect about me, and why?
How can I make choices about data collection?
Where does Font Awesome store data about me?
Does Font Awesome comply with the EU General Data Protection Regulation?
Where can I see, change, and erase data about me?
Does Font Awesome share data about me with others?
How can I contact Font Awesome about privacy?
How can I find out about changes?
Content Delivery Network Providers
Payment Processors
Other Services
EU-U.S. Data Protection Framework Statement and Policy
Link to "What is Font Awesome?"
What is Font Awesome?
Font Awesome is the company home of
Font Awesome Icons
, libraries of free-to-use and paid icons. As a company, Font Awesome publishes icons
        on its website,
fontawesome.com
, as well through
content delivery networks
for use on customers' websites.
Font Awesome sets only its own privacy policy, not the privacy policies of Font Awesome customers, affiliates, or others who use Font Awesome icons.
        You should ask all of those involved in administering and hosting websites that you use for their privacy policies.
Link to "How does Font Awesome collect data about me?"
How does Font Awesome collect data about me?
Font Awesome collects data about you:
when you browse
fontawesome.com
when you use Font Awesome's
content delivery networks
, or visit websites that do
when you create and use an account on
fontawesome.com
when you buy products and services from Font Awesome through the
fontawesome.com
web store
when you contact Font Awesome by e-mail for support or other help
Font Awesome does not buy or otherwise receive data about you from data brokers.
Link to "What data does Font Awesome collect about me, and why?"
What data does Font Awesome collect about me, and why?
Font Awesome collects data about visits to fontawesome.com.
When you visit
fontawesome.com
, whether you have an account or not, the site uses cookies, server logs, and other
          methods to collect data about what pages you visit and when.
Font Awesome uses data about how you use the website to:
optimize the website, so it's quick and easy to use
diagnose and debug technical errors
defend the website from abuse and technical attacks
associate your browsing session with an affiliate, if you click throug h an affiliate's referral link
associate your account with an affiliate, if you buy after clicking thr ough an affiliate's referral link
compile statistics on icon popularity
compile statistics on the kinds of software and computers visitors use
Font Awesome usually stores data about how you use the forum in identifiable form for just a few weeks. In special circumstances, like extended
          investigations about technical attacks, Font Awesome may preserve log data longer, for analysis. Font Awesome stores aggregate statistics about use
          of the website indefinitely, but those statistics don't include data identifiable to you personally.
Font Awesome collects data about use of its content delivery networks.
Content delivery networks are worldwide networks of computer servers that make sure everyone online can download files quickly from servers near to
          them. Font Awesome uses content delivery networks to serve files for its free and
Pro
icons. Many websites using Font Awesome
          icons have visitors download the icons from Font Awesome's content delivery networks.
When you visit a website that uses a Font Awesome content delivery network to load icons, Font Awesome collects data about what icon files you
          download and when.
Font Awesome uses data about how you use Font Awesome content delivery networks to:
optimize the content delivery networks, so website visitors can down load files quickly
diagnose and debug technical errors
defend the content delivery networks from abuse and technical attacks
calculate fees for Font Awesome Pro customers
compile statistics on icon popularity
compile statistics on the kinds of software and computers visitors use
Font Awesome usually stores data about how you use content delivery networks in identifiable form for just a few weeks. In special circumstances,
          like extended investigations about technical attacks, Font Awesome may preserve log data longer, for analysis. Font Awesome stores aggregate
          statistics about use of content delivery networks indefinitely, but those statistics don't include data identifiable to you personally.
Font Awesome collects account data.
To buy
Font Awesome Pro
, access Pro files, and configure Pro services like
content delivery networks
, you need a
fontawesome.com
account. To sign up for an account, Font Awesome requires your e-mail address, you may optionally provide your name, your company's name and other
          preference data.
Font Awesome uses your account data to identify you on
fontawesome.com
.
Font Awesome uses your e-mail address to:
announce new versions of
Pro
icons, software, and services
advertise new Font Awesome products and services
send you alerts about Pro services
reset your password and help keep your account secure
contact you in special circumstances related to your account
contact you about legal requests
Font Awesome stores your account data as long as your account remains open.
Font Awesome collects payment card data.
To buy licenses and sign up for
Font Awesome Pro
, Font Awesome requires your payment card data. Font Awesome does not collect or store enough information to charge your card itself. Rather, Font
          Awesome's
payment processors
collect that data on Font Awesome's behalf, and gives Font Awesome security tokens that allow Font Awesome to create charges and subscriptions.
Font Awesome uses your payment card data only to charge for Font Awesome products and services. Font Awesome instructs its payment processors to
          store your payment card data only as long as you use paid Font Awesome services.
Link to "How can I make choices about data collection?"
How can I make choices about data collection?
You're free to visit
fontawesome.com
without logging in. You may also configure your web browser to disable cookies when visiting the website.
You can set your cookie preferences by clicking the "Cookie Preferences" link located in the footer of all pages.
You can opt out of Google Analytics using a
browser extension
.
Font Awesome does not respond to the
Do Not Track HTTP header
.
Link to "Where does Font Awesome store data about me?"
Where does Font Awesome store data about me?
Font Awesome stores account data, data about website use, and data about content delivery network use on servers in the United States of America.
Content delivery network servers are located worldwide, and store data about their use wherever they are located.
Link to "Does Font Awesome comply with the EU General Data Protection Regulation?"
Does Font Awesome comply with the EU General Data Protection Regulation?
Font Awesome respects privacy rights under
Regulation (EU) 2016/679
, the European Union's General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR). Information that GDPR requires Font Awesome to give can be found throughout these
    questions and answers.
Link to "How is Font Awesome in Compliance with GDPR if my Data is Transferred Internationally?"
How is Font Awesome in Compliance with GDPR if my Data is Transferred Internationally?
International transfers are allowed via the adequacy decision associated with the EU-U.S. Data Protection Framework.
Link to "Where can I see, change, and erase data about me?"
Where can I see, change, and erase data about me?
You can see and change your account data at any time by visiting your account page on
fontawesome.com
.
You can download a copy of all the data Font Awesome currently has about you
here
(requires login).
You can cancel your
Font Awesome Pro
subscription at any time. Canceling subscription will also start the process of deleting your account data.
Link to "Does Font Awesome share data about me with others?"
Does Font Awesome share data about me with others?
Font Awesome does not sell or give information about you to other companies or services. However, Font Awesome does use services from other companies
        to provide
fontawesome.com
,
content delivery networks
, and to distribute and develop icons and
        software. The companies behind those services may collect data about you on their own, for their own purposes. Some of these services may be used to
        collect information about your online activities across different websites. All of these services are based in the United States.
Affiliates are companies or individuals who recommend Font Awesome and refer customers through links that enable us to pay them a sales commission. We
        do not share any personally identifiable data about you with affiliates, even if you purchase Font Awesome through an affiliate's link. We provide
        affiliates with summary reports of sales and commissions, and a detail report that shows time-stamped log entries of when sales occur.
Link to "Content Delivery Network Providers"
Content Delivery Network Providers
Font Awesome uses content delivery network service providers to provide its
content delivery networks
:
Service
Privacy Notice
Cloudflare
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy
Link to "Payment Processors"
Payment Processors
Font Awesome uses payment processing services to collect and use
payment card data
:
Service
Privacy Notice
Braintree
https://www.braintreepayments.com/legal/braintree-privacy-policy
PayPal
https://paypal.com/privacy
Stripe
https://stripe.com/privacy
Link to "Other Services"
Other Services
Font Awesome use several other services to run
fontawesome.com
, the
content delivery networks
, communicate with users and customers,
      and operate its business:
Service
Privacy Notice
Description
Amazon Web Services
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy
Provides cloud servers and services for running websites.
Basecamp
https://basecamp.com/about/policies/privacy
Manages Font Awesome team projects.
Backerkit
https://www.backerkit.com/privacy_policy
Manages Kickstarter campaign rewards delivery and shipping logistics.
GitHub
https://help.github.com/privacy-policy
Hosts source code and a private repository for Pro customers.
Google Analytics
https://www.google.com/analytics/terms
Compiles visitor statistics on
fontawesome.com
HelpScout
https://www.helpscout.net/company/legal/terms-of-service
Facilitates response to support questions.
Kickstarter
https://www.kickstarter.com/privacy
Hosts crowd-funding campaigns.
Sentry
https://sentry.io/privacy
Tracks technical errors.
Link to "How can I contact Font Awesome about privacy?"
How can I contact Font Awesome about privacy?
You can send privacy-related questions, complaints, and requests to Font Awesome at
privacy@fontawesome.com
.
For complaints under GDPR more generally, European Union users may lodge complaints with their local data protection supervisory authorities.
Link to "How can I find out about changes?"
How can I find out about changes?
This version of Font Awesome's privacy questions and answers took effect
November 11, 2024
.
Font Awesome will post the next version at
https://fontawesome.com/privacy
. Font Awesome may change how it announces changes in future versions.
      In the meantime, Font Awesome may update
its contact information
and
list of service providers
without announcing a change. Please refer to
https://fontawesome.com/privacy
for the latest information at any time.
Link to "EU-U.S. DPF Statement and Policy"
EU-U.S. DPF Statement and Policy
This EU-U.S. DPF Statement and Policy (this “policy”) explains the rights and policies concerning Fonticons, Inc.’s (“we,” “our,” or the “company’s”)
      collection, use, sale, and sharing of the personal information relating to any user (“you”) of our website, products, services, and other online tools
      and resources. We may update and make changes to this policy, so we encourage you to review it periodically. This policy only addresses specific matters
      concerning collection, use, sale, and sharing of certain personal information. The terms herein supplement and amend our other policies, including but
      not necessarily limited to any of our other privacy policies. For additional information regarding how the company addresses privacy matters, please
      review all of our posted policies. It is the intention of our policy to ensure compliance with EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the
      EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and to safeguard the rights created and outlined therein as such rights relate to citizens of
      the EU, UK, and Switzerland.
Personal Data We Collect About You.
We collect information to provide goods and/or services to you, to help improve your customer experience,
        and to support our business functions. We may collect the following categories of consumer personal data:
Identifiers:
Information that identifies, relates to, describes, or is capable of being associated with, a particular individual such as
          your name and email address.
Commercial information:
Purchase and transaction history, as well as information necessary to detect and prevent fraud when processing
          payments.
Quantitative Site Use:
Information pertaining to your use of our site, such as page views, the source of your visit, views of content
          during a visit, bandwidth utilized, stored video preferences, and information provided by you regarding your profile.
Geolocation data.
Why We Use Your Personal Information.
We use your consumer personal information for the following business purposes:
Maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying customer information,
          processing payments, providing financing, providing analytic services, providing storage, or providing similar services;
Advertising or marketing;
Helping to ensure security and integrity and prevent fraud;
Undertaking activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of our services or devices and to improve, upgrade, or enhance them;
Auditing or monitoring of transactions and engagements;
Compliance with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Conducting research and analysis;
To conduct other activities for legitimate business purposes
Third Parties.
The information described herein may be stored on servers owned by third parties in the ordinary course of business.
Our Participation in the EU-U.S. DPF.
In order to comply with certain domestic and international legal requirements, we participate in the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (the "EU-U.S.
          DPF"). If you would like additional information regarding the EU-U.S. DPF other than what is contained in our Privacy Policy, such information is
          available at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
As described herein, Fonticons, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with offices in the State of Arkansas and State of Missouri, collects certain personal
          information (described above) and shares it with certain other parties (described above). As part of our participation in EU-U.S. DPF, we adhere to
          certain Principles, as described on and defined by the EU-U.S. DPF website (the "Principles"). Any of our subsidiaries also adhere to such
          Principles.
It is the intention of this policy to ensure compliance with EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S.
          Data Privacy Framework, and to safeguard the rights created and outlined therein as such rights relate to citizens of the EU, UK, and Switzerland.
Fonticons, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data
          Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Fonticons, Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce
          that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received
          from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Fonticons, Inc. has certified
          to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to
          the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this
          privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data
          Privacy Framework (DPF) Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
As described herein, Fonticons, Inc., a Delaware corporation, with offices in the State of Arkansas and State of Missouri, collects certain personal
          information (described above) and shares it with certain other parties (described above). As part of our participation in EU-U.S. DPF, we adhere to
          certain Principles, as described on and defined by the EU-U.S. DPF website (the “Principles”). Any of our subsidiaries also adhere to such
          Principles.
We are committed to applying the Principles to all data we receive from the EU in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF.
The purposes for which we collect certain personal data is described above.
If you need to contact us, regarding inquiries, or complaints, you can reach us by email at
dpo@awesome.me
or
privacy@fontawesome.com
, or by clicking Help on
          any page at
https://fontawesome.com
". In addition, certain EU officials and organizations may be able to
          respond to your inquiries or complaints. You may find their contact information at
https://edps.europa.eu/about-edps/contact_en
or
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/more-about-edpb/contact-us_en
As described herein, the information we retain may be stored on servers owned by third parties.
You have a right to access the data that we collect about you. If you would like to do so, please contact us via the methods listed above.
Certain personal data, your email for example, is required for the use of our services. Therefore, if you do not wish for us to collect or store any
          of your personal data, then we will be unable to provide services to you.
An independent dispute resolution body is available to address complaints and provide recourse free of charge to you concerning the issues set forth
          herein. Specifically, we have elected the JAMS Data Privacy Framework for disputes relating to EU-U.S. DPF. If you need to open a dispute resolution
          matter relating to EU-U.S. DPF, information is available here:
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
Our services, including the activities described herein, may be subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the FTC.
By utilizing our services, you agree that, except as described herein and subject to the limitations of the laws of relevant jurisdictions, all
          matters relating to EU-U.S. DPF shall be subject to binding arbitration. You may initiate binding arbitration in the event that any dispute
          resolution procedures described by paragraph 4(xi) herein are unsuccessful. Information regarding initiating binding arbitration is available here:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction
In the event we receive a lawful request by a public or legal authority, such as a subpoena, we are required to abide by such requests and may be
          required to disclose data containing your personal information, even if you would prefer that we do not make such disclosure. Such disclosures may
          be required to be made in situations including, but not limited to, the necessity to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
The rights and obligations contained in this Privacy Policy shall inure to the benefit or our, and your, heirs, successors, and assigns.
Opting Out.
You have the opportunity to choose to opt out of your personal information (i) being disclosed to a third party or (ii) being
        used for a purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by the
        individuals. To exercise such option, you can reach us by email at
dpo@awesome.me
or
privacy@fontawesome.com
, or by clicking Help on any page at
https://fontawesome.com
". For your reference, we do not gather personal information specifying medical or
        health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or information specifying
        the sex life of any individual
Our Liability.
The Recourse, Enforcement and Liability Principle of the Principles explains that, if we wrongfully transfer your data, we
        have continuing responsibility for the processing of such personal information. In such case, we remain liable under the Principles if our agent
        processes your personal information in a manner inconsistent with the Principles, unless we prove that we were not responsible for the event giving
        rise to the damage.
More Information.
For more information concerning the Principles, please see
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/program-articles/FAQs
Font Awesome Pro License
See how and where you can use Font Awesome
Pro
's icons and software in your projects and work.
Font Awesome Free License
Read the details on how you can use Font Awesome Free pretty much anywhere and everywhere.
Terms of Service
Understand what terms and expectations we have of you when using Font Awesome's icons, software, and services.
Sub-policy 19
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/:
Solutions
By topic
By need
By industry
Public interest
Global services
Connectivity cloud
Contact sales
Products
Our products
For your employees
For apps and infrastructure
For developers
Register domain name
Get 1.1.1.1
Need help choosing?
Latest product news
Contact sales
Pricing
Our plans & pricing
Enterprise plan
Compare all plans
Need help choosing?
View FAQs
Contact sales
Resources
Library
Documentation
Getting Started
Application Security
Application Services
Zero Trust Services
Developer Platform
Network Services
Insights
API
AI
Learning
Trust & compliance
Trends & insights
Blog
Cloudflare TV
Community forum
Get help
Contact sales
Partners
Partner network
Peering portal
Partner Network
Why Cloudflare
Why choose Cloudflare
Learn about Cloudflare
Comparisons
Why trust Cloudflare
Contact sales
Sign up
Sign up
Under attack?
Under attack?
Log in
Log in
Support
Community Support
Help Center
Contact Cloudflare
Lost account access?
Log in
Log in
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policy application
Information we collect
How we use information we collect
Data aggregation
Information sharing
Notice to UK and EU residents
International information transfers
Data subject rights and choices
Communication preferences
Data security, data integrity and access
Data retention
Notification of changes
Business transactions
English language controls
Dispute resolution
Notice to California residents
Contact information
Legal questions
Have Questions?
If you have questions about these terms or anything else about Cloudflare, please don't hesitate to contact us:
+1 (650) 319-8930
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St,
San Francisco, CA 94107
USA
Cloudflare Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is effective as of August 28, 2024.
We have updated our July 18, 2024 Privacy Policy to update the contact email of our Data Protection Officer.
This Cloudflare Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines the personal information that Cloudflare, Inc. (“Cloudflare”, “we”, “us” or “our”) gathers, how we use that personal information, and the options you have to access, correct, or delete such personal information.
CLOUDFLARE’S PROMISE
Our mission to help build a better Internet is rooted in the importance we place on establishing trust with our Customers, users, and the Internet community globally. To earn and maintain that trust, we commit to communicating transparently, providing security, and protecting the privacy of data on our systems.
We keep your personal information personal and private. We will not sell or rent your personal information. We will only share or otherwise disclose your personal information as necessary to provide our Services or as otherwise described in this Policy, except in cases where we first provide you with notice and the opportunity to consent.
1. POLICY APPLICATION
This Policy applies to Cloudflare’s collection, use, and disclosure of the personal information of the following categories of data subjects:
Attendees
: Those who visit our offices or provide their information to Cloudflare or Cloudflare representatives when they attend or register to attend Cloudflare-sponsored events or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, as well as those who participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Website Visitors
: Those who visit our Websites, including those who may opt to provide an email address or other contact information to receive communications from Cloudflare, fill out a survey, or provide feedback. For the purposes of this Policy, “Websites” refer collectively to
www.cloudflare.com
as well as any other websites Cloudflare operates for its own behalf and that link to this Policy. For clarity, “Websites” does not include any sites owned or operated by our Customers, including where we serve as Registrar.
Customers
: Individuals or entities who enter into a subscription agreement with Cloudflare (or its authorized partner) and to whom Cloudflare provides Services pursuant to such agreement. For purposes of this Policy, “Services” shall refer to all of the cloud-based solutions offered, marketed, or sold by Cloudflare or its authorized partners that are designed to increase the performance, security, and availability of Internet properties, applications, devices, and networks, along with any software, software development kits, and application programming interfaces ("APIs") made available in connection with the foregoing.
Administrative Users
: Those with login credentials for a Cloudflare account and/or those who administer any of the Services for a Customer. In some cases, an Administrative User and Customer may be the same individual. In other cases, an Administrative User may be an agent acting on behalf of a Customer.
Public DNS Resolver Users
: Those who use Cloudflare’s 1.1.1.1 public recursive Domain Name System (“DNS”) resolver service, including 1.1.1.1 for Families ("1.1.1.1 resolver"). Learn more about the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
End Users
: Those who (i) access or use our Customers’ domains, networks, websites, application programming interfaces, and applications, or (ii) Customers’ employees, agents, or contractors, who access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust end users.
Registrants:
Users of Cloudflare’s domain registrar services. Cloudflare is an
ICANN
-accredited registrar and complies with the
2013 Registrar Accreditation Agreement
(“RAA”).
This Policy does not apply to “Application Users”—those individuals who use Cloudflare’s consumer-facing 1.1.1.1 Application. See the
1.1.1.1 Application Privacy Policy
for more information about the data collection and use practices for Cloudflare's 1.1.1.1 Application and the associated 1.1.1.1 Application Services.
This Policy also does not apply to our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, and networks, which may have their own terms and privacy policies. Our Customers are solely responsible for establishing policies for and ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including those relating to the collection of personal information, in connection with the use of our Services by End Users with whom our Customers interact.
Cloudflare’s Websites and Services are not intended for, nor designed to attract, individuals under the age of eighteen. Cloudflare does not knowingly collect or share personal information from any person under the age of eighteen. To the extent we become aware that we have the personal information of a person under the age of eighteen, we will delete that information.
When Cloudflare is a reverse proxy, our IP addresses may appear in WHOIS and DNS records for websites using our Services. We are a conduit for information controlled by others. It is our Customers and their users who are responsible for the content transmitted across our network (e.g., images, written content, graphics, etc.).
2. INFORMATION WE COLLECT (Categories of Data Subjects)
Attendees
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We may ask for and collect personal information such as your name, address, phone number and email address when you visit our offices, register for or attend a sponsored event or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, or participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Image and voice
: When you participate in a Cloudflare study, we may ask for your permission to record your voice and/or image during your participation in the study.
Website Visitors
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We ask for and—at your option—collect personal information from you when you submit web forms on our Websites, including opportunities to sign up for and agree to receive email communications from us. We may ask you to submit such personal information if you choose to use interactive features of the Websites, including participation in surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, or studies, requesting customer support, submitting feedback, or otherwise communicating with us. We will send such communications in accordance with applicable law.
Log files
: Just as when you visit and interact with most websites and services delivered via the Internet, when you visit our Websites, including the Cloudflare Community Forum, we gather certain information and store it in log files. This information may include but is not limited to Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, system configuration information, URLs of referring pages, and locale and language preferences.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
: We may use cookies and other information-gathering technologies for a variety of purposes, such as providing us with information about how you interact with our Websites and assisting us in our marketing efforts. You may view a complete list of cookies and change your cookie preferences by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) in the footer of the Cloudflare homepage at cloudflare.com or in the banner displayed when you visit our Websites from certain countries (such as the European Economic Area and the UK). Note that if you disable cookies entirely, Cloudflare’s Websites may not function properly. We may also use cookies and similar technologies to provide you advertising on third-party sites based upon your browsing activities and interests. In addition to exercising cookie choices through our “Cookie Preferences” or “Your Privacy Choices” links, if you do not want to have cookies and similar technologies used for the purpose of serving you interest-based ads, you may opt-out by clicking
here
(or if located in the European Union, the United Kingdom, or Switzerland, click
here
). For more information about the cookies Cloudflare uses and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Material contributed in Interactive Areas
: The Websites may offer publicly accessible blogs, community forums, comments sections, discussion forums, or other interactive features (“Interactive Areas”). If you choose to participate in any of these Interactive Areas, please be aware that any information that you post in an Interactive Area might be read, collected, and used by others who access it. If you wish to remove your personal information from any of our Interactive Areas, please see the Section 8, below.
Customers and Administrative Users
Customer Account Information
: When you register for an account, we collect contact information. Depending on subscription level, this contact information may include your Customer name, the email address(es) of your account administrator(s), telephone number, and addresses necessary to process payment and delivery of Services. In addition, when you use the Services, we collect information about how you configure your account and the Services (e.g., firewall settings for the domains you administer). We refer to all of this information collectively as “Customer Account Information” for the purposes of this Policy. Customer Account Information is required to enable your access to your Cloudflare account and Services. By providing us with any personal information, you represent that you are the owner of such personal information or otherwise have the requisite consent to provide it to us. We also maintain logs of Administrative Users’ activity (e.g., actions taken to configure settings in Customers’ account).
Payment information
: We do not require our Customers to have payment information on file with us unless they have a paid subscription to our Services. When you sign up for one of our paid Services, you must provide payment and billing information. The information you will need to submit depends on which payment method you choose. For example, if you pay with a credit card, we will collect your card information and billing address, although we do not store full credit card numbers or personal account numbers.
Crash Reports
: When our Services encounter an unexpected error, you may be asked to submit a crash report, which may contain personal information. You will have an opportunity to review the content of the report prior to submitting the report to us.
Public DNS Resolver Users
Limited DNS query data
: We will collect limited DNS query data that is sent to our 1.1.1.1 resolver. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not log personal information, and the bulk of the limited non-personally identifiable query data is only stored for 25 hours. You can learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Please note that our data handling practices for our 1.1.1.1 Application, which is not covered by this Policy, are somewhat different than our 1.1.1.1 resolver data handling practices and are described
here
.
End Users
Cloudflare processes End Users’ interactions with Customer’s Internet Properties and the Services. This information is processed when End Users access or use our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, devices, end points, and networks that use one or more of our Services, and when End Users access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust. The information processed may include but is not limited to IP addresses, traffic routing data, system configuration information, and other information about traffic to and from Customers’ websites, devices, applications, and/or networks.
The End User data that we make available to our Customers via the Service dashboard or other online interface are specifically defined as “Customer Logs”.
Registrants
Contact and domain information: We collect data such as domain name and status, contact information (such as name, organization, address, phone number and email address), name server, DNSSEC, and Form of Approval (i.e., full WHOIS capture at time of transfer into our system, including the IP address that initiated the transfer).
Network Data.
Cloudflare collects and stores Network Data, which are models, observations, reports, analyses, statistics, databases and other information created, compiled, analyzed, generated or derived by Cloudflare from server, network or traffic data generated by Cloudflare in the course of providing the Service, including information required to help Cloudflare identify, analyze, mitigate, prevent, and block malicious activities on Cloudflare’s network. Examples of Network Data include service uptime and service availability metrics, request volumes, error rates, cache rates, origin and nature of malware, and IP threat scores.
3. HOW WE USE INFORMATION WE COLLECT
Cloudflare only processes personal information in a way that is compatible with and relevant to the purpose for which it was collected or authorized. As a general matter, for the categories of data described in Section 2 above, except 1.1.1.1 resolver user data as explained below, we may use your personal information to:
Provide, operate, maintain, improve, and promote the Websites and Services for all users of the Websites and Services;
Enable you to access and use the Websites and Services;
Process and complete transactions, and send you related information, including purchase confirmations and invoices;
Send transactional messages, including responses to your comments, questions, and requests; provide customer service and support; and send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Comply with legal obligations as well as to investigate and prevent fraudulent transactions, unauthorized access to the Services, and other illegal activities;
For other purposes for which we obtain your consent.
In addition, we may use the information we collect from Attendees, Websites Visitors, and Registrants, as well as Customer Account Information for the following purposes:
Send commercial communications, in accordance with your communication preferences, such as providing you with information about products and services, features, surveys, newsletters, offers, promotions, contests, and events about us and our partners; and send other news or information about us and our partners. See Section 9 below for information on managing your communication preferences.
Process and deliver contest or sweepstakes entries and rewards;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Websites and Services and for marketing or advertising purposes;
Personalize the Websites and Services, including by providing features or content that match your interests and preferences;
To register visitors to our offices and to manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign, to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interest in protecting our offices and our confidential information against unauthorized access; and
Public DNS Resolver Users
. We use information we collect from 1.1.1.1 resolver users to operate and improve the 1.1.1.1 resolver, such as to assist us in our debugging efforts if an issue arises. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not store 1.1.1.1 resolver users’ personal information. We will not combine any information collected from DNS queries to our 1.1.1.1 resolver with any other Cloudflare or third party data in any way that can be used to identify individual end users. Cloudflare may store aggregated data, as outlined within our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitments to privacy, indefinitely in order to power Cloudflare Radar and assist Cloudflare in improving Cloudflare services, such as, enhancing the overall performance of the Cloudflare Resolver and identifying security threats. Learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Information from Third Party Services
. We may combine information we collect as described in Section 2 above with personal information we obtain from third parties. For example, we may combine information entered on a Cloudflare sales submission form with information we receive from a third-party sales intelligence platform vendor to enhance our ability to market our Services to Customers or potential Customers.
4. DATA AGGREGATION
Cloudflare may aggregate data we acquire about our Customers, Administrators, and End Users. For example, we may assemble data to determine how Web crawlers index the Internet and whether they are engaged in malicious activity or to compile web traffic reports and statistics. Non-personally identifiable, aggregated data may be shared with third parties.
5. INFORMATION SHARING
We work with other companies who provide us with services that help run our business and the Cloudflare Service (“Service Providers”). These companies provide services to help us deliver customer support, process credit card payments, manage and contact our existing Customers and Administrators as well as sales leads, provide marketing support, and otherwise operate and improve our Services. These Service Providers may only process personal information pursuant to our instructions and in compliance both with this Privacy Policy, the contracts we have in place with such Service Providers, and other applicable confidentiality, data protection, and security measures and regulations.
Specifically, we do not permit our Service Providers to sell any personal information we share with them or to use any personal information we share with them for their own marketing purposes or for any purpose other than in connection with the services they provide to us.
In addition to sharing with Service Providers as described above, we also may share your information with others in the following circumstances:
Within the Cloudflare Group (defined for the purposes of this Policy as Cloudflare, Inc. (United States) and its subsidiaries listed Section 15);
With our resellers and other sales partners who may help us distribute the Services to Customers;
With an app developer when you install an app from our App Marketplace;
In the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business;
When we are required to disclose personal information to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims. (Learn more about how we handle law enforcement requests
here
);
Where we have a good-faith belief sharing is necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person, or violations of our Website Terms of Use, Self-Serve Subscription Agreement, and/or Enterprise Subscription Terms of Service; or as otherwise required to comply with our legal obligations; or
As you may otherwise consent from time to time.
Additional Information on Sharing
Public DNS Resolver Users.
Cloudflare does not share 1.1.1.1 resolver logs with any third parties except for anonymous logs shared with APNIC pursuant to a Research Cooperative Agreement. Learn more about information sharing specific to the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
Registrants.
If you purchase a domain name from Cloudflare’s registrar service, ICANN (The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers) and the relevant registry operators overseeing the domain’s top-level domain require us to collect registrant data for the purposes of domain registration and via the WHOIS protocol. We may also be required to share this public data with ICANN, the relevant registry operators and other such providers with whom we contract in order to provide our domain name services, and additionally upon the legitimate request of third parties. Registrant data may include the domain name, registrant name and other contact information, and domain name server information. See our Domain Registration Agreement
here
.
Marketing & Advertising Partners.
Our marketing and advertising partners may collect or receive personal information about you and/or collect certain information about your interactions with our Websites, or your email communications with Cloudflare, including through the use of cookies, beacons, and similar technologies, in order to gain insights that may help us market and advertise our services to you.  You may opt out of such sharing using our “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) on the cloudflare.com homepage.
In addition, we may also provide these marketing and advertising partners with your email address or other limited account information. You may opt out of such sharing by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
These partners’ use of your information will be based on their own privacy policies. We share this personal information for our business purposes.
California residents can find additional information about data sharing for marketing and advertising purposes and their data subject rights in Section 16, below
6. NOTICE TO EU, UK, AND SWISS RESIDENTS
“Personal information” as referenced in this Privacy Policy means “personal data” as that term is defined under the European Union (“EU”) General Data Protection Regulations (“GDPR”) and its United Kingdom (“UK”) GDPR counterpart. Cloudflare is a data controller for the personal information collected from all categories of data subjects listed above, with the following exceptions: Cloudflare is a data processor of Customer Logs, Administrative User logs, and some account settings information. In addition, Cloudflare is a data processor for any of the content provided by Customers and End Users through the Services that transits, or in some cases, is stored on, the Cloudflare network. Where Cloudflare is a data processor, Cloudflare processes data on behalf of its Customers pursuant to their data processing instructions.
If you are an individual from the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), the UK or Switzerland, please note that our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information will depend on the personal information collected and the specific context in which we collect it. We normally will collect personal information from you only where: (a) we have your consent to do so, (b) where we need your personal information to perform a contract with you (e.g. to deliver the Cloudflare Services you have requested), or (c) where the processing is in our legitimate interests. Please note that in most cases, if you do not provide the requested information, Cloudflare will not be able to provide the requested service to you.
In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. Where we rely on your consent to process your personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline consent at any time. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal data, you have the right to object by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
7. INTERNATIONAL INFORMATION TRANSFERS
Cloudflare is a U.S. based, global company. We primarily store your information in the United States and the European Economic Area. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer and access such information from around the world, including from other countries in which the Cloudflare Group has operations for the purposes described in this Policy.
Whenever a Cloudflare company transfers personal information originating from one country to another Cloudflare group company or a third party service provider or partner in a different country, we will implement appropriate safeguards, consistent with the laws of the territory from which the data is exported. We describe the safeguards we implement
here
. If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the safeguards Cloudflare has in place to protect your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
When Cloudflare transfers personal data from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States, we rely on our certifications under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Should these certifications lapse or become otherwise invalidated, Cloudflare relies on the standard contractual clauses, including supplementary measures as necessary for transfers to the United States. We also use standard contractual clauses for other international transfers from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom.
Self-certification to the Data Privacy Framework
Cloudflare complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Cloudflare has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Cloudflare has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF (together, the “DPFs”), Cloudflare commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPFs should first contact us by emailing sar@cloudflare.com or via mail to: Cloudflare, Inc., 101 Townsend St., San Francisco, CA 94107, Attn: Data Protection Officer. We will respond to your inquiry within 30 days of receipt and verification of your identity.
In compliance with the DPFs, Cloudflare commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal information received in reliance on the DPFs to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe, LLC are provided at no cost to you. You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other mechanisms set out in this DPF Notice or our Privacy Notice.  For more information, please see Annex 1 of the DPF Principles, available
here
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Cloudflare’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). We may be required to disclose personal information we receive under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Cloudflare is liable for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Cloudflare shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Cloudflare proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
8. DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS AND CHOICES
Cloudflare  recognizes individuals’ data protection rights. You have the right to access, correct, update, port, or delete your personal information, and to restrict or object to the processing of your personal information (each of these a “Rights Request”). You may email us at sar@cloudflare.com with any Rights Request, and we will respond within thirty (30) days. Customers and Administrative Users also can access, correct, export, or update their Account Information by editing their profile or organization record at Cloudflare.com.
Please note that before we can complete your Rights Request, we will need to verify that your identity matches that of the data in which you are requesting to exercise your rights. You can expect a verification email under separate cover, to the email address associated with your personal information on file. If you are making a Rights Request on behalf of another individual as an authorized agent, we require that either (a) the data subject must verify their identity and directly confirm with Cloudflare they provided the authorized agent permission to submit the Rights Request, (b) the authorized agent must be provided power of attorney by the data subject in accordance with the law of the data subject’s jurisdiction, or (c) the Rights Request must otherwise be submitted in accordance with applicable privacy law.
For any Rights Request, we will need to verify a requestor is inquiring about their own information before we can assist. Where a Rights Request may implicate the personal information of another individual, we must balance the request against the risk of violating another person’s privacy rights. We will comply with Rights Requests to the extent required by applicable law or the Swiss-U.S. or EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. In the event that your Rights Request is denied, residents of the U.S. states Virginia and Colorado may appeal our decision by responding to the email informing them of the denial or by submitting a Rights Request to appeal to sar@cloudflare.com, and we will respond within sixty (60) days. In the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Please note that we do not retain any personal information about 1.1.1.1 resolver users that would be subject to the Rights Requests described above. In addition, Cloudflare has no direct relationship with End Users. Even where “Cloudflare” may be indicated as the authoritative name server for a domain, unless Cloudflare is the owner of that domain, we have no control over a domain’s content. Accordingly, we rely upon our Customers to comply with the underlying legal requirements for Rights Requests in accordance with their obligations under applicable data protection laws. If an End User requests that we fulfill a Rights Request, we will direct that End User to contact the Customer website(s) with which they interacted directly. Our Customers are solely responsible for ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with respect to their website users.
9. COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES
Cloudflare will send you commercial communications based on the communication preferences in your account settings. Cloudflare also will send you service-related communications. You may manage your receipt of commercial communications by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of such emails, through your account settings if you have a Cloudflare account, or you may send a request to unsubscribe@cloudflare.com.
10. DATA SECURITY, DATA INTEGRITY AND ACCESS
We take all reasonable steps to protect information we receive from you from accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure or access. We have put in place appropriate physical, technical and administrative measures to safeguard and secure your information, and we make use of privacy-enhancing technologies such as encryption. If you have any questions about the security of your personal information, you can contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
11. DATA RETENTION
We store your personal information for a period of time that is consistent with the business purposes set forth in Section 3 of this policy or as long as needed to fulfill and comply with legal obligations. The criteria we used to determine how long we store your personal information will vary depending on several different factors. We typically consider the following when determining data retention:
The purpose for collecting the personal information in the first place. For example, if you have an active account with us, we need to keep your contact information during the entirety of that time in order to provide you with support or contact you regarding your account;
The volume, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information we are processing;
The potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the personal information;
Whether we can achieve the purposes for processing with less data or through other means
Legal requirements that may apply to the data, such as applicable statutes of limitation or contractual obligations.
When the data retention period expires for a given type of data, we will delete or destroy it. If, for technical reasons, we are unable to do so, we will implement appropriate security measures to prevent any further use of such data.
12. NOTIFICATION OF CHANGES
If we make changes to this Policy that we believe materially impact the privacy of your personal information, we will promptly provide notice of any such changes (and, where necessary, obtain consent), as well as post the updated Policy on this website noting the effective date of any changes.
13. BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS
We may assign or transfer this Policy, as well as information covered by this Policy, in the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business.
14. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
Non-English translations of this Policy are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
15. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
If you have an unresolved privacy or data-use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
16. NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household as defined in the CCPA. It does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
How We Collect, Use, and Share Your Personal Information under the CCPA
We may collect, use, and disclose for our business and commercial purposes, the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers for the categories of individuals/users defined in Section 1 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy (e.g., email address of Customers and Administrative Users, name and contact information of Attendees);
Payment and customer records information of our Customers;
Protected classification characteristics (e.g., age, ethnicity, race, languages spoken, or gender) to the extent these characteristics are voluntarily disclosed to us or contained in any  content transmitted across or stored on our network;
Commercial information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or usage histories);
Professional or employment information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information; and
Inferences (e.g., information about your interests or preferences).
The sources from which we collect information are described in Section 2 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The business and commercial purposes for which we collect and use this information are described in Section 3 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” the information for a business purpose are described in Section 5 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Knowledge
. You can request information about what personal information we have collected about you, including:
the categories of personal information;
the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information;
the categories of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correction
. You can ask us to rectify inaccurate personal information and, taking into account the purpose of processing the personal information, ensure it is complete;
Opt-out of sales or sharing
. You can ask that we do not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information as “sell” and “share” are explicitly defined under the CCPA. For more information, please refer to the section titled “Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information” below.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you the Services; increasing the price/rate of the Services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
In order to submit a request to exercise your right of information, access, or deletion pursuant to the CCPA, please follow the instructions for the submitting a Rights Request detailed in Section 8, above. Please note, we reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and may need to confirm your identity to process certain requests using the verification methods described in Section 8. For example, we take reasonable precautions to verify the identities of those California residents submitting requests to delete or access Personal Information.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information
Cloudflare does not sell your Personal Information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you and may transfer Personal Information to business partners for their use. Making Personal Information (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information under the CCPA.
You can request to opt out of such “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information using the “
Your Privacy Choices”
link in the footer below
.
In addition, some internet browsers offer the option to enable opt-out signals such as Global Privacy Control that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked. Cloudflare responds to these signals by processing them as a request to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information as discussed above.
Please note that you will still see some advertising, regardless of your selection. We do not impose verification protocols for processing opt out requests unless we have reason to question the authenticity of a requester’s identity, in which case we may request evidence of identity and California residency.
17. CONTACT INFORMATION
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St.
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Canada) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
Suite 2600, Three Bentall Centre
595 Burrard Street, P.O. Box 49314
Vancouver, BC V7X 1L3
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare, Ltd.
County Hall/The Riverside Building
Belvedere Road
London, SE1 7PB
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Largo Rafael Bordalo Pinheiro 29
1200-369 Lisboa
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Germany GmbH
Rosental 7
80331 München
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare France SAS
6 place de la Madeleine
75008 Paris
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Netherlands B.V.
Keizersgracht 62,
1015CS Amsterdam
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Pte., Ltd.
182 Cecil Street, #35-01
Frasers Tower, Singapore 069547
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Australia Pty Ltd.
333 George St., 5th Floor
Sydney, NSW 2000
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Beijing) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
16 South Guangshun Street
Donghuang Building 17th Floor
Chaoyang District Beijing 100015
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Japan K.K.
Marunouchi Kitaguchi Building 9F
1-6-5 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo, 100-0005
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Middle East FZ-LLC
DIC 1 Internet City Road
Building 1, Ground Floor, Office 17
Jumeirah
Dubai UAE
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare India Private Limited
No. 215 Richmond Towers, 12 Richmond Road, Richmond Town
Banglore, Bangalore, Karnataka, India, 560025
Attention: Grievance Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Area 1 Security, LLC
838 Walker Road Suite 21-2,
Dover, DE, 19904
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Korea LLC
8-113 (Samseong-dong), Teheran-ro 507
Gangnam-gu, Seoul, South Korea, 06168
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Mexico S. de R.L de C.V.
Bosque de Ciruelos No. 180 int. PP 101, Col. Bosque de las Lomas, Miguel Hidalgo
Ciudad de México, 11700, México
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.
Level 21, Suite 21.01, The Gardens South Tower,
Mid Valley City,
Lingkaran Syed Putra,
Kuala Lumpur
Wilayah Persekutuan
59200
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Getting Started
Free plans
For enterprises
Compare plans
Domain name search
Get a recommendation
Request a demo
Contact sales
Resources
Learning center
Analyst reports
Cloudflare Radar
Cloudflare TV
Case studies
Webinars
White Papers
Developer docs
Architecture Center
theNET
Blog
Find an expert
Solutions
Connectivity cloud
SSE and SASE services
Application services
Network services
Developer services
Community
Community hub
Project Galileo
Athenian Project
Cloudflare for Campaigns
Critical Infrastructure Defense Project
Support
Help center
Cloudflare status
Trust-hub
Compliance
GDPR
Trust & safety
Company
About Cloudflare
Our team
Investor relations
Press
Careers
Diversity, equity, & inclusion
Impact/ESG
Network map
Logos & press kit
Become a partner
Sub-policy 20
https://www.addsearch.com/privacy/:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Addsearch
2
Learn more about this provider
PHPSESSID
Preserves user session state across page requests.
wpEmojiSettingsSupports
This cookie is part of a bundle of cookies which serve the purpose of content delivery and presentation. The cookies keep the correct state of font, blog/picture sliders, color themes and other website settings.
Cookiebot
3
Learn more about this provider
CookieConsent [x2]
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
Google
3
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
rc::a
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
rc::c
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
g2.com
g2crowd.com
hsadspixel.net
hs-banner.com
hs-sites-eu1.com
hubspot-logos.com
hubspotusercontent-eu1.net
hubspotusercontent-na1.net
t.co
vimeo.com
20
__cf_bm [x20]
This cookie is used to distinguish between humans and bots. This is beneficial for the website, in order to make valid reports on the use of their website.
hsforms.com
vimeo.com
3
_cfuvid [x3]
This cookie is a part of the services provided by Cloudflare - Including load-balancing, deliverance of website content and serving DNS connection for website operators.
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
Gyazo
1
Learn more about this provider
Gyazo_cfwoker
Enables the visitor to share content from the website onto social media platforms or websites.
Hubspot
1
Learn more about this provider
messagesUtk
Stores a unique ID string for each chat-box session. This allows the website-support to see previous issues and reconnect with the previous supporter.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
lidc
Registers which server-cluster is serving the visitor. This is used in context with load balancing, in order to optimize user experience.
Vimeo
2
Learn more about this provider
player
Saves the user's preferences when playing embedded videos from Vimeo.
sync_active
Contains data on visitor's video-content preferences - This allows the website to remember parameters such as preferred volume or video quality. The service is provided by Vimeo.com.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Addsearch
4
Learn more about this provider
_vwo_uuid_v2
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
ifso_last_viewed
Contains data on the latest products viewed by the visitor. Used for internal statistics by the website operator.
ifso_viewing_triggers
Collects data on the user’s navigation and behavior on the website. This is used to compile statistical reports and heatmaps for the website owner.
ifso_visit_counts
Stores data on the time spent on the website and its sub-pages, during the current session.
G2Crowd
1
Learn more about this provider
g2tracking
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
Google
2
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
_ga_#
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
Hotjar
5
Learn more about this provider
_hjSession_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_hjSessionUser_#
Collects statistics on the visitor's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_hjTLDTest
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
hjActiveViewportIds
This cookie contains an ID string on the current session. This contains non-personal information on what subpages the visitor enters – this information is used to optimize the visitor's experience.
hjViewportId
Saves the user's screen size in order to adjust the size of images on the website.
Hubspot
4
Learn more about this provider
__hssc
Identifies if the cookie data needs to be updated in the visitor's browser.
__hssrc
Used to recognise the visitor's browser upon reentry on the website.
__hstc
Sets a unique ID for the session. This allows the website to obtain data on visitor behaviour for statistical purposes.
hubspotutk
Sets a unique ID for the session. This allows the website to obtain data on visitor behaviour for statistical purposes.
Twitter Inc.
1
Learn more about this provider
personalization_id
This cookie is set by Twitter - The cookie allows the visitor to share content from the website onto their Twitter profile.
VWO
2
Learn more about this provider
v.gif
This cookie is set to make split-tests on the website, which optimizes the website's relevance towards the visitor – the cookie can also be set to improve the visitor's experience on a website.
vwo_apm_sent
Pending
Vimeo
1
Learn more about this provider
vuid
Collects data on the user's visits to the website, such as which pages have been read.
YouTube
1
Learn more about this provider
yt-player-headers-readable
Used to determine the optimal video quality based on the visitor's device and network settings.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
Adform
2
Learn more about this provider
C
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
uid
Registers a unique user ID that recognises the user's browser when visiting websites that use the same ad network. The purpose is to optimise display of ads based on the user's movements and various ad providers' bids for displaying user ads.
Google
5
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
IDE
Used by Google DoubleClick to register and report the website user's actions after viewing or clicking one of the advertiser's ads with the purpose of measuring the efficacy of an ad and to present targeted ads to the user.
NID
Pending
pagead/1p-conversion/#/
Pending
pagead/1p-user-list/#
Tracks if the user has shown interest in specific products or events across multiple websites and detects how the user navigates between sites. This is used for measurement of advertisement efforts and facilitates payment of referral-fees between websites.
Hotjar
1
Learn more about this provider
hubspotutk
Keeps track of a visitor's identity. This cookie is passed to the marketing platform HubSpot on form submission and used when de-duplicating contacts.
Hubspot
3
Learn more about this provider
__ptq.gif
Sends data to the marketing platform Hubspot about the visitor's device and behaviour. Tracks the visitor across devices and marketing channels.
__hmpl
Collects information on user preferences and/or interaction with web-campaign content - This is used on CRM-campaign-platform used by website owners for promoting events or products.
HUBLYTICS_EVENTS_53
Collects data on visitor behaviour from multiple websites, in order to present more relevant advertisement - This also allows the website to limit the number of times that they are shown the same advertisement.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
Microsoft
8
Learn more about this provider
_uetsid
Collects data on visitor behaviour from multiple websites, in order to present more relevant advertisement - This also allows the website to limit the number of times that they are shown the same advertisement.
_uetvid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
_uetsid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
_uetsid_exp
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
_uetvid
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
_uetvid_exp
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
MSPTC
Pending
MUID
Used widely by Microsoft as a unique user ID. The cookie enables user tracking by synchronising the ID across many Microsoft domains.
Quora
1
Learn more about this provider
_/ad/75aa344edeef4dbfa3b3dd7cb5f40e6f/pixel
Collects data on user behaviour and interaction in order to optimize the website and make advertisement on the website more relevant.
Reddit
3
Learn more about this provider
_rdt_uuid [x2]
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
rp.gif
Necessary for the implementation of the Reddit.com's share-button function.
Twitter Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
i/adsct [x2]
The cookie is used by Twitter.com in order to determine the number of visitors accessing the website through Twitter advertisement content.
muc_ads
Collects data on user behaviour and interaction in order to optimize the website and make advertisement on the website more relevant.
YouTube
18
Learn more about this provider
#-#
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Pending
iU5q-!O9@$
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
LogsDatabaseV2:V#||LogsRequestsStore
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
remote_sid
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
TESTCOOKIESENABLED
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Tries to estimate the users' bandwidth on pages with integrated YouTube videos.
YSC
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
ytidb::LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
YtIdbMeta#databases
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
yt-remote-cast-available
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-cast-installed
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-connected-devices
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-device-id
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-fast-check-period
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-app
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-name
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
sc.lfeeder.com
5
_lfa
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa_test_cookie_stored [x2]
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa
Used in context with Account-Based-Marketing (ABM). The cookie registers data such as IP-addresses, time spent on the website and page requests for the visit. This is used for retargeting of multiple users rooting from the same IP-addresses. ABM usually facilitates B2B marketing purposes.
_lfa_expiry
Contains the expiry-date for the cookie with corresponding name.
tr-rc.lfeeder.com
1
(unnamed)
Tracks the individual sessions on the website, allowing the website to compile statistical data from multiple visits. This data can also be used to create leads for marketing purposes.
Unclassified
1
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
Addsearch
1
Learn more about this provider
helpful_user
Pending
Cross-domain consent
2
Your consent applies to the following domains:
List of domains your consent applies to:
app.addsearch.com
www.addsearch.com
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/26/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please state your consent ID and date when you contact us regarding your consent.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Deny
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all
Privacy Policy last updated on May 24th 2018 to comply with
GDPR
.
ADDSEARCH PRIVACY POLICY FOR CUSTOMERS AND WEBSITE
GENERAL
This Privacy Policy is applicable to AddSearch Oy’s (“AddSearch” or “we”) database of customers and website visitors as well as AddSearch’s marketing database.
This Privacy Policy describes how we process personal data of our website visitors as well as the representatives of our customers and potential customers (all the aforementioned hereinafter “Customers”).
Some of our services might be subject to a separate privacy policy. If a separate privacy policy applies to a particular service, we will post it in connection with the service in question.
This Privacy Policy may be updated if required in order to reflect the changes in data processing practices or otherwise. The current version can be found on our website We will not make substantial changes to this Privacy Policy or reduce the rights of Customers under this Privacy Policy without providing a notice thereof.
Please note that this Privacy Policy only applies to processing of personal data carried out by AddSearch as a data controller. In regard to the data generated by AddSearch’s customers or users when using the Services while using the AddSearch service in their own business, AddSearch processes this personal data as a data processor. In such case the relevant customer shall be considered to be the data controller.
CONTROLLER’S CONTACT DETAILS
Name: AddSearch Oy
Company ID: 2545782-4
Address: PL 8, 02611 Espoo Finland
Email: info@addsearch.com
PERSONAL DATA PROCESSED AND SOURCES OF DATA
We collect two types of information concerning the Customers: (i) Customer Data; and (ii) Analytics Data. Although we do not normally use Analytics Data to identify individuals, sometimes individuals can be recognized from it, either alone or when combined or linked with Customer Data. In such situations, Analytics Data shall also be considered to be personal data under applicable laws and we will treat the combined data as personal data.
AddSearch may collect and process the following Customer Data: (i) name and contact details (including user names where applicable); (ii) organisation and title (iii) phone number; (iv) e-mail address; (v) communication history; (vi) invoicing and billing information; (vii) data concerning your orders and use of the Services or your interest in our Services; (iix) marketing opt-outs and opt-ins.
Most of the Customer Data is received directly from Customers in connection with the Customer’s use of the Services. In addition, personal information may be collected and updated from service providers and public registers.
Analytics Data we gather in connection with the use of our Services includes for example the following data: (i) Customer’s IP address; (ii) device and device identification number; (iii) operating system; (iv) time of visit; (v) browser type and version; (vi) language settings. (vii) URL route and search history on the page.
Cookies
We use various technologies to collect and store Analytics Data and other information when Customers visit our Services, including cookies.
Cookies are small text files sent and saved on your device that allows us to identify visitors of our websites and facilitate the use of our Services and to create aggregate information of our visitors. This helps us to improve our Services and better serve our Customers. The cookies will not harm your device or files. We use cookies to tailor our Services and the information we provide in accordance with the individual interests of our Customers.
Customers may choose to set their web browser to refuse cookies, or to alert when cookies are being sent. For example, the following links provide information on how to adjust the cookie settings on some popular browsers:
Safari
Google Chrome
Internet Explorer and Edge
Mozilla Firefox
Please note that some parts of our Services may not function properly if use of cookies is refused.
Web analytics services
Our Services use Google Analytics and other web analytics services to compile Analytics Data and reports on visitor usage and to help us improve the Services. For an overview of Google Analytics, please visit Google Analytics. It is possible to opt-out of Google Analytics with the following browser add-on tool:
Google Analytics opt-out add-on
.
PURPOSES AND LEGITIMATE GROUNDS FOR PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA
Purposes
Personal data is processed by AddSearch for the following purposes:
To provide our Services and carry out our contractual obligations
We process personal data in the first place to be able to offer the Services to our Customers and to run, maintain and develop our business. Personal data may be processed in order to carry out our contractual obligations towards the Customer. We may use the data for example to offer essential functionalities of the Services and to provide access to the Services. If Customer contacts our customer service, we will use the provided information for answering questions and solving possible issues.
For customer communication and marketing
We may process personal data for the purpose of contacting Customers regarding our Services and to inform Customers of changes in our Services as well as to market our Services.
For quality improvement and trend analysis
We may process information regarding the use of the Services to improve the quality of our Services e.g. by analysing any trends in the use of our Services. When possible, we will do this using only aggregated, non-personally identifiable data.
Legitimate grounds for processing
We process personal data to perform our contractual obligations towards Customers and to comply with legal obligations. Furthermore, we process personal data to pursue our legitimate interest to run, maintain and develop our business and to create and maintain Customer relationships. When choosing to use your data on the basis of our legitimate interests, we weigh our own interests against your right to privacy.
In some parts of the Services, Customers may be requested to grant their consent for the processing of personal data. In this event, Customers may withdraw their consent at any time.
TRANSFER TO COUNTRIES OUTSIDE EEA
We store personal data in several geographic locations, including areas outside of the European Economic Area. As such, we or our service providers may transfer personal data to, or access it in, jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area or the Customer’s domicile.
We will take steps to ensure that the Customers’ personal data receives an adequate level of protection in the jurisdictions in which it is processed. We provide adequate protection for the transfers of personal data to countries outside of the European Economic Area through a series of agreements with our service providers based on the Standard Contractual Clauses or other similar arrangements.
More information regarding the transfers of personal data may be obtained by contacting us on any of the addresses indicated above.
PERSONAL DATA RECIPIENTS
We do not share personal data with third parties outside of AddSearch’s organization unless one of the following circumstances applies:
It is necessary for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy
To the extent that third parties need access to personal data to perform the Services, AddSearch has taken appropriate contractual and organisational measures to ensure that personal data are processed exclusively for the purposes specified in this Privacy Policy and in accordance with all applicable laws and regulations.
For legal reasons
We may share personal data with third parties outside AddSearch’s organization if we have a good-faith belief that access to and use of the personal data is reasonably necessary to: (i) meet any applicable law, regulation, and/or court order; (ii) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues; and/or (iii) protect the interests, properties or safety of AddSearch, our Customers or the public in accordance with the law. When possible, we will inform Customers about such transfer and processing.
To authorized service providers
We may share personal data to authorized service providers who perform services for us (including data storage, sales, marketing and customer support services). Our agreements with our service providers include commitments that the service providers agree to limit their use of personal data and to comply with privacy and security standards at least as stringent as the terms of this Privacy Policy. Please bear in mind that if you provide personal data directly to a third party, such as through a link on our website, the processing is typically based on their policies and standards.
For other legitimate reasons
If AddSearch is involved in a merger, acquisition or asset sale, we may transfer personal data to the third party involved. However, we will continue to ensure the confidentiality of all personal data. We will give notice to all Customers concerned when the personal data are transferred or become subject to a different privacy policy as soon as reasonably possible.
With explicit consent
We may share personal data with third parties outside AddSearch’s organization for other reasons than the ones mentioned before, when we have the Customer’s explicit consent to do so. The Customer has the right to withdraw this consent at all times.
STORAGE PERIOD
AddSearch does not store personal data longer than is legally permitted and necessary for the purposes of providing the Services or the relevant parts thereof. The storage period depends on the nature of the information and the purposes of processing. The maximum period may therefore vary per use.
Customer Data relating to your use of the Services are typically deleted within reasonable time after you no longer use the Services. We will store Customer’s personal data for as long as the Customer is a registered user of our Services and, thereafter, for no longer than is required by law or reasonably necessary for our legitimate interests for example for claims handling, internal reporting, marketing and reconciliation purposes.
We will store Analytics Data relating to the Services for maximum of 24 months.
CUSTOMERS’ RIGHTS
Right to access
You have the right to access your personal data processed by us. Customers may contact us and we will inform what personal data we have collected and processed regarding the said Customer.
Right to withdraw consent
In case the processing is based on a consent granted by Customer, Customer may withdraw the consent at any time. Withdrawing a consent may lead to fewer possibilities to use our Services. The withdrawal of consent does not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
Right to rectify
Customers have the right to have incorrect or incomplete personal data we have stored about the Customer corrected or completed. You can correct or update some of your personal data through your user account in the Services.
Right to erasure
Customers may also ask us to erase the Customer’s personal data from our systems. We will comply with such request unless we have a legitimate ground to not delete the data.
Right to object
Customers may object to the processing of personal data if such data are processed for other purposes than purposes necessary for the performance of our Services to the Customer or for compliance with a legal obligation. In case we do not have legitimate grounds to continue processing such personal data, we shall no longer process the personal data after your objection.
Right to restriction of processing
Customers may request us to restrict processing of personal data for example when your data erasure, rectification or objection requests are pending and/or when we do not have legitimate grounds to process your data. This may however lead to fewer possibilities to use our Services.
Right to data portability
Customers have the right to receive their personal data from us in a structured and commonly used format and to independently transmit those data to a third party.
How to use the rights
The above mentioned rights may be used by sending a letter or an e-mail to us on the addresses set out above, including the following information: the full name, company name, address, e-mail address and a phone number. We may request the provision of additional information necessary to confirm the identity of the Customer. We may reject requests that are unreasonably repetitive, excessive or manifestly unfounded.
DIRECT MARKETING
Notwithstanding any consent granted beforehand for the purposes of direct marketing, Customer has the right to prohibit us from using Customer’s personal data for direct marketing purposes, market research and profiling made for direct marketing purposes by contacting us on the addresses indicated above or by using the functionalities of the Services or the unsubscribe possibility offered in connection with any direct marketing messages.
LODGING A COMPLAINT
In case Customer considers our processing of personal data to be inconsistent with the applicable data protection laws, a complaint may be lodged with the local supervisory authority for data protection.
INFORMATION SECURITY
We use administrative, organizational, technical, and physical safeguards to protect the personal data we collect and process. Measures include for example, where appropriate, encryption, firewalls, secure facilities and access right systems. Our security controls are designed to maintain an appropriate level of data confidentiality, integrity, availability, resilience and ability restore the data. We regularly test our Services, systems, and other assets for security vulnerabilities.
Should despite of the security measures, a security breach occur that is likely to have negative effects to the privacy of Customers, we will inform the relevant Customers and other affected parties, as well as relevant authorities when required by applicable data protection laws, about the breach as soon as possible.
Sub-policy 21
https://www.google.com/intl/de/analytics/learn/privacy.html:
Google is committed to advancing racial equity for Black communities.
See how.
Faster, smarter marketing
Introducing Google Marketing Platform, a unified advertising and analytics platform for smarter marketing and better results.
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Sign in to Google Marketing Platform
Easy-to-use tools for small businesses
Get free tools to make the most of your marketing, from site and app analytics to intuitive testing and more.
See small-business solutions
Advanced solutions for large enterprises
Make deeper customer connections to drive better marketing results with a complete set of advertising and analytics solutions.
See enterprise solutions
Our Adidas teams
work together in one environment
where we can see audience insights, what creative we’re running and where, how it’s performing, and make changes almost in real time.
Chris Murphy
,
          Head of Digital Experience,
              Adidas
GMP_Logo_analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Learn more about Analytics
Analytics
Understand your customers so you can deliver better experiences.
Tag Manager
Manage all your tags without editing code.
Campaign Manager 360
Get a complete view of all your digital media campaigns.
Display & Video 360
Reach today’s always-connected audiences wherever they are.
Search Ads 360
Get real-time data and unified insights for your search campaigns.
1
Bain report: How top brands grow with timely customer connections.
New research from Bain shows how leading marketers are using platform integrations and technology to boost customer engagement by delivering more relevant experiences in the moment.
Read more
Case Study
Deckers Brands drives business growth with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
Feature Brief
Control how data is used in Google Analytics
Read more
Guide
Meeting the data challenge with Google Marketing Platform and Google Cloud
Read more
1
See all resources
Let’s partner up.
Whether you’re looking for help with a single project or a bigger, long-term partnership, Google Marketing Platform Partners have the resources and expertise you need to help you achieve more with your marketing.
Find a partner
Help when you need it.
We’re here to support you every step of the way, whether you use a single product or the entire Google Marketing Platform.
Get support
Sub-policy 22
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Improving websites, for you.
Online businesses use Hotjar to create better website experiences.
Nobody wants to waste their time on a website that is confusing and hard to navigate.
You know it, we know it, and website owners know it too—which is why they turn to Hotjar.
Website owners use Hotjar to better understand user behavior: what actions people take on a website, what elements of a page they click or ignore, what they enjoy, where they struggle. With this insight, website owners can then make changes that improve the overall experience for all website users. And that includes you.
Show more
We record interactions, not your sensitive data.
Hotjar is designed for websites to get insights. And respect your privacy.
When you browse a website that has Hotjar installed, we collect data about your interactions (e.g. where you click, scroll your mouse, move in between pages) and use it to create visual representations of the experience. Website owners get these insights without tracking IP/MAC addresses-- the stuff that relates to the device you use.
Some Hotjar tools, like session recordings, reconstruct the individual actions you took during a website visit; others, like heatmaps, aggregate data points from you and hundreds of other visitors in one report.
But in all cases, by default, sensitive data that you might enter on the site (your credit card details or phone numbers) will never reach our servers: we cannot see it, and neither can the website owner. Hotjar customers viewing a session recording will only see asterisks (‘***’ ) instead of numbers.
For more information, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
We will never share or sell your data.
Not to advertisers. Not to third-party services. Not to anyone.
Nobody here at Hotjar likes the idea of tools following us around different websites or companies sharing and selling our data without our permission. We are committed to making sure this doesn’t happen to you, either.
Hotjar is designed to help make websites easier to use, and the data we track about your website visit (for example, what and where you click) is only used for this purpose. We don’t follow you around the Internet: website owners who use Hotjar cannot see or find out about your activity on sites they don’t own. Likewise, we don’t harvest personal data or sell it to anyone, ever, for any reason. Nor do we mine it for profiling or advertising purposes.
To learn more about data privacy, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Request and access your data, anytime.
Your data is stored securely, and you can ask to see it whenever you want.
As a website visitor, you have the right to request access to the personal identifiable information a website owner collected and stored about you. You also have the right to request that this information is deleted.
At any time, you can request a website owner who uses Hotjar to give you access to your data. They can run a search for personal data from inside the Hotjar dashboard; the system will then generate and email you a report that lets you view, and delete, any data connected with you.
To learn more about data privacy and accessing your data, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Tracking: we'll always give you options.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you want to stop a website using Hotjar from collecting data about your visit, you should know that the website owner is responsible for getting your consent to collect and process data about your visit (and must allow you to withdraw that consent as well).
But we understand that you might want Hotjar (and other tools) to not process data about you regardless of whether a site owner asks for permission or not, so we want to give you an extra option. If you put a ‘Do Not Track’ flag on your browser, Hotjar will look for it before we collect any data about your site visit. Not everybody does that, but we do.
For more information about this take a look at our
guide on how ‘Do Not Track’ in your browser works
.
Show more
Compliance commitment: GDPR, CCPA, and more.
Our customers can use Hotjar in a compliant manner, for you.
We have followed a ‘privacy by design’ approach since our very first day, back in 2014, so we’re big supporters of privacy acts and regulations like the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD) that enhance your privacy rights and protection as a consumer.
We have built the necessary controls around anonymity and consent to make sure website owners who use Hotjar can do it in a compliant manner. Plus, our legal team is fully committed to keeping up-to-date with any changes in the law and making sure they are reflected in our product.
You can read more about GDPR, CCPA, LGPD, and our other commitments over in our
Compliance resources.
Show more
Questions? We’ve got you covered.
From FAQs to in-depth resources - our help center has everything you need to know about Hotjar relating to privacy, compliance, legal, and security.
Take me there
Cookies on hotjar.com website
We use cookies to provide visitors with the best possible experience on our website. These include analytics, functionality, and targeting cookies, which may also be used in our marketing efforts. Click the button to agree to the use of cookies or click ‘Cookie settings’ to manage your preferences.
Cookie Policy
Cookie settings
Reject All
Accept
Manage Consent Preferences for Hotjar.com
Cookies help us understand how visitors use our website so we can provide an enhanced browsing experience. For more information on the cookies we use, see our
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 23
https://mixpanel.com/legal/privacy-policy/:

Sub-policy 24
https://www.instana.com/privacy-policy/:
My IBM
Log in
Try it free
Home
IT automation
Instana
Unlock cloud-native performance with Instana Observability
Unlock cloud-native performance with Instana Observability
Harness the power of AI and automation to proactively solve issues across the application stack
Try it free
Play with Instana
Discover how and where problems interconnect
Automate issue resolution. Turn context into actions.
Drive performance with AI.
CRN’s 2024 Product of the year
IBM Instana Observability has been awarded as the CRN's 2024 Product of the Year in the Application Performance and Observability category.
Read more
Deploy AI-driven decision-making for quick resolution
Automated observability
Cloud-native optimization
Application incident remediation
Digital experience monitoring
Stay ahead with gen AI
Look inside your IT domain
Access high fidelity full-stack data in real time—updated every second—to identify, trace and fix issues before they impact users. Get upstream and downstream visibility of application and infrastructure environments for over 300 platforms.
Explore automated observability
Scale performance seamlessly
Manage rapid change more effectively in cloud-native application environments with continuous automated discovery and monitoring. Identify issues quicker for application performance optimization.
Explore cloud-native optimization
AI helps drive faster MTTR
AI-powered probable-cause analysis can identify and remediate incidents with fewer false positives. Start to work faster with ready-to-use dashboards for immediate debugging and monitoring.
Explore application incident remediation
Improve every user’s experience
Optimize user experience across endpoints on all user devices and journeys. Test for performance, availability and reliability by simulating user interactions with synthetic monitoring.
Explore digital experience monitoring
Harness gen AI to improve performance
Generative AI proactively monitors and addresses performance issues to optimize operations before they impact user satisfaction. Gen AI monitoring also helps fill skill gaps.
Explore gen AI monitoring
IBM TechCon 2025, March 18-20
Join us for this free, virtual event to hear from industry experts and thought leaders in Technology Business Management. Don't miss:
- Cloud-Native Observability and AI-Driven Remediation with Instana, March 18, 10:00-11:00 am ET
- Unified observability and cloud cost management, March 19, 1:25 - 2:25 pm ET
Register today
What our clients are saying
SIXT
“Instana works for us in many ways and supports our platform…to enable our engineering teams to build, run and operate their cloud-native products with the insight needed to troubleshoot issues and achieve speedy recovery.”
Tata Play Broadband
“IBM’s Instana offered robust capabilities, ease of deployment and use, quicker decision-making for IT operations and development teams, and transparent pricing.”
Oregon Health Authority
“Instana has given us the visibility we need to ensure that eXPRS is consistently available and performing optimally. This is critical for the individuals who depend on these services.”
G2
“The AI-powered anomaly detection is excellent, proactively finding and alerting us to new risks before they escalate. Our system monitoring and reliability are much improved by call tracing and real-time insights.”
TrustRadius
“Instana was the perfect solution … It detects slow database queries, inefficient code or communication problems between services.”
Take the next step
Unlock cloud-native application performance with AI-driven automated observability.
Get the free trial
Work with a live demo
IBM web domains
ibm.com, ibm.org, ibm-zcouncil.com, insights-on-business.com, jazz.net, mobilebusinessinsights.com, promontory.com, proveit.com, ptech.org, s81c.com, securityintelligence.com, skillsbuild.org, softlayer.com, storagecommunity.org, think-exchange.com, thoughtsoncloud.com, alphaevents.webcasts.com, ibm-cloud.github.io, ibmbigdatahub.com, bluemix.net, mybluemix.net, ibm.net, ibmcloud.com, galasa.dev, blueworkslive.com, swiss-quantum.ch, blueworkslive.com, cloudant.com, ibm.ie, ibm.fr, ibm.com.br, ibm.co, ibm.ca, community.watsonanalytics.com, datapower.com, skills.yourlearning.ibm.com, bluewolf.com, carbondesignsystem.com
About cookies on this site
Our websites require some cookies to function properly (required). In addition, other cookies may be used with your consent to analyze site usage, improve the user experience and for advertising.
For more information, please review your
cookie preferences
options. By visiting our website, you agree to our processing of information as described in IBM’s
privacy statement
.
To provide a smooth navigation, your cookie preferences will be shared across the IBM web domains listed
here
.
Accept all
Required only
Sub-policy 25
https://matomo.org/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Menu
MENU
MENU
Why Matomo?
100% Data Ownership
Privacy Protection
Product Features
Open Source
Flexibility
No Data Sampling
GDPR
Google Analytics Alternative
Use Cases
Complete Analytics
Intranet Analytics
Consent-Free Tracking
Tracking Personal Data
Marketing Attribution
No Limitations
Log Analytics
Cloud
On-Premise
Matomo On-Premise
On-Premise vs Cloud
Download for free
Marketplace
Support Plans
Pricing
Pricing
Contact Sales
Resources
NEW! 2025 Ethical Marketing Field Guide
Help
Blog
Guides
Masterclasses
Case Studies
Integrations
Contact the Matomo team
List of all features
Get involved
Log in
Help
TRY IT FOR FREE
Matomo Website Privacy Policy
Effective Date: 13 August 2024
This Privacy Policy replaces the earlier version published on this website.
We believe in openness, privacy and 100% data ownership. Matomo’s mission is to liberate analytics and we are passionate about measuring for success. These core values are ingrained into everything we do here at Matomo and that will never change.
This Policy describes the personal information (or personal data) we collect from you, how we use that information and our legal basis for doing so. It also covers whether and how that information may be shared and your rights and choices regarding the information you provide to us.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to the collection and processing of information in the Matomo Cloud-hosted service provided by us, which is covered by the
Matomo Cloud Privacy Policy
and
Matomo Data Processing Addendum
.
This Privacy Policy applies to the information that we obtain from you through:
(a) your use of Matomo websites including their subdomains:
demo.matomo.cloud
,
forum.matomo.org
,
developer.matomo.org
,
shop.matomo.org
,
plugins.matomo.org
,
ios.matomo.org
,
issues.matomo.org
,
glossary.matomo.org
;
(b) any direct contact you make with our team via email, contact forms, newsletter subscriptions, surveys, or when you complete any on-line feedback forms;
(c) when you create, use and make purchases through your Matomo Marketplace account or download our software directly from our websites;
(d) when you interact with us via our social media accounts or
(e) when you apply for a role advertised on our websites.
This Privacy Policy also applies to instances where we may receive your personal data from third party service providers.
This Privacy Policy explains:
Who we are
What personal data we collect, when we receive and how we use it
Opt-out of website tracking
Legal bases
Your rights
Children’s privacy
Who we share your personal data with
Processors
Third party services we use
When you instruct us to transfer data to third parties
International transfers
Retention of data
How we protect your personal data
Automated decision-making including profiling
Privacy Policy changes
Contact us
Who we are
We are InnoCraft Limited (InnoCraft, we), a New Zealand registered company (NZBN 6106769), established by the creators of Matomo analytics. Our offices are located at 7 Waterloo Quay, PO625, 6140 Wellington, New Zealand.
We are the data controller, or agency, in relation to the activities described in this privacy policy, unless stated otherwise.
If you have any questions about this privacy policy or you would like to access earlier versions of this Privacy Policy, please contact our privacy team at
privacy@matomo.org
.
What personal data we collect, when we receive it and how we use it
We will never sell your personal data to anyone.
In order for us to provide you the best possible experience on our websites and deliver our services to you, we collect and process certain personal data as follows:
(a) When you contact us via our websites or directly via email
— for example, when you ask for support, send us sales enquiries, questions, comments, feedback or when you complete a survey, customer satisfaction questionnaire or report a problem, we will collect your name, email address, your job title if provided, the content of the message, etc. We use this data to answer the queries we receive, to build business relationships, and to analyse the types of queries we receive and improve our customer management processes and to improve our products and services. If you do not provide your personal data, we will not be able to respond to you.
(b)	When you sign up to receive Matomo content or offers
– for example, when you sign up to receive our guidebooks or participate in our masterclasses, or when you subscribe to the newsletter, or consent to receiving marketing materials, we use your email address to deliver the resources you requested. You can always withdraw your consent to receive our marketing content by clicking ‘unsubscribe’ in the relevant emails or contacting
privacy@matomo.org
.
(c)	When you create an account
— when you sign up for and open an account on Matomo forum, or create an account on the Matomo Marketplace, we may ask you to provide us with information such as your name, email address and details about your organisation. In addition, when you use your Matomo Marketplace account to purchase premium plugins, we collect and process your username, password, payment information, phone number and physical address.  As otherwise detailed in this Privacy Policy, we will solely process this information to provide you with the service you signed up for. If you do not provide your personal data, we would not be able to create the accounts and you would not be able to purchase plugins on the Matomo Marketplace.
(d)	When you download Matomo On-Premise
– we collect and store the following information relating to your Matomo On-Premise software licence, which may in some cases include personal information: the IP address of the server where the instance is stored, URL of the customer, version of Matomo On-Premise downloaded and database version and programming language, time zone, number of websites tracked and number of licensed authorised users. We use this information to manage our licensing, billing and customer support.
(e) When you apply for a role advertised on our website
, we will collect your name, email address, country if provided, the role you are applying for and your CV and cover letter or message. We use the personal data you provide to evaluate your application and communicate with you during the recruitment process. If you don’t provide your personal data, we would not be able to process your application.
(f)	When you interact with us via social media
, e.g.,
Meta (Facebook)
,
GitHub
,
Hootsuite
,
LinkedIn
,
Mastodon
,
Reddit
,
YouTube
or
X (Twitter)
, or any other similar third party page, your personal data is processed by the social media platform providers under their privacy policies and processes. We process your personal data collected from social media, such as full name, business email address, job title, company, telephone number, any other personal data you provide us with to respond to your requests, develop a business relationship or send you direct marketing communications (subject to prior consent requirements where applicable). If we cannot use your personal data, we would not be able to respond to your requests, establish business relationships or send you marketing materials.
(g) 	We use data broker services to enrich our customer or prospective customer data
-  when you express interest in our product, sign up to our newsletter or other marketing materials, or are our customer, we use a data broker services provider identified in
Who we share your personal data with
(section (b)) to enable us to collate corporate and professional information about our customers and prospective customers. This allows us to understand our customers’ requirements better, customise sales and marketing efforts and develop our products. The data broker services process your email address as data processors for us, and provide us with the following information, if they hold it, from their database: Company (your employer company name and corporate details), your job title, industry, office location (including city), business telephone number, business email address, LinkedIn URL. In some cases, we may receive information about your previous employers and titles. We process this personal data on the basis of legitimate interest. Without the information we will not be able to customise our communications with you, to best meet your needs.
You can opt-out of data enrichment processing, by completing this
form
.
(h)	 Usage data - when you visit our site, we will store
: the website  which you visited us from, the parts of our site you visit, the date and duration of your visit, your IP address which we store in full form in the server logs for 30 days for security reasons and which we anonymise on receipt for use in website analytics, information from the device (device type, operating system, screen resolution, language, country you are located in, and web browser type) you used during your visit, and
more
. We process this usage data using our own analytics tool,
Matomo Analytics
, and we process the information for statistical purposes, to improve our site and to recognise and stop any misuse.
You can opt out of being tracked by our Matomo Analytics instance below.
(i)	Cookies
- we use cookies (small data files transferred onto computers or devices by sites) for record-keeping purposes and to enhance functionality on our site. You may deactivate or restrict the transmission of cookies by changing the settings of your web browser. Cookies that are already stored may be deleted at any time.
Opt-out of website tracking
Please be aware that some browsers can delete the opt-out cookie if you have not visited our website in anywhere between 7 days (Safari), 45 days (Firefox) or 400 days (Chrome) as of the date of this policy. These timeframes may be subject to change. If you are not a regular visitor to our websites and wish to opt-out of analytics use, please check the setting when you visit, to make sure the opt-out is still recognised by your browser.
Legal bases
We process your Personal Data on the following legal bases:
Consent
– We may process your Personal Data for one or more specific purposes if you give us your consent, for example we ask for your consent to receive marketing materials, surveys or general information about our products. Whenever we process your Personal Data on the basis of your consent, we will ask you for it and inform you about your right to withdraw it.
Contract performance and pre-contractual requests
– We may process your Personal Data when it is necessary for the performance of a contract with you or for the performance of pre-contractual measures, which are carried out at your request. For example, when you send us a sales enquiry, when you download Matomo On-Premise, when you purchase a plugin or process a payment, when you send us a customer support request or a technical query.
Legal obligation
– We may process your Personal Data when it is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, for example, to comply with any applicable tax laws.
Legitimate interests
– We may process your Personal Data when it is necessary for the purposes of our legitimate interests, unless these are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. For example, when we process your enquiries for customer relationship management purposes or when we enrich customer or prospective customer data with data from a third party provider, as explained in the
Third Party Services We Use
section.
Your Rights
Data subject rights vary depending on the applicable privacy laws. We are based in New Zealand and governed by the New Zealand Privacy Act and any privacy laws that apply to the processing because of their extra-territorial effect (e.g. EU GDPR, UK GDPR).
If the EU GDPR or UK GDPR is the law applicable to our processing of your data, you have the right of access to your Personal Data and to information regarding the processing of Personal Data by InnoCraft, the right to rectification/correction, erasure, restriction of processing and the right to object to the processing of your Personal Data. You also have the right to receive your Personal Data in a structured, common and machine-readable format and to transmit it or have it transmitted to another controller. If you have given us your consent for processing your Personal Data, you also have the right to withdraw your consent at any time with effect for the future.
To the extent any U.S. state privacy act applies to our processing of your personal information, your rights may include a right to access, correct, delete, opt-out of certain processing, right to portability, right to opt-in for sensitive data processing, right against automated decision making or other rights provided for under applicable laws.
We can only identify you via your email address and we can only adhere to your request and provide information if we have Personal Data about you through you having made contact with us directly and/or you using our site and/or service. We cannot provide, rectify or delete any data that we store on behalf of our users or customers. If you wish to exercise your rights in relation to personal data processed by a publisher or a website using Matomo Analytics, please contact the publisher first.
To exercise any of the rights mentioned in this Privacy Policy and/or in the event of questions or comments relating to the use of Personal Data you may contact our privacy team:
privacy@matomo.org
In addition, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a data protection authority or a supervisory authority responsible for protecting your privacy rights, e.g.:
New Zealand: Office of the Privacy Commissioner: https://www.privacy.org.nz/about-us/contact/
UK: Information Commissioner’s Office: https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
EU: select the appropriate authority from the list provided by European Data Protection Board https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
Australia: Office of the Australian Information Commissioner: https://www.oaic.gov.au/about-us/contact-us/
Rest of the world: please contact us on privacy@matomo.org and we can provide you with the details of the appropriate authority.
Children’s Privacy
Our websites and products are not intended for children or minors. We do not knowingly collect children’s or minors’ personal data. Any accounts created by a child or a minor without parental consent and brought to our attention will be deleted as required by law.
Who We Share Your Personal Data With
A. Processors
We use a select number of trusted external service providers for certain technical data processing and/or service offerings. These service providers are carefully selected and meet high data protection and security standards. We only share information with them that is required for the services offered and we contractually bind them to treat any information we share with them as confidential and to process personal data only according to our instructions.
Recipient
Purpose of processing
Our legal basis for processing
Data location and security
Personal data collected by the third party
Privacy Terms
AlwaysData S.à r.l.
,
Secure infrastructure for website servers, databases and logs
Contract (customers, potential customers)
Legitimate interest (other data subjects):
security
Europe, France
IP address (stored for 30 days for security reasons), contact information provided via forms, subscriptions or queries
Processing covered by
DPA
Atlassian Pty Limited and Atlassian, Inc.
Company work management
Legitimate interest
workflow management
USA
name, email address, role of customers
Processing covered by
DPA
Calendly LLC
To book calls with customers, prospective customers or applicants
Contract
USA
Name, email, time zone and date of appointment
Processing covered by
DPA
ChartMogul Ltd
Customer relationship management analytics
Legitimate interest
analysis of data from prospects, leads or customers to improve products, sales and marketing
Germany
B2B customer/prospect: job title, name, phone number, email address.
Processing covered by
DPA
Dovetail Research Pty Ltd
To transcribe, summarise, and process your feedback given in video interviews using
AI tools
Consent
Australia and the EU
Video recording of the interview, transcript, contact details, personal information given during the interview
Processing covered by DPA (available on request) including
AI terms
Employ, Inc. (previously Lever)
To receive job applications and reply to applicants
Contract
USA
All candidate information, resume, references, when staff come onboard after recruitment (successful candidates): Job application details (Email, name, CV/resume, IP address), etc.
Processing covered by
DPA
HappyScribe Ltd.
Transcription of calls with customers and prospective customers
Consent
Ireland
Name, email address, role of customers
Link
Help Scout, PBC
To receive and reply to your messages after you contact us
Consent:
processing and responding to visitors
Contract:
providing customer support or
responding to sales enquiries
Legitimate Interest:
internal communication and management of customer support tasks workflow
USA
Message sent, Name, Email, if included in the email: contact address, job title, company name, company contact details.
Processing covered by
DPA
HubSpot, Inc.
To send marketing materials;
To receive webinar signup confirmation, reminder and follow-up emails
Consent
EU
Email
Processing covered by
DPA
HubSpot, Inc.
CRM system
Legitimate interest:
Processing data from prospects, leads or customers, analysing and improving marketing strategies
EU
Name, email, job title, company name, company contact details, sale details, account type, number of authorised users, requirements, account activation, etc.
Processing covered by
DPA
Intuition Machines
Authorisation
Legitimate interest
ensuring security and authorisation
USA
IP address numbers, device information.
Processing covered by
DPA
MadMimi
(owned by
GoDaddy Operating Company, LLC)
To send you our newsletter emails after you sign up
Consent
USA
Email
Processing covered by
DPA
Microsoft France SAS
Use Microsoft 365 to manage workflows, files and documentation; email correspondence; meetings and scheduling
Consent:
processing and responding to visitors
Contract:
managing and providing customer support or
responding to sales enquiries
Legitimate interest (in other cases):
workflow, file and documentation management;
correspondence;
meeting scheduling
France, EU
Name, email address, mailing address, telephone number, department, role, company name; 

Correspondence; 

Associated Matomo account; 

Billing address, subscriptions and payment history
Processing is covered by DPA (available on request)
Productboard, Inc
To collate and process product and services feedback
Legitimate interest:
processing product and services feedback
USA
Work title and company name, any personal data included in the feedback.
Processing is covered by DPA (available on request)
Slack Technologies Limited
(Ireland)
Used for internal company communications
Legitimate interest:
internal chat tool to discuss projects, requests, workflow, operations
TBC
Name, email address, mailing address, telephone number, department, role, company name;
Correspondence;
Associated Matomo account;
Billing address, subscriptions and payment history;
Processing covered by
DPA
Userlike UG
To be able to chat with you
Consent
Germany
IP Address, Chat transcript, Email address, Browser, Operating system, Device, Number of page requests, Number of page visits, Referrer, URL (where the chat originated), Questionnaire before and after the chat (optional), Chat topic, Chat status (new, pending, closed), Chat evaluation after the chat, Duration of the chat, Date of the chat, Geo location (voluntary, optional), Media files shared by the contact with the operator during the chat
Processing covered by
DPA
UXtweak j.s.a.
To collect user/customer feedback
Consent
Slovenia
Name, email, job title, company, feedback
Processing covered by
DPA
Zoho Corporation Pvt. Ltd.
To host customer feedback surveys
Legitimate interest:
collect customer feedback;
improve product and services
EU
Customer email and feedback
link
(DPA available on request)
B. Third party services we use
When you visit our websites, or purchase products or services, we use the following third party services providers who collect and process your data as data controllers or joint controllers with us. These providers may collect personal data beyond the data we collect about you.
Please refer to the privacy policies of these third parties for full information about what personal data these third parties collect about you, how they process the data, on what legal basis and how to exercise your data subject rights against them.
Recipient
Purpose of processing
Our legal basis for processing
Data location and security
Examples of personal data collected by the third party
Third party Privacy Policy
Cognism Limited
To enable customer and prospective customer data enrichment in B2B (business to business) context. This is to enable us to tailor our communications with you to better fit your needs and to better understand our customer base.
Legitimate interest
sales and marketing
customisation of communications
product development
UK, Croatia
Company (employer company and company details), Job Title, Industry, Office location (including city), Business telephone number, Business email address, LinkedIn URL. In some cases we may receive from Cognism information about your previous employers and titles.
    
    You can
opt out of Cognism Data
processing or opt out from us enriching your data by completing this
form
.
link
Communiteq Q B.V.
(previously Discourse Hosting)
To enable users to create an account on Matomo forum and participate in the forum.
Contract
Germany
Email address, Username, Name, Password, Posts
link
Quickchannel AB
To sign up for live webinar, receive confirmation, reminder and follow-up emails and participate in live webinars; to control live webinar access
Contract
Sweden (EU)
Name, Email, Company, Phone number, IP address, Browser information, Operating system, Type of device, Screen size, Internet connection
link
PayPal Pte. Ltd.
(PayPal Braintree)
To receive payments
Contract
USA Singapore
Username, password, names, e-mail, payment information, phone number, billing address
link
Youtube
(operated by
Google LLC
)
Social media content provision and interactions
To embed video files on our websites. We use Privacy Enhanced Mode to prevent your viewing of the embedded content being used to personalise your YouTube browsing experience
Legitimate interest (content creation and user interaction)
or
Consent (if required for specific processing, e.g., embedding content on our website)
USA
At minimum your IP address, data processing in local storage and possibly cookies. If you are logged into Google account, Google may merge this action with your account.
link
Zoom Video Communications, Inc.
To conduct meetings with customers and prospective customers
Contract
USA
Profile info (unique user ID); profile picture; Diagnostic Data (event logs, session information, host and participant information);Telemetry data (data collected from devices, microphone, speaker, hard disk ID, MAC address); other service data;  Customer authentication data; session content, chat messages, customer initiated cloud recordings; meeting and participant info, stored chat info, etc.
link
C. When you instruct us to transfer data to third parties
Looker Studio Integration
: We provide the
Matomo Connector
(the “Connector”), designed to facilitate the seamless integration of your Matomo On-Premise account data with Looker Studio. Should you choose to activate or utilise the Matomo Connector, please be aware of the following:
Data Export
: Upon activation of the Matomo Connector, all data stored within your Matomo account will be exported to Looker Studio. This transfer is initiated by you and is under your control.
Data Privacy
: Once your data is exported to Looker Studio, it will be governed by the applicable
Looker Studio terms of service and policies
provided by Google. We strongly advise you to review their terms and policies and understand the implications before initiating the data transfer.
Privacy Considerations
: Transferring data, especially visitor data, to external platforms can have privacy implications. It's crucial to ensure that you have the necessary permissions and have considered the privacy ramifications of such a transfer.
Exclusive Connector Use
: To ensure the security and privacy of your data, we recommend exclusively using the
Matomo Connector
for this integration. Avoid using third-party connectors or tools for Looker Studio that claim compatibility with Matomo, as we cannot vouch for their security or data handling practices.
International transfers
If the EU GDPR or UK GDPR applies to our processing of your personal data, we receive it in New Zealand on the basis of adequacy decision. For the above processors and third-party services, we transfer your personal  data to a third country (i.e. outside the European Union (EU), the United Kingdom or the European Economic Area (EEA)) or the processing takes place in the context of the use of third-party services or the disclosure or transfer of data to other persons, bodies or companies, only in accordance with the applicable legal requirements.
Specifically, for the above processors and third-party services, we process or allow the data to be processed on the basis of adequacy or standard contractual clauses of the EU Commission, subject to data transfer impact assessments where required. More information on this is available from us upon request.
Retention of data
We will retain your information as long as your account is active, as necessary to provide you with the services or as otherwise set forth in this Policy. We will also retain and use this information as necessary for the purposes set out in this Policy and to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, enforce our agreements and protect our legal rights.
We also collect and maintain aggregated, anonymised information which we may retain indefinitely to protect the safety and security of our websites, improve our Services or comply with legal obligations.
How We Protect Your Personal Data
Data security is important to us. We process your personal data securely, using appropriate technical and organisation measures designed to protect your data from unauthorised access, disclosure, alteration or loss. Some of the measures applied by InnoCraft include: use of secure cloud infrastructure compliant with a number of information security standards, access controls, bug bounty, in-transit and at-rest encryption, response and tracking of security risks and availability controls.
If you have any concerns about the security of your personal data, please contact us immediately using the contact details provided below.
Automated decision-making including profiling
We do not perform automated decision making or profiling.
Privacy Policy changes
We may update this Policy from time to time. If we do, we’ll let you know about any material changes, either by notifying you on the website or by sending you an email. Once posted on this website, the amended Privacy Policy will be effective as of the Effective Date stated above.
Contact us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or how your personal data is processed, please contact us by emailing
privacy@matomo.org
or via the contact form:
matomo.org/contact
.
If you are based in New Zealand, you can write to us at our registered address: InnoCraft Limited, 7 Waterloo Quay, PO625, 6140 Wellington, New Zealand, Attention: Privacy Officer.
We aim to respond to your inquiries as soon as reasonably possible. If you want to give us feedback on how we handled your request, please let us know. We are always trying to improve.
EU Representative
Because InnoCraft is located outside of the EU and UK, the InnoCraft team has named a representative of controllers or processors not established in the EU or the EEA and in the UK (Art. 27 GDPR):
If you are a resident of the EU or the EEA, you can contact:
ePrivacy Holding GmbH
Burchardstraße 14
20095 Hamburg
Germany
www.eprivacy.eu/en/legal
If you are a resident of the UK, you can contact:
UK Representative Service for GDPR Ltd.
7 Savoy Court
London WC2R 0EX
United Kingdom
www.eprivacy.eu/en/legal
External Data Protection Officer
If you wish to communicate directly with our Data Protection Officer (because you have a particularly sensitive matter for example), please contact them by post, as communication by e-mail could always have security gaps.
Please state in your request that your concern relates to the company InnoCraft.
External Data Protection Officer
ePrivacy GmbH
represented by Prof. Dr.
Christoph Bauer
Burchardstraße 14, 20095 Hamburg
Germany
Sub-policy 26
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024 |
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 27
https://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy/:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Instagram on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Instagram, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 28
https://twitter.com/de/privacy:
Skip to main content
Datenschutzrichtlinien
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Privacy Center
Hilfe-Center
Archiv der Datenschutzerklärungen
PDF herunterladen
X Datenschutzrichtlinien
Gültig ab: 15. November 2024
Vor dem Scrollen bitte lesen
Es ist wirklich schwer, alle mit einer Datenschutzerklärung zufrieden zu stellen. Die meisten Personen, die X nutzen, wollen etwas Kurzes und leicht Verständliches. Wir wünschten zwar, wir könnten alles, was Sie wissen müssen, in einen Post packen, aber unsere Regulierungsbehörden verlangen von uns, dass wir unseren rechtlichen Verpflichtungen nachkommen und alle Richtlinien sehr detailliert beschreiben.
Aus diesem Grund haben wir unsere Datenschutzrichtlinien so einfach wie möglich formuliert, damit Sie in der Lage sind, informierte Entscheidungen zu treffen, wenn Sie X nutzen. Unser Ziel ist, dass Sie verstehen, welche Daten wir erfassen, wie sie genutzt und wann sie weitergegeben werden, und dass Sie Kontrolle darüber haben.
Wenn Sie also nicht jedes Wort der Datenschutzerklärung lesen, sollten Sie wenigstens Folgendes wissen:
X ist eine öffentliche Plattform
Erfahren Sie, was angezeigt und durchsucht werden kann
Wir erheben einige Daten
über Sie
Erfahren Sie, was wir erfassen und wie
Dienste unserer verbundenen Unternehmen können ihre eigenen Richtlinien haben
Erfahren Sie mehr über verbundene Unternehmen
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten zur Verbesserung von X
Erfahren Sie, wie wir Ihre Daten nutzen
Sie haben die Kontrolle über Ihr Erlebnis
Erfahren Sie, wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen aktualisieren
Wenn Sie Fragen zur Datennutzung haben, dann stellen Sie sie!
Erfahren Sie, wie Sie uns kontaktieren können
Datenschutzrichtlinien
1. Daten, die wir erheben
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
3. Weitergabe von Daten
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
9. Allgemein
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
Datenschutzrichtlinien
1. Daten, die wir erheben
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
3. Weitergabe von Daten
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
9. Allgemein
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
1. Daten, die wir erheben
Die Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen, lassen sich in drei Kategorien unterteilen.
1.1 Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen.
Zur Nutzung einiger unserer Produkte und Dienste benötigen Sie einen Account, und zur Erstellung eines Accounts müssen Sie uns bestimmte Daten zur Verfügung stellen. Gleichfalls können wir, wenn Sie unsere kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste nutzen, Ihnen diese nicht zur Verfügung stellen, wenn wir Ihre Zahlungsdaten nicht erhalten. Grundsätzlich brauchen wir für viele unserer Produkte und Dienste bestimmte Daten, damit Sie sie nutzen können.
Persönliche Accounts.
Wenn Sie einen Account erstellen, müssen Sie uns einige Daten zur Verfügung stellen, damit wir Ihnen unsere Dienste bereitstellen können. Dazu gehören ein Anzeigename (zum Beispiel „Gestalter*innen“); ein Nutzername (zum Beispiel @XGestalter*innen); ein Passwort; eine E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer; ein Geburtsdatum, Ihre Anzeigesprache und Daten zur einmaligen Anmeldung bei Dritten (wenn Sie diese Anmeldemethode wählen). Sie können sich auch dafür entscheiden, Ihren Standort in Ihrem Profil und in Ihren Posts zu teilen und Ihr Adressbuch auf X hochzuladen, damit Sie leichter nach Personen suchen können, die Sie kennen. Ihre Profildaten, einschließlich Ihres Anzeigenamens und Ihres Nutzernamens, sind immer öffentlich, aber Sie können entweder Ihren echten Namen oder ein Pseudonym verwenden. Denken Sie auch daran, dass Sie mehrere X Accounts einrichten können, zum Beispiel wenn Sie verschiedene Aspekte Ihrer Identität zum Ausdruck bringen möchten, sei es beruflich oder anderweitig.
Professionelle Accounts.
Wenn Sie einen
professionellen Account
einrichten, müssen Sie uns auch eine professionelle Kategorie angeben und können uns weitere Daten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich Postanschrift, Kontakt-E-Mail-Adresse und Kontakt-Telefonnummer. Alle diese Daten sind immer öffentlich.
Zahlungsdaten.
Wenn Sie Werbeanzeigen oder andere Angebote kaufen möchten, die im Rahmen unserer kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung gestellt werden, müssen Sie uns Zahlungsdaten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich Ihrer Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer, des Ablaufdatums der Karte, des CVV-Codes und der Rechnungsadresse.
Bevorzugte Einstellungen.
Wenn Sie in Ihren
Einstellungen
bestimmte Präferenzen angeben, erheben wir diese Daten, damit wir Ihre Wünsche berücksichtigen können.
Biometrische Informationen.
Wenn Sie dazu Ihre Einwilligung gegeben haben, können wir Ihre biometrischen Daten zu Sicherheits- und Identifikationszwecken erfassen und verwenden.
Stellenbewerbungen/Empfehlungen.
Wir können Ihre personenbezogenen Daten (z. B. Informationen aus Ihrer Biografie, Ihren beruflichen Werdegang, Ihren Bildungsgang, Ihre Beschäftigungspräferenzen, Fähigkeiten und Fertigkeiten oder Ihre Aktivität und Interaktionen bei der Stellensuche, zusätzlich zu den Informationen, die wir bereits gemäß dem Abschnitt „Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen“ unserer Datenschutzerklärung weiter unten erfassen) dafür erfassen und heranziehen, Ihnen potenzielle Jobs zu empfehlen, sie an potenzielle Arbeitgeber weiterzuleiten, wenn Sie sich auf eine Stelle bewerben, sodass Arbeitgeber potenzielle Kandidat*innen finden können, und Ihnen relevantere Werbung zu zeigen.
1.2 Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie X nutzen.
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Daten darüber, wie Sie unsere Produkte und Dienste nutzen. Mithilfe dieser Daten stellen wir Ihnen Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung und tragen dazu bei, dass X sicherer und respektvoller für alle und relevanter für Sie ist.
Nutzungsinformationen.
Wir erfassen Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten auf X, darunter:
Von Ihnen gepostete Beiträge und andere Inhalte (einschließlich Datum, Anwendung und Version von X) sowie Informationen zu Ihrer Broadcast-Aktivität (z. B. Spaces), einschließlich von Ihnen erstellter Broadcasts und deren Erstellungszeitpunkt, Ihrer Listen, Lesezeichen und Communities, denen Sie angehören.
Ihre Interaktionen mit den Inhalten anderer Nutzer*innen, wie z. B. Reposts, „Gefällt mir“-Angaben, Lesezeichen, geteilten Inhalten, Downloads, Antworten, wenn andere Nutzer*innen Sie in Inhalten erwähnen oder markieren oder wenn Sie sie erwähnen oder markieren, und Broadcasts, an denen Sie teilgenommen haben (einschließlich Ihres Verlaufs in Bezug auf angesehene/angehörte Inhalte, Kommentare, Sprechbeiträge und Reaktionen).
Wie Sie mit anderen auf der Plattform interagieren, beispielsweise mit Personen, denen Sie folgen, und Personen, die Ihnen folgen, Metadaten in Bezug auf
verschlüsselte Nachrichten
und, wenn Sie
Direktnachrichten
verwenden, auch den Inhalt der Nachrichten, die Empfänger*innen sowie Datum und Uhrzeit der Nachrichten.
Wenn Sie mit uns kommunizieren, beispielsweise per E-Mail, erheben wir Daten über die Kommunikation und deren Inhalt.
Wir erheben Daten über Links, mit denen Sie in unseren Diensten interagieren (auch in den E-Mails, die wir Ihnen schicken).
Käufe und Zahlungen.
Damit Sie unter Verwendung von X-Funktionen oder -Diensten eine Zahlung tätigen oder Geld senden können, auch über einen Vermittler, erhalten wir möglicherweise Informationen zu Ihrer Transaktion, etwa wann sie getätigt wurde, wann ein Abonnement abläuft oder automatisch verlängert wird und welche Beträge gezahlt oder erhalten wurden.
Gerätedaten.
Wir erfassen Informationen von und über die Geräte, die Sie für den Zugriff auf X verwenden, darunter:
Daten über Ihre Verbindung, wie beispielsweise Ihre IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp und verwandte Informationen.
Daten über Ihr Gerät und seine Einstellungen, wie beispielsweise Geräte- und Werbe-ID, Betriebssystem, Anbieter, Sprache, Speicher, installierte Apps und Akkustand.
Das Adressbuch Ihres Geräts, wenn Sie sich dazu entschieden haben, es mit uns zu teilen.
Standortinformationen.
Wenn Sie X verwenden, erfassen wir einige Informationen zu Ihrem ungefähren Standort, um Ihnen den erwarteten Dienst bereitzustellen, einschließlich der Anzeige relevanter Werbung. Sie können auch wählen, ob Sie Ihren aktuellen genauen Standort oder Orte, an denen Sie X zuvor genutzt haben, teilen möchten, indem Sie diese Einstellungen in Ihrem Account aktivieren.
Abgeleitete Identität.
Wir können Informationen sammeln oder erhalten, die wir verwenden, um auf Ihre Identität zu schließen, wie unten beschrieben:
Wenn Sie sich mit einem Browser oder Gerät bei X anmelden, verknüpfen wir diesen Browser oder dieses Gerät mit Ihrem Account. Vorbehaltlich Ihrer Einstellungen können wir Ihren Account auch mit anderen Browsern oder Geräten verknüpfen als mit denen, die Sie für die Anmeldung bei X nutzen (oder Ihr abgemeldetes Gerät oder Ihren Browser mit anderen Browsern oder Geräten oder von X generierten Identifikatoren verknüpfen).
Wenn Sie X andere Daten zur Verfügung stellen, einschließlich einer E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer, verknüpfen wir diese Daten mit Ihrem X Account. Vorbehaltlich Ihrer Einstellungen können wir anhand dieser Daten auch andere Daten über Ihre Identität ableiten, zum Beispiel indem wir Ihren Account mit Hashes von E-Mail-Adressen verknüpfen, die gemeinsame Komponenten mit der E-Mail-Adresse haben, die Sie X zur Verfügung gestellt haben.
Wenn Sie auf X zugreifen und nicht angemeldet sind, können wir anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten Rückschlüsse auf Ihre Identität ziehen.
Protokollinformationen.
Wenn Sie Inhalte auf unseren Produkten und Diensten ansehen oder auf andere Weise mit ihnen interagieren, erhalten wir möglicherweise Informationen, auch wenn Sie keinen Account erstellt haben oder abgemeldet sind, beispielsweise:
IP-Adresse und zugehörige Informationen; Browsertyp und -sprache; Betriebssystem; die verweisende Webseite; Zugriffszeiten; besuchte Seiten; Standort; Ihr Mobilfunkanbieter; Geräteinformationen (einschließlich Geräte- und Anwendungs-IDs); Suchbegriffe und IDs (einschließlich derjenigen, die nicht als Abfragen übermittelt wurden); Ihnen auf X angezeigte Anzeigen; von X generierte Kennungen; und mit Cookies verknüpfte Kennungen. Wir erhalten Protokolldaten auch, wenn Sie auf Links in unseren Diensten klicken, sich diese ansehen oder mit ihnen interagieren, u. a. wenn Sie eine andere Applikation über X installieren.
Werbung.
Wenn Sie Werbung ansehen oder mit ihr interagieren, die wir auf oder außerhalb von X bereitstellen, erfassen wir möglicherweise Informationen zu diesen Ansichten oder Interaktionen (z. B. Ansehen einer Videoanzeige oder eines Prerolls, Anklicken einer Anzeige, Interagieren mit Reposts oder Antworten auf eine Anzeige).
Cookies und ähnliche Technologien.
Wie viele Websites verwenden wir Cookies und ähnliche Technologien, um zusätzliche Daten zur Website-Nutzung zu sammeln und unsere Dienste zu betreiben. Für viele Teile unserer Produkte und Dienste, wie etwa die Suche und Anzeige öffentlicher Profile, sind Cookies nicht erforderlich. Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien finden Sie
hier
.
Interaktionen mit unseren Inhalten auf Websites Dritter.
Wenn Sie sich unsere Inhalte auf Websites von Dritten ansehen, die X Inhalte wie eingebettete Timelines oder Buttons zum Posten integrieren, können wir Protokolldaten erhalten, einschließlich der von Ihnen besuchten Webseite.
1.3 Daten, die wir von Dritten erhalten.
Wenn Sie andere Online-Produkte und -Dienste nutzen, können sie Daten über diese Nutzung an uns weitergeben.
Werbepartner, Entwickler, Verleger.
Unsere Werbe- und Geschäftspartner geben Daten wie Browser-Cookie-IDs, von X generierte Identifikatoren,
IDs von Mobilgeräten, gehashte Nutzerdaten wie E-Mail-Adressen, demografische Daten oder Interessensdaten sowie auf einer Website oder App angesehene Inhalte oder durchgeführte Aktionen an uns weiter. Einige unserer Werbepartner, insbesondere unsere Werbekunden, ermöglichen es uns auch, ähnliche Daten direkt von ihrer Website oder App zu erheben, indem sie unsere Werbetechnologie integrieren. Daten, die von Werbepartnern und verbundenen Unternehmen weitergegeben oder von X von den Websites und Apps der Werbepartner und verbundenen Unternehmen erhoben werden, können mit den anderen Daten kombiniert werden, die Sie mit X teilen und die X erhält,
generiert oder
über Sie ableitet, wie an anderer Stelle in diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben.
Andere Dritte, Account-Verbindungen und Integrationen.
Wir können Daten über Sie von Dritten erhalten, die nicht unsere Werbepartner sind, wie beispielsweise von anderen X Nutzer*innen, Entwickler*innen und Partner*innen, die uns helfen, die Sicherheit und Qualität von Inhalten auf unserer Plattform zu bewerten, von unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
und von anderen Diensten, die Sie mit Ihrem X Account verknüpfen. Sie können sich entscheiden, Ihren X Account mit Ihrem Account bei einem anderen Dienst zu verbinden und dieser andere Dienst kann uns Daten über Ihren Account bei diesem Dienst senden.
2. Wie wir Daten verwenden
Aufgrund der Funktionsweise der Systeme, die unsere Dienste für Sie anbieten, ist es nicht einfach, die Verwendung der von uns erhobenen Daten aufzuschlüsseln. So kann beispielsweise dieselbe Dateninformation in verschiedener Art und Weise für verschiedene Zwecke verwendet werden, damit letztlich ein einziger Dienst erbracht werden kann. Am zweckdienlichsten ist es wahrscheinlich, die fünf wichtigsten Arten und Weisen zu erläutern, in der wir Daten verwenden. Wenn Sie Fragen haben, die nicht beantwortet werden, können Sie uns jederzeit
kontaktieren
. Mehr im Folgenden:
2.1 Betreiben, Verbessern und Personalisieren unserer Dienste.
Die von uns erhobenen Daten nutzen wir zur Bereitstellung und zum Betrieb der X Produkte und Dienste. Außerdem verbessern und personalisieren wir mit den erhobenen Daten unsere Produkte und Dienste, damit Sie ein besseres Erlebnis auf X haben, u. a. indem wir Ihnen relevantere Inhalte und Werbung zeigen, Ihnen Personen und Themen vorschlagen, denen Sie folgen können, und Ihnen helfen,
verbundene Unternehmen
, Apps von Dritten und Dienste zu entdecken. Wir können die Daten, die wir erheben, und öffentlich verfügbare Daten zum Training unserer Modelle für Maschinenlernen oder künstliche Intelligenz für die in dieser Richtlinie dargelegten Zwecke heranziehen.
Wir können die Daten, die wir von Accounts anderer Dienste erheben, bei denen Sie sich zur Verknüpfung mit Ihrem X Accounts entschieden haben, heranziehen, damit wir Ihnen Funktionen wie dienstübergreifendes Posting oder dienstübergreifende Authentifizierung bieten und unsere Dienste betreiben können.
Anhand Ihrer Kontaktdaten helfen wir anderen, Ihren Account zu finden, wenn Ihre Einstellungen dies zulassen, u. a. über Dienste von Dritten und Client-Applikationen.
Vorbehaltlich Ihrer
Einstellungen
stellen wir mithilfe Ihrer Daten unsere Dienste für Werbung und gesponserte Inhalte bereit, was dabei hilft, die Werbeanzeigen auf X für Sie relevanter zu gestalten. Anhand dieser Daten messen wir auch die Effektivität von Werbeanzeigen und helfen, Ihre Geräte zu erkennen, damit wir Werbeanzeigen auf und außerhalb von X für Sie schalten können. Einige unserer Werbepartner ermöglichen es uns auch, ähnliche Daten direkt von ihrer Website oder App zu erheben, indem sie unsere Werbetechnologie integrieren. Daten, die von Werbepartnern und verbundenen Unternehmen weitergegeben oder von X von den Websites und Apps der Werbepartner und verbundenen Unternehmen erhoben werden, können mit den anderen Daten kombiniert werden, die Sie mit X teilen und die X erhält, generiert oder über Sie ableitet, wie an anderer Stelle in unseren Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben.
2.2  Sicherheit und Schutz fördern.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten sorgen wir für den Schutz und die Sicherheit unserer Nutzer*innen, unserer Produkte, unserer Dienste und Ihres Accounts. Dazu gehören die Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, die Authentifizierung Ihres Accounts und die Abwehr von Betrug, unbefugter Nutzung und illegalen Aktivitäten. Außerdem bewerten und beeinflussen wir mithilfe der Daten die Sicherheit und Qualität der Inhalte auf X. Das beinhaltet die Untersuchung und Durchsetzung unserer Richtlinien und AGB sowie des geltenden Rechts.
2.3 Messen, Analysieren und Verbessern unserer Dienst.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten messen und analysieren wir die Effektivität unserer Produkte und Dienste und lernen besser verstehen, wie Sie sie nutzen, damit wir sie weiter verbessern können.
2.4 Kommunikation mit Ihnen über unsere Dienste.
Anhand der von uns erhobenen Daten kommunizieren wir mit Ihnen über unsere Produkte und Dienste, u. a. über Produktaktualisierungen und Änderungen unserer Richtlinien und AGB. Wenn Sie sich dafür entscheiden, können wir Ihnen auch gelegentlich Marketingnachrichten schicken.
2.5 Forschung.
Anhand der Daten, die Sie uns mitteilen oder die wir erheben, führen wir Forschung, Umfragen, Produkttests und Fehlerbehebungen durch, die uns helfen, unsere Produkte und Dienste zu betreiben und zu verbessern.
3. Weitergabe von Daten
Sie sollten wissen, auf welche Weise wir Ihre Daten weitergeben, warum wir sie weitergeben und wie Sie dies beeinflussen können. Es gibt fünf grundsätzliche Möglichkeiten, wie wir Ihre Daten weitergeben.
3.1 Wenn Sie posten und teilen.
An die breite Öffentlichkeit
. Sie weisen uns an, diese Daten so weit wie möglich offenzulegen. Die Inhalte von X, einschließlich Ihrer Profildaten (z. B. Name/Pseudonym, Nutzername, Profilbilder), sind für die breite Öffentlichkeit zur Ansicht zugänglich. Die Öffentlichkeit muss sich nicht anmelden, um einen Teil der Inhalte auf X zu sehen. X Inhalte sind auch außerhalb von X auffindbar, zum Beispiel über die Ergebnisse von Suchanfragen in Internet-Suchmaschinen oder in Videos, die heruntergeladen und anderswo geteilt wurden (abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
).
An andere X Nutzer*innen.
Abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
und basierend auf den X Produkten und Diensten, die Sie nutzen, geben wir Folgendes weiter:
Ihre Interaktionen mit X-Inhalten anderer Benutzer, z. B. Antworten und Personen, denen Sie folgen.
Inhalte, die Sie an bestimmte X Nutzer*innen senden, wie beispielsweise über
Direktnachrichten
. Zur Beachtung: Wenn Sie Daten wie Direktnachrichten oder geschützte Posts mit einer Person geteilt haben, die über einen Dienst eines Dritten auf X zugreift, können die Daten an den Dienst des Dritten weitergegeben werden.
An Partner.
Abhängig von Ihren
Einstellungen
stellen wir auch bestimmten Dritten Daten zur Verfügung, damit sie uns beim Angebot oder Betrieb unserer Produkte und Dienste unterstützen. In unserem
Hilfe-Center
erfahren Sie mehr über diese Partnerschaften. Ob X Ihre personenbezogenen Daten an diese Partner weitergibt, steuern Sie über die Option „Datenaustausch mit Geschäftspartnern“ in Ihren
Einstellungen für Datenschutz und Sicherheit
. (Diese Einstellung steuert nicht die Weitergabe, die an anderer Stelle in diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien beschrieben wird, wie beispielsweise wenn wir Daten mit unseren Dienstleistern oder durch andere als die in diesem
Hilfe-Center
-Artikel beschriebenen Partnerschaften teilen.)
3.2 Mit Drittanbietern und Drittanbieterintegrationen.
An Dienstleister.
Wir können Ihre Daten an unsere
Dienstleister
weitergeben, die in unserem Auftrag Funktionen und Dienste erbringen, u.a. Zahlungsdienstleister, die Zahlungen ermöglichen; Servicepartner, die unsere verschiedenen Blogs und Wikis hosten; Servicepartner, die uns helfen, die Nutzung unserer Dienste zu verstehen, Anbieter von Bewerberverfolgungssystemen, die Bewerber- und Stellendaten an mögliche Arbeitgeber versenden und von ihnen enthalten, und solche, die Betrugserkennungsdienste anbieten.
An Werbekunden.
Werbeeinnahmen ermöglichen es uns, unsere Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen. Werbekunden können Daten aus Ihrer Interaktion mit ihren Werbeanzeigen auf oder außerhalb von X erhalten. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in unseren Diensten auf einen externen Link oder eine Werbeanzeige klicken, kann der Werbekunde oder der Betreiber der Website herausfinden, dass Sie von X gekommen sind, zusammen mit anderen Daten, die mit der Werbeanzeige, auf die Sie geklickt haben, verknüpft sind, wie beispielsweise Merkmale der Zielgruppe, die damit erreicht werden sollte, und andere von X generierte Identifikatoren für diese Werbeanzeige. Sie können auch andere personenbezogene Daten von Ihnen erheben, wie beispielsweise Cookie-Identifikatoren oder Ihre IP-Adresse.
Inhalte und Integrationen von Dritten.
Wir geben Ihre Daten mit Ihrer Einwilligung oder auf Ihre Anweisung hin weiter oder legen diese offen, beispielsweise wenn Sie
einen Web-Client oder eine Applikation eines Dritten autorisieren
, auf Ihren Account zuzugreifen, oder uns anweisen, Ihr Feedback an ein Unternehmen weiterzugeben. Gleichfalls arbeiten wir zur Verbesserung Ihrer Nutzung mit Dritten zusammen, damit ihre Videoinhalte auf X angezeigt oder Inhalte plattformübergreifend geteilt werden können. Wenn Sie sich Inhalte unserer Videopartner oder plattformübergreifenden Partner ansehen oder anderweitig mit diesen interagieren, können diese Ihre personenbezogenen Daten erhalten und verarbeiten, wie in ihren Datenschutzerklärungen beschrieben. Für Videoinhalte können Sie Ihre
Autoplay-Einstellungen
anpassen, wenn Sie möchten, dass die Inhalte nicht automatisch abgespielt werden.
Kooperation mit Dritten.
Wenn Sie die entsprechenden
Einstellungen
vorgenommen haben oder sich dazu entschließen, Ihre Daten weiterzugeben, können wir Ihre Informationen an Dritte weitergeben oder offenlegen. Wenn Sie sich nicht abmelden, können die Empfänger der Informationen diese in einigen Fällen zusätzlich zu den in der Datenschutzrichtlinie von X genannten Zwecken auch für ihre eigenen unabhängigen Zwecke verwenden, darunter beispielsweise zum Trainieren ihrer Modelle künstlicher Intelligenz, ob generativ oder anderweitig.
Durch unsere APIs.
Wir verwenden Technologien wie
APIs
und Einbettungen zur Bereitstellung öffentlicher X Daten für Websites, Apps und andere zu ihrer Nutzung, zum Beispiel damit Posts auf einer Nachrichten-Website angezeigt werden können oder damit analysiert werden kann, was Personen auf X äußern. Wir stellen diese Inhalte in der Regel in begrenztem Umfang kostenlos zur Verfügung und erheben Lizenzgebühren für den Zugriff in großem Umfang. Wir haben
Standard
-Geschäftsbedingungen, die regeln, wie diese Daten verwendet werden können, und ein Compliance-Programm zur Durchsetzung dieser Bedingungen. Diese Personen und Unternehmen sind jedoch nicht mit X verbunden und ihre Angebote spiegeln möglicherweise nicht die Aktualisierungen wider, die Sie auf X vornehmen. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir der Welt öffentliche Daten auf X zur Verfügung stellen, finden Sie unter
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 In Fällen, in denen es gesetzlich vorgeschrieben ist, zur Verhinderung von Schaden oder im öffentlichen Interesse.
Wir können Ihre Daten aufbewahren, verwenden, weitergeben oder offenlegen, wenn wir glauben, dass es für einen der folgenden Zwecke vernünftigerweise notwendig ist:
zur Einhaltung eines Gesetzes, einer Verordnung oder
zur Erfüllung eines rechtsgültigen Verfahrens oder einer behördlichen Anfrage
zum Schutz der Sicherheit einer Person, zum Schutz der Sicherheit oder Integrität unserer Plattform, u. a. zur Verhinderung von Spam, Missbrauch oder böswilligen Akteuren auf unseren Diensten
Erklären, warum wir Inhalte oder Konten aus unseren Diensten entfernt haben (z. B. wegen eines Verstoßes gegen
unsere Regeln
);
zur Lösung von Problemen mit Betrug und Sicherheit oder technischen Problemen
zum Schutz unserer Rechte oder unseres Eigentum oder der Rechte oder des Eigentums der Personen, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir können außerdem verschiedene Signale und Ihre Daten zur Ableitung, Aufbewahrung, Nutzung, Weiterleitung oder Offenlegung Ihres Alter und Ihrer Identitätsinformationen heranziehen, damit wir gesetzliche Vorschriften einhalten können sowie je nach Sachlage im Interesse von Sicherheit, Schutz, Betrugsbekämpfung, Sorgfaltspflichten in Bezug auf Kund*innen und Unternehmen sowie zur Identitätsprüfung. Zu diesen Zwecken können wir Ihre Alters- und Identitätsinformationen auch an unsere Partner, Dienstanbieter und andere weitergeben oder offenlegen.
3.4 An unsere verbundenen Unternehmen.
Wir können Daten an unsere
verbundenen Unternehmen
weitergeben, damit unsere Produkte und Dienste zur Verfügung gestellt werden können.
3.5 Änderung der Eigentumsverhältnisse.
Wir können Daten über Sie in Verbindung mit einer Fusion, Übernahme, Reorganisation, einem Verkauf von Vermögenswerten oder einem Konkurs weitergeben, verkaufen oder übertragen. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten, die (vor und nach dem Abschluss einer Transaktion) an das neue Unternehmen weitergegeben oder übertragen werden.
4. Wie lange wir Daten aufbewahren
Wir bewahren verschiedene Arten von Informationen für unterschiedlich lange Zeiträume auf, abhängig davon, wie lange wir sie benötigen, damit wir Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienste bereitstellen und unseren gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachkommen können, sowie aus Sicherheitsgründen. Zum Beispiel:
Wir speichern Ihre Profilinformationen wie Ihren Anzeigenamen, Benutzernamen, Ihr Passwort und Ihre E-Mail-Adresse für die Dauer Ihres Kontos. Ohne die Speicherung dieser Informationen können wir Ihnen unsere Produkte und Dienstleistungen nicht bereitstellen.
Wir speichern Ihre Nutzungsinformationen, beispielsweise die von Ihnen veröffentlichten Inhalte, Ihre Interaktionen mit den Inhalten anderer Nutzer*innen und Ihre Interaktion mit anderen auf der Plattform, solange Ihr Account besteht oder bis diese Inhalte entfernt werden.
Wir speichern Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, einschließlich Ihrer Kredit- oder Debitkartennummer und Rechnungsadresse, für die Dauer, in der Sie unsere kostenpflichtigen Produkte und Dienste nutzen. Aufzeichnungen von Transaktionen werden im Einklang mit geltendem Recht länger aufbewahrt.
Wenn Sie mit uns kommunizieren, beispielsweise per E-Mail, bewahren wir Informationen über die Kommunikation und deren Inhalt bis zu 18 Monate lang auf, es sei denn, wir müssen sie für einen längeren Zeitraum aufbewahren, um unseren gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen nachzukommen oder unsere gesetzlichen Rechte auszuüben oder zu verteidigen.
Wir erfassen Geräteinformationen, Standortinformationen, abgeleitete Identitätsinformationen und Protokollinformationen im Allgemeinen mithilfe von Cookies. Wir bewahren Cookies und mithilfe von Cookies erfasste Informationen bis zu 13 Monate lang auf. Weitere Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies und ähnlichen Technologien finden Sie
hier
.
Informationen zu Ihren Ansichten oder Interaktionen mit Anzeigen mit oder ohne X sowie zu Ihrer Interaktion mit unseren Inhalten auf Websites von Drittanbietern speichern wir bis zu 90 Tage lang.
Wir speichern von Werbe- und Geschäftspartnern weitergegebene Informationen bis zu 90 Tage lang.
Wenn Sie gegen unsere Regeln verstoßen und Ihr Account gesperrt wird, können wir die Identifikatoren, die Sie zur Erstellung des Accounts verwendet haben (z. B. E-Mail-Adresse oder Telefonnummer), auf unbestimmte Zeit speichern. Dadurch wollen wir verhindern, dass Wiederholungstäter*innen neue Accounts erstellen.
Um gesetzliche Anforderungen zu erfüllen und aus Sicherheitsgründen müssen wir bestimmte Informationen möglicherweise länger aufbewahren, als in unseren Richtlinien angegeben. Zum Beispiel:
Damit wir einem Gesetz, einer Verordnung, einem rechtsgültigen Verfahren oder einer behördlichen Anfrage nachkommen können.
Darunter fällt die Erfüllung einer rechtlich angemessenen Aufbewahrungsanfrage von Strafverfolgungsbehörden. Weitere Informationen zum Zugriff durch Strafverfolgungsbehörden finden Sie
hier
.
Im Zusammenhang mit Rechtsansprüchen, Rechtsstreitigkeiten und behördlichen Angelegenheiten.
Einschließlich der Fälle, in denen es vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, Informationen zu Ihrem Konto aufzubewahren, um X gegen Rechtsansprüche zu verteidigen.
Um die Sicherheit unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu gewährleisten.
Einschließlich der Fälle, in denen es erforderlich ist, Ihre Daten länger zu speichern, um den Missbrauch unserer Produkte und Dienstleistungen zu untersuchen und zu bekämpfen.
Bedenken Sie, dass öffentliche Inhalte auch nach ihrer Entfernung von X noch woanders vorhanden sein können. Suchmaschinen und andere Drittanbieter können beispielsweise Kopien Ihrer Beiträge auf Grundlage ihrer eigenen Datenschutzrichtlinien länger aufbewahren, selbst nachdem sie auf X gelöscht wurden oder abgelaufen sind. Weitere Informationen zur Suchsichtbarkeit finden Sie
hier
.
5. Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle
5.1 Zugriff, Berichtigung, Übertragbarkeit.
Sie können auf die Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung gestellt haben, zugreifen, sie berichtigen oder ändern, indem Sie Ihr Profil bearbeiten und Ihre Account-
Einstellungen
anpassen.
Unter
Deine X Daten
erfahren Sie mehr über die Daten, die wir über Sie erhoben oder abgeleitet haben.
Hier
können Sie Zugriff auf weitere Daten anfordern.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Daten, z. B. Ihrer Posts, herunterladen, indem Sie den Anweisungen
hier
folgen.
Zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre und zur Aufrechterhaltung der Sicherheit ergreifen wir Maßnahmen zur Überprüfung Ihrer Identität, bevor wir Ihnen Auskunft über Ihre personenbezogenen Daten gewähren oder einem Antrag auf Löschung, Übertragbarkeit oder einem anderen damit zusammenhängenden Antrag nachkommen. In bestimmten Situationen können wir Ihren Antrag auf Zugriff, Berichtigung oder Übertragbarkeit ablehnen, z. B. wenn Sie Ihre Identität nicht nachweisen können.
5.2 Löschung Ihrer Daten.
Wenn Sie den Anweisungen
hier
folgen, wird Ihr Account deaktiviert und Ihre Daten werden in eine Warteschlange zur Löschung gestellt. Ist Ihr X Account deaktiviert, sind der Account, Ihr Anzeigename, Ihr Nutzername und Ihr öffentliches Profil auf X.com, in X für iOS und in X für Android nicht mehr sichtbar. Bis zu 30 Tage nach der Deaktivierung ist eine Wiederherstellung Ihres X Accounts möglich, falls er versehentlich oder fälschlich deaktiviert wurde.
5.3 Widerspruch, Einschränkung oder Rückzug Ihrer Einwilligung.
Hier
können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen und andere Account-Funktionen verwalten. Wenn Sie Ihre Einstellungen ändern, kann es einige Zeit dauern, bis Ihre Auswahl in unseren Systemen vollständig umgesetzt ist. Abhängig davon, welche Einstellungen Sie angepasst haben, können Sie auch Änderungen bei Ihrer X Nutzung oder Einschränkungen beim Zugriff auf bestimmte Funktionen feststellen. Sie können auch zusätzliche Einstellungen verwalten, wenn Sie mit bestimmten Inhalten und Funktionen in verschiedenen Teilen der Plattform interagieren, z. B. ob ein
Space
aufgezeichnet wird oder ob
Videos, die Sie hochladen,
von anderen heruntergeladen werden können.
5.4 Anfragen von bevollmächtigten Vertreter*innen.
Wenn Sie eine Anfrage bezüglich des Zugriffs, der Berichtigung oder der Löschung Ihrer Daten oder der Daten einer anderen Person, deren bevollmächtigte*r Vertreter*in Sie sind, stellen möchten, können Sie sich auch mit der Methode an uns wenden, die im Abschnitt „Wie kann ich X kontaktieren?“ unserer Datenschutzrichtlinien unten beschrieben ist. Wir können von Ihnen verlangen, dass Sie zusätzliche Daten zur Überprüfung zur Verfügung stellen.
6. Ihre und unsere Rechte
Wir stellen X Personen auf der ganzen Welt zur Verfügung und bieten allen unseren Nutzer*innen, unabhängig von ihrem Wohnort, viele der gleichen Datenschutz-Tools und Kontrollmöglichkeiten. Es kann jedoch sein, dass sich Ihre Nutzung etwas anders gestaltet als für Nutzer*innen in anderen Ländern. Das soll sicherstellen, dass X die lokalen Anforderungen respektiert.
6.1 Wir stützen uns bei der Nutzung Ihrer Daten auf bestimmte Rechtsgrundlagen.
X hat die Rechtsgrundlagen, auf deren Grundlage es X erlaubt ist, Ihre Daten zu erheben, zu verwenden, weiterzugeben und anderweitig zu verarbeiten, sorgfältig geprüft. Wenn Sie mehr erfahren und die Feinheiten besser verstehen möchten, empfehlen wir Ihnen, sich diese
zusätzlichen Informationen über die Datenverarbeitung
anzusehen. Und nein, wir verkaufen Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht.
6.2 Wir verlagern Ihre Daten, damit X für Sie funktioniert.
So wie Sie sich mit X nahtlos an globalen Konversationen mit Personen in Ländern auf der ganzen Welt beteiligen, muss X Daten über Grenzen hinweg und in verschiedene Länder auf der ganzen Welt verlagern, damit der sichere und zuverlässige Dienst, auf den Sie sich verlassen, möglich wird. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel in Europa leben und eine Konversation mit jemandem in den USA führen, müssen Daten zwischen diesen Ländern ausgetauscht werden, damit die Konversation möglich wird. Das ist es, was Sie von uns erwarten.
Wir nutzen auch Rechenzentren und Cloud-Anbieter und beauftragen
unsere verbundenen Unternehmen
sowie Dritte und
Dienstleister
in vielen Teilen der Welt, damit sie uns bei der Bereitstellung unserer Dienste helfen. Bevor wir Daten zwischen Ländern übertragen, prüfen wir die Risiken, die für die Daten bestehen können, und verlassen uns, sofern zutreffend, auf
Standardvertragsklauseln
(SCCs), um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Datenschutzrechte geschützt sind. Um eine Kopie der SCCs anzufordern, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte
hier
. Wenn Daten an Dritte weitergegeben werden, verlangen wir von ihnen, dass sie den gleichen Schutz für Ihre Daten gewährleisten, wie wir selbst bieten.
X ist an Datenschutz-Rahmenvereinbarungen (Data Privacy Frameworks, DPF) zwischen der EU und den USA und zwischen der Schweiz und den USA und an der Ausweitung des EU-US PDF auf das Vereinigte Königreich
beteiligt
. X beachtet bei jeglicher Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die aus der Europäischen Union, der Schweiz und dem Vereinigten Königreich stammen, die DPF-Prinzipien in Bezug auf die DPF zwischen der EU und den USA bzw. der Schweiz und den USA bzw. in Bezug auf die Ausweitung des EU-US PDF auf das Vereinigte Königreich. Wenn Sie eine Anfrage oder Beschwerde bezüglich unserer Teilnahme am DPF haben, kontaktieren Sie uns bitte
hier
. Im Rahmen unserer Beteiligung an den DPF versuchen wir bei Streitigkeiten zwischen Ihnen und uns in Bezug auf unsere Einhaltung der DPF-Prinzipien, diese durch unser internes Beschwerdeverfahren zu lösen, alternativ durch die in den USA basierte unabhängige Schlichtungsstelle
JAMS
, und unter bestimmten Bedingungen durch das DPF-Schlichtungsverfahren anhand der Verfahren und gemäß den Bedingungen, die in
Anhang 1
zu den DPF-Prinzipien beschrieben sind. DPF-Teilnehmer unterliegen den Untersuchungs- und Durchsetzungsbefugnissen der US-amerikanischen Federal Trade Commission und anderer autorisierter gesetzlicher Stellen. Unter bestimmten Umständen können die beteiligten Parteien für die Übertragung personenbezogener Daten aus der EU, der Schweiz und dem Vereinigten Königreich an Dritte außerhalb der EU, der Schweiz und des Vereinigten Königreichs haftbar sein. Weitere Informationen zum EU-US-DPF, zum Schweiz-US-DPF und zur britischen Erweiterung des EU-US-DPF
finden Sie hier
.
7. Die Zielgruppe von X
8. Änderungen an diesen Datenschutzrichtlinien
Die aktuellste Version dieser Datenschutzerklärung regelt unsere Verarbeitung Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten und wir können diese Datenschutzerklärung gelegentlich nach Bedarf überarbeiten.
Wenn wir diese Datenschutzrichtlinien überarbeiten und Änderungen vornehmen, die wir als wesentlich erachten, werden wir Sie darüber informieren und Ihnen die Möglichkeit geben, die überarbeiteten Datenschutzrichtlinien zu überprüfen, bevor Sie X weiter nutzen.
9. Allgemein
Die X Datenschutzrichtlinien sind auf Englisch verfasst, werden aber durch Übersetzungen in mehreren Sprachen verfügbar gemacht. X strebt an, dass die Übersetzungen die englische Originalversion so genau wie möglich wiedergeben. Im Falle von Abweichungen oder Unstimmigkeiten hat jedoch die englischsprachige Version der X Datenschutzrichtlinien Vorrang. Sie erkennen an, dass Englisch die Referenzsprache für die Interpretation und Konstruktion der Bedingungen der X Datenschutzrichtlinien ist.
10. Kontaktaufnahme mit X
Wir möchten von Ihnen hören, wenn Sie Gedanken oder Fragen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung haben. Sie können uns über unsere Seite für
Anfragen zum Datenschutz
kontaktieren oder uns an die unten angegebene Adresse schreiben.
Informationen zu unserer Handhabung von Anfragen im Rahmen des California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) finden Sie
hier
. Informationen zur Handhabung von „Consumer Health Data“ und zu zugehörigen Anfragen, wie sie im „My Health My Data Act“ des US-Bundesstaates Washington und in anderen, ähnlichen Gesetzen von US-Bundesstaaten definiert sind, finden Sie
hier
.
Wenn Sie in den USA oder einem anderen Land außerhalb der Europäischen Union, der EFTA-Staaten oder des Vereinigten Königreichs leben, ist der für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten Verantwortliche X Corp. unter folgender Adresse:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
Wenn Sie in der Europäischen Union, den EFTA-Staaten oder dem Vereinigten Königreich leben, ist der Datenverantwortliche, der für Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verantwortlich ist, Twitter International Unlimited Company mit der folgenden Adresse:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRLAND
Wenn Sie in der Schweiz wohnen, können Sie unseren Vertreter auch unter der folgenden Adresse kontaktieren:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
Wenn Sie Bedenken bezüglich unserer
Datenverarbeitungspraktiken
äußern möchten, haben Sie das Recht, sich über die auf ihrer Website aufgelisteten
Kontaktdaten
an Ihre örtliche Aufsichtsbehörde oder an die federführende Aufsichtsbehörde der Twitter International Unlimited Company, die Irish Data Protection Commission, zu wenden.
Vorherige Erklärungen anzeigen
Übernehmen Sie die Kontrolle über Ihre Privatsphäre
Einstellungen anpassen
Cookies… aber nicht zum Essen...
X und seine Partner möchten dir mit Cookies einen besseren, sichereren und
  schnelleren Service bieten und unser Geschäft unterstützen. Einige Cookies sind erforderlich,
  wenn du unsere Services nutzen möchtest, verbessern unsere Services und sorgen dafür, dass sie korrekt funktionieren.
Mehr über deine Wahlmöglichkeiten erfahren
.
Alle Cookies akzeptieren
Unwesentliche Cookies ablehnen
Sub-policy 29
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Sub-policy 30
https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung:
Datenschutz bei XING
Menü
Einführung
Deine Privatsphäre
Deine Sicherheit
Deine Ansprechpartner
Neues
Datenschutzerklärung
Datenschutzerklärung
Allgemeine Hinweise
Stand: 20. Dezember 2023
Hier informieren wir Dich über die Datenverarbeitung im Rahmen des gesamten Dienstes XING und seiner Anwendungen (XING, kununu, onlyfy usw.).
Verantwortlich für die Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten ist die New Work SE.
Unser Datenschutzbeauftragter ist Christian Schmidt.
Mehr erfahren
Wie werden Deine personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet?
1. Allgemeines zu den Zwecken der Datenverarbeitung.
Im Wesentlichen verarbeiten wir
personenbezogene Daten
, um unseren vertraglichen Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Nutzern nachzukommen. Die Verarbeitung der Daten ist die Voraussetzung dafür, dass wir Dir beispielsweise passende Kontakte, Angebote und Informationen vorschlagen können.
Mehr erfahren
2. Informationen, die Du uns mitteilst.
Dies sind Daten, die wir direkt von Dir erhalten und Informationen, die Du auf
XING Websites
veröffentlichst oder versendest, beispielsweise:
Zugangsdaten (z. B. Nutzername und Passwort)
Profildaten (z. B. Job-Titel, Firmenname, Branche, Ausbildung, Kontaktmöglichkeiten, Foto)
Nachrichten, Beiträge, Zahlungsdaten
Mehr erfahren
3. Automatisch auf Grund Deiner Nutzung von XING gesammelte Informationen
Während Du den Dienst
XING
nutzt oder besuchst, werden automatisch Daten von Dir mittels Tracking gesammelt. Hier erfährst Du,
wie das Tracking geschieht,
warum Tracking eingesetzt wird (Gewährleistung der Sicherheit, Bereitstellung unseres Dienstes, Erfolgsmessung und Optimierung von Werbung sowie Ermittlung statistischer Kennwerte).
Werden Dir innerhalb der XING App Bereiche unserer Website xing.com angezeigt, findet kein Tracking statt.
Mehr erfahren
4. Informationen, die wir über Dich aus anderen Quellen erhalten.
Mitunter verarbeiten wir Daten von Dir, die wir nicht direkt bei Dir erhoben haben. Dies kann z. B. der Fall sein, wenn ein Nutzer uns die Information zukommen lässt oder wir sie aus anderen Quellen erheben.
Mehr erfahren
5. Wer erhält Daten zu Deiner Person?
Hier erfährst Du, an wen wir Daten weitergeben, welchem Zweck dies dient und wie Du Deine Privatsphäre bei
XING
individuell einstellen kannst. Übrigens: Wir geben Deine
personenbezogenen Daten
nur an Dritte weiter, wenn …
dies zur Erfüllung unserer Geschäftszwecke erforderlich ist, z. B. wenn wir Dein Profil einem anderen Nutzer zugänglich machen,
Du Deine Einwilligung gegeben hast (z. B. zur Nutzung einer externen Anwendung),
wir gesetzlich, gerichtlich oder behördlich dazu verpflichtet sind.
Mehr erfahren
Welche Rechte kannst Du geltend machen?
Hier kannst Du Dich ausführlich über Deine Rechte informieren:
Dein Widerspruchsrecht
Dein Recht auf Auskunft
Dein Recht auf Löschung
weitere Rechte
Mehr erfahren
Begriffe, die in unserer Datenschutzerklärung vorkommen.
Mehr erfahren
Bei XING soll keine Deiner Fragen offen bleiben.
Wir haben diese Datenschutzerklärung so für Dich aufbereitet, dass Du die für Dich relevantesten Themen schnell und einfach findest. Du kannst aber auch gern die gewohnte
Langversion auf einer Seite lesen
.
Cookies:
Kleine Dateien, die es uns ermöglichen, auf Deinem Endgerät spezifische, auf Dich, den Nutzer, bezogene Informationen zu ermitteln. Die Speicherung von Cookies kannst Du über Deine Browser-Einstellungen verhindern.
Drittland:
Ein Land außerhalb der EU.
EU-DSGVO:
Die Verordnung (EU) 2016/679 des Europäischen Parlaments und des Rates vom 27. April 2016 zum Schutz natürlicher Personen bei der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, zum freien Datenverkehr und zur Aufhebung der Richtlinie 95/46/EG (Datenschutz-Grundverordnung).
Newsletter:
Newsletter bzw. Status-E-Mails sowie Werbung für eigene ähnliche Produkte und Dienstleistungen oder Befragungen zum Zweck eigener Marktforschung.
Personenbezogene Daten:
Gemäß Art. 4 Ziffer 1 EU-DSGVO alle Informationen, die sich auf eine identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person beziehen; als identifizierbar wird eine natürliche Person angesehen, die direkt oder indirekt, insbesondere mittels Zuordnung zu einer Kennung wie einem Namen, zu einer Kennnummer, zu Standortdaten, zu einer Online-Kennung oder zu einem oder mehreren besonderen Merkmalen identifiziert werden kann, die Ausdruck der physischen, physiologischen, genetischen, psychischen, wirtschaftlichen, kulturellen oder sozialen Identität dieser natürlichen Person sind.
Pixel:
Eine Bilddatei bzw. ein Link zu einer Bilddatei, das im Webseiten-Code eingefügt wird, sich jedoch nicht auf Deinem Endgerät (z. B. Computer, Smartphone etc.) befindet. Üblicherweise arbeiten Pixel in Verbindung mit Cookies.
Profil:
Die Seite der XING Websites, auf der die vom Nutzer eingegebenen personenbezogenen Daten im sozialen Netzwerk dargestellt werden.
Profiling:
Gemäß Art. 4 Ziffer 4 EU-DSGVO jede Art der automatisierten Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die darin besteht, dass diese personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, um bestimmte persönliche Aspekte, die sich auf eine natürliche Person beziehen, zu bewerten, insbesondere um Aspekte bezüglich Arbeitsleistung, wirtschaftliche Lage, Gesundheit, persönliche Vorlieben, Interessen, Zuverlässigkeit, Verhalten, Aufenthaltsort oder Ortswechsel dieser natürlichen Person zu analysieren oder vorherzusagen.
Soziales Netzwerk:
Die zu den Anwendungen des Dienstes XING gehörenden Kontakt- und Kommunikationsforen.
XING:
Der Dienst XING und die zum Dienst XING gehörenden Anwendungen (XING, kununu, onlyfy usw.).
XING Websites:
Alle Websites, Subdomains, Aliases, mobile Applikationen, Hintergrund-Applikationen, Webservices und Einbindungen in Drittseiten, auf denen der Dienst XING zur Verfügung steht.
Sub-policy 31
https://www.spotify.com/de/legal/privacy-policy/:
Germany (English)
✕
Close
Rechtliches
Allgemeine Nutzungsbedingungen
Richtlinie zum geistigen Eigentum
Datenschutzrichtlinie
Richtlinien für Nutzer*innen
Angebotsbedingungen für Premium
Datenschutzrichtlinie von Spotify
Gültig ab dem 10. Oktober 2024
1. Informationen zu dieser Richtlinie
2. Deine personenbezogenen Daten - Rechte und Kontrolle
3. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben
4. Zweck der Verwendung deiner personenbezogenen Daten
5. Teilen deiner personenbezogenen Daten
6. Aufbewahrung von Daten
7. Übermittlung in andere Länder
8. Schutz deiner personenbezogenen Daten
9. Kinder
10. Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie
11. Kontaktaufnahme mit Spotify
1. Informationen zu dieser Richtlinie
In dieser Richtlinie wird beschrieben, wie wir bei Spotify AB deine personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten.
Die Richtlinie deckt Folgendes ab:
Deine Nutzung aller Spotify Streamingdienste. Dazu gehören beispielsweise:
Verwendung von Spotify auf jedem Gerät
Personalisierung deines Nutzungserlebnisses
Infrastruktur, die für die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste erforderlich ist
Verknüpfung deines Spotify Kontos mit anderen Anwendungen
Sowohl unsere kostenlose als auch die kostenpflichtige Streamingoption (beides eine „
Serviceoption
")
Deine Nutzung anderer Spotify Dienste, die eine Verknüpfung zu dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie enthalten. Dazu gehören die Spotify Websites, der Support und die Community-Website.
Im Folgenden werden diese kollektiv als „
Spotify Dienst
" bezeichnet.
Von Zeit zu Zeit entwickeln wir möglicherweise neue Dienstleistungen oder bieten zusätzliche an. Diese unterliegen dann ebenfalls dieser Richtlinie, sofern bei der Einführung nicht anders angegeben.
Bei dieser Richtlinie handelt es sich
nicht
um ...
die Spotify
Nutzungsbedingungen
. Diese sind separat zu beachten. Die Nutzungsbedingungen stellen den rechtlichen Vertrag zwischen dir und Spotify zur Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes dar. Sie beschreiben auch die Regeln von Spotify sowie deine Nutzungsrechte.
Informationen zur Nutzung anderer Dienste von Spotify, die ihre eigene Datenschutzrichtlinie haben. Zu diesen Diensten gehören unter anderem Anchor, Soundtrap, Megaphone und die Spotify Live App.
Weitere Ressourcen und Einstellungen
Die wichtigsten Informationen über deine personenbezogenen Daten findest du hier in dieser Richtlinie. Du solltest allerdings auch einen Blick auf unsere anderen Datenschutzressourcen und -einstellungen werfen:
Datenschutz-Center:
In diesem intuitiven Hub findest du Zusammenfassungen wichtiger Themen.
Datenschutzeinstellungen für dein Konto:
Lege die Verarbeitung bestimmter personenbezogener Daten fest, einschließlich
individuell angepasster Werbung
.
Benachrichtigungseinstellungen:
Lege fest, welche Marketingmitteilungen du von Spotify erhältst.
Einstellungen (zu finden in der Spotify App für PC und Smartphone): Steuere bestimmte Aspekte des Spotify Dienstes, z. B. „Social" oder „Unangemessene Inhalte". Unter „Social" kannst du
eine private Session starten.
auswählen, ob deine Follower*innen sehen können, was du auf Spotify hörst.
auswählen, ob deine kürzlich gehörten Künstler*innen auf deinem öffentlichen Profil angezeigt werden.
Unter „Unangemessene Inhalte" kannst du einstellen, ob als unangemessen bewertete Inhalte mit deinem Spotify Konto abgespielt werden können.
Cookie-Richtlinie:
Sie enthält Informationen darüber, wie wir Cookies verwenden und wie du deine Cookie-Einstellungen verwaltest. Cookies sind Dateien, die auf deinem Handy, Tablet oder Computer gespeichert werden, wenn du eine Website besuchst.
2. Deine personenbezogenen Daten - Rechte und Kontrolle
Viele Datenschutzgesetze räumen Einzelpersonen Rechte in Bezug auf ihre personenbezogenen Daten ein. Zu diesen Gesetzen gehört die Datenschutz-Grundverordnung oder
DSGVO
.
Einige Rechte gelten nur, wenn Spotify eine bestimmte „Rechtsgrundlage" für die Verarbeitung deiner Daten verwendet. Wir erläutern jede Rechtsgrundlage – und wann Spotify sie verwendet – in
Abschnitt 4 „Zweck der Verwendung deiner personenbezogenen Daten"
.
In der nachfolgenden Tabelle wird Folgendes erläutert:
Deine Rechte
Umstände, in denen sie gelten (z. B. die erforderliche Rechtsgrundlage)
Wie du von deinen Rechten Gebrauch machst
Es ist dein Recht, …
Wie?
Informations­auskunft
… darüber informiert zu werden, welche deiner personenbezogenen Daten wir verarbeiten und wie wir sie verarbeiten.
Wir informieren dich
mit dieser Datenschutzrichtlinie.
durch Informationen, die dir bei der Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes zur Verfügung gestellt werden.
indem wir deine spezifischen Fragen und Anfragen beantworten, wenn du
uns kontaktierst
.
Zugriff
… Zugriff auf deine von uns verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten anzufordern.
So forderst du eine Kopie deiner personenbezogenen Daten von Spotify an:
Verwende die Funktion „Deine Daten herunterladen“ in den
Datenschutz­einstellungen für dein Konto
oder
kontaktiere uns.
Beim Herunterladen deiner Daten erhältst du die Informationen über deine Daten, die Spotify gemäß Artikel 15 der DSGVO zur Verfügung stellen muss. Wenn du weitere Informationen darüber wünschst, wie wir deine personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten, kannst du dich
an uns wenden
.
Berichtigung
… zu beantragen, dass wir deine personenbezogenen Daten ändern oder aktualisieren, wenn sie fehlerhaft oder unvollständig sind.
Du kannst deine persönlichen Daten in deinem Konto unter „Profil bearbeiten“ anpassen oder
uns kontaktieren
.
Löschung
… die Löschung bestimmter personenbezogener Daten anzufordern.
Du kannst uns beispielsweise bitten, personenbezogene Daten zu löschen,
die wir für den Zweck, für den sie gesammelt wurden, nicht mehr benötigen.
die wir basierend auf der
Rechtsgrundlage
der Einwilligung verarbeiten, sobald du deine Einwilligung zurückziehst.
wenn du Einspruch erhebst (siehe Abschnitt „Einspruch“ unten) und
dieser Einspruch berechtigt ist oder
du direktes Marketing ablehnst.
In bestimmten Situationen ist es für Spotify nicht möglich, deine Daten zu löschen, z. B. wenn
wir die Daten für den Zweck, für den wir sie gesammelt haben, weiter verarbeiten müssen.
das Interesse von Spotify an der Nutzung der Daten dein Interesse an einer Löschung der Daten überwiegt. Das kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn wir die Daten benötigen, um unsere Dienste vor Betrug zu schützen.
Spotify gesetzlich verpflichtet ist, die Daten aufzubewahren.
Spotify die Daten benötigt, um Rechtsansprüche zu schaffen, auszuüben oder zu verteidigen, beispielsweise bei einem ungelösten Problem bezüglich deines Kontos.
Du hast verschiedene Möglichkeiten, deine personenbezogenen Daten von Spotify zu löschen:
Entferne Audioinhalte aus deinem Profil, indem du die entsprechenden Inhalte auswählst und sie löschst. Du kannst beispielsweise Playlists aus deinem Profil oder Songs aus deinen Playlists entfernen.
Beantrage die Löschung deiner anderen personenbezogenen Daten von Spotify. Die entsprechenden Schritte findest du auf unserer
Supportseite
. Diese Daten umfassen persönliche Daten, Nutzungsdaten sowie in
Abschnitt 3 „Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben“
aufgeführte Daten.
Du kannst uns auch
kontaktieren
und die Löschung beantragen.
Einschränkung
… die Einstellung der Verarbeitung aller oder bestimmter personenbezogener Daten anzufordern.
Dies ist unter folgenden Voraussetzungen möglich:
Deine personenbezogenen Daten sind nicht korrekt.
Unsere Verarbeitung ist rechtswidrig.
Wir benötigen deine Daten nicht für einen bestimmten Zweck.
Du widersprichst unserer Verarbeitung und wir bewerten deinen Antrag auf Einspruch. Siehe Abschnitt „Einspruch“ unten.
Du kannst verlangen, dass wir diese Verarbeitung vorübergehend oder dauerhaft einstellen.
Nimm
Kontakt zu uns
auf, um von deinem Recht auf Einschränkung Gebrauch zu machen.
Einspruch
… der Verarbeitung deiner personenbezogenen Daten durch uns zu widersprechen.
Dies ist unter folgenden Voraussetzungen möglich:
Spotify verarbeitet deine personenbezogenen Daten auf der Rechtsgrundlage berechtigter Interessen.
Spotify verarbeitet deine personenbezogenen Daten für individuell angepasste Werbung.
So übst du dein Einspruchsrecht aus:
Du kannst in den Einstellungen des Spotify Dienstes einige Funktionen, die deine persönlichen Daten verarbeiten, deaktivieren oder anpassen. Am Ende dieses Abschnitts erfährst du, wie du Einstellungen für individuell angepasste Werbung vornehmen kannst.
Kontaktiere uns.
Übertragbarkeit von Daten
… eine Kopie deiner personenbezogenen Daten in elektronischer Form anzufordern und diese Daten zur Nutzung an den Dienst eines Drittanbieters zu übertragen.
Du kannst uns auffordern, deine Daten zu übertragen, wenn wir deine personenbezogenen Daten auf der Rechtsgrundlage einer Einwilligung oder zur Erfüllung eines Vertrags verarbeiten. Spotify wird jedoch versuchen, jeder Anfrage im Rahmen seiner Möglichkeiten nachzukommen.
Informationen darüber, wie du dein Recht auf Übertragbarkeit ausüben kannst, findest du oben unter „Zugriff“.
Nicht Gegenstand einer automatisierten Entscheidungs­findung zu sein
… nicht einer Entscheidung unterworfen zu werden, die rein auf automatisierter Entscheidungsfindung basiert (ohne menschliche Beteiligung), einschließlich Profiling, wenn dabei die Entscheidung rechtliche Auswirkungen auf dich oder eine ähnlich bedeutende Wirkung hätte.
Spotify wendet keine solche automatisierte Entscheidungsfindung im Rahmen seines Dienstes an.
Rücknahme der Einwilligung
… deine Einwilligung in die Erhebung oder Verwendung deiner personenbezogenen Daten zurückzunehmen.
Dies ist möglich, wenn Spotify deine personenbezogenen Daten auf der
Rechtsgrundlage
der Einwilligung verarbeitet.
So nimmst du deine Einwilligung zurück:
Ändere die entsprechende Einstellung auf Spotify.
Nimm Kontakt auf.
Recht auf Beschwerde
… dich bei Fragen oder Bedenken an die schwedische Behörde für Datenschutz oder an deine örtliche Datenschutzbehörde zu wenden.
Die Kontaktinformationen der schwedischen Behörde für Datenschutz findest du
hier
. Besuche alternativ die Website deiner örtlichen Datenschutzbehörde.
Individuell angepasste Werbung – Einstellungen
Was sind individuell angepasste Werbeinhalte?
Wir verwenden dafür Informationen, die wir über dich haben, um Werbung so zu gestalten, dass sie für dich relevanter ist. Dies wird auch als interessenbasierte Werbung bezeichnet.
Beispiel für eine individuell angepasste Ad: Ein Werbetreibender hat Informationen, die darauf hindeuten, dass du Autos magst. Mit diesem Wissen können wir dir Ads zu Autos bereitstellen.
Einstellungen zu individuell angepasster Werbung:
Du kannst in den
Datenschutzeinstellungen für dein Konto
unter „Individuelle Werbeinhalte" festlegen, ob du individuell angepasste Werbung erhalten möchtest.
Bei einigen Podcasts kannst du auch über den Link in der Beschreibung der Folge einstellen, ob du individuelle Werbung wünschst. Dies ist möglich, wenn die Person, die diese Inhalte zur Verfügung stellt, Werbung einfügt, um ihren Podcast zu finanzieren. Diese Einstellungen werden vom Hostinganbieter des Podcasts verwaltet, der nicht unbedingt Spotify ist.
Wenn du individuell angepasste Werbung in den
Datenschutzeinstellungen für dein Konto
deaktiviert hast, kannst du dennoch Werbung erhalten, beispielsweise bei unserem kostenlosen Dienst (Spotify Free) und Teilen unseres Premium Dienstes (beispielsweise Werbung in Podcasts). Diese Art von Werbung basiert auf deinen Registrierungsdaten und den Inhalten, die du dir gerade über unsere Dienste anhörst. Wenn du zum Beispiel einen Podcast zum Thema Kochen streamst, hörst du vielleicht eine Ad für eine Küchenmaschine.
Angemessenes Alter für individuell angepasste Werbung:
Das angemessene Alter für den Erhalt individuell angepasster Werbung hängt von dem Land ab, in dem du dich befindest, sowie davon, welche Regeln für individuell angepasste Werbung in diesem Land gelten. Du erhältst keine individuellen Werbeinhalte, wenn du das angemessene Alter noch nicht erreicht hast.
Du kannst dich nicht dafür entscheiden, individuelle Werbeinhalte zu erhalten, wenn du das angemessene Alter noch nicht erreicht hast.
Du erhältst individuelle Werbeinhalte, sobald du das für dein Land geltende angemessene Alter erreicht hast. Wir informieren dich dann über den Spotify Dienst darüber. Unsere Nachricht wird einen Link zu den
Datenschutzeinstellungen für dein Konto
enthalten, wo du jederzeit deine Einstellungen ändern oder individuell angepasste Werbung deaktivieren kannst.
3. Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben
In diesen Tabellen sind die Kategorien personenbezogener Daten aufgeführt, die wir zu dir sammeln.
Erfasst, wenn du dich für den Spotify Dienst registrierst
oder dein Konto aktualisierst
Kategorie
Beschreibung
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Dies sind persönliche Daten, die wir zur Erstellung deines Spotify Kontos benötigen und die es dir ermöglichen, den Spotify Dienst zu nutzen.
Die Art der erfassten und verwendeten Daten hängt von der von dir gewählten Serviceoption ab. Sie hängt auch davon ab, wie du dein Konto erstellst, in welchem Land du dich befindest und ob du Dienste von Drittanbietern für die Anmeldung nutzt. Folgende Daten können erfasst und verwendet werden:
Profilname
E-Mail-Adresse
Passwort
Telefonnummer
Geburtsdatum
Geschlecht
Adresse (weitere Informationen siehe unten)
Land
Universität/Hochschule (für Spotify Premium Student)
Einige dieser Daten erhalten wir von dir, z. B. über das Registrierungsformular oder die Kontoseite.
Wir erfassen auch einige dieser Daten über dein Gerät, z. B. Land oder Region. Weitere Informationen darüber, wie wir diese Daten erheben und verwenden, findest du in der Kategorie „Nutzungsdaten“ unter „Dein ungefährer (nicht präziser) Standort“.
Adressdaten
Wir bitten dich möglicherweise, deine Adresse anzugeben, um die Daten zu verarbeiten. Das kann folgende Gründe haben:
Überprüfung der Berechtigung für eine Serviceoption
Übermittlung von gesetzlich vorgeschriebenen Mitteilungen
Bereitstellung von Supportoptionen
Abrechnung und Steuerverwaltung
Zustellung von Waren oder Geschenken, die du angefordert hast
In einigen Fällen können wir Drittanbieteranwendungen verwenden, um deine Adresse zu überprüfen, z. B. Google Maps.
Erfasst durch deine Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes
Kategorien
Beschreibung
Nutzungsdaten
Dies sind personenbezogene Daten, die gesammelt und verarbeitet werden, wenn du auf den Spotify Dienst zugreifst oder ihn nutzt.
Dazu gehören verschiedene Arten von Informationen, die im Folgenden aufgeführt sind.
Informationen zu deiner Nutzung von Spotify
Beispielsweise:
Informationen zu deiner Spotify Serviceoption
Interaktionen mit dem Spotify Dienst (einschließlich Datum und Uhrzeit), z. B.:
Suchanfragen
Streamingverlauf
Von dir erstellte Playlists
Deine Bibliothek
Navigationsverlauf
Kontoeinstellungen
Interaktionen mit anderen Spotify Nutzer*innen
Nutzung von Drittanbieterdiensten, -geräten und -anwendungen in Zusammenhang mit dem Spotify Dienst
Rückschlüsse (d. h. unser Verständnis) auf deine Interessen und Präferenzen basierend auf deiner Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes
Informationen, die du zur Verfügung stellst, wenn du an Spotify Werbeaktionen teilnimmst, z. B. Wettbewerbe oder Gewinnspiele
Inhalte, die du in einem beliebigen Bereich des Spotify Dienstes veröffentlichst, z. B. Bilder, Audio, Text, Titel, Beschreibungen, Kommunikation und andere Arten von Inhalten
Deine technischen Daten
Beispielsweise:
Informationen zur URL
Onlinekennzeichen wie
Cookie-Daten
und IP-Adressen
Informationen zu von dir verwendeten Geräten, z. B.:
Geräte-IDs
Netzwerkverbindung (z. B. WLAN, 4G, LTE, Bluetooth)
Anbieter
Netzwerk- und Geräteleistung
Art des Browsers
Sprache
Informationen zur Verwaltung digitaler Rechte
Betriebssystem
Version der Spotify App
Informationen, die es Spotify ermöglichen, Geräte und Anwendungen von Drittanbietern zu erkennen und sich mit ihnen zu verbinden. Dazu gehören Gerätename, Gerätekennungen, Marke und Version. Beispiele für Geräte und Anwendungen von Drittanbietern sind:
Geräte in deinem WLAN (wie Lautsprecher), die sich mit dem Spotify Dienst verbinden können
Geräte, die vom Betriebssystem zur Verfügung gestellt werden, wenn eine Verbindung über Bluetooth, Plug-in und Installation hergestellt wird
Spotify Partneranwendungen, um festzustellen, ob die Anwendung auf deinem Gerät installiert ist
Dein ungefährer (nicht präziser) Standort
Dein ungefährer Standort umfasst Land, Region oder Bundesland. Er geht beispielsweise aus technischen Daten (z. B. deiner IP-Adresse, den Spracheinstellungen deines Geräts) oder der Zahlungswährung hervor.
Wir benötigen diese Information aus folgenden Gründen:
Erfüllung der geografischen Anforderungen in unseren Vereinbarungen mit den Eigentümer*innen von Inhalten im Spotify Dienst
Bereitstellung von für dich relevanten Inhalten und Werbeinhalten
Sensordaten deines Geräts
Dies sind durch Bewegung oder Orientierung generierte Sensordaten des Geräts. Sie werden erfasst, wenn sie für die Bereitstellung von Funktionen des Spotify Dienstes erforderlich sind. Das Gerät sammelt diese Daten über die Art und Weise, wie du es bewegst oder hältst.
Zusätzliche Daten, die du uns möglicherweise zur Verfügung stellst
Kategorien
Beschreibung
Sprachdaten
Wenn in deinem Markt Sprachfunktionen verfügbar sind und du dich dazu entschieden hast, diese Sprachfunktionen zu verwenden, erfassen und verarbeiten wir Sprachdaten. Damit sind Audioaufnahmen deiner Stimme und Transkripte dieser Aufnahmen gemeint.
Weitere Informationen darüber, wie die verschiedenen Sprachfunktionen funktionieren und wie du sie anpasst und deaktivierst, findest du in unserer
Richtlinie zur Sprachsteuerung
.
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Wenn du bei Spotify einen Kauf tätigst oder dich für eine kostenpflichtige Serviceoption oder ein kostenloses Probe-Abo registrierst, müssen wir deine Zahlungsdaten verarbeiten.
Die genauen personenbezogenen Daten, die erhoben und verwendet werden, hängen von der Zahlungsmethode ab. Dazu gehören Informationen wie:
Name
Geburtsdatum
Zahlungsmethode (z. B. Kredit- oder Debitkarte)
Bei Verwendung einer Kredit- oder Debitkarte der Kartentyp, das Gültigkeitsdatum und ausgewählte Ziffern deiner KartennummerHinweis: Aus Sicherheitsgründen speichern wie niemals deine vollständige Kartennummer.
Postleitzahl
Handynummer
Details zu deinem Kauf- und Zahlungsverlauf
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Wenn du an einer Umfrage oder an einer Studie teilnimmst, erheben und verwenden wir die von dir angegebenen personenbezogenen Daten.
Einige der oben genannten Daten erhalten wir von Dritten. In der Tabelle unten sind die Kategorien dieser Dritten beschrieben.
Drittanbieterquellen, von denen wir deine Daten erhalten
Kategorien von Drittanbietern
Beschreibung
Datenkategorien
Authentifizierungs­partner
Wenn du dich über einen anderen Dienst für den Spotify Dienst registrierst oder ihn zur Anmeldung verwendest, erhalten wir deine Daten von diesem externen Dienst. Anhand dieser Informationen erstellen wir dein Konto bei uns.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Anwendungen, Dienste und Geräte von Drittanbietern, die du mit deinem Spotify Konto verbindest
Wenn du dein Spotify Konto mit einer Anwendung, einem Dienst oder einem Gerät eines Drittanbieters verbindest, erheben und verwenden wir unter Umständen bestimmte Informationen, um die Integration zu ermöglichen.
Zu diesen Anwendungen, Diensten oder Geräten von Drittanbietern gehören:
Social Media
Geräte, unter anderem:
Audio (z. B. Lautsprecher und Kopfhörer)
Smartwatches
Fernseher
Smartphones und Tablets
Fahrzeuge (z. B. Autos)
Spielkonsolen
Dienste oder Plattformen wie Sprachassistenten oder Inhaltsplattformen
Wir bitten dich um Erlaubnis, bevor wir deine Daten von bestimmten Drittanbietern sammeln.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Technische Dienstleistungs­partner
Wir arbeiten mit technischen Dienstleistungspartnern zusammen, die uns bestimmte Daten zur Verfügung stellen. Dazu gehört die Zuordnung von IP-Adressen zu ungenauen Standortdaten (z. B. Land oder Region, Stadt, Bundesland).
Dies ermöglicht es Spotify, den Spotify Dienst, Inhalte und Features bereitzustellen.
Wir arbeiten auch mit Sicherheitsdienstleistern zusammen, die uns dabei helfen, die Konten der Nutzer*innen zu schützen.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Zahlungspartner und Händler
Wenn du dich dafür entscheidest, über Dritte (z. B. Telekommunikations­anbieter) oder per Rechnung zu bezahlen, erhalten wir möglicherweise Daten von unseren Zahlungspartnern.
Dies ermöglicht uns Folgendes:
Senden von Rechnungen
Verarbeitung deiner Zahlung
Bereitstellung des Gekauften
Wenn wir dich zu einem Händler weiterleiten, erhalten wir von diesem Händler Daten, die mit deinem Einkauf zusammenhängen. Wir leiten dich beispielsweise zum Merchandise-Shop eines*einer Künstler*in auf einer Drittanbieterplattform oder zu einer externen Ticket-Website weiter.
Anhand dieser Daten können wir:
die uns zustehende Provision berechnen.
die Effektivität unserer Partnerschaft mit diesen Handelspartnern analysieren.
deine Interessen besser verstehen.
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Werbe- und Marketingpartner
Wir erhalten Rückschlüsse von bestimmten Werbe- oder Marketingpartnern. Diese Rückschlüsse sind das Wissen der Partner über deine Interessen und Vorlieben.
So können wir relevantere Werbung und individuelleres Marketing anbieten.
Nutzungsdaten
Erworbene Unternehmen
Möglicherweise erhalten wir Daten über dich von Unternehmen, die wir erwerben. Dies dient dazu, unsere Dienste, Produkte und Angebote zu verbessern.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Wenn du die Spotify App für Mobilgeräte herunterlädst und Spotify verwendest, ohne dich anzumelden, erfassen wir eingeschränkte Informationen über deine Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes, einschließlich Nutzungsdaten. Wir tun dies, um zu verstehen, wie du auf den Dienst zugreifst und ihn nutzt. Wir tun dies auch, um sicherzustellen, dass wir dir das richtige Erlebnis bieten, zum Beispiel basierend auf deinem Land oder deiner Region. Wenn du dich entscheidest, ein Spotify Konto zu erstellen, um unseren Dienst in vollem Umfang nutzen zu können, kombinieren wir diese Daten mit den Daten deines Spotify Kontos.
4. Zweck der Verwendung deiner personenbezogenen Daten
Die nachfolgende Tabelle enthält Folgendes:
Zweck der Verarbeitung deiner personenbezogenen Daten
Juristische Begründungen (jeweils als
Rechtsgrundlage
bezeichnet) nach Datenschutzgesetz für jeden Zweck
Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten, die wir für die einzelnen Zwecke verwenden. Weitere Informationen zu diesen Kategorien findest du in
Abschnitt 3 „Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben".
Im Folgenden findest du eine allgemeine Erläuterung der einzelnen „Rechtsgrundlagen", die dir das Verständnis der Tabelle erleichtert:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags:
Wenn es für Spotify (oder eine dritte Partei) notwendig ist, deine personenbezogenen Daten zu verarbeiten, um
die Verpflichtungen aus einem Vertrag mit dir zu erfüllen. Dazu gehören auch die Verpflichtungen von Spotify gemäß den Nutzungsbedingungen, dir den Spotify Dienst zur Verfügung zu stellen.
Informationen zu überprüfen, bevor ein neuer Vertrag mit dir beginnt.
Berechtigtes Interesse:
Wenn Spotify oder ein Drittanbieter ein Interesse daran hat, deine personenbezogenen Daten in einer bestimmten Weise zu nutzen, die unter Berücksichtigung möglicher Risiken für dich und andere Spotify Nutzer
innen notwendig und gerechtfertigt ist. Dazu gehört beispielsweise die Verwendung deiner Nutzungsdaten, um den Spotify Dienst für alle Nutzer
innen zu verbessern.
Setz dich mit uns in Verbindung
, um mehr über eine bestimmte Begründung zu erfahren.
Einwilligung:
Wenn Spotify dich auffordert, aktiv dein Einverständnis mit der Verwendung deiner personenbezogenen Daten durch Spotify für einen bestimmten Zweck zu geben.
Einhaltung der rechtlichen Verpflichtungen:
Wenn Spotify deine personenbezogenen Daten verarbeiten muss, um ein Gesetz einzuhalten.
Zweck der Verarbeitung deiner Daten
Rechtsgrundlage, die diesen Zweck zulässt
Für diesen Zweck verwendete Kategorien personenbezogener Daten
Bereitstellung des Spotify Dienstes gemäß unserem Vertrag mit dir.
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir deine personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um
ein Konto für dich zu errichten.
dein Konto zu personalisieren.
die Spotify App bereitzustellen, nachdem du sie heruntergeladen hast.
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Bereitstellung weiterer Aspekte des Spotify Dienstes
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir deine personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um dir zu ermöglichen, einen Link zu Inhalten auf Spotify zu teilen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen zählt Folgendes:
Den Spotify Dienst am Laufen zu halten und seine Funktionsfähigkeit sicherzustellen
Zugriff auf den Spotify Dienst sowie die Nutzung des Dienstes ermöglichen
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Bereitstellung bestimmter zusätzlicher optionaler Funktionen des Spotify Dienstes. In solchen Fällen bitten wir ausdrücklich um deine Zustimmung.
Einwilligung
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Feststellen und Beheben von Problemen mit dem Spotify Dienst
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Bewerten und Entwickeln neuer Features, Technologien und Verbesserungen für den Spotify Dienst
Zum Beispiel:
Wir verwenden personenbezogene Daten, um unseren Algorithmus für personalisierte Empfehlungen zu entwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir analysieren, wie unsere Nutzer*innen auf neue Features reagieren, und prüfen, ob wir Änderungen vornehmen sollten.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehören die Entwicklung und Verbesserung von Produkten und Features für unsere Nutzer*innen.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Marketing- oder Werbezwecke, bei denen es das Gesetz vorschreibt, dass wir deine Einwilligung einholen müssen
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir Cookies verwenden, um deine Interessen zu verstehen, oder wenn das Gesetz eine Einwilligung für E-Mail-Marketing erfordert.
Einwilligung
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Andere Marketing- und Werbezwecke, für die das Gesetz keine Einwilligung verlangt
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir deine personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um Werbung auf deine Interessen abzustimmen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehört das Schalten von Werbung zur Finanzierung des Spotify Dienstes. Das ermöglicht es uns, einen Großteil davon kostenlos anzubieten.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Einhaltung der gesetzlichen Verpflichtungen, denen wir unterliegen
Das kann Folgendes sein:
Verpflichtung nach dem Recht des Landes/der Region, in dem bzw. der du dich befindest
Schwedisches Recht (da sich unser Hauptsitz in Schweden befindet)
Für uns geltendes EU-Recht
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir dein Geburtsdatum für die Verifizierung deines Alters verwenden.
Einhaltung der rechtlichen Verpflichtungen
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Befolgung eines Ersuchens von Strafverfolgungs­behörden, Gerichten oder anderen zuständigen Behörden
Einhaltung der rechtlichen Verpflichtungen und berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen zählt die Unterstützung von Strafverfolgungs­behörden zur Verhinderung oder Erkennung schwerwiegender Verbrechen.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Erfüllung vertraglicher Verpflichtungen mit Drittanbietern
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir pseudonymisierte Daten zum Hörverhalten unserer Nutzer*innen bereitstellen, weil wir eine entsprechende Vereinbarung mit einem Rechteinhaber von Spotify getroffen haben.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen zählt Folgendes:
Aufrechterhaltung unserer Beziehungen zu Künstler*innen, damit wir den Spotify Dienst bereitstellen können
Aufrechterhaltung unserer Beziehungen zu anderen Dritten aus demselben Grund
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Ergreifen von geeigneten Maßnahmen bei Meldungen über Verletzungen des geistigen Eigentums und unangemessene Inhalte
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehört der Schutz von geistigem Eigentum und Originalinhalten.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Schaffung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir in einen Rechtsstreit verwickelt sind und wir unseren Anwält*innen Informationen in Bezug auf diesen Rechtsfall zur Verfügung stellen müssen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen zählt Folgendes:
Einholen von Rechtsberatung
Schutz unseres Unternehmens, unserer Nutzer*innen oder anderen Parteien im Rahmen von Rechtsverfahren
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Geschäftliche Planungen, Reporting sowie Treffen von Prognosen
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir aggregierte Nutzungsdaten wie die Anzahl der Registrierungen in einem Land betrachten, um neue Standorte für die Einführung unserer Produkte und Features zu planen.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehören Forschung und Planung, damit wir unser Geschäft erfolgreich weiterführen können.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Verarbeitung deiner Zahlungen
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir deine personenbezogenen Daten verwenden, um dir den Kauf eines Spotify Abos zu ermöglichen.
Erfüllung eines Vertrags und Einwilligung
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Adressdaten
Feststellen und Beheben von Problemen mit dem Spotify Dienst
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir Nutzungsdaten analysieren, um eine mögliche betrügerische Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes aufzuspüren.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehört der Schutz des Spotify Dienstes und unserer Nutzer*innen vor Betrug und anderen illegalen Aktivitäten.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Durchführen von Studien und Umfragen
Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn wir Nutzer*innen kontaktieren, um sie um Feedback zu bitten.
Berechtigtes Interesse
Zu unseren berechtigten Interessen gehört es, mehr darüber zu erfahren, wie Nutzer*innen über den Spotify Dienst denken und ihn nutzen.
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
5. Teilen deiner personenbezogenen Daten
In diesem Abschnitt wird aufgeführt, wer die personenbezogenen Daten empfängt, die durch deine Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes erfasst oder generiert werden.
Öffentlich verfügbare Informationen
Die folgenden personenbezogenen Daten sind beim Spotify Dienst immer öffentlich verfügbar (außer für Nutzer*innen, die du blockiert hast):
Profilname
Profilfoto
Öffentliche Playlists
Sonstige Inhalte, die du beim Spotify Dienst veröffentlichst, sowie zugehörige Titel, Beschreibungen und Bilder
Nutzer*innen des Spotify Dienstes, denen du folgst
Nutzer*innen des Spotify Dienstes, die dir folgen
Du (oder ein
e andere
r Nutzer*in) kannst bestimmte Informationen an Drittanbieterdienste weitergeben, z. B. an soziale Netzwerke oder Nachrichtendienste. Dazu gehören:
Dein Profil
Alle Inhalte, die du auf Spotify veröffentlichst, sowie Details zu diesen Inhalten
Deine Playlists sowie zugehörige Titel, Beschreibungen und Bilder
Wenn diese Weitergabe erfolgt, kann der Drittanbieter eine Kopie dieser Daten speichern, um seine Funktionen zu unterstützen.
Personenbezogene Daten, die du möglicherweise teilst
Wir geben folgende personenbezogene Daten nur unter diesen Umständen an die in der nachstehenden Tabelle aufgeführten Parteien weiter:
Wenn du dich entschieden hast, ein Feature des Spotify Dienstes oder eine Anwendung, einen Dienst oder ein Gerät eines Drittanbieters zu nutzen, und wir dafür personenbezogene Daten weitergeben müssen.
Wenn du uns anderweitig deine Zustimmung zur Weitergabe der personenbezogenen Daten erteilst. Du kannst dies zum Beispiel tun, indem du die entsprechende Einstellung im Spotify Dienst wählst oder uns die Erlaubnis gibst.
Kategorien von Empfängern
Kategorien von Daten, die du teilen kannst
Kategorien von Daten, die du teilen kannst
Anwendungen, Dienste und Geräte von Drittanbietern, die du mit deinem Spotify Konto verbindest
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Um dein Spotify Konto mit Anwendungen, Diensten oder Geräten von Drittanbietern zu verbinden oder dir die Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes in Verbindung damit zu ermöglichen
Zu diesen Anwendungen, Diensten und Geräten von Drittanbietern gehören:
Social-Media-Apps
Lautsprecher
Fernseher
Automobilplattformen
Sprachassistenten
Einige der Verknüpfungen mit Drittanbietern kannst du in deinem Konto unter „Apps“ einsehen und entfernen.
Support-Community
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Zur Verwendung des Dienstes der
Spotify Support-Community
Wenn du dich für ein Konto in der Spotify Support-Community registrierst, wirst du aufgefordert, einen Profilnamen zu erstellen. Dieser wird allen Nutzer*innen der Spotify Support-Community öffentlich angezeigt. Wir zeigen auch alle Fragen und Kommentare an, die du veröffentlichst.
Andere Spotify Nutzer*innen
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zum Teilen von Informationen zu deiner Nutzung des Spotify Dienstes mit anderen Spotify Nutzer*innen. Das schließt möglicherweise deine Follower*innen auf Spotify ein.
In deinen Einstellungen unter „Social“ kannst du festlegen, dass deine kürzlich gehörten Künstler*innen und deine Playlists in deinem Profil angezeigt werden. Du kannst auch eine Playlist mit anderen Nutzer*innen erstellen oder einer geteilten Playlist beitreten. In geteilten Playlists erhältst du soziale Empfehlungen, die auf deiner Höraktivität basieren.
Künstler*innen und Plattenlabels
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Zum Erhalt von Neuigkeiten oder Werbeangeboten von Künstler*innen, Plattenlabels oder anderen Partnern
Du kannst dich dafür entscheiden, deine persönlichen Daten zu diesem Zweck weiterzugeben. Du kannst jederzeit deine Meinung ändern und deine
Einwilligung widerrufen
.
Daten, die wir weitergeben können
In dieser Tabelle findest du Details dazu, an wen wir Daten weitergeben und aus welchem Grund.
Kategorien von Empfängern
Kategorien von Daten
Grund für die Weitergabe
Dienstleister
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Bereitstellung ihrer Dienste für Spotify
Zu diesen Dienstleistern gehören diejenigen, die wir für Folgendes beauftragen:
Kundensupport
Betrieb der Infrastruktur, die für die Bereitstellung des Spotify Dienstes erforderlich ist
Unterstützung beim Schutz und der Sicherung unserer Systeme und Dienste (z. B. reCAPTCHA von Google)
Unterstützung beim Marketing unserer Produkte, Dienste, Events und Werbeaktionen (sowie der unserer Partner)
Zahlungspartner
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Verarbeitung deiner Zahlungen und Schutz vor Betrug
Werbepartner
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Bereitstellung relevanterer Werbung im Rahmen des Spotify Dienstes und Messung der Effektivität von Ads
Beispielsweise helfen uns unsere Werbepartner, individuell angepasste Werbeinhalte auszuliefern.
Marketingpartner
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Zur Promotion von Spotify mit unseren Partnern. Wir geben bestimmte Daten von Nutzer*innen und Nutzungsdaten an diese Partner weiter, wenn es für Folgendes erforderlich ist:
Deine Teilnahme an Spotify Werbeaktionen, einschließlich kostenlosen Probe-Abos oder anderen Bundle-Angeboten
Promoten von Spotify in den Medien und in Werbung bei anderen Onlinediensten
Unterstützung bei der Messung der Effektivität von Spotify Werbeaktionen (durch Spotify und seine Partner)
Beispiele für diese Partner:
Marketing- oder Sponsoringpartner
Websites und mobile Apps, bei denen wir Werbeplätze kaufen
Partner im Bereich Geräte, Apps und Mobilfunk, die ebenfalls Spotify Werbeaktionen anbieten
Unsere Partner können die personenbezogenen Daten, die wir an sie weitergeben, auch mit anderen Daten kombinieren, die sie über dich sammeln, z. B. deine Nutzung ihrer Dienste. Wir und unsere Partner können diese Informationen verwenden, um dir Angebote, Werbeaktionen oder andere Marketinginhalte zu präsentieren, von denen wir glauben, dass sie für dich relevant sind.
Hostingplattformen
Nutzungsdaten
Hostingplattformen hosten Podcasts, damit sie sie für dich bereitstellen können. Wenn du einen Podcast abspielst, geben wir bestimmte Daten, wie deine IP-Adresse, an die Hostingplattform weiter. Wir ermöglichen dir auch das Streamen von Podcasts, die auf Plattformen gehostet werden, die nicht zu Spotify gehören.
Die Personen oder Netzwerke, die den Podcast anbieten, sollten in der Beschreibung der Show oder der Folge erwähnen, wo der Podcast gehostet wird. Lies in der Datenschutzrichtlinie der entsprechenden Hostingplattform nach, wie diese an sie weitergegebene Daten verwendet.
Wissenschaftliche Forscher*innen
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Für Aktivitäten wie statistische Analyse und akademische Forschung, jedoch ausschließlich pseudonymisiert. Pseudonymisiert bedeutet, dass deine Daten durch einen Code und nicht durch deinen Namen oder andere direkt identifizierenden Informationen gekennzeichnet sind.
Andere Unternehmen der Spotify Gruppe, einschließlich Unternehmen, die Spotify erwirbt
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Für den täglichen Geschäftsbetrieb und für die laufende Bereitstellung und Verbesserung des Spotify Dienstes sowie der Dienste erworbener Unternehmen
Zum Beispiel:
Ermöglichung der Entwicklung und Verbesserung von Features für den Spotify Dienst durch unsere Mitarbeiter*innen, die für verschiedene Unternehmen der Spotify Gruppe tätig sind
Weitergabe von Daten an unsere Messunternehmen, um die Wirksamkeit von im Spotify Dienst ausgelieferten Ad-Kampagnen zu messen
Weitergabe von Daten an unsere Podcast-Unternehmen zum besseren Verständnis der Hörtrends der Nutzer*innen
Strafverfolgungs­behörden und andere Behörden oder andere Parteien in Rechtsstreitigkeiten
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Nutzungsdaten
Wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben überzeugt sind, dass wir diese Daten weitergeben müssen, z. B.
um einer gesetzlichen Verpflichtung nachzukommen.
um auf ein gültiges rechtliches Verfahren zu reagieren (etwa einen Durchsuchungsbeschluss, einen Gerichtsbeschluss oder eine Vorladung).
für unser eigenes berechtigtes Interesse oder das eines Dritten, das sich auf Folgendes bezieht:
Staatssicherheit
Gesetzesvollstreckung
Rechtsstreit (Gerichtsverfahren)
Strafrechtliche Ermittlung
Schutz von Personen
Abwendung von Tod oder unmittelbarer körperlicher Schädigung
Käufer unseres Unternehmens
Daten von Nutzer*innen
Adressdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Sprachdaten
Zahlungs- und Kaufdaten
Daten zu Umfragen und Studien
Für den Fall, dass wir unser Unternehmen verkaufen oder mit möglichen Käufern darüber verhandeln
In diesem Fall können wir deine personenbezogenen Daten als Teil dieser Transaktion an einen Nachfolger oder ein verbundenes Unternehmen weitergeben.
6. Aufbewahrung von Daten
Wir bewahren deine personenbezogenen Daten nur so lange auf, wie es für die Bereitstellung des Spotify Dienstes und für legitime und wesentliche Geschäftszwecke von Spotify erforderlich ist, z. B.
die Aufrechterhaltung der Leistung des Spotify Dienstes.
das Treffen von datengestützten Geschäftsentscheidungen über neue Features und Angebote.
die Einhaltung unserer rechtlichen Verpflichtungen.
die Beilegung von Streitigkeiten.
Hier sind einige der Kategorien unserer Aufbewahrungsfristen sowie die Kriterien, nach denen wir sie auswählen:
Daten, die aufbewahrt werden, bis du sie entfernst
Du hast das Recht, die Löschung bestimmter personenbezogener Daten zu verlangen. Weitere Informationen dazu findest du in
Abschnitt 2 „Deine personenbezogenen Daten – Rechte und Kontrolle"
. In diesem Abschnitt werden auch die Umstände aufgelistet, unter denen wir deinem Löschantrag nachkommen können.
Bestimmte personenbezogene Daten kannst du auch direkt über den Spotify Dienst löschen, beispielsweise dein Profilbild. Wenn Nutzer
innen die persönlichen Daten selbst aufrufen und bearbeiten können, speichern wir diese Informationen, solange der
die Nutzer*in es wünscht, es sei denn, es gilt einer der unten beschriebenen begrenzten Zwecke.
Daten, die nach einem bestimmten Zeitraum automatisch gelöscht werden
Wir haben bestimmte Aufbewahrungsfristen festgelegt, sodass einige Daten nach einer bestimmten Zeitspanne automatisch gelöscht werden. So werden beispielsweise personenbezogene Daten, die du im Rahmen von Suchanfragen eingibst, in der Regel nach 90 Tagen gelöscht.
Daten, die bis zur Löschung deines Spotify Kontos aufbewahrt werden
Einige Daten bewahren wir so lange auf, bis dein Spotify Konto gelöscht wird. Beispiele dafür sind dein Benutzername und deine Profilinformationen. In der Regel speichern wir auch den Streamingverlauf, um beispielsweise Playlists, die Nutzer*innen gefallen, und personalisierte Empfehlungen, die die Hörgewohnheiten berücksichtigen, zu erstellen (z. B. „Deine Zeitkapsel" oder „Dein Sommer-Flashback"). Wenn dein Spotify Konto gelöscht wird, werden Daten dieser Kategorie gelöscht oder anonymisiert.
Daten, die über einen längeren Zeitraum für begrenzte Zwecke gespeichert werden
Nach der Löschung deines Kontos bewahren wir einige Daten für einen längeren Zeitraum auf, allerdings für sehr begrenzte Zwecke. Zum Beispiel können wir gesetzlichen oder vertraglichen Verpflichtungen unterliegen, die dies erfordern. Beispiele sind obligatorische Gesetze zur Datenspeicherung, behördliche Verfügungen zur Verwahrung von relevanten Daten in Zusammenhang mit einer Ermittlung oder die Speicherung von Daten zum Zwecke von Gerichtsverfahren. Wir können auch Daten, die aus dem Spotify Dienst entfernt wurden, für einen begrenzten Zeitraum aufbewahren, ...
um die Sicherheit der Nutzer*innen zu gewährleisten oder
um vor schädlichen Inhalten auf unserer Plattform zu schützen.
Dies hilft uns, mögliche Verstöße gegen unsere
Richtlinien für Nutzer*innen
und unsere
Plattformregeln
zu untersuchen. Wenn wir umgekehrt gesetzlich verpflichtet sind, rechtswidrige Inhalte zu entfernen, kommen wir dieser Verpflichtung nach.
7. Übermittlung in andere Länder
Aufgrund des globalen Charakters unserer Geschäftstätigkeit gibt Spotify bei der Durchführung der in dieser Richtlinie beschriebenen Aktivitäten personenbezogene Daten international an Unternehmen der Spotify Gruppe, Unterauftragnehmer und Partner weiter. Diese verarbeiten deine Daten unter Umständen in Ländern, deren Datenschutzgesetze als nicht so streng gelten wie die Gesetze der EU oder in deiner Heimat. So hast du dort möglicherweise nicht dieselben Rechte in Bezug auf deine Daten.
Bei der internationalen Übermittlung deiner personenbezogenen Daten verwenden wir Tools, um
sicherzustellen, dass die Datenübermittlung im Einklang mit dem geltenden Recht steht.
dazu beizutragen, dass deine Daten denselben Schutz genießen wie in der EU.
Wir nutzen die folgenden rechtlichen Mechanismen, um sicherzustellen, dass jede Datenübermittlung mit den geltenden EU-Rechtsvorschriften übereinstimmt:
Standardvertragsklauseln:
Diese Klauseln verlangen von der anderen Partei, deine Daten zu schützen und dir Rechte und Schutz auf EU-Niveau zu gewähren. Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Standardvertragsklauseln, um die in
Abschnitt 3 „Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben"
beschriebenen personenbezogenen Daten an unseren Hostinganbieter zu übertragen, der Server in den USA verwendet. Du kannst deine Rechte gemäß den Standardvertragsklauseln ausüben, indem du uns oder den Drittanbieter, der deine personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet,
kontaktierst
.
Angemessenheitsentscheidungen:
Das bedeutet, dass wir personenbezogene Daten in Länder außerhalb des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums übermitteln, die über angemessene Gesetze zum Schutz personenbezogener Daten verfügen, wie von der Europäischen Kommission festgelegt. So übermitteln wir beispielsweise die in
Abschnitt 3 „Personenbezogene Daten, die wir zu dir erheben"
beschriebenen personenbezogenen Daten an Anbieter mit Sitz in Japan, Kanada, der Republik Korea, der Schweiz und im Vereinigten Königreich.
Außerdem ermitteln wir für jede Datenübermittlung zusätzliche Schutzmaßnahmen und wenden sie an. Beispiele für solche Maßnahmen:
Technische Schutzmaßnahmen, wie Verschlüsselung und Pseudonymisierung
Richtlinien und Verfahren zur Anfechtung unverhältnismäßiger oder unrechtmäßiger behördlicher Anfragen
8. Schutz deiner personenbezogenen Daten
Wir verpflichten uns, die personenbezogenen Daten unserer Nutzer*innen zu schützen. Wir setzen geeignete technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen ein, um die Sicherheit deiner personenbezogenen Daten bestmöglich zu gewährleisten. Du solltest dir allerdings bewusst sein, dass kein System jemals vollkommen sicher ist.
Wir haben verschiedene Sicherheitsvorkehrungen getroffen, um unbefugten Zugriff und unnötige Speicherung personenbezogener Daten in unseren Systemen zu verhindern. Dazu gehören Richtlinien für Pseudonymisierung, Verschlüsselung, Zugang und Aufbewahrung.
Für den Schutz deines Kontos empfehlen wir dir Folgendes:
Erstelle ein sicheres Passwort, das du
nur
für dein Spotify Konto verwendest.
Gib dein Passwort nie an andere weiter.
Beschränke den Zugriff auf deinen Computer und Browser.
Melde dich ab, nachdem du den Spotify Dienst auf einem gemeinsam genutzten Gerät verwendet hast.
Informiere dich,
wie du dein Konto noch schützen kannst
.
Mit der Funktion „Überall abmelden" auf deiner
Kontoseite
kannst du dich bei mehreren Geräten gleichzeitig von Spotify abmelden.
Wenn andere Personen Zugriff auf dein Spotify Konto haben, können sie auf persönliche Daten, Einstellungen und den mit deinem Konto verfügbaren Spotify Dienst zugreifen. Dies ist beispielsweise der Fall, wenn du jemandem die Erlaubnis erteilt hast, dein Konto auf einem gemeinsam genutzten Gerät zu nutzen.
Erlaube Personen nur dann die Nutzung deines Kontos, wenn du mit der Weitergabe dieser personenbezogenen Daten an sie einverstanden bist. Diese Entscheidung liegt in deiner Verantwortung. Die Nutzung deines Spotify Kontos durch andere Personen kann sich auf deine personalisierten Empfehlungen auswirken und im Download deiner Daten enthalten sein.
9. Kinder
Hinweis: Diese Richtlinie gilt nicht für Spotify Kids, es sei denn, die
Datenschutzrichtlinie von Spotify Kids
weist ausdrücklich darauf hin. Spotify Kids ist eine separate App von Spotify.
Für den Spotify Dienst gilt in jedem Land bzw. jeder Region ein Mindestalter. Der Spotify Dienst ist nicht für Kinder gedacht, die
jünger als 13 Jahre alt sind,
deren Alter die Verarbeitung ihrer personenbezogenen Daten rechtswidrig macht oder
die Zustimmung der Eltern zur Verarbeitung ihrer personenbezogenen Daten erfordert.
Wir erheben und verwenden wissentlich keine personenbezogenen Daten von Kindern, die das geltende Mindestalter nicht erreicht haben. Nutze den Spotify Dienst nicht, wenn du das Mindestalter noch nicht erreicht hast, und stelle uns keine personenbezogenen Daten zur Verfügung. Erstelle stattdessen ein
Spotify Kids
Konto.
Wenn du ein Elternteil eines Kindes unter dem Mindestalter bist und feststellst, dass dein Kind Spotify personenbezogene Daten zur Verfügung gestellt hat,
setz dich mit uns in Verbindung
.
Sollten wir erfahren, dass wir die personenbezogenen Daten eines Kindes unter dem geltenden Mindestalter erfasst haben, unternehmen wir angemessene Schritte, um diese personenbezogenen Daten zu löschen. Dies kann erfordern, dass wir das Spotify Konto des Kindes löschen.
Wenn du den Hauptdienst von Spotify auf einem gemeinsam genutzten Gerät verwendest, solltest du vorsichtig sein, wenn du Personen unter 18 Jahren für sie ungeeignete Inhalte vorspielst oder empfiehlst.
10. Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie
Wir können gelegentlich Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie vornehmen.
Wenn wir wesentliche Änderungen an dieser Richtlinie vornehmen, werden wir dich den jeweiligen Umständen entsprechend deutlich darauf hinweisen. Wir können zum Beispiel eine Meldung innerhalb des Spotify Dienstes anzeigen oder dir eine E-Mail oder eine Benachrichtigung an dein Gerät senden.
11. Kontaktaufnahme mit Spotify
Wenn du Fragen oder Bedenken zu dieser Richtlinie hast, kannst du dich auf einem der folgenden Wege an unsere Abteilung für Datenschutz wenden:
E-Mail:
privacy@spotify.com
Postweg: Spotify AB, Regeringsgatan 19, 111 53 Stockholm, Schweden
Spotify AB ist zuständig für die im Rahmen dieser Richtlinie verarbeiteten personenbezogenen Daten.
© Spotify AB
Sub-policy 32
https://soundcloud.com/pages/privacy:
SoundCloud Privacy Policy
Welcome to SoundCloud, a service provided by SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG and its affiliates, including SoundCloud, Inc. and Repost Network Inc. (hereinafter “SoundCloud”). Capitalized terms used in this Privacy Policy that are not specifically defined shall have the meanings given to the applicable capitalized terms in the SoundCloud Terms of Use.
Your privacy is important to us. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, store, use, disclose and otherwise process your personal data when you use soundcloud.com and m.soundcloud.com (together, the “Website”), our mobile and desktop apps (the “Apps”) and all related sites, players, widgets, tools, data, software, APIs and other services provided by SoundCloud (the “Services”). This Privacy Policy applies to any Website, Apps, or Services by SoundCloud that refers to this Privacy Policy, i.e. by linking to it.
For employees with California residency, our privacy notice applicable to past, current, and prospective employees and similar individuals, as well as their beneficiaries and emergency contacts, can be accessed by
clicking here
.
This Privacy Policy explains the following, amongst other things:
Who Controls Your Data
Legal Basis for Data Processing
Personal Data We Collect
Personal Data You Provide
Personal Data We Collect Automatically
Personal Data We Obtain From Third Parties
How We Use Your Personal Data
How We Share Your Personal Data
Cookies and Similar Technology
Information Security
International Data Transfers
Children
Our Activity On Social Networks
Your Choices and Controls
Exercising Your EU/EEA/U.K. Privacy Rights
Notice to Users Who are Residents of Certain U.S. States
Contact Information
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Information relating to our use of cookies and similar technologies is set out in our
Cookie Policy
, which forms part of the Privacy Policy. When we refer to the Privacy Policy, we are referring to the Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
Please take some time to read this Privacy Policy, along with our
Terms of Use
, in order to ensure you understand and are comfortable with our use and disclosure of your personal data and to understand the choices available to you.
Please note that this Privacy Policy only applies to the Website, Apps and Services (together, the “Platform”). When using the Platform, you may find links to other websites, apps and services, or tools that enable you to share information with other websites, apps and services. SoundCloud is not responsible for the privacy practices of these other websites, apps and services and we recommend that you review the privacy policies of each of these websites, apps or services before connecting your SoundCloud account or sharing any personal data.
If you do not agree to any of the provisions of this Privacy Policy, you should not use the Platform. If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, you can contact us through the
Help Center
or at dataprotection@soundcloud.com.
SoundCloud is committed to putting its users first and believes you should know what personal data we collect about you, why we collect it, and how we use and share it. That’s why we’ve designed this Privacy Policy to give you simple, clear, and actionable information about our privacy and data protection practices.
We believe users should also have meaningful choices over the personal data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy, your
Settings
and the
Help Center
. We encourage you to take full advantage of these tools.
Who Controls Your Data
With regard to data processing within the framework of SoundCloud’s internal administration and joint procedures through centralized systems, SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG, SoundCloud Inc. and Repost Network Inc. act as joint controllers. The joint processes particularly pertain to the operation and use of joint databases, platforms and IT systems. With respect to the joint processes, SoundCloud determines the purposes and means of processing. In a separate agreement on joint controllership pursuant to Article 26 GDPR, SoundCloud determines how the respective tasks and responsibilities of the processing of personal data are structured and who fulfils which data protection obligations. In particular, it is determined how an appropriate level of security and how your rights as a data subject can be ensured, how the information duties under data protection law can be jointly fulfilled and how potential data protection incidents can be monitored. This includes reporting and notification obligations.
In the event SoundCloud does not act as a joint controller, the sole controller, as given the meaning by data protection legislation, is either:
If you are located in the United States, SoundCloud Inc., 71 5th Avenue, 3rd Floor, New York 10003, NY, USA, dataprotection@soundcloud.com,
or if you are located outside of the United States, SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG, Rheinsberger Str. 76/77, 10115 Berlin, Germany, dataprotection@soundcloud.com,
We may share your data within our corporate group of companies that are related by common ownership or control (“SoundCloud Group”) and the data of US users may be processed by SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG on SoundCloud Inc.’s behalf. The personal data of users who have signed up for SoundCloud Monetization may be processed by Repost Network Inc. doing business as SoundCloud Direct on behalf of the respective Data Controller.
SoundCloud provides statistics and insights about the performance of a particular sound recording and its underlying composition uploaded to the Platform (“Track”). These statistics and insights are provided to any person (including Creators) or entity owning or controlling a Track (“Rightsholders”) and include information about how fans interact with their Tracks on the Platform to make Rightsholders better understand their fanbase ("Rightsholder Insights"). Rightsholder Insights are processed in joint controllership between SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG and the respective Rightsholder, subject to the applicable agreement to be found
here
.
For Users in the EU/EEA/U.K.: Legal Basis for Data Processing
The collection and processing of your data is governed by the law applicable to your respective Data Controller, as outlined above.
With that being said, SoundCloud follows European law and the GDPR where applicable. Data collection and processing under GDPR may be based on your consent (see Art. 6 lit. a) GDPR), contractual purposes (see Art. 6 lit. b) GDPR) or, in exceptional cases, for legitimate purposes, which we weigh against your data protection interests (see Art. 6 lit. f) GDPR). We have specified the legal bases for individual data processing activities in more detail below.
We may also use our user’s personal data under GDPR if:
Processing is necessary to fulfil a legal obligation to which the person responsible is subject (see Art. 6 lit. c) GDPR);
Processing is necessary to protect the vital interests of the data subject or another natural person (Art. 6 lit. d) GDPR); or
Processing is necessary for the performance of a task that is in the public interest or takes place in the exercise of official authority that has been assigned to the person responsible (see Art. 6 lit. e) GDPR).
Personal Data We Collect
Any personal data we collect falls into one of three general categories:
Personal data you provide to us,
Personal data we collect automatically,
Personal data we obtain from third parties.
Personal Data You Provide
We ask for and collect the below personal data when you use the Platform. This personal data is necessary for the adequate performance of the platform, to meet the requirements of the contract present between you and us and to comply with our obligations thereunder.
You don’t need to register for a SoundCloud account in order to visit or use our Platform. However, certain Services require that you register for an account and, by doing so, you will need to provide us with certain personal data:
Account Information - When you register with any kind of SoundCloud account, and from time to time thereafter, you will need to provide your email address (except when you sign-up with Facebook, Google or Apple and don’t give your permission to share it with SoundCloud), your age or birthdate, postal code, a username (which may be your real name or a pseudonym) and a password.
Profile Information - you may choose, at your discretion, to provide additional personal data for your public profile on SoundCloud – for example:
your real name
your gender
the city and country in which you live
a profile picture, profile header image or avatar
any content associated with your Track uploads (all audio (including podcasts), text, pictures, graphics, comments, and other content, data or information that you upload, including your compositions, metadata, song names, composer names, creators’ names, performers’ names, group names, producers’ names, album artworks and your name, image, likeness and biographical information) (“Materials”).
information about how you categorize yourself with respect to your Materials (for example, whether you are a musician, a label or some other category of creator)
details of your other websites and social media profiles, including links to those pages
any personally identifiable data from your Tracks or respective meta-data will be published on your profile page in accordance with our
Terms of Use
. This personal data will be publicly accessible and may be viewed by anyone accessing the Website, or using our API or other Services. Please be aware that a profile picture is mandatory when you request profile verification via your Settings in the “Account” tab.
Subscriptions - If you purchase a Subscription, you must provide your real name, billing address, payment verification information, and, if applicable, school affiliation. Please be aware that we only get payment verification information and no further details of your payment, as outlined in the respective section of this Privacy Policy. Any use of such personal data is for contractual purposes.
SoundCloud Monetization - In the event you use the services of SoundCloud Monetization, you must provide your real name, payment information and personal data necessary to operate and maintain your monetization and/or distribution with SoundCloud Monetization (e.g. content identification information such ISRC codes).
Music Publishing - In the event you use the services of music publishing administration, you must provide your real name, payment information and personal data necessary to operate and maintain your music publishing administration (e.g. publisher, sub-publisher information as well as performance rights and or mechanical rights organization information and content identification data, such as interested party Information (IPI) numbers, ISWC numbers).
Communications - When you communicate with SoundCloud by email or through the Platform, or use the Platform to communicate with other users, we collect personal data about your communication and any personal data you choose to provide based on contractual purposes.
Survey Information - If you participate in any survey, you may provide certain personal data as part of your response, unless you respond anonymously. The personal data you provided is only processed based on your consent.
Information You Post - You may provide personal data when you upload Tracks to the Platform, when you post comments, when you like or repost a track, or when you contribute to community discussions. This is based on your own choice, and in accordance with our
Terms of Use
, we may use such data for contractual purposes.
Identity Verification Information - We may collect personal data sufficient to verify your identity for the purpose of your participation in the SoundCloud Monetization program.
Information Provided For Tax or Financial Reasons
Tax ID/VAT - We also collect your tax ID or VAT number if applicable. If you join SoundCloud Direct as a business, this personal data is required to enable proper tax accounting purposes.
Other Tax Payee Information and W9 Certifications (US Only) - If you are located in the U.S., we will collect certain personal data and certifications from you, which enables us to report eligible payouts to the Internal Revenue Service.
PayPal Email Address - In order to be able to remit any revenue earned through your monetized tracks to your designated PayPal account, we ask you to provide us with the email address that is connected to the PayPal account in which you wish to receive your eligible payouts.
Personal Data We Collect Automatically
There is certain personal data that we collect automatically as the result of your use of the Platform, subject to the choices you make in your
Settings
, or through the use of cookies and other web analytics services as described in our
Cookie Policy
. This personal data generally includes:
Usage Information - We collect personal data about your interactions with the Platform, including the pages that you visit and links you click on, streaming, offline listening or downloading Tracks, uploading or recording Tracks, connecting your Facebook, Google or Apple account, sharing a Track with another user, following or unfollowing another user, posting a comment, performing a search, the time, frequency and duration of your visits to the Platform, and whether you interact with email messages, for example, if you opened, clicked on, or forwarded the email message. This use of your personal data is based on contractual purposes should you have accepted our
Terms of Use
. If you have not registered on SoundCloud, the use of this personal data is based on our legitimate interest. Please be aware that we need such usage data as we are under contractual obligation to track use of content by our content providers.
Log Data – We automatically collect log information when you use the Platform, even if you have not registered for an account or logged in. That personal data includes, among other things: details about how you’ve used the Platform (including links to third party sites or services), Internet Protocol (IP) address, access times, your browser type and operating system, device information, device event information (e.g., crashes, browser type), and the page you’ve viewed or engaged with before or after using the Platform. This personal data is essential for our service and is therefore either based on contractual purposes or on legitimate interest if no contract exists. Please be aware that we need log data as we are under contractual obligation to track use of content by our content providers.
Cookies – We use cookies and other similar technologies, such as pixels, local storage, and mobile device identifiers and may also allow our business partners to use these tracking technologies on the Platform, or engage others to track your behavior on our behalf. Type, number and function of cookies can vary depending on your individual selection. For more information on our use of these technologies, see our
Cookie Policy
.
Location Data – When you use certain features of the Platform, we may collect personal data about your general location. We use such personal data to deliver personalized location-based services or content. In some instances, you may be permitted to allow or deny such use of your device’s location, but if you choose to deny such use, we may not be able to provide you with the applicable personalized services or content. We use this personal data to provide you with location-based services (such as advertising and personalized content). Most mobile devices allow you to control or disable the use of location services for applications in the device’s settings. Such use of personal data is based on your consent, either within our Platform or within your device where you provided your consent when prompted.
Device Information – We collect personal data from and about the devices you use, including how you interact with the Platform and information about the device itself, such as the hardware model, operating system, IP addresses, cookie information, device settings, mobile carrier information, mobile device and advertising identifiers, apps installed, browser type, language, battery level and time zone. This information allows us to recognize and associate your activity, and provide personalized content and advertising, consistently across all of your devices. Such use of personal data is based on your consent given either within our Platform or within your device.
Software Development Kits (“SDK”) - We may use third parties including our business partners and service providers who use mobile SDKs to collect personal data and information related to how mobile devices interact with the Platform. An SDK is computer code that app developers can include in their apps to enable ads to be shown, personal data to be collected and related services and functionality to be implemented. We may use this technology, for instance, to analyze how you interact with Materials and advertisements and to enable analytics or other features through mobile devices. However, such use will be based on your consent.
SoundCloud Widget - Other websites may integrate SoundCloud widgets; when you visit a website with a SoundCloud widget embedded, we may receive certain personal data, including personal data about the website you visited. SoundCloud and the widget may be able to recognize you in order to retrieve your library of content, and in some cases the widget may be used to show personalized content. We know when you interact with a widget, and websites containing the widgets may receive this information as well. Such use is subject to the privacy policy of the third party website or app that has integrated a SoundCloud widget.
Personal Data We Obtain From Third Parties
Single-Sign Ons – If you sign up for SoundCloud through a third party application such as Facebook, Google or Apple, you authorize us to collect your authentication information, such as your username and encrypted access credentials, and other personal data available through the third party application account, including the following personal data:
Facebook Connect – If you have a Facebook profile, you can register on our website to create a user account or to register using the "Facebook Connect" social plugin run by the Facebook social network, which is operated by Facebook, Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA ("Facebook"), using what is known as Single Sign-On technology. You can recognize the "Facebook Connect" social plugins on our website by the blue button with the Facebook logo and the inscription "Register with Facebook" or "Connect with Facebook" or "Log in with Facebook" or "Sign in with Facebook". When you visit a page of our website that contains a social plugin, your browser makes a direct connection to the Facebook servers. The content of the plugin is transferred from Facebook directly to your browser, which then embeds it into the website. Through the integrated plugin, Facebook receives the information that your browser has accessed the corresponding page of our website, even if you do not have a Facebook profile or are not currently logged in to Facebook. This information (including your IP address) is transmitted by your browser directly to a Facebook server in the US and stored there. These data processing operations are carried out on the basis of Facebook's legitimate interest in the displaying of personalized advertising on the basis of browsing behavior. By using the "Facebook Connect" button on our website, you can also log in or register on our website using your Facebook user data. Depending on your personal data protection settings on Facebook, we will only receive general information that is publicly accessible and stored in your profile when you use Facebook’s "Facebook Connect" button if you give your express consent prior to the registration process on the basis of a corresponding notification on the exchange of data with Facebook. This information includes your user ID, name, profile picture, age and gender. We would like to point out that with your consent or in case of changes to Facebook's privacy policy and terms of use, your profile pictures, your friends' user IDs and friends list may be transferred if these have been marked as "public" in your Facebook privacy settings. Apart from connecting your Facebook account with your SoundCloud account for the purposes of registration and signing in, you may provide, based on your free choice (i.e. with your expressed consent) further personal data from your Facebook profile with Facebook Connect to enrich your use and enjoyment of our Platform. This especially applies to your likes and/or usage, listening and viewing behavior as well as your friends within Facebook. In case you decide to share this information with us, we will display relevant artists, playlists and such to you for your liking. We will store and process the personal data transmitted by Facebook to create a user account with the necessary personal data, provided you have approved this on Facebook. Alternatively, based on your consent, personal data (e.g. on your surfing or purchasing behavior) may be transferred from us to your Facebook profile. Please see
Facebook's privacy policies
for the purpose and scope of data collection and the further processing and use of data by Facebook, as well as your rights and settings options for protecting your privacy. If you do not wish Facebook to associate any data collected via our website with your Facebook profile, you should log out of Facebook before you visit our website. You can also completely avoid loading the Facebook plugin with add-ons for your browser.
Google – You can sign up and log in to SoundCloud using your Google account. When you sign up using Google, Google will ask your permission to share certain information from your Google account with SoundCloud. This includes your Google email address, birthdate (optional), gender (optional), and avatar (optional). This information is collected by Google and is provided to us under the terms of
Google’s privacy policy
. You can regulate the information that we receive from Google using your
Google activity controls
. If you signed up using Google by mistake, you can delete your account from the Account page within your Settings at any time, or you can contact us via the
Help Center
.
Apple - You may also sign up and log in to SoundCloud using your Apple ID. When you sign up using your Apple ID, Apple will ask your permission to share certain information from your Apple account with SoundCloud. This includes your Apple email address, birthdate (optional), gender (optional), and avatar (optional). This information is collected by Apple and is provided to us under the terms of
Apple’s privacy policy
. You can regulate the information that we receive from Apple using your Apple ID settings. If you signed up using Apple by mistake, you can delete your account from the Account page within your Settings at any time, or you can contact us via the
Help Center
.
Service Providers and Business Partners – We may also receive personal data about you from our service providers and business partners, including companies that assist with payment processing, analytics, advertising, marketing, data processing and management (e.g. to measure ad quality and responses to ads, and to display ads that are more likely to be relevant to you, including for SoundCloud products), account management, hosting, customer and technical support, content moderation, and other services which we use to personalize your SoundCloud experience. We explain in more detail why and how we use this personal data below.
Android Advertising IDs - We collect your Google Android’s Advertising ID (“AAID”). You can reset these numbers through the settings of your device’s operating system (we do not control this). Such identifiers will only be used for advertising and further analysis subject to your consent, where required by applicable law.
Apple IDs - We collect your Apple Identifier for Advertising (“IDFA”). You can reset these numbers through the settings of your device’s operating system (we do not control this). Such identifiers will only be used for advertising and further analysis subject to your consent, where required by applicable law and in accordance with Apple’s settings.
Cross App Tracking on Apple Devices - Starting with iOS 14.5, iPadOS 14.5, and tvOS 14.5, we will need to receive your permission through the AppTrackingTransparency framework to access and track you through your device’s advertising identifier (see above “IDFA”). Tracking refers to the act of linking user or device data collected from our app with user or device data collected from other companies’ apps, websites, or offline properties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes. Tracking also refers to sharing user or device data with data brokers. The use of such tracking is subject to your consent and therefore may only be exercised by us with such consent. Apple allows the ID for Vendors (IDFV) to be used for analytics across apps from the same content provider (us). The IDFV may not be combined with other data to track a user across apps and websites owned by other companies unless we have been granted permission to track by you. For further information on how we use the SKAdNetwork for attribution tracking please refer to the documentation that Apple provides
here
.
Payment Verification Information - We use the services of Adyen (Adyen N.V., Simon Carmiggeltstraat 6-50, 1011 DJ, Netherlands, click
here
for privacy policy), Recurly (Recurly, Inc., San Francisco, CA (HQ), 400 Alabama Street, Suite 202 San Francisco, CA 94110, United States, click
here
for privacy policy) and Apple Pay (only via in app purchase and subject to the
privacy policy
of Apple, Inc., and the terms and conditions of the payment provider you are using Apple Pay with) for processing your payments. We will get a verification including information on the respective payment method and your name as well as other non-personally identifiable payment information (for example the expiry date of a credit card) as well as information hashed by the respective payment provider (for example a hashed credit card number).
Payment Processing In the Apple App and Google Play Store - Payment processing services within the relevant Apps and App Stores enable SoundCloud to process payments. SoundCloud does not process or store credit card details, and uses only the information necessary to execute the transaction with the financial intermediaries handling the transaction. Even though we do not access raw unencrypted card details of a card holder, some of these services may also enable the sending of timed messages to you, such as emails containing invoices or notifications concerning your payment.
External Payment Providers - The payment provider you use for your payment is solely responsible for the payment. Please refer to the terms of service and privacy policy of your payment provider for further information.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We use the personal data we collect from you for a range of different business purposes according to different legal bases of processing and subject to the choices you make in your
Settings
. We do this with the help of automated systems and decision making. Please be aware that when we refer to automated decision making, we will not use any profiling that produces legal effects concerning you or, similarly, significantly affects you. Automated decisions are concerned with content that may be more relevant for you than other content. We use your personal data to:
Provide, Improve, and Develop the Platform - We process your personal data primarily for the adequate performance of our contract with you (e.g.
Terms of Use
). We may also process your personal data in light of our legitimate interest in improving the Platform and giving our users the best experience. We do this to:
Operate and maintain your SoundCloud account, and to provide you with access to and use of the Platform. Your email address and password are used to identify you when you log into the Platform. Your device-IDs are used to help ensure that you are in control of the devices that have access to your Subscription.
Identify you as the creator of the Tracks that you upload, the comments that you post and/or the other contributions that you make to the Platform.
Provide creators with stats and insights about users’ listening behavior of their Tracks, (i.e. streaming and downloading their Tracks or following their profiles).
Conduct surveys and research, test features in development, and analyze the information we have to evaluate and improve products and services, develop new features, and conduct audits and troubleshooting activities.
If purchasing a Subscription, to process your account subscription and renewals, to collect your payment with the use of payment verification information, and, if applicable, to verify your eligibility for discounts and promotions.
Send you service updates and notifications about your account and other information we think may interest you, though you may opt out from our promotional communications at any time.
Respond to you about any comment or enquiry you have submitted.
Enable age restrictions.
Maintain a Safe and Secure Environment - We also process your personal data in light of our legitimate interest in improving the security of the Platform (including the security of your personal data) in order to give our users the best experience, and where it is necessary for the adequate performance of our contract with you (e.g.
Terms of Use
) or to comply with our legal obligations. This includes:
The detection and prevention of fraud, spam, abuse, security incidents, and other suspicious activity.
The verification and authentication of your identity to prevent unauthorized or illegal activity.
The enhancement of the safety and security of our products and services.
The conducting of security investigations and risk assessments.
The prevention or action against activities that are, or may be, in breach of our Terms of Use, Community Guidelines or applicable law.
The ability to provide you with customer and technical support.
Personalized Content – We process your personal data in this case based on our performance of a contract and our legitimate interests. This includes:
To improve your experience on the Platform by providing personalized content, recommendations, and features.
To customize the content and measure performance of any email, push notification, or in-app message we may send to you.
Advertising and Marketing - We may process the minimum personal data, especially your IP-address and other identifiers, necessary to provide non-personalized ads. These ads will only be based on the context on where the ads are shown or triggered.  Such processing of your personal data is based on our legitimate interests. Where required by applicable law, we process your personal data in this case based on your consent. You can revisit your choices in your
settings
or in our cookie consent tool. This includes:
To administer sweepstakes, contests, or other promotional activities or events sponsored or managed by SoundCloud or its partners.
To deliver targeted marketing for SoundCloud products on and off the Platform and measure the success of those campaigns. When seeing our ads on third party websites or apps, we or third party services we engage with for this purpose may collect personal data. This personal data includes the information that your browser or mobile app makes available when seeing the ad (e.g IP address, referral URL, browser details, timestamp of request). We use this information to understand, for example, if a click on our ad converted to an actual purchase of a subscription.
To help us select which ads to show you on behalf of advertisers, as ads are more effective when they are shown to people who are likely to be interested in the product or service advertised. This includes personal data you choose to provide to us (e.g. age and gender) and make available to us when you interact with the Platform (e.g. by listening, liking or creating playlists), as well as device information and general location data. We may also display ads based on the page you’re on or Materials you have recently viewed, searched, or listened to. This allows us to show you ads that will likely be more relevant and interesting to you.
To collect certain personal data such as cookie data and device information, if we engage with third party services such as ad-networks and exchanges that enable us to show you targeted ads. That personal data is used to sync or match users to segments and serve targeted advertising, based on device activity, inferred interests, and general location information.
To combine personal data that we collect about you with personal data from business partners and use it to serve more relevant advertising.
Combine information we collect about you with information from business partners and use it to serve more relevant advertising.
Marketing Communications - Based on your consent, SoundCloud may send you email and push communications about SoundCloud’s and its affiliates’ offers and promotions. From time to time, these communications will be tailored based on your use of SoundCloud. SoundCloud may also send you tips, news, and recommendations about SoundCloud and our own similar services. You can withdraw your consent to receive these communications at any time in your Settings.
Market Research Studies - Based on our legitimate interest, from time to time we will ask you to participate in market research studies and surveys or to do research studies based on anonymized and/or pseudonymized data. There is no obligation to participate in our studies. In the case that you do participate, it will be based on the consent you provide when answering the survey. We deem that the use of anonymized and/or pseudonymized data is covered by our legitimate interest as we will only use such analysis to further improve our research and Platform for the benefit of understanding your needs and enhancing your experience. We will only use the data you provide when answering the market study for other reasons, such as customized product recommendations or notifications based on your consent which you provide ahead of your participation in the market study.
Operate and Maintain SoundCloud Monetization - In the event you use the services of SoundCloud Monetization, we use the personal data provided by you to operate and maintain your monetization and/or distribution with SoundCloud Monetization. The personal data will be used to calculate the eligible revenue to be paid out to you and affect the payments into your PayPal account or any other accepted payment provider.
How We Share Your Personal Data
This section describes how the personal data collected or generated through your use of the Platform may be shared by you or by us.
Through Your Profile – Any personal data in your public profile (other than your email address) will be accessible by other users of the Platform, who may view your profile information, listen to and comment on any of your public Tracks, add themselves to your list of followers, and send you messages. Similarly, if you comment on any Tracks on the Platform, your comments will be available to all users of the Platform together with your profile name and picture.
With Artists - When you listen to Artists, you are providing your public profile and information about your listening behavior to those Artists. Artists are able to see in their statistics that you have listened to the Tracks they uploaded along with a ranking of who listened to their Tracks the most. They will also be able to see how many times you have listened to any of their Tracks, and that you are following them. This is to allow Artists to Artists better understand their fanbase. More information is available in the SoundCloud Fan Insights document
here
.
With Other SoundCloud Users - Based on our legitimate interest in fostering connections among fans and artists, when you listen to, like, or follow a particular Track or Artist, we may identify you to other SoundCloud users as (i) a listener who has engaged in that way with the Track or Artist and (ii) one of the listeners with the most, or first, plays of that Track or Artist. In your Settings (“Privacy” tab), you may opt out of being identified as a listener with the most, or first, plays of Tracks and Artists.
Service Providers – We use a variety of service providers, some of whom may be located outside of the European Economic Area (“EEA”), to provide services to us or to our users on our behalf. These service providers have access to your personal data solely to perform these tasks on our behalf, and are contractually bound to implement appropriate organizational and technical security measures to protect against unauthorized disclosure of personal data, and only to process personal data in accordance with our instructions and to the extent necessary to provide their services to us. We need to share your personal data in order to ensure the adequate performance of our contract with you. For instance, we work closely with service providers in the area of customer service (i.e. help center, content moderation), with technical service providers (e.g. running computer centers) or music service providers (i.e. rights administration) and payment service providers. These service providers may generally only process your personal data on our behalf under special conditions.
Rightsholders - The Platform allows you to listen to a variety of Tracks, including licensed streaming content. To help rightsholders that license Tracks to us understand how the Tracks that they provide are performing, including insights about general or individual user listening trends and preferences, rightsholders are able to view information like your public profile details as well as basic usage data (for example interactions with Tracks). If you live in the EU/EEA/U.K., we share this personal data based on our legitimate interest, as our contracts with these rightsholders state that they will be granted these insights. Their interest prevails over your legitimate interest in the safekeeping of your public profile information and basic usage data.
Collecting Societies - Due to legal obligations, we are obliged in many countries around the world to transmit pseudonymized or anonymized usage data to copyright collecting societies that help manage payment and royalty information for Rightsholders.
Advertising on the Platform – We share the personal data collected about you in hashed, aggregated, or de-identified forms with advertisers and business partners in order to serve ads on our Platform that we think will interest you and to measure the reach and effectiveness of those ads, including whether you took an action (e.g. purchased a product). We may also share cookie data and device identifiers with our partners for data matching purposes, in order to improve ad targeting. If you live in the EU/EEA/U.K., You can find a detailed overview of our advertisers
here
. Please be aware that where such personal data of yours is identifiable, we will only use it with your consent. For users outside of the EU/EEA/U.K., you can turn off our use of third-party data to inform the ads you see on SoundCloud by adjusting your settings
here
.
Ads about SoundCloud – Where permissible under applicable law we may share your email address (in hashed form, so that it does not identify you personally) with advertising partners, including social networks, in order to target you with ads for SoundCloud products on third party websites and applications. We also allow advertising partners, including social networks, to collect personal data through cookies and similar technologies like pixels in order to serve ads for SoundCloud on those third party websites and apps and drive users to our Platform. In order to measure the effectiveness of and optimize these marketing campaigns, these technologies track activity taken across devices after a user sees a SoundCloud ad, in order to determine performance metrics like sign ups, visits to the Platform, and purchases. For users within the EU/EEA/U.K., we only engage in these activities with your explicit consent. For users outside of the EU/EEA/U.K., you may opt out of these disclosures by adjusting your settings in the Cookie Manager.
Aggregated Data – We may also share aggregated and anonymized personal data (personal data about our users that we render in such a way that it no longer identifies or references an individual user) and other pseudonymized personal data for regulatory compliance, industry and market analysis, demographic profiling, marketing and advertising, and other business purposes.
API Integrations – SoundCloud has an open application-programming interface (API), which enables application developers to integrate elements of the Platform into other apps. Some of these developers may be located outside of the EEA but will always, if user data is concerned, sign a Data Processing Addendum and accordingly (where applicable) EU-US Standard Contract Clauses. Any personal data you choose to make public on the Platform, including your public profile information and any public Tracks, may be accessible to these developers, subject to our
API Terms of Use
. Please bear this in mind when deciding what information to publish on your profile. For information on how to limit the information that is available through the API, please see the Your Choices and Controls section below.
Third Party Applications – If you choose to connect your SoundCloud account to other apps or social networks such as Facebook, you may be sharing certain personal data with these apps or networks. Materials that you share with social media networks will appear on your timeline (or similar functions) as well as in news feeds that may be viewed by the public or by certain followers, subject to the terms and conditions of such social media networks. In the case of connected apps, you will need to provide the app developer with full access to your SoundCloud account in order to upload and download Tracks, or comment on, favorite, or repost Tracks from within the app. This means sharing your public information, plus access to your private Tracks. SoundCloud is not responsible for these other apps or networks, so please make sure you only connect your account with apps or services that you trust. For information on how to control the personal data that you share, and how to disconnect your account from these apps, please see the Your Choices and Controls section below. If you do not want this information shared with such social media networks or other Third Party Applications, please change your SoundCloud
Settings
on our Platform or in those networks.
Use of Your Name and Other User Identifiers in Sharing Links - When sharing personal data from our platform on other platforms, especially social media platforms like Facebook or Instagram, we may use your pseudonymized data. If a user clicks on your shared link and is led to our platform, the user will be presented with a banner telling the user that you (in this context, your profile name will be displayed) are using SoundCloud and/or that you shared this link, and the user will then be asked if they want to follow you. Such use by us is considered a legitimate interest as it enriches our user experience and the way our users connect with each other. As we assume that you share links responsibly with people whom you want to interact with, we also assume that your interest in the safekeeping of your personal data is not affected, especially since we only use pseudonymized data within the link itself. Please be aware that your shared link may be shared further by other parties.
Compliance with Laws – We may disclose your personal data to courts, law enforcement agencies, and governmental authorities (i) to comply with our legal obligations, (ii) to comply with legal process and to respond to claims asserted against SoundCloud, (iii) to respond to verified requests relating to a criminal investigation or alleged or suspected illegal activity or any other activity that may expose us, you, or any other of our users to legal liability, (iv) to enforce and administer our Terms of Use and other agreements with users, or (v) to protect the rights, property or personal safety of SoundCloud, its employees, and members of the public.
Protecting our Rights – We may disclose your personal data if we feel it is necessary in order to protect or defend our legitimate rights and interests, or those of our users, employees, directors, officers, or shareholders, and/or to ensure the safety and security of the Platform and/or the SoundCloud community.
Change of Control – We may also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control of SoundCloud, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your personal data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy.
SoundCloud Direct - In the event you choose to grant other users access to your SoundCloud Direct account, or in the event you set up our Split Pay feature, some personal data, such as your name and email address, will be available to those users. Additionally, if you use SC Planner, your SC Planner profile will be visible to other users in the “Leaderboard” section of the App, unless you elect to make your profile invisible in your settings.
Cookies and Similar Technology
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g. pixels, local storage, and device identifiers) to recognize you and/or your device(s) on and off the Platform, and across devices. To the extent allowed by your settings or your device and in accordance with your choices, we also allow third parties to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy in order to track user behavior on and off the Platform in order to show you ads based on your interests and preferences. You can control cookies through your browser and other tools as described in the Cookie Policy.
For users in the EU/EEA/U.K., please be aware any use of cookies is subject to your consent, except for technical storage or access for transmitting communication, or as strictly necessary to provide a service which was explicitly requested by a user. You will find information regarding the use of cookies from specific third parties when making the choice of cookies you want to allow within our cookie consent tool. Further information is provided in your account settings under “advertising”, where you may as well toggle your choices after your first decision.
International Data Transfers
SoundCloud operates globally and may share your personal data internally within the SoundCloud Group and third parties for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. Personal data collected within the EEA may, for example, be transferred to countries outside of the EEA for the purposes as described in this Privacy Policy. We utilize appropriate safeguards such as Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission, or another legally approved mechanism, to ensure the lawful transfer of your personal data outside of the EEA. The Standard Contractual Clauses can be accessed at any time
here
. Alternatively, you can request these documents from us using the contact details given below.
Children
SoundCloud is not intended for use by children. Anyone under the age of 16 in the EEA and UK, or 13 in the United States and the rest of the world, is not permitted to use the Platform and must not attempt to register an account or submit any personal data to us. We do not knowingly collect any personal data from any person who is under the age of 16 or 13, as the case may be, or allow them to register an account. If it comes to our attention that we have collected personal data from a person under the age of 16 or 13, as applicable, we will delete this personal data as quickly as possible. If you have reason to believe that we may have collected any such personal data, please notify us immediately at dataprotection@soundcloud.com.
Our Activity On Social Networks
To allow us to communicate with you on third party social networks and inform you about our services, we run pages on third party social networks. If you visit our pages on any of these third party social media pages, we and the provider of the third party social media network are joint controllers regarding the processing operations thereby triggered, which concern personal data. We are not the original provider of these pages, but only use them within the scope of the options offered to us by the respective providers.
For our EU/EEA/U.K. based users, we would like to point out that your personal data may also be processed outside of the EU, EEA, or the U.K. Use of these networks may therefore involve data protection risks for you since the protection of your rights may be difficult, e.g. your right to information, erasure, objection, etc. Processing on social networks frequently takes place directly for advertising purposes or for the analysis of user behavior by network providers, and we have no control over this. If the provider creates user profiles, cookies are often used or user behavior may be assigned directly to your own member profile on the respective social network (if you are logged in).
The processing operations of personal data described are carried out on the basis of our legitimate interests and the legitimate interests of the respective provider in order to communicate with you in a timely manner or to inform you about our services. If you get asked to grant your consent to the respective providers to process your personal data as a user, your consent is the legal basis for this processing.
Since we have no access to these providers’ databases, we would like to point out that you would be best situated to exercise your rights (e.g. to information, rectification, erasure, etc.) directly with the respective provider. More information on the processing of your personal data on social networks and your options for exercising your right to object or your right of revocation (opt out) is listed below for each of the social network providers we use:
Facebook - (Jointly) For Europe: Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland
Privacy Notice (Data Policy)
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
Instagram - (Jointly) For Europe: Meta Platforms Ireland Ltd, 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Ireland
Privacy Notice (Data Policy)
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
Twitter - (Jointly) For Europe: Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2, D02 AX07, Ireland
Privacy Notice
Information About Your Data
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
LinkedIn - (Jointly) For Europe: LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company, Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Ireland
Privacy Notice
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
TikTok - (Jointly) For Europe: TikTok Technology Limited, 10 Earlsfort Terrace, Dublin, D02 T380, Ireland. For Great Britain: TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited, WeWork, 125 Kingsway, London, WC2B 6NH, England
Privacy Notice
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
Snapchat - (Jointly) Snap Inc., 2772 Donald Douglas Loop North Santa Monica, CA 90405, USA. For Europe: Snap Group Limited, 77 Shaftesbury Avenue, London, W1D 5DU, United Kingdom
Privacy Notice
Opt-Out and Advertising Settings
Twitch - (Jointly) Twitch Interactive, Inc., 225 Bush Street, 6th Floor, San Francisco, CA 94104, USA
Privacy Notice
Security
Your Choices and Controls
We work to give you meaningful choices regarding the amount of personal data you provide to us, and the control you have over that personal data.
Managing SoundCloud Settings - If you register an account, you may manage the content and personal data you share when you use SoundCloud through your account
Settings
, including for the features explained below. You are solely responsible for keeping your
Settings
up-to-date.
Email & Device Notifications – You can adjust your Settings in the “Notification” tab to disable email and device notifications (other than important service updates and essential notifications about the Platform or your account). All commercial emails and newsletters also allow you to unsubscribe at any time.
Analytics – To control whether we collect analytics and usage information, including through cookies and similar technologies, you can adjust your Settings in the “Privacy” tab (“Cookie Manager”).
Marketing – If you do not want to receive marketing messages for SoundCloud products or services, you can adjust your Settings in the “Notifications” tab.
Advertising on the Platform – If you do not want SoundCloud to deliver “interest based” or personalized ads for third party products, you can adjust your Settings in the “Advertising” tab (for EU/EEA/U.K. and California users, under “Cookie Manager”). Please note, however, that even if you opt out of personalized ads, you may still see ads, but they may not be as tailored to your interests.
Material Sharing – It’s not possible to make your account entirely private. However, you do have the option to make all of your Tracks, playlists and other uploads private. This means that no one will be able to access and listen to your Tracks without your explicit permission. You can learn more about these settings
here
.
Third Party Apps – If you have chosen to connect your account to a third-party application, like Facebook or Google, you can disable permission for the app by adjusting your Settings in the “Account” tab.
Third Party Developers – SoundCloud has an open API, which allows third party developers to build apps as an extension of the Platform. If you would prefer that your Tracks are not made available to third party app developers, you can disable API access within the sound page for each of the Tracks that you upload. Click on the pencil icon below the waveform player, and navigate to the “Permissions” tab and uncheck the “enable app playback” box. Please note that your public profile information will still be accessible, but this does not include anything that is not publicly available on the Platform.
Deleting Your SoundCloud Account – If you have an account and would like to delete it, you may do so by adjusting your Settings in the account tab. If you delete your account, all personal data associated with your account (except for backup copies), including the Tracks that you have uploaded and the usage data associated with those Tracks, will be deleted and may not be recoverable. We therefore advise you to copy or backup all Materials uploaded to your account before deletion. Even if you delete your account, it is possible that your personal data may still show up in some internet search results for a short while afterwards, if the search engine maintains a temporary cache of web pages. Search engines’ caching processes are outside of SoundCloud’s control and therefore we cannot be responsible for any personal data that remains cached by search engines after that personal data has been removed from the Platform. Please note that deleting any SoundCloud Apps, or any third party apps to which your account is connected, will not delete your account. Similarly, if you delete a third party app that is connected to your account over our API, this will not necessarily delete all personal data about your activity on the Platform from within that third party app. You will need to refer to the app provider’s terms of use and privacy policy to find out how to delete personal data about your activity on the Platform from that third party app.
Messages From Other Users - If you do not want to receive messages from users you don’t follow, you can adjust your settings in the “Privacy” tab. If you want to block users, you will have to do so on their respective profiles. Any blocked user will be shown in your settings in the “Privacy” tab.
Managing Device Settings
On your mobile device, you may disable the “Allow Apps to Request to Track” setting in your iOS phone’s settings, or enable the setting to “Opt out of Ads Personalization” in your Android phone’s settings. To opt-out of location tracking when using our Apps, you can use the settings of your device. You can disable mobile analytics and bug reporting through these same settings as well.
Managing Browser Settings
You may also control cookies in your browser settings. You can modify your settings in most web browsers to accept or deny cookies or to request your permission each time a site attempts to set a cookie. You can also manually delete previously stored cookies at any time. Please note that if you choose to block cookies, doing so may impair the Platform or prevent certain elements of it from functioning.
Exercising Your EU/EEA/U.K. Privacy Rights
If you are a user residing in the EU/EEA/U.K., you may exercise any of the rights described in this section through the
Help Center
or by contacting us at dataprotection@soundcloud.com. Please note that we may ask you to verify your identity before taking further action on your request.
Data Access and Portability - You may be entitled to request copies of your personal data held by us. While a lot of the personal data you provide to us can be accessed in your account settings, you may also be entitled to request copies of personal data you have provided to us in machine-readable format.
Change or Correct Data - Where you cannot update personal data yourself through an account, you have the right to ask us to correct, change, update or rectify your personal data.
Data Retention and Deletion - We generally retain personal data for as long as is necessary to provide services to you under your account, i.e. as long as your contract is ongoing and for the sake of legal obligations, for 3 years following the end of the year in which your contract was canceled - or, for as long as is necessary to provide the Platform to you as a unregistered user. You have the right to ask us to delete all or some of the personal data we hold about you. If you have an account, you can also delete your account through the Settings at any time as described below. We may need to retain some of your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (e.g. under applicable tax or commercial law or to prevent fraud and abuse and maintain and enhance security). Afterwards, we delete the personal data immediately, unless we need the personal data until the expiry of the statutory period of limitation for the purpose of providing evidence for civil law claims or because of statutory storage obligations (e.g. for accounting reasons).
Objection to Processing - You have the right to object to processing your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation at any time (in particular, where we don’t have to process the personal data to meet a contractual or other legal requirement, or where we are using the personal data on the basis of our legitimate interests). If you object to such processing, SoundCloud will no longer process your personal data for these purposes unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for such processing or such processing is required for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims or obligations. Where your personal data is processed for direct marketing purposes, you have the right to object to such processing of your personal data at any time and ask SoundCloud to cease processing your data for these direct marketing purposes. However, please be aware that any objection to processing will not necessarily have an impact on the personal data processing before such objection was made, thus such processing will generally be deemed as permissible and will be subject to the usual retention and deletion periods.
Restriction of Processing - You have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data where one of the following applies: your personal data is not accurate anymore; the processing is unlawful and instead of erasing the personal data you request the restriction of use; the personal data is no longer needed by us but required by you for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; you have objected to the use and the decision on the legitimate grounds for objection is pending.
Withdrawing Consent - Where you provide consent to the processing of your personal data by SoundCloud, you may withdraw your consent at any time by changing your account
Settings
or by sending a communication to SoundCloud specifying the specific consent you are withdrawing. Please note that the withdrawal of your consent does not affect the lawfulness of any processing activities based on such consent before its withdrawal.
Lodging Complaints - You have the right to lodge complaints about the data processing activities carried out by SoundCloud before a competent data protection authority. A list of EU data protection authorities is available
here
.
Notice to Users Who Are Residents of Certain U.S. States
If you are a resident of California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia, this section applies to you. Some state privacy laws require additional disclosures, which we cover in this section.
Collection, Disclosure, Sale and Sharing of Personal Data
Above, we explain how SoundCloud collects, uses, and discloses information about you.  Below we use two charts to communicate the same information, in accordance with requirements under certain state privacy laws. In addition to the information below, as we explain above, we also share your public profile information and information about your interactions with Artists’ content (such as what you listen to and how often you listen) with those Artists.
Categories of Personal Data that we plan to collect and have collected and disclosed within the preceding 12 months
Disclosed to Which Categories of Recipients for Operational Business Purposes
How We Use Personal Data
Identifiers, such as your name, email address, residential address, date of birth, profile picture, social security number, as well as IP addresses, device IDs, anonymous Repost user IDs, and other similar identifiers
Affiliates; service providers; business partners; joint marketing partners; content partners; social networks; contest sponsors; legal authorities
We may use this personal data to operate, manage, and maintain our business, to provide our products and services, and to accomplish our business purposes and objectives, including, for example, to:
To operate and maintain the Platform and your SoundCloud account and to provide you with access to and use of the Platform
To identify you as the creator of the Tracks that you upload and the comments that you post
To provide our newsletter to subscribers
To market and sell our products and services
To provide personalized content and ads
To perform market research studies and development
To perform data and business analytics
To detect and prevent fraud, spam, abuse, security incidents, or other suspicious activity
To perform identity verification and authentication and prevent unauthorized or illegal activity
To process Subscription payments
To operate and maintain SoundCloud Monetization To process user inquiries and requests
To perform security investigations and other risk assessments
To undertake quality assurance measures
To maintain our systems and infrastructure
To comply with law or exercise or defend legal claims
To prevent or take action against activities that are, or may be, in breach of our Terms of Use, Community Guidelines or applicable law
To perform accounting, conduct audits and other internal functions
and To otherwise operate our business and achieve our business objectives
Personal data as defined in the California customer records law, such as name, contact information, financial information, and tax identification number
Affiliates; service providers; business partners; joint marketing partners; contest sponsors; legal authorities
Characteristics about you that you choose to provide when you register an account on the Platform, which may include characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law, such as age and gender
Affiliates; service providers; business partners; joint marketing partners; social networks; contest sponsors
Commercial information, such as revenue and/or transaction information related to your content and use of the Platform and SoundCloud Monetization
Affiliates; service providers; business partners; joint marketing partners; contest sponsors
Financial, tax, and payment information you provide when you create an account or use certain features of the Platform
Affiliates; service providers; business partners; legal authorities
Internet or network activity information, such as (browsing history, search history and interactions with our online properties or ads)
Affiliates; service providers
General location data, such as approximate location derived from IP address
Affiliates; service providers; contest sponsors
Audio, images, text, and other electronic information, such as the content you distribute through the Platform
Affiliates; service providers; operating systems and platforms
Inferences drawn from any of the personal data listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics
Affiliates; service providers; ad networks
Personal Data that We “Share,” “Sell,” or Use for “Targeted Advertising”
We disclose the following categories of personal information to third parties for the purpose of advertising to you on non-affiliated sites and services and to inform the ads we show you on our Platform, including to measure and improve the effectiveness of advertising (see the “
Advertising on the Platform
” and “
Ads about SoundCloud
” section above for more information). These activities may be considered “sales” or “sharing” or use of personal information for “targeted advertising” under certain State Laws.
Category of Personal Data
Categories of Third Parties
Identifiers
Advertising partners
Internet or network activity information, such as (browsing history, search history and interactions with our online properties or ads)
Advertising partners
Characteristics about you that you choose to provide when you register an account on the Platform, which may include characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law, such as age and gender
Advertising partners
General location data, such as approximate location derived from IP address
Advertising partners
Inferences drawn from any of the personal data listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics
Advertising partners
We do not knowingly sell or share the personal data of individuals ages 13–15 without consent.
Sources of Personal Data - As described above, we collect this personal data from you, from affiliates via single-sign ons, and from our trusted service providers and business partners.
Retention Period - We retain personal data for as long as needed or permitted in light of the purpose(s) for which it was collected. The criteria used to determine our retention periods include:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide services to you (for example, for as long as you have an account with us or keep using our services) and the length of time thereafter during which we may have a legitimate need to reference your personal data to address issues that may arise;
Whether there is a legal obligation to which we are subject (for example, certain laws require us to keep records of your transactions for a certain period of time before we can delete them); or
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to applicable statutes of limitations, litigation or regulatory investigations).
We generally do not collect information that is considered “sensitive” under state privacy laws. In the limited circumstances that we do, such as collection of your account username and password, which is designated as “sensitive” under the California Consumer Privacy Act, we do not use or disclose such sensitive personal information for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you.
Individual Rights and Requests
If you are a California, Colorado, Connecticut, Utah or Virginia resident, you may, subject to applicable law, make the following requests, to which SoundCloud will respond consistent with our obligations under applicable law:
Request to Know - You may request to know whether we process your personal data.
If you are a California resident, you may request that we disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
The categories of personal data we’ve collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such personal data;
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling or sharing personal data about you;
The categories of personal data about you that we sold or shared and the categories of third parties to whom we sold or shared such personal data; and
The categories of personal data about you that we otherwise disclosed and the categories of third parties to whom we disclosed such personal data.
Request for a Copy – You may request to receive a copy of your personal data, including, where applicable, in a portable, readily usable format. If you are a Utah or Virginia resident, this right applies to personal data you provided to us;
Request to Correct – If you are a California, Colorado, Virginia, or Connecticut resident, you may request to correct inaccuracies in your personal data.
Request to Delete - You may request that we delete your personal data. If you are a California or Utah resident, this right applies only to personal data we have collected from you.
To make a Request to Know, a Request for a Copy, a Request to Correct, or a Request to Delete, please use the Help Center or contact us at dataprotection@soundcloud.com or +1 833 993 2002. We will verify and respond to your request consistent with applicable law, taking into account the type and sensitivity of the personal data subject to the request. We may request additional personal data from you in order to verify your identity and protect against fraudulent requests, such as your email address or a picture and then use that information to match it with information we already have. If you maintain a password-protected account with us, we may verify your identity through our existing authentication practices for your account and require you to re-authenticate yourself before disclosing, correcting, or deleting your personal data. If you make a Request to Delete, we may ask you to confirm your request before we delete your personal data.
If you want to make a Request to Know, a Request for a Copy, a Request to Correct, or a Request to Delete as an authorized agent on behalf of another individual, you may use the submission methods noted above. Not all kinds of requests can be made by authorized agents in all states. As part of our verification process, we may request that you provide, as applicable, proof concerning your status as an authorized agent. In addition, we may require that the individual who is the subject of the request verify their identity, as set forth above or confirm that they provided you (the agent) with permission to submit the request.
Request to Opt Out of Sales and Shares – If you are a California resident, you may request to opt-out of any future “sale” or “share” (as defined by applicable law) of personal data about you by using the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information”
link
on our homepage or within our mobile apps, or by contacting us at dataprotection@soundcloud.com or +1 833 993 2002. If you want to make a Request to Opt Out as an authorized agent on behalf of another individual, you may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we may request, as applicable:
Proof of your registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California;
Signed permission that the individual has authorized you to make a Request to Opt-Out on their behalf. “Signed” means that the permission has either been physically signed or provided electronically in accordance with the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, Civil Code 1633.7 et seq.
Request to Opt Out of Targeted Advertising – You may request to opt-out of any future targeted advertising under Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia laws by adjusting your account Settings in the “Advertising” tab, or by contacting us at dataprotection@soundcloud.com or +1 833 993 2002.
Right to Non-Discrimination - You have the right to be free from unlawful discriminatory treatment for exercising your rights under applicable state laws.
Right to Appeal – If you are a Colorado, Connecticut, or Virginia consumer and we refuse to take action on your request, you may appeal the refusal within a reasonable period after you have received notice of the refusal. You may file an appeal by contacting us at dataprotection@soundcloud.com or +1 833 993 2002.
Your Right to Request Removal of Content - Pursuant to California Business & Professions Code section 22581, if you are a resident of California, under 18, and a registered user of the Platform, you may ask us to remove content or information that you have posted to the Platform by writing to dataprotection@soundcloud.com. Please note that your request does not ensure complete or comprehensive removal of the content or information, as, for example, some of your content may have been reposted by another user.
Other Rights - You can request certain information about our disclosure of personal data to third parties for their own direct marketing purposes during the preceding calendar year. This request may be made once a year.
De-Identified Data - Where we maintain or use de-identified data, we will continue to maintain and use the de-identified data only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify the data.
Contact Information
If you have questions or complaints about this Privacy Policy or our practices, please contact our Data Protection Officer by email at dataprotection@soundcloud.com or write to our Data Protection Officer at SoundCloud Global Limited & Co. KG, Rheinsberger Str. 76/77 10115 Berlin, Germany Attention: Data Protection Officer.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time at our sole discretion. If we make changes to this Privacy Policy, we will post the revised Privacy Policy on the Platform and update the “Last Amended” date below. Please be sure to periodically check this page to ensure that you are aware of any changes to this Privacy Policy. Any material changes to this Privacy Policy will be communicated to registered users by a notification to their account and/or by posting a notice of the change on the Website. Your continued access to or use of the Platform after the effective date of such changes will be subject to the revised Privacy Policy.
Last Amended: December 2024
Link to prior versions
You will find a link to prior versions of our Privacy Policy below.
April 2022
October 2021
December 2020
November 2020
December 2019
May 2019
May 2018
May 2017
March 2016
January 2016
June 2015
August 2014
July 2014
March 2014
May 2013
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Cookie Manager
Community Guidelines
Moderation and Enforcement Policies
Law Enforcement Guidelines
Transparency Reports
Report Illegal Content
Learn About Copyright
Report Copyright Infringement
About SoundCloud
Company Information
Press Information
Next up
Clear
Hide queue
Skip to previous
Play current
Skip to next
Shuffle
Repeat track
Volume
Toggle mute
Use shift and the arrow up and down keys to change the volume.
Cookies & Tracking
When clicking on “I accept”, you agree that we and our
878
partners may store and/or access information on your device, such as unique IDs in cookies to process personal data. You may accept or manage your choices by clicking below, including your right to object where legitimate interest is used. You can withdraw your consent or manage your choices at any time in your settings or the cookie manager. For additional info please refer to our Privacy Policy. Your choices will be signaled to our partners and will not affect browsing data.
Personalized Ads
Use precise geolocation data. Actively scan device characteristics for identification. Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
List of Partners
I Accept
Reject All
Manage Preferences
About Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent. You may exercise your right to consent or object to a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
Read more about our Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set by us or by our advertising partners. They are used for targeted advertising or for other purposes related to our marketing efforts.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count unique visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.
Cookies Details‎
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Full Legal Text
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
655 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create profiles for personalised advertising
528 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Full Legal Text
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
523 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Full Legal Text
Create profiles to personalise content
233 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Full Legal Text
Use profiles to select personalised content
206 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects. This can for example be used to adapt the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Full Legal Text
Measure advertising performance
763 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure content performance
380 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
483 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Develop and improve services
571 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Use limited data to select content
145 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Full Legal Text
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Full Legal Text
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Full Legal Text
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
The choices you make regarding the purposes and entities listed in this notice are saved and made available to those entities in the form of digital signals (such as a string of characters). This is necessary in order to enable both this service and those entities to respect such choices.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Full Legal Text
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 33
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy-eea:
Introduction
What Information We Collect
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
Your Rights and Choices
Data Security and Retention
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
Younger Users
Privacy Policy Updates
Contact Us
EEA/UK/CH
Privacy Policy
Effective Date:
04 December 2024
Introduction
What Information We Collect
How We Use Your Information
How We Share Your Information
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
Your Rights and Choices
Data Security and Retention
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
Younger Users
Privacy Policy Updates
Contact Us
Introduction
This privacy policy ("
Privacy Policy
") applies to the personal information that TikTok processes in connection with TikTok apps, websites, software and related services (the “
Platform
”), that link to or reference this Privacy Policy.
Data Controller
: If you live in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), or Switzerland, TikTok Technology Limited, an Irish company (“
TikTok Ireland
”), and TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited (“
TikTok UK
”), a UK company, ("
TikTok
," "
our
," "
we
," or "
us
") are the joint controllers of your information processed in connection with this Privacy Policy.
What Information We Collect
We collect your information in three ways:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. More detail is provided below.
Information You Provide
Account Information.
We collect information that you provide when you set up an account, such as your date of birth, username, email address and/or telephone number, and password. You can choose to add other information to your account, such as a bio or image.
User Content.
We collect the content you create, import, upload or publish through the Platform, such as photographs, videos, audio recordings, livestreams, comments, hashtags, feedback, reviews, and the associated metadata (such as when, where, and by whom the content was created). Even if you are not a user, information about you may appear in content created or published by users on the Platform. We collect
User Content
through pre-loading at the time of creation, import, or upload, regardless of whether you choose to save or upload that
User Content
, for example, to recommend music based on the video. We also collect content (such as text, images, and video) from your device's clipboard if you choose to copy and paste content to or from the Platform or share content between it and a third party platform. In addition, we collect location information (such as tourist attractions, shops, or other points of interest) if you choose to add the location information to your
User Content
.
Messages.
We collect the content of the messages you send and receive on the Platform and the associated metadata (such as the time the message was sent, received or read, as well as the participants in the communication). We also collect the messages you send or receive through our chat functionality when using our shopping feature to communicate with sellers or using virtual assistants.
Your Contacts and Other Connections.
If you choose to sync your contacts, we will collect information from your device’s phone book such as names, phone numbers, and email addresses, and match that information to users of the Platform. If you choose to find other users through your social network contacts, we will collect your public profile information as well as names and profiles of your social network contacts. We also collect information about the accounts you follow and that follow you.
Purchase Information.
When you make a purchase, a payment, or other transaction on or through the Platform, including when you buy TikTok Coins or purchase products through our shopping features, we collect information about the transaction, such as payment card information, billing, delivery, and contact information, and products you purchased.
Surveys, Research, and Promotions.
We collect
Information You Provide
if you choose to participate in a survey, research, promotion, contest, marketing campaign, or event conducted or sponsored by us.
Information When You Contact Us.
When you contact us, we collect the information you send us, such as proof of identity or age, feedback or inquiries about your use of the Platform or information about possible violations of our
Terms of Service
(our “
Terms
”),
Community Guidelines
(our “
Guidelines
”), or other policies.
Information From Forms and Features You Use
. We collect the
Information You Provide
when you fill in a form on the Platform. You can let TikTok fill in forms automatically with your account info, like your addresses or payment info.
Automatically Collected Information
Technical Information.
We collect certain device and network connection information when you access the Platform. This information includes your device model, operating system, keystroke patterns or rhythms, IP address, system language and device settings. We also collect service-related, diagnostic, performance information, including crash reports and performance logs. We automatically assign you a device ID and user ID. Where you log-in from multiple devices, we use information such as your device ID and user ID to identify your activity across devices to give you a seamless log-in experience and for security purposes.
Location Information.
We automatically collect information about your approximate location (e.g. country, state, or city) based on your
Technical Information
(such as SIM card and IP address). Also, where you enable location services for the TikTok app within your device settings, we collect approximate location information from your device. Click
here
to learn more about how we collect Location Information.
Usage Information.
We collect information about how you engage with the Platform, including information about how you interact with content and ads, the duration and frequency of your use, your engagement with other users, and your search history.
Content Characteristics and Features.
We detect and collect characteristics and features about the videos, images, and audio recordings that are part of your
User Content
, for example, by identifying objects and scenery, the existence or location within an image of a face or other body parts; and the text of words spoken in your
User Content
. We do this, for example, for content moderation and to provide special effects (such as video filters and avatars) and captions.
Inferred Information.
We infer your attributes (such as age-range and gender) and interests based on the information we have about you. We use inferences, for example, to keep the Platform safe (such as for content moderation), to show you relevant information, and, where permitted, to serve you personalised ads based on your interests.
Cookies.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to operate and provide the Platform. For example, we use cookies to remember your language preferences, make sure you don’t see the same video more than once, and for security purposes. We also use these technologies for marketing purposes. To learn more about our use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
. We will obtain your consent to our use of cookies where required by law.
Information From Other Sources
Advertising, Measurement and Other Partners.
Advertisers, measurement and other partners share information with us about you and the actions you have taken outside of the Platform, such as your activities on other websites and apps or in stores, including the products or services you purchased, online or in person. These partners also share information with us, such as mobile identifiers for advertising, hashed email addresses and phone numbers, and cookie identifiers, which we use to help match you and your actions outside of the Platform with your TikTok account. Some of our advertisers and other partners enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our
TikTok Advertiser Tools
(such as TikTok Pixel). These partners are required to have the necessary rights and permissions to share your information with us before doing so. We process certain information that we receive from these partners as a joint controller with them.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these partners.
Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfillment Providers.
We receive information about you from sellers as well as payment and transaction fulfillment providers, such as payment confirmation details, and information about the delivery of products you have purchased through our shopping features.
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
Third party platforms provide us with information (such as your email address, authentication ID, and public profile) when you choose to sign up for or log in to the Platform using sign-in features provided by those third parties. We may also receive contact information that you hold or is held about you when contact information is synced with our Platform by you or another user. When you interact with any third party service (such as third party apps, websites or products) that integrate
TikTok Developer Tools
, we will receive the information necessary to provide you with features like cross-service authentication or cross-posting. For example, this will happen if you log in to another platform with your TikTok account or if you use TikTok’s “share” button on a third party platform to share content from there to the Platform. We may also receive information from third party providers which we use for safety purposes, including to protect users on the Platform and for content moderation.
Additional Sources.
We may collect or receive information about you from organisations, businesses, people, and others, including, for example, publicly available sources, government authorities, professional organisations, and charity groups. We also collect information about you where you are included or mentioned in
User Content
,
Messages
, in a complaint, appeal, request or feedback submitted by a user or third party, or if your contact information is provided to us by a user.
How We Use Your Information
We use your information to operate, provide, develop, and improve the Platform, including for the following purposes. You can find more detail in “
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
”.
Provide and administer the Platform, such as enabling you to create, share, and consume content, to interact with other users and their content, and provide user support.
Provide our shopping features (such as personalised shopping benefits) and facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, including sharing your information with sellers, payment and transaction fulfilment providers, and other service providers in order to process your orders.
Personalise and customise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed and content creation tools.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies that apply to you. We review
User Content
and other information through a mix of technology (including through automated means) and human moderation to protect the safety and well-being of our community.
Provide certain interactive features, such as enabling your content to be used in other users’ videos,
Suggest your account to other users and suggest accounts of others to you to help connect you with other users.
Provide and improve our advertising services, including to serve ads (including personalised ads, where permitted).
Create analytics reports so that partners, sellers and creators can see how their content, ads or products are performing and to better understand their audience and buyers.
Maintain and enhance the safety, security, and stability of the Platform by identifying and addressing technical or security issues or problems (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Review, improve, and develop the Platform, including by monitoring interactions and usage across your devices, analysing how people are using it, and by training, testing, and improving our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms.
Share your information with third party platforms to provide you with features, like content sharing at your request when you integrate your TikTok account with a third party service.
Facilitate research conducted by independent researchers that meets certain criteria.
Promote the Platform or third party services through marketing communications, contests, or promotions.
Facilitate the sending of marketing communications by sellers to you on our Platform. We act as a joint controller with the sellers in this scenario.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these sellers.
Comply with our legal obligations, or as necessary to perform tasks in the public interest, or to protect the vital interests of our users and other people.
Protect the Platform and defend our legal rights and commercial interests, and those of our affiliates, users and the public.
How We Share Your Information
Service Providers
We engage service providers that help us provide, support, and develop the Platform and understand how it is used. They provide services such as: cloud hosting, and content delivery, customer and technical support, content moderation, marketing, analytics, and online payments.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
with these service providers as necessary to enable them to provide their services.
Partners
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
We share limited information which may include
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
, and
Usage Information
with third party platforms and partners whose platform or services are integrated with the Platform, or with whom we have a commercial relationship. We do this to give you a seamless experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, allow sellers to view and manage your orders through our shopping features, and enable third party platforms and partners to better authenticate users. Some examples include if you:
log-in to a third party platform using your account, we will share your basic account information and any other
Information You Provide
,
sign-up or log-in to the Platform using your account details from a third party platform (such as Facebook or Google), we will share certain
Technical Information
to facilitate this,
share
User Content
you publish on the Platform on other social media platforms, we will share your
User Content
and related information.
Advertisers.
We provide advertisers with reports about the performance of their ads and other content on the Platform in order to help them measure their effectiveness and understand their audience. These reports contain aggregate information of certain
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. We don’t share information with advertisers that can be used to contact you (such as your name or email address) unless you give us your permission.
Measurement and Data Partners.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
and
Usage Information
with third party measurement providers who create aggregate reports that help us measure advertising served on the Platform and help our advertisers understand their effectiveness and their audience.
Sellers and their Service Providers.
When you make a purchase through the shopping features on our Platform, we share
Purchase Information
related to the transaction with the sellers and service providers acting on their behalf. This includes order items, contact details and delivery information so that your order can be processed. We also share certain
Technical Information
about your device or connection with these parties to help ensure the security of the transaction. When making a purchase through our shopping features, please review the product and seller location details provided on the Platform for information about where your information will be sent.
Users of Our Analytics Services.
We provide aggregated statistics and insights to help people and businesses understand how people are engaging with the Platform. For example, creators, advertisers and sellers can receive information about the number of views, likes, comments and shares of their content, as well as information to understand their followers, buyers and the audience of their content. We create this aggregate information using
Information you Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
. In certain circumstances, TikTok is a joint controller with TikTok account holders for this processing.
Learn more
about the joint processing for TikTok Analytics.
Our Corporate Group
As a global company, the Platform is supported by certain entities within our corporate group (“
Corporate Group
”). These entities process
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for us, as necessary to provide certain functions, such as storage, content delivery, security, research and development, analytics, online payments, customer and technical support, and content moderation. See
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
for additional information.
Others
We share your information in other limited scenarios as follows:
Users and the Public.
Based on your privacy settings, your information, including your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Usage Information
may be visible to other users and the public. For example, if you have a public account and have not restricted the visibility of your posts individually, your
Account Information
and
User Content
can be viewed or shared by anyone on or off the Platform, whether or not they have a TikTok account. Depending on your privacy settings, your
Account Information
and
User Content
may also appear on search engines, content aggregators, and news sites. You can learn about account types and privacy settings, including how to limit the audience for your videos
here
.
Independent Researchers:
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria as described in
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
.
Corporate Transactions.
Your information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a corporate transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganisation, financing, change of control, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business.
Legal Obligations and Rights.
We may access, preserve, and share the information described in "
What Information We Collect
" with law enforcement agencies, public authorities, researchers, copyright holders, or other third parties if we have good faith belief that it is necessary to:
comply with applicable law, legal process or government requests, as consistent with internationally recognised standards,
protect the rights, property, and safety of our users, copyright holders, and others, including to protect life or prevent imminent bodily harm. For example, we may provide information (such as your IP address) to law enforcement in the event of an emergency where someone’s life or safety is at risk,
investigate potential violations of and enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or any other applicable terms, policies, or standards, or
detect, investigate, prevent, or address misleading activity, copyright infringement, or other illegal activity.
To learn more about how we handle requests from law enforcement agencies and public authorities, see our
Law Enforcement Guidelines
.
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
We may only use your information when we have a “legal basis” to do so. We use different legal bases depending on why we use your information (in other words, the “purpose” of our processing). These legal bases are contractual necessity, legitimate interests (ours, yours or those of another party), consent, compliance with a legal obligation, performing a task in the public interest, and protection of vital interests.
Here we explain the legal bases we rely on when we process your information. This section also describes why we use your information, how this information is processed, the categories of information involved, and the associated rights (which always includes the right to access your information). For more information on how to exercise any of your rights, please check out the “
Your Rights and Choices
” section in the Privacy Policy.
Contractual Necessity
If you have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract, we use
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
where it is necessary to perform the contract you enter into (our Terms) when you register for, access, or use the Platform. This means we use your information to:
Provide you with the Platform.
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share and consume content, interact with others, utilise social features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Personalise features and content.
We also personalise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Product orders and deliveries.
We use your information to process orders, such as to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, and communicate with you about your orders. This includes sharing
Purchase Information
with Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfilment Providers, and Other Service Providers
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Administer the Platform.
We also use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with you on service related matters, provide you with updates and support regarding any purchase you make on or through the Platform, and respond to and process your queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for the contract we have with you, you have the right to port information you have provided to us.
Legitimate Interests
We use your information where this is necessary to achieve legitimate interests - whether belonging to us, you, or a third party - provided these interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. We use the information we collect to:
Enable users to create content with interactive features
.
Interactive features, like Duet and Stitch, enable other users to include your videos in their videos (if you allow this in your settings).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To provide users with tools to inspire creativity, collaboration, and enjoyment, and to create opportunities for users to reach new audiences.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Suggest your account to other users
.
We may suggest your account to other users, including when a user chooses to sync their contacts with the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable users to quickly and efficiently find and connect with other users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Provide all users with generic advertising
.
We show all users generic ads, including those who have chosen not to receive personalised ads.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: We show generic ads to keep the Platform free of charge. We process limited categories of your information to make sure our advertising service is useful to our advertisers (for example, to serve ads to users in a particular country or to users who speak the same language).
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Provide measurement and analytics services
.
We help creators, sellers and advertisers measure the effectiveness and distribution of ads and other content viewed on the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable creators, sellers and advertisers to view and understand how their ads or content performed and the audience that viewed or interacted with their ads or content. This is so that they can make informed decisions (such as what kinds of ad campaigns they may want to run, the type of audience they want to reach and the types of content that users enjoy the most). This helps keep the advertising and other content we show users relevant and entertaining, and keeps the Platform free for all users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the safety and well-being of our community
.
We use your information to ensure the safety and well-being of our community, including by reviewing
User Content
(and if permitted under applicable law,
Messages
and associated metadata) for breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies. We also infer your age range, and under certain circumstances, may ask you to provide additional information to confirm your age.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To keep our community safe, review compliance with our Guidelines, and identify misuse of the Platform.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the security and stability of the Platform
.
We use your information to ensure the stability and security of the Platform, including by identifying and combating technical or security issues (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To ensure the ongoing stability and security of the Platform and to ensure it is continuously available and functioning.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Review, improve, promote, and develop the Platform
.
We use the information we have to understand how people are using the Platform and to develop, test, and make improvements to the Platform, including to develop and improve our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms. We also use this information to better understand and promote the Platform, popular topics, and emerging trends, and offer certain personalised features. We also review messages you exchange with customer support to improve technologies supporting such functions.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To improve, promote, and develop the Platform in an informed way.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Facilitate independent research.
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria, including where such researchers have demonstrable experience and expertise in their area. Click
here
to learn more
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To facilitate independent research that aims to develop society’s collective knowledge, including in the areas of misinformation and disinformation, violence, cybercrime, and social trends.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Share your information with third parties
.
We share your information with third parties whose platforms or services are integrated with, or otherwise made available on, the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To optimise your experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, enable third parties to authenticate users, and to allow for the performance of commercial agreements.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Protect the Platform and defend legal rights
We may use your information in connection with preparing for, taking and defending actual or anticipated legal claims or proceedings (including investigating any potential claims we may have or be aware of).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: to protect the Platform and defend the legal rights and commercial interests of us, our affiliates, our users and the public.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Marketing communications
.
We may send you marketing messages about the Platform and third party products and services where we think they will interest you. Where required, we will obtain your consent to send you such communications.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To promote the Platform and third party products and services.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
If you are under the age of majority (under 18 in most relevant countries), with a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity, we rely on legitimate interests and use the information we collect to:
Provide you with the Platform
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share, and consume content, interact with others, utilise features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, and engage with content and express themselves. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Platform in an easy and intuitive manner..
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Personalise features and content
We use your information to personalise
certain
features and content
on the Platform, such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, create and engage with content and users relevant to their interests. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us in being able to access the Platform and content relevant to their interests.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To keep the Platform free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, or policies and to protect the safety of users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, including to prevent exploitation or other harm to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable. It is also in the legitimate interests of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Administer the Platform.
We use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with users and respond to and process queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To share meaningful updates with our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us about service-related matters, and process their queries, claims and disputes.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
Your Consent
We ask for your consent to access or use your information for specific purposes. If we do, you’ll always be able to revoke your consent through your device permissions or in-app settings.
Personalised advertising
.
With your consent, we serve you with personalised ads based on your activity on and off the Platform. Click
here
to learn more.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for this purpose.
Retain your payment card information.
With your consent, we store your payment card information to facilitate future transactions through our Platform.
Information used:
Information You Provide
Sellers’ marketing communications.
With your consent, we facilitate the sending of marketing communications to you by sellers on our Platform and/or share your email address with sellers for the purpose of sending marketing communications to you.
Information used:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Device permissions.
We collect information that you allow us to receive through your device-based settings (such as access to your camera, photos and location services) which we use for subsequent purposes as described in this Privacy Policy.
Information used:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your rights
: Whenever we use your information based on your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. However, your withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing your information based on your consent prior to your withdrawal of consent. You can withdraw your consent for applicable personalised ads related settings by following these
instructions
.
You also have the right to port information you have provided to us that we use based on your consent.
Compliance with a legal obligation
We may use your information including your
Account Information
or
User Content
where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation. This includes situations where we have obligations to communicate with you, take measures to ensure the safety of our users, or comply with a valid legal request such as an order or disclosure request from regulators, law enforcement agencies or courts. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
To perform a task in the public interest
We may use your information where it is necessary to perform a task in the public interest, including undertaking research, preventing and detecting crime, safeguarding children and promoting public safety, security, and integrity as laid down by applicable law. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your rights
: When we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our usage.
To protect someone's vital interests
We may use your information where it is necessary to protect your or someone else's life, physical integrity, or safety. This could include providing law enforcement agencies or emergency services with information in urgent situations to protect health or life. We generally provide
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your Rights and Choices
You have rights and choices when it comes to your information. Some of these rights apply generally, while others will only apply in certain circumstances. Depending on the scenario, these rights may be subject to some limitations. TikTok Ireland will be responsible for responding to your request within the relevant periods provided by law. If necessary to resolve your request, TikTok Ireland will liaise with TikTok UK.
Access your information.
You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm what information we process about you, to provide certain information about the processing, and for a copy of your information. In-app controls enable you to:
access your information that is available to other users when you navigate to the "
me
" tab on your account.
request a copy of your information by using the “
Download your data
” tool. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
Delete your information.
You can delete or ask us to delete your information. In-app controls enable you to:
delete the content posted on your account, such as your
User Content
and your
Account Information
.
delete your full account. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
request the deletion of a particular piece of content using the in-app reporting feature (more information is available
here
).
Rectify your information.
You can change or ask us to change or correct your information where that information is not accurate. You can change or correct much of your information through the in-app controls and settings (such as your
Account Information
and video content).
Port your information.
You have the right to data portability in circumstances where we rely on contractual necessity or consent as our legal basis. This means that you have the right to receive your information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and to share it with a third party. You can exercise your right of portability by choosing to “
Download your data
” in your settings. Click
here
for detailed instructions. You can also port your TikTok data through TikTok’s Data Portability API. Click
here
for further information.
Object to the processing of your information
. You also have the
right to object
to the processing of your information in certain circumstances. This right applies when we are performing a task in the public interest, pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party, or when your data is processed for the purpose of facilitating scientific or historical research in certain circumstances. In submitting an objection request, please provide all relevant information, including the processing activity you are objecting to, why you want to object and how the processing activity affects you, and any additional information that you think will help us review your request. We will stop the particular processing if we don't have compelling legitimate grounds to continue that processing or don’t need it for legal claims.
Restrict the processing of your information
. You have the right to request the restriction of the processing of your information where (a) you are challenging the accuracy of the information, (b) the information has been unlawfully processed, but you are opposing the deletion of that information, (c) where you need the information to be retained for the pursuit or defence of a legal claim, or (d) you have objected to processing and you are awaiting the outcome of that objection request.
To exercise any of the above rights, please contact us through our
webform
. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details or provide additional information so that we can understand your request.
We encourage you to “
Contact us
” if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Irish Data Protection Commission (TikTok Ireland’s lead supervisory authority) or with your local supervisory authority.
In addition to these rights, you can control privacy settings for your account. Click
here
for more information.
Your choice regarding the use of information across different services.
If you are a user in the EU, we offer you the choice of whether to combine and cross-use your TikTok activity data with our affiliated services, like TikTok Shop, where legally required.
Learn more
.
Data Security and Retention
Security of your information is important to us. We maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical security measures that are designed to protect your information from unauthorised access, theft, disclosure, modification, or loss. We regularly review our security measures to consider available new technology and methods.
We retain information for as long as necessary to provide the Platform and for the other purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. We also retain information when necessary to comply with contractual and legal obligations, when we have a legitimate business interest to do so (such as improving and developing the Platform, and enhancing its safety, security and stability), and for the exercise or defence of legal claims.
The retention periods will be different depending on the type of information and the purposes for which we use the information. For example, when we process your information to provide you with the Platform, we keep this information for as long as you have an account. This information includes your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Messages
. If you violate our Guidelines or Terms, we may remove
Information You Provide
including your
Account Information
and/or
User Content
from public view immediately but keep your information as is necessary to process the violation.
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
To support our global operations:
We store the information described in the “
What Information We Collect
” section in servers located in the United States, Malaysia and Singapore.
Certain entities in our Corporate Group, located outside your country of residence (see
here
), are given limited remote access to this information so they can provide certain functions, as described in the Our Corporate Group section in “
How We Share Your Information
”. This access is limited, secure and only granted where necessary under strict security controls and authorisation approval protocols.
We share “
What Information We Collect
” with service providers, partners and other third party entities, as described in “
How We Share Your Information
”. These third parties can be located outside your country of residence.
These entities commit to processing information in compliance with applicable privacy laws and to implementing appropriate security measures to protect your information.
When we transfer your information outside of the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, we ensure it benefits from an adequate level of data protection by relying on:
Adequacy decisions. These are decisions from the
European Commission
under Article 45 GDPR (or equivalent decisions under other laws) where they recognise that a country offers an adequate level of data protection. We transfer your information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to some countries with adequacy decisions, such as the countries listed
here
; or
Article 49. In the absence of an adequacy decision, We rely on Article 49 (1)(b) and (c) GDPR to transfer Purchase Information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to sellers and transaction fulfilment providers in countries without an adequacy decision when necessary to provide shopping features to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, or to process your orders; or
Standard contractual clauses. The European Commission has approved
contractual clauses
under Article 46 of the GDPR that allows companies in the EEA to transfer data outside the EEA. These (and their approved equivalent for the UK and Switzerland) are called standard contractual clauses. We rely on standard contractual clauses to transfer information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to certain entities in our Corporate Group (as described
here
)
and third parties in countries without an adequacy decision.
For a copy of these adequacy decisions or standard contractual clauses, please contact us via the details provided in the “
Contact us
” section below.
Younger Users
You must be at least 13 years old to use the Platform. If you believe that there is a user who is below this minimum age, please contact us using this
webform
.
To provide users younger than 18 with an age-appropriate experience, certain features are not available. Further details are available in our
Help Centre
.
If you are the guardian of a teen, our
Guardian's Guide
contains information and resources to help you understand the Platform and the tools and controls you or your teen can use, including “Family Pairing” features.
Privacy Policy Updates
We may amend or update this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will notify you of any material changes to this policy by a notice provided through the Platform or by other means. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this policy reflects the effective date of such policy changes.
Contact Us
You can contact us about this Privacy Policy through our
webform
. You can reach TikTok's Data Protection Officer
here
.
You can also contact us at the following postal address.
For users in the European Economic Area and Switzerland
: TikTok Technology Limited, The Sorting Office, Ropemaker Place, Dublin 2, Dublin, D02 HD23, Ireland.
For users in the United Kingdom
: TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited, Kaleidoscope, 4 Lindsey Street, London, EC1A 9HP, United Kingdom.
Sub-policy 34
https://policy.pinterest.com/de/privacy-policy.:
Policy
Terms
Privacy
Community
Merchant
Advertising
Developers
Copyright
Trademark
Enforcement
Transparency
Call Recordings
Non-User Notice
404 error
We couldnt find the page youre looking for. Sorry about that.
Lets find a better place for you to go.
Read our policies
Sub-policy 35
https://www.acast.com/de/privacy-policy:
Skip to content
Privacy
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) Privacy Policy
Rest of World Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Melde dich für unsere Newsletter an
Vorname
Emailadresse
*
Land
Australien
Kanada
Dänemark
Frankreich
Deutschland
Irland
Mexiko
Neuseeland
Norwegen
Schweden
Großbritannien
USA
Andere
Wenn du dich für den Newsletter einträgst, erhältst du gelegentlich News und Informationen von Acast zu Events und Angeboten von denen wir glauben, dass sie dich interessieren könnten.
Hiermit stimmst du der Verarbeitung deiner Daten (Name und E-Mail) seitens Acast zu, welche du in unserern
Datenschutzbestimmungen
nachlesen kannst. Du kannst jederzeit deine Zustimmung widerrufen.
Anmelden
Successful subscription
Unsere Geschichte
Podcasting mit Acast
News
Investor relations
Rechtliches
Datenschutzerklärung
Cookie-Einstellungen
English
German
Spanish
French
Swedish
Norwegian Bokmål
Italian
Portuguese (Brazil)
Kontaktiere uns
Registrieren
Deine Privatsphäre ist uns wichtig
Indem Du auf ‘Alle Cookies akzeptieren’ klickst, erklärst Du dich damit einverstanden, dass wir und unsere Partner Cookies nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Website zu verbessern, Inhalte zu personalisieren und die Verwendung der Website zu analysieren. Du erfährst mehr über die Zwecke, für welche wir und unsere Partner Cookies einsetzen, und kannst deine Einstellungen ändern, wenn du auf den Button ‘Cookie Einstellungen’ klickst oder unsere Cookie Policy besuchst.
Cookie Policy
Cookie-Einstellungen
Alle Cookies akzeptieren
Sub-policy 36
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy:
blank
blank
blank
blank
blank
Skip to content
Terms & Policies
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Intercom Additional Product Terms
Privacy Policy
Data Processing Addendum
Product Privacy Notice
Intercom Regional Data Hosting Addendum
Support Policy
Premier Services Policy
Cookie Policy
Security Policy
Subprocessors List
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Intercom Website Terms of Use
Academy Terms
Service Level Agreement
Acceptable Use Policy
Code of Conduct
Trademark Usage
Intercom Global Anti-Corruption Statement
Intercom Partner Code of Conduct
Intercom DMCA Policy
Law Enforcement Guidelines
European Digital Services Act Notice
Terms of Service
Definitions
Intercom Services
Customer Data and Customer Obligations
Security
Third-Party Platforms and Third Party Messaging Apps
Ownership
Subscription Term, Fees & Payment
Term and Termination
Limited Warranty
Availability
Support
Limitation of Remedies and Damages
Indemnification
Confidential Information
Publicity
General Terms
Intercom Additional Product Terms
Privacy Policy
Purpose and Scope
Personal Data Collected by Intercom
How and Why We Use Your Personal Data
Sharing Your Personal Data
Retention of Your Personal Data
Transfers of Your Personal Data
How We Store and Safeguard Personal Data
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Children’s Privacy
Changes to this Notice and Questions
Collection and Use of Personal Data of California Residents
Data Processing Addendum
Product Privacy Notice
Intercom Regional Data Hosting Addendum
Scope
RDH Services
Exhibit A to the RDH Addendum: European Data Hosting
Exhibit B to the RDH Addendum: Australian Data Hosting
Support Policy
Premier Services Policy
Cookie Policy
Introduction
Cookies and similar technologies and the processing of personal data
What are cookies?
Why do we use cookies?
What type of cookies do we use and what are they used for?
Security Policy
Overview
Security Team
Best Practices
Infrastructure
Data
Data Transfer
Authentication
Permissions and Admin Controls
Application Monitoring
Security Audits and Certifications
Customer Responsibilities
Subprocessors List
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Intercom Website Terms of Use
Acceptance of Terms
Permission to Use the Site
User Content
Restrictions on User Content and Your Conduct
Intellectual Property Rights in User Content
User Content You Post Becomes Public
We Are Not Responsible for User Content
Proprietary Rights
Enforcement of Copyrights
Notify Us of Infringers
How to Communicate with Us
Site Availability
Links to Other Sites
Warranty Disclaimer
Limitation of Liability
Indemnity
Termination and Suspension
Governing Law and Dispute Resolution
General Terms
Academy Terms
Intercom Academy Terms
Access
Participant Responsibilities
Restrictions on Use
Badges
Ownership
Feedback
Privacy
Suspension and Termination
Disclaimer
Modifications
Independent Contractors
Service Level Agreement
Acceptable Use Policy
Code of Conduct
Our Code Of Conduct
Speak Up
Potential Consequences Of Code Violations
Promote Labor, Employment, And Immigration Compliance
Prevent Harassment And Discrimination
Conflicts Of Interest
Keep Clear And Accurate Financial Records
Business Partner Relationships
Zero-Tolerance For Corruption
Avoid Improper Gifts And Entertainment
Respect Trade Controls
Keep Intercom Secrets Safe
Protect Intercom Assets And Promote Our Solutions
Protect Our Employee And Customer Information
Fair Competition
Use Social Media Responsibly
Promote Sustainability
Protect And Celebrate Our Culture
Trademark Usage
Intercom Marks and License
Permissible Use of the Intercom Marks
Impermissible Use of the Intercom Marks
Termination
Ownership
No Warranties
Your Liability for Third-Party Claims
Additional Legal
Questions
Intercom Global Anti-Corruption Statement
Summary
Bribery and Kickbacks
Records and Reporting
Applicability and Enforcement
Intercom Partner Code of Conduct
Labor and Employment Laws
Anti Corruption Laws
Competition
International Trade and Export Controls
Recordkeeping, Financial Integrity, and Honest and Accurate Dealings
Intellectual Property and Confidential Information
Raising Issues and Concerns
Certification and Application
Intercom DMCA Policy
Law Enforcement Guidelines
European Digital Services Act Notice
Effective day
1 November 2024
1. PURPOSE AND SCOPE
1.1 At Intercom, we respect your privacy and data protection rights and recognize the importance of protecting the personal data we collect and process. This Privacy Policy is designed to help you to understand what personal data we collect about you and how we use and share it.
1.2 When we refer to Intercom, we mean Intercom R&D Unlimited Company, a company registered in Ireland with offices at 124 St Stephen's Green, Dublin 2, DC02 C628; Intercom, Inc. a Delaware corporation with offices at 55 2nd Street, 4th Fl., San Francisco, CA 94105, USA; Intercom Software UK Limited, a private limited company registered in the United Kingdom ("
UK
") with offices at Level 9, the Warehouse 207-211 Old St, London, EC1V 9NR UK; Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd, a company registered in Australia with offices at 285A Crown St. Surry Hills NSW 2010, Australia, 1st Floor, Sydney, and Intercom's group companies ("
Intercom
", "
we
", "
us
", "
our
").
1.3 This Privacy Policy applies to you if you:
interact with any of Intercom’s websites (including
www.intercom.com
and
www.intercom.io
) or our social media pages (collectively, the "Sites") ("
website users
");
visit any of Intercom’s premises ("
office visitors
");
attend an Intercom event or an event which Intercom sponsors ("
event attendees
");
use Intercom's communication and messaging products, customer workspaces, mobile applications, and our other applications and services (collectively, the "
Intercom Services
") ("
customers
");
are a marketing prospect, who is anyone whose data Intercom processes for the purposes of assessing customer eligibility ("
marketing prospect
"); or
receive marketing communications from Intercom.
The below Privacy Policy applies to you irrespective of where you are based. There are certain additional parts of the Privacy Policy that will apply to you where you are a resident of the EEA, UK, Switzerland, or California. These additional parts do not apply to everyone.
1.4 For the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (or any successor or equivalent legislation in the UK) ("
GDPR
"), either Intercom R&D Unlimited Company or Intercom, Inc., Intercom Software UK Limited, Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd, or any other Intercom group company from time to time, is the controller of your personal data.
2. PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED BY INTERCOM
2.1 PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT AND RECEIVE
The personal data that we collect about you broadly falls into the categories set out in the following table. Some of this information you provide voluntarily when you interact with the Intercom Services and Sites, or when you attend an event or visit our premises. Other types of information may be collected automatically from your device, such as device data and service data. From time to time, we may also receive personal data about you from third party sources (as further described in the table).
Registration, contact, and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
avatars;
company name;
your role in your company.
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Device data:
operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model;
browser type;
screen resolution;
IP address;
unique device identifiers.
Service data:
the website you visited before browsing to the Intercom Services;
how long you spent on a page or screen;
how you interact with our emails;
navigation paths between pages or screens;
date and time;
pages viewed;
links clicked.
Third party source data:
profile information gathered from social networking sites;
information that you have viewed or interacted with our content;
company information;
job titles;
avatars;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
addresses;
approximate geolocation data.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
contact enrichment and lead generation providers; and
targeted online advertising providers
Registration, contact and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
company name;
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Visitation Data
time and date of arrival;
photograph ID;
signature;
CCTV footage.
Registration, contact and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
Visitation Data
time and date of arrival;
photograph ID;
signature;
CCTV footage.
Third party source data:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
The event organizer
Registration and contact information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Device data:
operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model;
browser type and language;
screen resolution;
IP address;
unique device identifiers.
Service data:
the website you visited before browsing to the services;
how long you spent on a page or screen;
navigation paths between pages or screens;
session date and time;
activity status (including first seen, last seen, last heard from - and last contacted);
pages viewed;
links clicked;
language preferences
tags applied within customer accounts
Intercom assigned user identifier.
Third party source data
profile information gathered from social networking sites;
information that you have viewed or interacted with our content;
company information;
job titles;
avatars;
email addresses;
phone number;
approximate geolocation data.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
Our identity resolution and insight management provider; and
Our geolocation IP intelligence provider
2.2 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
Some device data, service data and third party source data is collected through the use of first or third party cookies and similar technologies. The Intercom Messenger service (and specifically the domains widget.intercom.io and api-iam.intercom.io) does not collect, retain, or share data regarding a particular user's activity across multiple websites or applications that are not owned by Intercom. Intercom does assign each user a unique user ID within the scope of an individual website, but does not collect or retain IP or any information that would allow Intercom to identify the same particular user on more than one website. For more information, please see Intercom's
Cookie Policy
.
Do Not Track
. Some Internet browsers may be configured to send "Do Not Track" signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to "Do Not Track" or similar signals. To find out more about "Do Not Track," please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
3. HOW AND WHY WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
3.1 We collect and process your personal data for the following purposes and, if you are from the European Economic Area (EEA), the UK or Switzerland, on the following legal bases:
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to perform our contract with you for use of our Services and Sites and to fulfill our obligations under applicable terms of service. Where we have not entered into a contract with you, we process your personal data in reliance on our legitimate interests to operate and administer the Intercom Services and Sites. For example, to create, administer and manage your account.
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
: We may send you service, technical and other administrative messages in reliance on our legitimate interests in administering the Intercom Services. For example, we may send you messages about the availability or security of the Intercom Services. We also process your personal data to respond to your comments and questions and to provide customer care and support. When we have entered into an agreement with you, we process your personal data as necessary to meet our contractual obligations to you.
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to improve and optimize the Intercom Services and Sites and to understand how you use the Intercom Services and Sites, including to monitor usage or traffic patterns and to analyze trends and develop new products, services, features and functionality in reliance on our legitimate interests or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your consent.
Sending marketing communications
: We process your personal data to send you marketing communications via email, post or SMS about our products, services and upcoming events that might interest you in reliance on our legitimate interests or where we seek your consent. Please see the "Your Privacy Rights and Choices" section below to learn how you can control your marketing preferences.
Registering office visitors
: We process your personal data for security reasons and for the purpose of hosting your visit to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interests in protecting our premises and confidential information against unauthorized access and the safety of our staff and office visitors.
Managing event registrations and attendance
: We process your personal data to plan and host events for which you have registered or that you attend, including sending related communications to you. This processing is based on our legitimate interest in ensuring the successful organization of the event, as well as providing you with relevant information regarding your participation.
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to control unauthorized use or abuse of the Intercom Services and Sites, or otherwise detect, investigate or prevent activities that may violate Intercom policies or applicable laws, in reliance on our legitimate interests to maintain and promote the safety and security of the Intercom Sites and Services.
Displaying personalized advertisements
: We process your personal data to advertise to you and to provide personalized information, including by serving and managing advertisements on our Sites and on third party sites, in reliance on our legitimate interests to support our marketing activities and advertise our products and services or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your consent.
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
: including invoicing, audits, fraud monitoring and prevention. This processing is based on our legitimate interest in ensuring efficient business operations and on the necessity to comply with legal obligations.
Complying with legal obligations
: We process your personal data when cooperating or complying with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our obligations under applicable laws and to protect against imminent harm to our rights, property or safety, or that of our users or the public, as required or permitted by law.
3.2 In certain circumstances, we may collect your personal data on a different legal basis. If we do, or if we use your personal data for purposes that are not compatible with, or are materially different than, the purposes described in this notice or the point of collection, we will explain how and why we use your personal data in a supplementary notice at or before the point of collection. Where we refer to legal bases in this section we mean the legal grounds on which organizations can rely when processing personal data.
3.3 Please note these legal bases only apply to you if you are resident in the EEA, the UK or Switzerland.
3.4 If you have any questions about our legal bases for processing your personal data, please contact us through our
Privacy Request Form
.
4. SHARING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
4.1 We may disclose some or all of the personal data we collect to the following third parties:
To Intercom Group Companies:
Intercom Inc.;
Intercom R&D Unlimited Company;
Intercom Software UK Limited;
Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd;
Any such other group companies, as may be added to this list from time to time.
Service Providers:
Consultants and vendors engaged by us to support our provision of the Intercom Services and Sites and the operation of our business;
Any such other Service Providers, as may be added to the
Subprocessor list
, from time to time.
Advertising Partners:
Third party advertising companies may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about your activity on the Intercom Services and other online services over time to serve you online targeted advertisements, including the companies listed in the third-party cookies section of our
Cookie Policy
.
Professional Advisors:
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, auditors and insurers, in the course of the professional services that they render to us.
Compliance with Law Enforcement:
Comply with applicable laws, lawful requests, and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities;
Protect our, your or others’ rights, privacy, safety or property (including by making and defending legal claims);
Enforce the terms and conditions that govern the Services; and
Prevent, identify, investigate and deter fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft.
Business Transfers:
Parties to transactions or potential transactions (and their professional advisors) involving a corporate divestiture, merger, consolidation, acquisition, reorganization, sale or other disposition of all or any portion of the business, assets, or equity interests of Intercom Group Companies (including, as part of a bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
4.2
Aggregated or anonymized information
. We may also share aggregated or anonymized information with third parties for other purposes. Such information does not identify you individually, but may include usage, viewing and technical information such as the websites you generally use, the configuration of your computer, and performance metrics related to the use of websites which we collect through our technology, products and services. If we are required under applicable law to treat such information as personal data, then we will only disclose it as described above. Otherwise, we may disclose such information for any reason.
4.3
Third party websites
. The Sites may also contain links to third party websites. This Privacy Policy applies solely to information processed by us. You should contact the relevant third party websites for more information about how your personal data is processed by them.
5. RETENTION OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
5.1 We retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
5.2 Note that content you post may remain on the Sites even if you cease using the Sites or we terminate access to the Sites.
6. TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
6.1 The Intercom Services and Sites, and our messenger domains are provided and hosted in the United States. If you are located outside the United States, we may transfer, and process, your personal data outside of the country in which you are resident to other Intercom Group Companies and our service providers including to, Ireland, the UK, Australia and other such countries as we deem appropriate from time to time. These countries may not have equivalent privacy and data protection laws (and, in some cases, may not be as protective). We will protect your personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy wherever it is processed.
6.2 Certain recipients (our service providers and other companies) who process your personal data on our behalf may also transfer personal data outside the country in which you are resident. Where such transfers occur, we will make sure that an appropriate transfer agreement is put in place to protect your personal data.
6.3 If you are a resident of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, we will protect your personal data when it is transferred outside of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland by processing it in a territory which the European Commission has determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal data; or otherwise ensuring appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your personal data. For transfers of your personal data to:
Intercom Group Companies based in the US, we rely on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-U.S. DPF
”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (“
UK-U.S. DPF
”), and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-U.S. DPF
”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“
DPF
”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
;
other Intercom Group Companies based outside of the US, we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or the UK International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA); and
recipients who are located outside of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, we rely on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK-U.S. DPF or Swiss-U.S. DPF where those recipients are located in the US or for onward transfers from the US, and otherwise we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or the UK International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA).
6.4 Intercom, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Intercom, Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to (i) the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK-U.S. DPF and (ii) the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
6.5 In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Intercom, Inc. commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your Personal Information. EU, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF or the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Intercom through our
Privacy Request Form
.
6.6 In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Intercom, Inc. commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (“
DPAs
“), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (“
GRA
“) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (“
FDPIC
“) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. Under certain conditions, it may be possible to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, see
here
for additional information.
Intercom, Inc. remains responsible if its service provider, when acting on its behalf, processes personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Intercom, Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
7. HOW WE STORE AND SAFEGUARD PERSONAL DATA
We care about protecting personal data. That is why we put in place appropriate measures that are designed to secure your personal data. You can find out more about our technical and organizational safeguards on our Security page:
https://www.intercom.com/security
.
8. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND CHOICES
8.1 Depending on your location and subject to applicable laws, you may have certain data protection rights. If you are a resident of the EEA or the UK you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, you can do so at any time.
You can object to processing of your personal data, ask us to restrict processing of your personal data or request portability of your personal data.
You have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. If you no longer wish to receive our newsletter and promotional communications, you may opt-out of receiving them by clicking on the "unsubscribe" or "opt-out" link in the communications we send you. Please note, however, that it may not be possible to opt-out of certain service-related communications. You can let us know at any time if you do not wish to receive marketing messages by contacting us on the Intercom Messenger or by contacting us using the contact details below.
Similarly, if we have collected and processed your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA and the UK are available
here
.
8.2 You can exercise any of these rights by submitting a request through our
Privacy Request Form
.
8.3 If you are a California resident, you can find information about how we use your personal data and about your privacy rights in
Section 11
of this notice.
9. CHILDREN'S PRIVACY
Our Services and Sites are not intended for use by anyone under the age of 16. Intercom does not knowingly collect personal data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, you may not attempt to register for our Services or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. If we become aware that we have collected personal data from someone under the age of 16 without verification of parental consent, we will delete that information promptly. If you are a parent or legal guardian of a child under 16 and believe that a child has provided us with their personal data, please contact us through our Privacy Request Form.
10. CHANGES TO THIS NOTICE AND QUESTIONS
10.1 We may amend this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update it, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. If we make material updates to this Privacy Policy we will update the effective date at the top of the Privacy Policy.
10.2 We have appointed a Data Protection Officer responsible for managing and addressing inquiries related to this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions, comments or concerns about this Privacy Policy or the way your personal data is being used or processed by Intercom, please contact us through our Privacy Request Form or by using the Contact Us link in the footer of this page.
11. COLLECTION AND USE OF PERSONAL DATA OF CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
11.1 SCOPE
Except as otherwise provided, this Section 11 applies only if you are a California resident. For purposes of this section, "Personal Information" has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act ("
CCPA
"), the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 ("
CPRA
"), and any regulations promulgated under either law, in each case, as amended from time to time.
This Section 11 does not apply to;
information exempted from the scope of the CCPA;
activities governed by a different privacy notice, such as notices we give to California personnel or job candidates; or
Personal Information we collect, use, and share on behalf of our customers as a "
service provider
" under the CCPA.
11.2 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
You have the following rights:
Right to Information/Know
You can request whether we have collected your Personal Information, and in certain cases, the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, sharing, and/or selling Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom Personal Information was sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose.
Right to Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
Right to Correction
. You can request that we correct inaccurate Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Right to Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Right to Opt-Out of Tracking for Targeted Advertising Purposes
. While we do not sell Personal Information for money, like many companies, we use services that help deliver targeted ads (also known as interest-based ads) to you, as we have described in the “How and Why We Use Your Personal Data” section above. The CCPA classifies our use of some of these services as “sharing” your Personal Information with the advertising partners that provide the services, from which you have the right to opt-out.
Right to Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination prohibited by the CCPA.
11.3 HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR RIGHTS
Right to Information/Know, Access, Correction, and Deletion
. You can exercise any of these rights by submitting a request through our
Privacy Request Form
or by mailing us at 55 2nd Street, 4th Fl., San Francisco, CA 94105, USA, Attention: Compliance.
Right to Opt-Out of Tracking for Targeted Advertising Purposes
. You can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by using our
Your Privacy Choices
. Your request to opt-out will apply only to the browser and the device from which you submit the request.
Verification of Identity
. We will need to verify your identity to process your information/know, access, correction, and deletion requests and reserve the right to confirm your California residency. To verify your identity, we may require you to log into an Intercom online account (if applicable), provide government identification, give a declaration as to your identity under penalty of perjury, and/or provide additional information. These rights are not absolute, and in some instances, we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Authorized Agents
. Your authorized agent may make a request on your behalf upon our verification of the agent's identity and our receipt of a copy of the valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to California Probate Code Sections 4000-4465. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, you must provide your agent with written and signed permission to exercise your CCPA rights on your behalf, provide the information we request to verify your identity and provide us with written confirmation that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
11.4 PERSONAL INFORMATION THAT WE COLLECT, USE AND DISCLOSE
The table below describes our Personal Information practices by reference to the categories in the “Personal Data Collected by Intercom” section above and the categories described in the CCPA (Cal. Civ. Code Section 1798.140(v)) and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described below. Note that:
We do not “sell” personal information as defined by the CCPA and have not sold Personal Information in the preceding 12 months.
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
CCPA statutory category
Personal Information “PI” we collect in this category
Business/commercial purpose for collection
Categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” PI for a business purpose
Categories of third parties with whom we “share” PI
Identifiers
Registration, contact, and company information
Visitation data
Third party source data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Professional or employment- related data
Registration, contact, and company information
Third party source data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Financial information
Payment information
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
None
Internet or network information
Device data
Service data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Sensory information
Registration, contact, and company information
Visitation data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
None
Inferences
Data derived from the above categories
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
This site uses cookies and similar technologies ("cookies") as strictly necessary for site operation. We and our partners also would like to set additional cookies to enable site performance analytics, functionality, advertising and social media features. See our
Cookie Policy
for details. You can change your cookie preferences in our Cookie Settings.
Reject All
Accept All
Manage your cookies
Sub-policy 37
https://automattic.com/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Your privacy is critically important to us. At Automattic, we have a few fundamental principles:
We are thoughtful about the personal information we ask you to provide and the personal information that we collect about you through the operation of our services.
We store personal information for only as long as we have a reason to keep it.
We aim to make it as simple as possible for you to control what information on your website is shared publicly (or kept private), indexed by search engines, and permanently deleted.
We help protect you from overreaching government demands for your personal information.
We aim for full transparency on how we gather, use, and share your personal information.
Below is our Privacy Policy, which incorporates and clarifies these principles.
Who We Are and What This Policy Covers
Howdy! We are the folks behind a variety of products and services designed to allow anyone — from bloggers, to photographers, small business owners, and enterprises — to take full advantage of the power and promise of the open web. Our mission is to democratize publishing and commerce so that anyone with a story can tell it, and anyone can turn their great idea into a livelihood. We believe in powering the open internet with code that is open source and are proud to say that the vast majority of our work is available under the General Public License (“GPL”). Unlike most other services, because our GPL code is public, you can actually download and take a look at that code to see how it works.
This Privacy Policy applies to information that we collect about you when you use:
Our websites (including automattic.com, wordpress.com, jetpack.com, woocommerce.com, crowdsignal.com, gravatar.com, intensedebate.com, vaultpress.com, akismet.com, simplenote.com, simperium.com, leandomainsearch.com, cloudup.com, longreads.com, atavist.com, mailpoet.com, automatewoo.com, jetpackcrm.com, happy.tools, wpcourses.com, wpscan.com, newspack.pub, and wp.cloud);
Our mobile applications (including the WordPress mobile app for Android and iOS);
Our other Automattic products, services, and features that are available on or through our websites (for example, WordPress.com plans, the Payments feature, the Pay with PayPal block, WordPress.com, Jetpack, Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, Gravatar, the IntenseDebate comment management system, Akismet plans, Simplenote, Simperium, Cloudup, Longreads, MailPoet, AutomateWoo, Jetpack CRM, Happy Tools, WordPress.com Courses, WPScan and Newspack); and
Other users’ websites that use our Services, while you are logged in to your account with us.
This Privacy Policy also applies to information we collect when you apply for a job at Automattic or one of our subsidiaries.
Throughout this Privacy Policy we’ll refer to our websites, mobile applications, and other products and services collectively as “Services.” And if you’d like to learn more about which Automattic company is the controller of information about you, take a look at the section below on
Controllers and Responsible Companies
.
Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to any of our products or services, like Tumblr, that have a separate privacy policy.
Below we explain how we collect, use, and share information about you, along with the choices that you have with respect to that information.
Creative Commons Sharealike License
We’ve decided to make this Privacy Policy available under a
Creative Commons Sharealike
license. You can grab a copy of this Privacy Policy and other legal documents on
GitHub
. You’re more than welcome to copy it, adapt it, and repurpose it for your own use. Just make sure to revise the language so that your policy reflects your actual practices. If you do use it, we’d appreciate a credit and link to Automattic somewhere on your site.
Information We Collect
We only collect information about you if we have a reason to do so — for example, to provide our Services, to communicate with you, or to make our Services better.
We collect this information from three sources: if and when you provide information to us, automatically through operating our Services, and from outside sources. Let’s go over the information that we collect.
Information You Provide to Us
It’s probably no surprise that we collect information that you provide to us directly. Here are some examples:
Basic account information:
We ask for basic information from you in order to set up your account. For example, we require individuals who sign up for a WordPress.com account to provide an email address and password, along with a username or name — and that’s it. You may provide us with more information — like your address and other information you want to share — but we don’t require that information to create a WordPress.com account.
Public profile information:
If you have an account with us, we collect the information that you provide for your public profile. For example, if you have a WordPress.com account, your username is part of that public profile, along with any other information you put into your public profile, like a photo or an “About Me” description. Your public profile information is just that — public — so please keep that in mind when deciding what information you would like to include.
Payment and contact information:
There are various ways in which you may provide us payment information and associated contact information. For example, if you buy something from us or earn revenue through your site, we’ll collect information to process those payments and contact you. If you buy something from us — a subscription to a WordPress.com plan, a premium theme, a
custom domain
, some Longreads swag — or if you pay fees to a person or business through their WordPress.com site (for example via the Payments feature or the Pay with PayPal block), you’ll provide additional personal and payment information like your name, credit card information, and contact information. We also keep a record of the purchases you’ve made. If you use our Ecommerce Services (including Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, and WooPayments), you’ll have to create a WordPress.com account or connect an existing account and, for some Services, provide your site URL. You may also provide us with financial details to set up a payments integration, like the email address for your Stripe or PayPal account or your bank account information. Additionally, if you use
WooPay
to make purchases on other sites, we will store the contact information and payment information you provide to that service. And if you participate in a revenue sharing opportunity for your site, like
WordAds
, you’ll provide some additional information — for example, a tax ID or other identifier so we can process payments to you.
Business Profile:
Some of our products collect additional information from you as part of creating a user/customer profile. For example, if you are a Jetpack CRM customer we may add you to our customer relationship database (powered by Jetpack CRM!) using information you provide us including your name, your employer, your job title or role, your contact information, and your communications with us. If you are a Happy Tools user, we use information you provide us like your timezone and location information, your company and team information, and your contact information, to set up your account and power the Service’s features.
Content information:
You might provide us with information about you in draft and published content (a blog post or comment that includes biographic information about you, or any media or files you upload).
Credentials:
Depending on the Services you use, you may provide us with credentials for your self-hosted website (like SSH, FTP, and SFTP username and password). Jetpack and VaultPress users may provide us with these credentials in order to use our one-click restore feature if there is a problem with their site, or to allow us to troubleshoot problems more quickly.
Communications with us (hi there!):
You may also provide us with information when you respond to surveys, communicate with our Happiness Engineers about a support question, post a question in our public forums, or sign up for a newsletter like the one we send through Longreads. When you communicate with us via form, email, phone, WordPress.com comment, or otherwise, we store a copy of our communications (including any call recordings as permitted by applicable law).
Job applicant information:
If you apply for a job with us — awesome! You may provide us with information like your name, contact information, resume or CV, professional or personal references, similar professional and employment-related data, and work authorization verification as part of the application process. We may also collect additional information about you during the process, like background and credit checks (in applicable jurisdictions and only for certain job roles).  You may also provide us with demographic information when required by law or to support our diverse workplace initiatives, such as your gender, racial or ethnic origin, veteran status, and disability status if you voluntarily submit such information as part of your application. We collect demographic information in accordance with applicable law, and do not request demographic information in jurisdictions where it may be prohibited. We will only use this sensitive information to accommodate a disability or illness, comply with legal obligations, protect the health and safety of our employees, and facilitate our internal programs relating to diversity, inclusion, and anti-discrimination.
Information We Collect Automatically
We also collect some information automatically:
Log information:
Like most online service providers, we collect information that web browsers, mobile devices, and servers typically make available, including the browser type, IP address, unique device identifiers, language preference, referring site, the date and time of access, operating system, and mobile network information. We collect log information when you use our Services — for example, when you create or make changes to your website on WordPress.com.
Transactional information:
When you make a purchase through our Services, we collect information about the transaction, such as product details, purchase price, and the date and location of the transaction. This includes when you purchase something we sell or when you use our Services (like
WooPay
) to buy something from a third party.
Usage information:
We collect information about your usage of our Services. For example, we collect information about the actions that site administrators and users perform on a site using our WordPress.com or Jetpack services — in other words, who did what and when (e.g., [WordPress.com username] deleted “[title of post]” at [time/date]). Our
WooCommerce Usage Tracker
also tracks information like your email address, WooCommerce settings, and PHP settings, along with information about your online store, like the aggregate number of orders and customers. We also collect information about what happens when you use our Services (e.g., page views, support document searches at en.support.wordpress.com, features enabled for your website, interactions with our
Admin Bar
and other parts of our Services) along with information about your device (e.g., screen size, name of cellular network, and mobile device manufacturer). We use this information to, for example, provide our Services to you, get insights on how people use our Services so we can make our Services better, and understand and make predictions about user retention.
Location information:
We may determine the approximate location of your device from your IP address. We collect and use this information to, for example, calculate how many people visit our Services from certain geographic regions. We may also collect information about your precise location via our mobile apps (like when you post a photograph with location information) if you allow us to do so through your mobile device operating system’s permissions.
Stored information:
We may access information stored on your mobile device via our mobile apps. We access this stored information through your device operating system’s permissions. For example, if you give us permission to access the photographs on your mobile device’s camera roll, our Services may access the photos stored on your device when you upload a really amazing photograph of the sunrise to your website.
Interactions with other users’ sites:
We collect some information about your interactions with other users’ sites while you are logged in to your account with us, such as your “Likes” and the fact that you commented on a particular post, so that we can, for example,
recommend posts
we think may interest you. As another example, we collect information about the comments IntenseDebate users make while logged in and use that information to, for example, tally up statistics about your comments (check them out in your dashboard!) and display information about your comments in your IntenseDebate public profile.
Information from cookies & other technologies:
A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor’s computer, and that the visitor’s browser provides to the website each time the visitor returns. Pixel tags (also called web beacons) are small blocks of code placed on websites and emails. Automattic uses cookies and other technologies like pixel tags to help us identify and track visitors, usage, and access preferences for our Services, as well as track and understand email campaign effectiveness and to deliver targeted ads. For more information about our use of cookies and other technologies for tracking, including how you can control the use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information We Collect from Other Sources
We may also get information about you from other sources. For example:
Third Party Login:
If you create or log in to your WordPress.com account through another service (like Google) we’ll receive associated login information (e.g. a connection token, your username, your email address)
Social Sharing Services:
If you connect your website or account to a social media service (like Twitter) through our
Publicize feature
, we’ll receive information from that service (e.g., your username, basic profile information, friends list) via the authorization procedures for that service.
Financial Account Info
:
If you use WooPayments, we’ll receive information relating to your Stripe account, such as your email address and phone number. If you use WooPay, we’ll receive your payment information from Stripe.
Google Account Information:
When you connect your Google account to your Newspack powered site, we may access certain Google user data such as your Google Ad Manager Configuration (the network code and your ad units) and your Google Analytics data to allow you to access and manage features more seamlessly. For example, you may be able to manage your Google ads and see your Google Analytics data directly within the dashboard of your Newspack powered site.
The information we receive depends on which services you use or authorize and what options are available.
Third-party services may also give us information, like mailing addresses for individuals who are not yet our users (but we hope will be!). We use this information for marketing purposes like postcards and other mailers advertising our Services.
How and Why We Use Information
Purposes for Using Information
We use information about you for the purposes listed below:
To provide our Services.
For example, to set up and maintain your account, host your website, backup and restore your website, provide customer service, process payments and orders, and verify user information.
To ensure quality, maintain safety, and improve our Services.
For example, by providing automatic upgrades and new versions of our Services. Or, for example, by monitoring and analyzing how users interact with our Services so we can create new features that we think our users will enjoy and that will help them create and manage websites more efficiently or make our Services easier to use.
To place and manage ads in our advertising program.
For example, to place ads on our users’ sites and some of our own sites as part of our advertising program, and understand ad performance.
To market our Services and measure, gauge, and improve the effectiveness of our marketing.
For example, by targeting our marketing messages to groups of our users (like those who have a particular plan with us or have been users for a certain length of time), advertising our Services, analyzing the results of our marketing campaigns (like how many people purchased a paid plan after receiving a marketing message), and understanding and forecasting user retention.
To protect our Services, our users, and the public.
For example, by detecting security incidents; detecting and protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity; fighting spam; complying with our legal obligations; and protecting the rights and property of Automattic and others, which may result in us, for example, declining a transaction or terminating Services.
To fix problems with our Services.
For example, by monitoring, debugging, repairing, and preventing issues.
To customize the user experience.
For example, to personalize your experience by serving you relevant notifications and advertisements for our Services, recommending content through our Reader post suggestions, and providing new essays and stories through Longreads for your reading pleasure.
To communicate with you.
For example, by emailing you to ask for your feedback, share tips for getting the most out of our products, or keep you up to date on Automattic; texting you to verify your payment; or calling you to share offers and promotions that we think will be of interest to you. If you don’t want to hear from us, you can opt out of marketing communications at any time. (If you opt out, we’ll still send you important updates relating to your account.)
To recruit and hire new Automatticians.
For example, by evaluating job applicants (including verifying their identity, experience, and other information submitted) and communicating with them by phone, email, or social media platforms.  If the application progresses, we may also collect interview information and background check information.  This may also include verifying information required to initiate employment, for purposes such as confirming ability to legally work in a specific location, setting up payroll, and complying with statutory reporting requirements.
Legal Bases for Collecting and Using Information
A note here for those in the European Union about our legal grounds for processing information about you under EU data protection laws, which is that our use of your information is based on the grounds that:
(1) The use is necessary in order to fulfill our commitments to you under the applicable terms of service or other agreements with you or is necessary to administer your account — for example, in order to enable access to our website on your device or charge you for a paid plan; or
(2) The use is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation; or
(3) The use is necessary in order to protect your vital interests or those of another person; or
(4) We have a legitimate interest in using your information — for example, to provide and update our Services; to improve our Services so that we can offer you an even better user experience; to safeguard our Services; to communicate with you; to measure, gauge, and improve the effectiveness of our advertising; and to understand our user retention and attrition; to monitor and prevent any problems with our Services; and to personalize your experience; or
(5) You have given us your consent — for example before we place certain cookies on your device and access and analyze them later on, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Sharing Information
How We Share Information
We share information about you in limited circumstances, and with appropriate safeguards on your privacy. These are spelled out below, as well as in the section called
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
:
Subsidiaries and independent contractors:
We may disclose information about you to our subsidiaries and independent contractors who need the information to help us provide our Services or process the information on our behalf. We require our subsidiaries and independent contractors to follow this Privacy Policy for any personal information that we share with them.
Third-party vendors:
We may share information about you with third-party vendors who need the information in order to provide their services to us, or to provide their services to you or your site. This includes vendors that help us provide our Services to you (like Stripe, which powers WooPayments, payment providers that process your credit and debit card information, payment providers you use for your own ecommerce operations, fraud prevention services that allow us to analyze fraudulent payment transactions, cloud storage services, postal and email delivery services that help us stay in touch with you, customer chat and email support services that help us communicate with you, registrars, registries, data escrow services that allow us to provide domain registration services, and your hosting provider if your site is not hosted by Automattic); those that assist us with our marketing efforts (e.g., by providing tools for identifying a specific marketing target group or improving our marketing campaigns, and by placing ads to market our services); those that help us understand and enhance our Services (like analytics providers); those that make tools to help us run our operations (like programs that help us with task management, scheduling, word processing, email and other communications, and collaboration among our teams); other third-party tools that help us manage operations; and companies that make products available on our websites (like the extensions on woocommerce.com), who may need information about you in order to, for example, provide technical or other support services to you. We require vendors to agree to privacy commitments in order to share information with them. Other vendors are listed in our more specific policies (e.g., our
Cookie Policy
).
Legal and regulatory requirements:
We may disclose information about you in response to a subpoena, court order, or other governmental request. For more information on how we respond to requests for information about WordPress.com users, please see our
Legal Guidelines
. Additionally, if you have a domain registered with WordPress.com, we may share your information to comply with the Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers’ (ICANN) regulations, rules, or policies. For example, your information relating to your domain registration may be available in the WHOIS database, or we may be required to share your information with ICANN-approved Dispute Resolution Service Providers. Please see our
Domain Registrations and Privacy support document
for more details.
To protect rights, property, and others:
We may disclose information about you when we believe in good faith that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect the property or rights of Automattic, third parties, or the public at large. For example, if we have a good faith belief that there is an imminent danger of death or serious physical injury, we
may disclose information related to the emergency without delay
.
Business transfers:
In connection with any merger, sale of company assets, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company, or in the unlikely event that Automattic goes out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would likely be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. If any of these events were to happen, this Privacy Policy would continue to apply to your information and the party receiving your information may continue to use your information, but only consistent with this Privacy Policy.
With your consent:
We may share and disclose information with your consent or at your direction. For example, we may share your information with third parties when you authorize us to do so, like when you connected your site to a social media service through our Publicize feature.
Aggregated or de-identified information:
We may share information that has been aggregated or de-identified, so that it can no longer reasonably be used to identify you. For instance, we may publish aggregate statistics about the use of our Services, or share a hashed version of your email address to facilitate customized ad campaigns on other platforms.
Site owners:
If you have a WordPress.com account and interact with another site using our Services, your information may be shared with the administrators of the site. For example, if you leave a comment on a site created on WordPress.com or running Jetpack, your IP address and the email address associated with your WordPress.com account may be shared with the administrator(s) of the site where you left the comment. Or if you make a payment (like via the
Payments feature
) to a site, your public display name, user name, and email address may be shared with the administrator(s) of the site. Or if you follow/subscribe to another WordPress.com site we will share your email address with the site owner.
Published support requests:
If you send us a request for assistance (for example, via a support email or one of our other feedback mechanisms), we reserve the right to publish that request in order to clarify or respond to your request, or to help us support other users.
Information Shared Publicly
Information that you choose to make public is — you guessed it — disclosed publicly.
That means information like your public profile, posts, other content that you make public on your website, and your “Likes” and comments on other websites are all available to others — and we hope they get a lot of views!
For example, the photo that you upload to your public profile, or a default image if you haven’t uploaded one, is your
G
lobally
R
ecognized Avatar, or Gravatar — get it? :) Your Gravatar, along with other public profile information, displays alongside the comments and “Likes” that you make on other users’ websites while logged in to your WordPress.com account. Your Gravatar and public profile information may also display with your comments, “Likes,” and other interactions on websites that use our Gravatar service, if the email address associated with your account is the same email address you use on the other website.
We also provide a “Firehose” stream of public data (like posts and comments) from some sites that use our Services to provide that data to Firehose subscribers, who may view and analyze the content (all subject to our Terms of Service), but do not have rights to re-publish it publicly. Find out more about opting out of the Firehose for
WordPress.com
and
Jetpack
sites. Public information may also be indexed by search engines or used by third parties.
Please keep all of this in mind when deciding what you would like to share publicly.
How Long We Keep Information
We generally discard information about you when it’s no longer needed for the purposes for which we collect and use it — described in the section above on How and Why We Use Information — and we’re not legally required to keep it.
For example, we keep web server logs that record information about a visitor to one of Automattic’s websites, like the visitor’s IP address, browser type, and operating system, for approximately 30 days. We retain the logs for this period of time in order to, among other things, analyze traffic to Automattic’s websites and investigate issues if something goes wrong on one of our websites.
As another example, when you delete a post, page, or comment from your WordPress.com site, it stays in your Trash folder for thirty days in case you change your mind and would like to restore that content, because starting from scratch is no fun. After the thirty days are up, the deleted content may remain on our backups and caches until purged.
If you are a job applicant, we will keep your personal data during the application process, and for a certain period thereafter. To determine that period, we take into account a number of factors, like our legal and regulatory obligations (such as equal opportunity obligations) and whether we may need to retain personal data for internal business purposes like analyzing our applicant pool.
Security
While no online service is 100% secure, we work very hard to protect information about you against unauthorized access, use, alteration, or destruction, and take reasonable measures to do so. We monitor our Services for potential vulnerabilities and attacks.
To enhance the security of your account, we encourage you to enable our advanced security settings, like
Two Step Authentication
.
Choices
You have several choices available when it comes to information about you:
Limit the information that you provide:
If you have an account with us, you can choose not to provide the optional account information, profile information, and transaction and billing information. Please keep in mind that if you do not provide this information, certain features of our Services — for example, premium themes that carry an additional charge — may not be accessible. If you are a job applicant, and you choose not to provide certain data elements to us, we may not be able to proceed with the recruitment process.
Limit access to information on your mobile device:
Your mobile device operating system should provide you with the option to discontinue our ability to collect stored information or location information via our mobile apps. If you choose to limit this, you may not be able to use certain features, like geotagging for photographs.
Opt out of marketing communications:
You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from us. Just follow the instructions in those communications or let us know. If you opt out of promotional communications, we may still send you other communications, like those about your account and legal notices.
Set your browser to reject cookies:
At this time, Automattic does not respond to “do not track” signals across all of our Services. However, you can
usually choose
to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies before using Automattic’s websites, with the drawback that certain features of Automattic’s websites may not function properly without the aid of cookies.
Opt out of our internal analytics program:
You can do this through your user settings. By opting out, you will stop sharing information with our analytics tool about events or actions that happen after the opt-out, while you’re logged in to your WordPress.com account. For more information, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Close your account:
While we’d be very sad to see you go, you can close your account if you no longer want to use our Services. (
Here
are account closure instructions for WordPress.com accounts.) Please keep in mind that we may continue to retain your information after closing your account, as described in How Long We Keep Information above — for example, when that information is reasonably needed to comply with (or demonstrate our compliance with) legal obligations such as law enforcement requests, or reasonably needed for our legitimate business interests.
Your Rights
If you are located in certain parts of the world, including some US states and countries that fall under the scope of the European General Data Protection Regulation (aka the “GDPR”), you may have certain rights regarding your personal information, like the right to request access to or deletion of your data.
European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
If you are located in a country that falls under the scope of the GDPR, data protection laws give you certain rights with respect to your personal data, subject to any exemptions provided by the law, including the rights to:
Request access to your personal data;
Request correction or deletion of your personal data;
Object to our use and processing of your personal data;
Request that we limit our use and processing of your personal data; and
Request portability of your personal data.
You also have the right to make a complaint to a government supervisory authority.
US Privacy Laws
Laws in some US states require us to provide residents with additional information about the categories of personal information we collect and share, where we get that personal information, and how and why we use it. You’ll find that information in this section (if you are a California resident, please note that this is the Notice at Collection we are required to provide you under California law).
In the last 12 months, we collected the following categories of personal information, depending on the Services used:
Identifiers (like your name, contact information, and device and online identifiers);
Commercial information (your billing information and purchase history, for example);
Characteristics protected by law (for example, you might provide your gender as part of a research survey for us or you may choose to voluntarily disclose your race or veteran status as part of your job application);
Internet or other electronic network activity information (such as your usage of our Services, like the actions you take as an administrator of a WordPress.com site);
Geolocation data (such as your location based on your IP address);
Audio, electronic, visual or similar information (such as your profile picture, if you uploaded one);
Professional or employment-related information (for example, your company and team information if you are a Happy Tools user, or information you provide in a job application); and
Inferences we make (such as likelihood of retention or attrition).
If you are a job applicant, we may have also collected:
Education information, such as the education you disclose in your job application.
You can find more information about what we collect and sources of that information in the
Information We Collect section
above.
We collect personal information for the business and commercial purposes described in the
How and Why We Use Information section
. And we share this information with the categories of third parties described in the
Sharing Information section
. We retain this information for the length of time described in our
How Long We Keep Information section
.
In some US states you have additional rights subject to any exemptions provided by your state’s respective law, including the right to:
Request a copy of the specific pieces of information we collect about you and, if you’re in California, to know the categories of personal information we collect, the categories of business or commercial purpose for collecting and using it, the categories of sources from which the information came, and the categories of third parties we share it with;
Request deletion of personal information we collect or maintain;
Request correction of personal information we collect or maintain;
Opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information;
Receive a copy of your information in a readily portable format; and
Not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your rights.
You can find detailed metrics about Automattic’s compliance with these rights in
our Privacy Report
.
Right to Opt Out
We never directly sell your personal information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money).
We may share your information as necessary with our third-party service providers to provide our services to you. To the extent that we share your information with certain advertising, marketing, or analytics vendors, this can be considered a “sale” or “share” in certain U.S. States, which you may have the right to opt out of.
You can learn more about this sharing and how to opt out by clicking the “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” link in the footer of our websites, or from the settings page within our apps. Note that in some instances this link will only display to individuals visiting our sites from within the relevant states.
Our opt-out is managed through cookies, so if you delete cookies, your browser is set to delete cookies automatically after a certain length of time, or if you visit sites in a different browser, you’ll need to make this selection again.
We also respect the GPC browser signal and will treat it as a valid means of communicating your desire to opt out.
We do not collect or process your sensitive (and potentially sensitive) personal information except where it is strictly necessary to provide you with our service, where the processing is not for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you, or for other purposes that do not require an option to limit under California law. We don’t knowingly sell or share personal information of those under 16.
Your Information & Personalized Advertising
Our mission is to democratize publishing and commerce, and that means making our Services accessible to as many people as possible. We show ads on some of our users’ sites as well as some of our own sites, and the revenue these ads generate lets us offer free access to some of our Services so that money doesn’t become an obstacle to having a voice. Our ads program also allows our users to earn revenue to support and grow their own sites. As part of our advertising program, we and our users do use cookies to share certain device identifiers and information about your browsing activities with our advertising partners, and those advertising partners may use that information to show you personalized ads on some of our users’ sites and some of our own.
The personal information we share includes online identifiers; internet or other network or device activity (such as cookie information, other device identifiers, and IP address); and geolocation data (approximate location information from your IP address). These disclosures may be considered a “sale” or “share” of information under some US state privacy laws. We do not sell (or share) information through our ads program that identifies you personally, like your name or contact information. Learn how you can opt out by going to
Advertising on WordPress.com Sites and Sites in the WordAds Program
.
Contacting Us About These Rights
You can usually access, correct, or delete your personal data using your account settings and tools that we offer, but if you aren’t able to or you’d like to contact us about one of the other rights, scroll down to “
How to Reach Us
” to, well, find out how to reach us.
When you contact us about one of your rights under this section, we’ll need to verify that you are the right person before we disclose or delete anything. For example, if you are a user, we will need you to contact us from the email address associated with your account. You can also designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf by giving us written authorization. We may still require you to verify your identity with us.
Appeals Process for Rights Requests Denials
In some circumstances we may deny your request to exercise one of these rights. For example, if we cannot verify that you are the account owner we may deny your request to access the personal information associated with your account. As another example, if we are legally required to maintain a copy of your personal information we may deny your request to delete your personal information.
In the event that we deny your request, we will communicate this fact to you in writing. You may appeal our decision by responding in writing to our denial email and stating that you would like to appeal. All appeals will be reviewed by an internal expert who was not involved in your original request. In the event that your appeal is also denied this information will be communicated to you in writing.  Please note that the appeal process does not apply to job applicants.
If your appeal is denied, in some US states you may refer the denied appeal to the state attorney general if you believe the denial is in conflict with your legal rights. The process for how to do this will be communicated to you in writing at the same time we send you our decision about your appeal.
Controllers and Responsible Companies
Automattic’s Services are worldwide. Different Automattic companies are the controller (or co-controller) of personal information, which means that they are the company responsible for processing that information, based on the particular service and the location of the individual using our Services.
Depending on the Services you use, more than one company may be the controller of your personal data. Generally, the “controller” is the Automattic company that entered into the contract with you under the Terms of Service for the product or service you use. In addition, Automattic Inc., our US-based company, is the controller for some of the processing activities across all of our Services worldwide.
The chart below explains the current controllers for processing your personal information. We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to Australia, Canada, Japan, Mexico, New Zealand, Russia, and all countries located in Europe (including the UK and ROI).
Automattic Services (except Woo)
If you reside outside of the Designated Countries:
Automattic Inc.
60 29th Street #343
San Francisco, CA 94110
If you reside in the Designated Countries:
Aut O’Mattic A8C Ireland Ltd.
Grand Canal Dock, 25 Herbert Pl
Dublin, D02 AY86
IrelandAutomattic Inc. is also the controller for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by Aut O’Mattic A8C Ireland Ltd.
Woo Services
Woo services includes WooCommerce, WooPayments, Woo Shipping, Woo Tax, MailPoet, and other products and services available at woocommerce.com.
If you reside outside of the Designated Countries:
WooCommerce, Inc.
60 29th Street #343
San Francisco, CA 94110Automattic Inc. is also the controller for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by WooCommerce, Inc.
If you reside in the Designated Countries:
WooCommerce Ireland Ltd.
Grand Canal Dock, 25 Herbert Pl
Dublin, D02 AY86
IrelandAutomattic Inc and WooCommerce, Inc are also the joint controllers for some of the processing activities related to Services provided by WooCommerce Ireland Ltd.
How to Reach Us
If you have a question about this Privacy Policy, or you would like to contact us about any of the rights mentioned in the
Your Rights section
above, please contact us through our
web form
or via
email
. These are the fastest ways to get a response to your inquiry, but you can also contact us by telephone at 1-877-273-3049.
Other Things You Should Know (Keep Reading!)
Transferring Information
Because Automattic’s Services are offered worldwide, the information about you that we process when you use the Services in the EU may be used, stored, and/or accessed by individuals operating outside the European Economic Area (EEA) who work for us, other members of our group of companies, or third-party data processors. This is required for the purposes listed in the
How and Why We Use Information section
above.
When providing information about you to entities outside the EEA, we will take appropriate measures to ensure that the recipient protects your personal information adequately in accordance with this Privacy Policy as required by applicable law. These measures include entering into European Commission approved standard contractual arrangements with entities based in countries outside the EEA.
You can ask us for more information about the steps we take to protect your personal information when transferring it from the EU.
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
Ads appearing on any of our Services may be delivered by advertising networks. Other parties may also provide analytics services via our Services. These ad networks and analytics providers may set tracking technologies (like cookies) to collect information about your use of our Services and across other websites and online services. These technologies allow these third parties to recognize your device to compile information about you or others who use your device. This information allows us and other companies to, among other things, analyze and track usage, determine the popularity of certain content, and deliver ads that may be more targeted to your interests. Please note this Privacy Policy only covers the collection of information by Automattic and does not cover the collection of information by any third-party advertisers or analytics providers.
Third-Party Software and Services
If you’d like to use third-party plugins or embeds, WooPayments (powered by Stripe), Woo extensions that enable services provided by third parties, or other third-party software or services, please keep in mind that interacting with them may mean providing information about yourself (or your site visitors) to those third parties. For example, some third-party services may request or require access to your (yours, your visitors’, or customers’) data via a pixel or cookie. Please note that if you use the third-party service or grant access, your data will be handled in accordance with the third party’s privacy policy and practices. We don’t own or control these third parties, and they have their own rules about information collection, use, and sharing, which you should review before using the software or services.
Visitors to Our Users’ Websites
We also process information about visitors to our users’ websites, on behalf of our users and in accordance with our user agreements. Please note that our processing of that information on behalf of our users for their websites isn’t covered by this Privacy Policy. We encourage our users to post a privacy policy that accurately describes their practices on data collection, use, and sharing of personal information. If you’d like, you can also read more about the data we collect on behalf of our users in our
Privacy Notice
.
Users control the content posted on their sites, so any disputes regarding content on a user’s site should be made directly to the site owner, through their “contact us” page, at an email address they provide, or by leaving a comment on the site.
Privacy Policy Changes
Although most changes are likely to be minor, Automattic may change its Privacy Policy from time to time. Automattic encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to its Privacy Policy. If we make changes, we will notify you by revising the change log below, and, in some cases, we may provide additional notice (like adding a statement to our homepage or the
WordPress.com Blog,
or sending you a notification through email or your dashboard). Your further use of the Services after a change to our Privacy Policy will be subject to the updated policy.
Other Information and Resources
Jetpack Privacy Center
Woo and the GDPR
Translation
Our Privacy Policy was originally written in English (US). We may translate it into other languages. For example:
French:
https://automattic.com/fr/privacy
Spanish:
https://automattic.com/es/privacy
German:
https://automattic.com/de/privacy
In the event of a conflict between a translated version of our Privacy Policy and the English version, the English version will control.
That’s it! Thanks for reading.
Change log
April 22, 2024:
Removed the outdated list of specific US states covered by the US Privacy Laws section
October 31, 2023:
Changed instances of “WooCommerce” to “Woo.”
July 12, 2023:
Added new example of information shared with site owners.
March 17, 2023:
Removed references to WPVIP.
December 30, 2022:
Updated the California rights section to apply to additional US states.
October 18, 2022
: Added wp.cloud to the list of our websites.
April 26, 2022:
Included information regarding WooPay.
November 22, 2021:
Included information for WPScan.
October 8, 2021:
Included information for WordPress.com Courses and Newspack. Updated the “Information we Collect from Other Sources” section with new examples.
January 1, 2021
: Included information for AutomateWoo and Jetpack CRM. Updated the “Controllers and Responsible Companies” section to reflect changes affecting WooCommerce users.
December 7, 2020:
Included information for MailPoet.
October 12, 2020
: Renamed WooCommerce Services to WooCommerce Shipping & Tax.
August 1, 2020
: Renamed some Payments features and updated the “Controllers and Responsible Companies” section to reflect changes affecting WooCommerce users.
February 21, 2020:
Updated for WooCommerce Payments and added a new section: “Other Information and Resources.”
December 31, 2019
: Updated for California Consumer Privacy Act and miscellaneous clarification throughout.
October 2, 2019:
A few miscellaneous changes, such as new sections about translations of this Privacy Policy and how to opt out of our internal analytics program.
May 31, 2019:
Included information for the Recurring Payments feature.
April 1, 2019:
Included information for Happy Tools.
March 13, 2019:
Added clarifications and additional details to existing sections, for example about ICANN policies and what we may store when you communicate with us.
February 1, 2019:
Included information for Longreads and additional information regarding Longreads accounts.
November 6, 2018:
Removed references to Polldaddy, which has been rebranded as Crowdsignal.
September 24, 2018:
Included information for Simplenote, Simperium, Cloudup, and Lean Domain Search.
May 25, 2018:
Added more specific information to help clarify our practices, included information for Crowdsignal and Woocommerce.com services, and added information to reflect the requirements of the EU’s General Data Protection Regulation.
January 3, 2018:
Revised and reorganized language throughout to help simplify the policy and clarify our practices.
August 22, 2017:
Added “Information We Collect from Other Sources” section.
November 2, 2016
: Added that comments submitted as missed spam are retained by Akismet to improve future performance.
February 18, 2015:
Updated Creative Commons license from 2.5 to 4.0.
September 18, 2013:
Added that blog commenter email addresses are disclosed to administrators of the blog where the comment was left.
February 1, 2011:
Clarified subpoena language and added Business Transfers paragraph.
January 3, 2011:
Added court order and subpoena clarification.
July 1, 2010:
Revised paragraph about IP addresses to explain when they are collected and that commenter IPs are visible to blog administrators.
October 29, 2009:
Added Comments paragraph to explain Akismet comment storage policy.
March 10, 2009:
Added Ads paragraph to alert users that ads from third parties may use cookies.
Sections
▼
Who We Are and What This Policy Covers
Creative Commons Sharealike License
Information We Collect
Information You Provide to Us
Information We Collect Automatically
Information We Collect from Other Sources
How and Why We Use Information
Purposes for Using Information
Legal Bases for Collecting and Using Information
Sharing Information
How We Share Information
Information Shared Publicly
How Long We Keep Information
Security
Choices
Your Rights
European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
US Privacy Laws
Contacting Us About These Rights
Appeals Process for Rights Requests Denials
Controllers and Responsible Companies
How to Reach Us
Other Things You Should Know (Keep Reading!)
Transferring Information
Ads and Analytics Services Provided by Others
Third-Party Software and Services
Visitors to Our Users’ Websites
Privacy Policy Changes
Other Information and Resources
Translation
Change log
Subscribe
Subscribed
Automattic
Join 10,682 other subscribers
Sign me up
Already have a WordPress.com account?
Log in now.
Privacy
Automattic
Subscribe
Subscribed
Sign up
Log in
Copy shortlink
Report this content
View post in Reader
Manage subscriptions
Collapse this bar
Sub-policy 38
https://www.podigee.com/de/about/privacy/:
Consent
Details
[#IABV2SETTINGS#]
About
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to personalise content and ads, to provide social media features and to analyse our traffic. We also share information about your use of our site with our social media, advertising and analytics partners who may combine it with other information that you’ve provided to them or that they’ve collected from your use of their services.
Consent Selection
Necessary
Preferences
Statistics
Marketing
Show details
Necessary cookies help make a website usable by enabling basic functions like page navigation and access to secure areas of the website. The website cannot function properly without these cookies.
Cookiebot
1
Learn more about this provider
1.gif
Used to count the number of sessions to the website, necessary for optimizing CMP product delivery.
Github
2
Learn more about this provider
_gh_sess
Preserves users states across page requests.
logged_in
Registers whether the user is logged in. This allows the website owner to make parts of the website inaccessible, based on the user's log-in status.
Google
1
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
test_cookie
Used to check if the user's browser supports cookies.
LinkedIn
1
Learn more about this provider
li_gc
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Loom
3
Learn more about this provider
awc.taskSessions
This cookie is necessary for the login function on the website.
__awc_tld_test__ [x2]
Necessary for the general functionality of the website.
Podigee
3
Learn more about this provider
PLAY_SESSION [x2]
Preserves users states across page requests.
_pk_testcookie_domain
This cookie determines whether the browser accepts cookies.
beacon-v2.helpscout.net
1
hs-beacon-#-#-#-#-#-shown-animation
Pending
consent.cookiebot.com
podigee.com
5
CookieConsent [x5]
Stores the user's cookie consent state for the current domain
Preference cookies enable a website to remember information that changes the way the website behaves or looks, like your preferred language or the region that you are in.
We do not use cookies of this type.
Statistic cookies help website owners to understand how visitors interact with websites by collecting and reporting information anonymously.
Github
1
Learn more about this provider
_octo
Pending
Google
2
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
_ga
Registers a unique ID that is used to generate statistical data on how the visitor uses the website.
_ga_#
Used by Google Analytics to collect data on the number of times a user has visited the website as well as dates for the first and most recent visit.
Loom
10
Learn more about this provider
ajs_anonymous_id
This cookie is used to count how many times a website has been visited by different visitors - this is done by assigning the visitor an ID, so the visitor does not get registered twice.
awc.taskSessionsInit
This cookie is necessary for the viewing of screencasts on the website.
sentryReplaySession
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
viewer_session_data
Used in connection with End User Experience Monitoring (EUEM). The cookie collects information on application/device performance, which allows support/website staff to optimize their products and services.
ajs_anonymous_id [x2]
This cookie is used to identify a specific visitor - this information is used to identify the number of specific visitors on a website.
loom_anon_comment
This cookie stores information for the widget settings on the website.
__Host-psifi.analyticsTrace
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
__Host-psifi.analyticsTraceV2
Registers statistical data on users' behaviour on the website. Used for internal analytics by the website operator.
dd_cookie_test_#
Registers data on visitors' website-behaviour. This is used for internal analysis and website optimization.
Podigee
4
Learn more about this provider
_pk_id
Pending
_pk_id#
Collects statistics on the user's visits to the website, such as the number of visits, average time spent on the website and what pages have been read.
_pk_ref#
Used by Piwik Analytics Platform to identify the referring website from which the visitor has come.
_pk_ses#
Used by Piwik Analytics Platform to track page requests from the visitor during the session.
Marketing cookies are used to track visitors across websites. The intention is to display ads that are relevant and engaging for the individual user and thereby more valuable for publishers and third party advertisers.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
3
Learn more about this provider
lastExternalReferrer
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
lastExternalReferrerTime
Detects how the user reached the website by registering their last URL-address.
_fbp
Used by Facebook to deliver a series of advertisement products such as real time bidding from third party advertisers.
Google
5
Learn more about this provider
Some of the data collected by this provider is for the purposes of personalization and measuring advertising effectiveness.
IDE
Used by Google DoubleClick to register and report the website user's actions after viewing or clicking one of the advertiser's ads with the purpose of measuring the efficacy of an ad and to present targeted ads to the user.
NID
Registers a unique ID that identifies a returning user's device. The ID is used for targeted ads.
pagead/1p-conversion/#/
Pending
pagead/1p-user-list/#
Tracks if the user has shown interest in specific products or events across multiple websites and detects how the user navigates between sites. This is used for measurement of advertisement efforts and facilitates payment of referral-fees between websites.
_gcl_au
Used by Google AdSense for experimenting with advertisement efficiency across websites using their services.
LinkedIn
3
Learn more about this provider
bcookie
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
lidc
Used by the social networking service, LinkedIn, for tracking the use of embedded services.
LinkedIn Pixel
Pending
Loom
5
Learn more about this provider
ajs_user_id
Collects data on visitors' preferences and behaviour on the website - This information is used make content and advertisement more relevant to the specific visitor.
__tld__ [x2]
Used to track visitors on multiple websites, in order to present relevant advertisement based on the visitor's preferences.
ajs_user_id
This cookie is used to collect data on the visitor's behavior on the website - this information can be used to assign the visitor to a visitor segment, based on common preferences.
loom_referral_video
Used to detect referrals in relation to website's embedded video-player.
Meta Platforms, Inc.
1
Learn more about this provider
Facebook Pixel
This is a Tracking technology offered by Facebook and used by other Facebook services such as Facebook Custom Audiences.
YouTube
33
Learn more about this provider
#-# [x2]
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
iU5q-!O9@[#COOKIETABLE_ADVERTISING#]nbsp;[x2]
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY [x2]
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
nextId
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
requests
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
yt.innertube::nextId
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
ytidb::LAST_RESULT_ENTRY_KEY [x2]
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
YtIdbMeta#databases [x2]
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
yt-remote-cast-available [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-cast-installed [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-connected-devices [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-device-id [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-fast-check-period [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-app [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
yt-remote-session-name [x2]
Stores the user's video player preferences using embedded YouTube video
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Pending
LogsDatabaseV2:V#||LogsRequestsStore
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
remote_sid
Necessary for the implementation and functionality of YouTube video-content on the website.
TESTCOOKIESENABLED
Used to track user’s interaction with embedded content.
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Tries to estimate the users' bandwidth on pages with integrated YouTube videos.
YSC
Registers a unique ID to keep statistics of what videos from YouTube the user has seen.
Unclassified
4
Unclassified cookies are cookies that we are in the process of classifying, together with the providers of individual cookies.
Loom
1
Learn more about this provider
analytics-web-client#analytics-resilience
Pending
Podigee
3
Learn more about this provider
mtm:tag_fG4gTLsZ
Pending
_podigee_session_v5
Pending
podigeeLanguagePreference
Pending
Cross-domain consent
4
Your consent applies to the following domains:
List of domains your consent applies to:
help.podigee.com
hilfe.podigee.com
app.podigee.com
podigee.com
Cookie declaration last updated on 2/22/25 by
Cookiebot
[#IABV2_TITLE#]
[#IABV2_BODY_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_LEGITIMATE_INTEREST_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PREFERENCE_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PURPOSES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_FEATURES#]
[#IABV2_LABEL_PARTNERS#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS_INTRO#]
[#IABV2_BODY_PARTNERS#]
Cookies are small text files that can be used by websites to make a user's experience more efficient.
The law states that we can store cookies on your device if they are strictly necessary for the operation of this site. For all other types of cookies we need your permission.
This site uses different types of cookies. Some cookies are placed by third party services that appear on our pages.
You can at any time change or withdraw your consent from the Cookie Declaration on our website.
Learn more about who we are, how you can contact us and how we process personal data in our Privacy Policy.
Please state your consent ID and date when you contact us regarding your consent.
Do not sell or share my personal information
Use necessary cookies only
Allow selection
Customize
Allow all cookies
Datenschutzerklärung
Einleitung
Mit der folgenden Datenschutzerklärung möchten wir Sie darüber aufklären, welche Arten Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten (nachfolgend auch kurz als "Daten“ bezeichnet) wir zu welchen Zwecken und in welchem Umfang verarbeiten. Die Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle von uns durchgeführten Verarbeitungen personenbezogener Daten, sowohl im Rahmen der Erbringung unserer Leistungen als auch insbesondere auf unseren Webseiten, in mobilen Applikationen sowie innerhalb externer Onlinepräsenzen, wie z.B. unserer Social-Media-Profile (nachfolgend zusammenfassend bezeichnet als "Onlineangebot“).
Die verwendeten Begriffe sind nicht geschlechtsspezifisch.
Stand: 30. November 2023
Inhaltsübersicht
Einleitung
Verantwortlicher
Übersicht der Verarbeitungen
Kontakt Datenschutzbeauftragter
Maßgebliche Rechtsgrundlagen
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Datenverarbeitung in Drittländern
Einsatz von Cookies
Geschäftliche Leistungen
Zahlungsdienstleister
Bereitstellung des Onlineangebotes und Webhosting
Besondere Hinweise zu Applikationen (Apps)
Bezug von Applikationen über Appstores
Registrierung, Anmeldung und Nutzerkonto
Blogs und Publikationsmedien
Kontaktaufnahme
Videokonferenzen, Onlinemeetings, Webinare und Bildschirm-Sharing
Musik und Podcasts
Bewerbungsverfahren
Cloud-Dienste
Newsletter und elektronische Benachrichtigungen
Webanalyse, Monitoring und Optimierung
Onlinemarketing
Angebot eines Affiliate-Programms
Präsenzen in sozialen Netzwerken (Social Media)
Plugins und eingebettete Funktionen sowie Inhalte
Management, Organisation und Hilfswerkzeuge
Löschung von Daten
Änderung und Aktualisierung der Datenschutzerklärung
Rechte der betroffenen Personen
Begriffsdefinitionen
Verantwortlicher
Podigee GmbH
Revaler Str. 28
10245 Berlin
E-Mail:
hello@podigee.com
Webseite:
https://podigee.com
Vertretungsberechtigte Personen: Mateusz Sójka, Benjamin Zimmer.
E-Mail-Adresse:
hello@podigee.com
.
Impressum:
https://www.podigee.com/de/about/imprint
Kontakt Datenschutzbeauftragter
Herting Oberbeck Datenschutz GmbH
Hallerstr. 76
20146 Hamburg
E-Mail:
datenschutzbeauftragter@podigee.com
Webseite:
https://www.datenschutzkanzlei.de
Übersicht der Verarbeitungen
Die nachfolgende Übersicht fasst die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten und die Zwecke ihrer Verarbeitung zusammen und verweist auf die betroffenen Personen.
Arten der verarbeiteten Daten
Kontaktinformationen (Facebook) ("Kontaktinformationen" sind Daten, die betroffene Personen (klar) identifizieren, wie z. B. Namen, E-Mail-Adressen und Telefonnummern, die an Facebook, z. B. via Facebook-Pixel oder Upload zu Abgleichzwecken zwecks Bildung von Custom Audiences übermittelt werden können; Nach dem Abgleich zwecks Bildung von Zielgruppen, werden die Kontaktinformationen gelöscht).
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen).
Bewerberdaten (z.B. Angaben zur Person, Post- und Kontaktadressen, die zur Bewerbung gehörenden Unterlagen und die darin enthaltenen Informationen, wie z.B. Anschreiben, Lebenslauf, Zeugnisse sowie weitere im Hinblick auf eine konkrete Stelle oder freiwillig von Bewerbern mitgeteilte Informationen zu deren Person oder Qualifikation).
Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen).
Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern).
Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten).
Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie).
Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie).
Kategorien betroffener Personen
Beschäftigte (z.B. Angestellte, Bewerber, ehemalige Mitarbeiter).
Bewerber.
Geschäfts- und Vertragspartner.
Interessenten.
Kommunikationspartner.
Kunden.
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung
Affiliate-Nachverfolgung.
Bereitstellung unseres Onlineangebotes und Nutzerfreundlichkeit.
Konversionsmessung (Messung der Effektivität von Marketingmaßnahmen).
Bewerbungsverfahren (Begründung und etwaige spätere Durchführung sowie mögliche spätere Beendigung des Beschäftigungsverhältnisses).
Büro- und Organisationsverfahren.
Content Delivery Network (CDN).
Direktmarketing (z.B. per E-Mail oder postalisch).
Zielgruppenbildung.
Marketing.
Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation.
Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen).
Remarketing.
Reichweitenmessung (z.B. Zugriffsstatistiken, Erkennung wiederkehrender Besucher).
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen.
Umfragen und Fragebögen (z.B. Umfragen mit Eingabemöglichkeiten, Multiple-Choice-Fragen).
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice.
Verwaltung und Beantwortung von Anfragen.
Zielgruppenbildung (Bestimmung von für Marketingzwecke relevanten Zielgruppen oder sonstige Ausgabe von Inhalten).
Maßgebliche Rechtsgrundlagen
Nachfolgend erhalten Sie einen Überblick über die Rechtsgrundlagen der DSGVO, die wir der Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten zugrunde legen. Bitte beachten Sie, dass zusätzlich zu den Bestimmungen der DSGVO, nationale Datenschutzbestimmungen Ihres oder unseres Wohnsitz-, bzw. Sitzlandes zur Anwendung kommen können. Sollten ferner im Einzelfall speziellere Rechtsgrundlagen maßgeblich sein, teilen wir Ihnen diese in der Datenschutzerklärung mit.
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO)
- Die betroffene Person hat ihre Einwilligung in die Verarbeitung der sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten für einen spezifischen Zweck oder mehrere bestimmte Zwecke gegeben.
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO)
- Die Verarbeitung ist für die Erfüllung eines Vertrags, dessen Vertragspartei die betroffene Person ist, oder zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich, die auf Anfrage der betroffenen Person erfolgen.
Rechtliche Verpflichtung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. c. DSGVO)
- Die Verarbeitung ist zur Erfüllung einer rechtlichen Verpflichtung erforderlich, der der Verantwortliche unterliegt.
Wahrnehmung öffentlicher Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. e. DSGVO)
- Die Verarbeitung ist für die Wahrnehmung einer Aufgabe erforderlich, die im öffentlichen Interesse liegt oder in Ausübung öffentlicher Gewalt erfolgt, die dem Verantwortlichen übertragen wurde.
Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO)
- Die Verarbeitung ist zur Wahrung der berechtigten Interessen des Verantwortlichen oder eines Dritten erforderlich, sofern nicht die Interessen oder Grundrechte und Grundfreiheiten der betroffenen Person, die den Schutz personenbezogener Daten erfordern, überwiegen.
Bewerbungsverfahren als vorvertragliches bzw. vertragliches Verhältnis (Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. b DSGVO)
- Soweit im Rahmen des Bewerbungsverfahrens besondere Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten im Sinne des Art. 9 Abs. 1 DSGVO (z.B. Gesundheitsdaten, wie Schwerbehinderteneigenschaft oder ethnische Herkunft) bei Bewerbern angefragt werden, damit der Verantwortliche oder die betroffene Person die ihm bzw. ihr aus dem Arbeitsrecht und dem Recht der sozialen Sicherheit und des Sozialschutzes erwachsenden Rechte ausüben und seinen bzw. ihren diesbezüglichen Pflichten nachkommen kann, erfolgt deren Verarbeitung nach Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. b. DSGVO, im Fall des Schutzes lebenswichtiger Interessen der Bewerber oder anderer Personen gem. Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. c. DSGVO oder für Zwecke der Gesundheitsvorsorge oder der Arbeitsmedizin, für die Beurteilung der Arbeitsfähigkeit des Beschäftigten, für die medizinische Diagnostik, die Versorgung oder Behandlung im Gesundheits- oder Sozialbereich oder für die Verwaltung von Systemen und Diensten im Gesundheits- oder Sozialbereich gem. Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. h. DSGVO. Im Fall einer auf freiwilliger Einwilligung beruhenden Mitteilung von besonderen Kategorien von Daten, erfolgt deren Verarbeitung auf Grundlage von Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. a. DSGVO.
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (EKD) (§ 6 Nr. 5 DSG-EKD)
- Die Verarbeitung ist für die Erfüllung eines Vertrags, dessen Vertragspartei die betroffene Person ist, oder zur Durchführung vorvertraglicher Maßnahmen erforderlich, die auf Anfrage der betroffenen Person erfolgen.
Nationale Datenschutzregelungen in Deutschland
: Zusätzlich zu den Datenschutzregelungen der Datenschutz-Grundverordnung gelten nationale Regelungen zum Datenschutz in Deutschland. Hierzu gehört insbesondere das Gesetz zum Schutz vor Missbrauch personenbezogener Daten bei der Datenverarbeitung (Bundesdatenschutzgesetz – BDSG). Das BDSG enthält insbesondere Spezialregelungen zum Recht auf Auskunft, zum Recht auf Löschung, zum Widerspruchsrecht, zur Verarbeitung besonderer Kategorien personenbezogener Daten, zur Verarbeitung für andere Zwecke und zur Übermittlung sowie automatisierten Entscheidungsfindung im Einzelfall einschließlich Profiling. Des Weiteren regelt es die Datenverarbeitung für Zwecke des Beschäftigungsverhältnisses (§ 26 BDSG), insbesondere im Hinblick auf die Begründung, Durchführung oder Beendigung von Beschäftigungsverhältnissen sowie die Einwilligung von Beschäftigten. Ferner können Landesdatenschutzgesetze der einzelnen Bundesländer zur Anwendung gelangen.
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Wir treffen nach Maßgabe der gesetzlichen Vorgaben unter Berücksichtigung des Stands der Technik, der Implementierungskosten und der Art, des Umfangs, der Umstände und der Zwecke der Verarbeitung sowie der unterschiedlichen Eintrittswahrscheinlichkeiten und des Ausmaßes der Bedrohung der Rechte und Freiheiten natürlicher Personen geeignete technische und organisatorische Maßnahmen, um ein dem Risiko angemessenes Schutzniveau zu gewährleisten.
Zu den Maßnahmen gehören insbesondere die Sicherung der Vertraulichkeit, Integrität und Verfügbarkeit von Daten durch Kontrolle des physischen und elektronischen Zugangs zu den Daten als auch des sie betreffenden Zugriffs, der Eingabe, der Weitergabe, der Sicherung der Verfügbarkeit und ihrer Trennung. Des Weiteren haben wir Verfahren eingerichtet, die eine Wahrnehmung von Betroffenenrechten, die Löschung von Daten und Reaktionen auf die Gefährdung der Daten gewährleisten. Ferner berücksichtigen wir den Schutz personenbezogener Daten bereits bei der Entwicklung bzw. Auswahl von Hardware, Software sowie Verfahren entsprechend dem Prinzip des Datenschutzes, durch Technikgestaltung und durch datenschutzfreundliche Voreinstellungen.
Kürzung der IP-Adresse
: Sofern IP-Adressen von uns oder von den eingesetzten Dienstleistern und Technologien verarbeitet werden und die Verarbeitung einer vollständigen IP-Adresse nicht erforderlich ist, wird die IP-Adresse gekürzt (auch als "IP-Masking" bezeichnet). Hierbei werden die letzten beiden Ziffern, bzw. der letzte Teil der IP-Adresse nach einem Punkt entfernt, bzw. durch Platzhalter ersetzt. Mit der Kürzung der IP-Adresse soll die Identifizierung einer Person anhand ihrer IP-Adresse verhindert oder wesentlich erschwert werden.
SSL-Verschlüsselung (https)
: Um Ihre via unser Online-Angebot übermittelten Daten zu schützen, nutzen wir eine SSL-Verschlüsselung. Sie erkennen derart verschlüsselte Verbindungen an dem Präfix https:// in der Adresszeile Ihres Browsers.
Übermittlung von personenbezogenen Daten
Im Rahmen unserer Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten kommt es vor, dass die Daten an andere Stellen, Unternehmen, rechtlich selbstständige Organisationseinheiten oder Personen übermittelt oder sie ihnen gegenüber offengelegt werden. Zu den Empfängern dieser Daten können z.B. mit IT-Aufgaben beauftragte Dienstleister oder Anbieter von Diensten und Inhalten, die in eine Webseite eingebunden werden, gehören. In solchen Fall beachten wir die gesetzlichen Vorgaben und schließen insbesondere entsprechende Verträge bzw. Vereinbarungen, die dem Schutz Ihrer Daten dienen, mit den Empfängern Ihrer Daten ab.
Datenverarbeitung in Drittländern
Sofern wir Daten in einem Drittland (d.h., außerhalb der Europäischen Union (EU), des Europäischen Wirtschaftsraums (EWR)) verarbeiten oder die Verarbeitung im Rahmen der Inanspruchnahme von Diensten Dritter oder der Offenlegung bzw. Übermittlung von Daten an andere Personen, Stellen oder Unternehmen stattfindet, erfolgt dies nur im Einklang mit den gesetzlichen Vorgaben.
Vorbehaltlich ausdrücklicher Einwilligung oder vertraglich oder gesetzlich erforderlicher Übermittlung verarbeiten oder lassen wir die Daten nur in Drittländern mit einem anerkannten Datenschutzniveau, vertraglichen Verpflichtung durch sogenannte Standardschutzklauseln der EU-Kommission, beim Vorliegen von Zertifizierungen oder verbindlicher internen Datenschutzvorschriften verarbeiten (Art. 44 bis 49 DSGVO, Informationsseite der EU-Kommission:
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection_de
).
Einsatz von Cookies
Cookies sind Textdateien, die Daten von besuchten Websites oder Domains enthalten und von einem Browser auf dem Computer des Benutzers gespeichert werden. Ein Cookie dient in erster Linie dazu, die Informationen über einen Benutzer während oder nach seinem Besuch innerhalb eines Onlineangebotes zu speichern. Zu den gespeicherten Angaben können z.B. die Spracheinstellungen auf einer Webseite, der Loginstatus, ein Warenkorb oder die Stelle, an der ein Video geschaut wurde, gehören. Zu dem Begriff der Cookies zählen wir ferner andere Technologien, die die gleichen Funktionen wie Cookies erfüllen (z.B., wenn Angaben der Nutzer anhand pseudonymer Onlinekennzeichnungen gespeichert werden, auch als "Nutzer-IDs" bezeichnet)
Die folgenden Cookie-Typen und Funktionen werden unterschieden:
Temporäre Cookies (auch: Session- oder Sitzungs-Cookies):
Temporäre Cookies werden spätestens gelöscht, nachdem ein Nutzer ein Online-Angebot verlassen und seinen Browser geschlossen hat.
Permanente Cookies:
Permanente Cookies bleiben auch nach dem Schließen des Browsers gespeichert. So kann beispielsweise der Login-Status gespeichert oder bevorzugte Inhalte direkt angezeigt werden, wenn der Nutzer eine Website erneut besucht. Ebenso können die Interessen von Nutzern, die zur Reichweitenmessung oder zu Marketingzwecken verwendet werden, in einem solchen Cookie gespeichert werden.
First-Party-Cookies:
First-Party-Cookies werden von uns selbst gesetzt.
Third-Party-Cookies (auch: Drittanbieter-Cookies)
: Drittanbieter-Cookies werden hauptsächlich von Werbetreibenden (sog. Dritten) verwendet, um Benutzerinformationen zu verarbeiten.
Notwendige (auch: essentielle oder unbedingt erforderliche) Cookies:
Cookies können zum einen für den Betrieb einer Webseite unbedingt erforderlich sein (z.B. um Logins oder andere Nutzereingaben zu speichern oder aus Gründen der Sicherheit).
Statistik-, Marketing- und Personalisierungs-Cookies
: Ferner werden Cookies im Regelfall auch im Rahmen der Reichweitenmessung eingesetzt sowie dann, wenn die Interessen eines Nutzers oder sein Verhalten (z.B. Betrachten bestimmter Inhalte, Nutzen von Funktionen etc.) auf einzelnen Webseiten in einem Nutzerprofil gespeichert werden. Solche Profile dienen dazu, den Nutzern z.B. Inhalte anzuzeigen, die ihren potentiellen Interessen entsprechen. Dieses Verfahren wird auch als "Tracking", d.h., Nachverfolgung der potentiellen Interessen der Nutzer bezeichnet. Soweit wir Cookies oder "Tracking"-Technologien einsetzen, informieren wir Sie gesondert in unserer Datenschutzerklärung oder im Rahmen der Einholung einer Einwilligung.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Auf welcher Rechtsgrundlage wir Ihre personenbezogenen Daten mit Hilfe von Cookies verarbeiten, hängt davon ab, ob wir Sie um eine Einwilligung bitten. Falls dies zutrifft und Sie in die Nutzung von Cookies einwilligen, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten die erklärte Einwilligung. Andernfalls werden die mithilfe von Cookies verarbeiteten Daten auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (z.B. an einem betriebswirtschaftlichen Betrieb unseres Onlineangebotes und dessen Verbesserung) verarbeitet oder, wenn der Einsatz von Cookies erforderlich ist, um unsere vertraglichen Verpflichtungen zu erfüllen.
Speicherdauer:
Sofern wir Ihnen keine expliziten Angaben zur Speicherdauer von permanenten Cookies mitteilen (z. B. im Rahmen eines sog. Cookie-Opt-Ins), gehen Sie bitte davon aus, dass die Speicherdauer bis zu zwei Jahre betragen kann.
Allgemeine Hinweise zum Widerruf und Widerspruch (Opt-Out):
Abhängig davon, ob die Verarbeitung auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung oder gesetzlichen Erlaubnis erfolgt, haben Sie jederzeit die Möglichkeit, eine erteilte Einwilligung zu widerrufen oder der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten durch Cookie-Technologien zu widersprechen (zusammenfassend als "Opt-Out" bezeichnet). Sie können Ihren Widerspruch zunächst mittels der Einstellungen Ihres Browsers erklären, z.B., indem Sie die Nutzung von Cookies deaktivieren (wobei hierdurch auch die Funktionsfähigkeit unseres Onlineangebotes eingeschränkt werden kann). Ein Widerspruch gegen den Einsatz von Cookies zu Zwecken des Onlinemarketings kann auch mittels einer Vielzahl von Diensten, vor allem im Fall des Trackings, über die Webseiten
https://optout.aboutads.info
und
https://www.youronlinechoices.com/
erklärt werden. Daneben können Sie weitere Widerspruchshinweise im Rahmen der Angaben zu den eingesetzten Dienstleistern und Cookies erhalten.
Verarbeitung von Cookie-Daten auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung
: Wir setzen ein Verfahren zum Cookie-Einwilligungs-Management ein, in dessen Rahmen die Einwilligungen der Nutzer in den Einsatz von Cookies, bzw. der im Rahmen des Cookie-Einwilligungs-Management-Verfahrens genannten Verarbeitungen und Anbieter eingeholt sowie von den Nutzern verwaltet und widerrufen werden können. Hierbei wird die Einwilligungserklärung gespeichert, um deren Abfrage nicht erneut wiederholen zum müssen und die Einwilligung entsprechend der gesetzlichen Verpflichtung nachweisen zu können. Die Speicherung kann serverseitig und/oder in einem Cookie (sogenanntes Opt-In-Cookie, bzw. mithilfe vergleichbarer Technologien) erfolgen, um die Einwilligung einem Nutzer, bzw. dessen Gerät zuordnen zu können. Vorbehaltlich individueller Angaben zu den Anbietern von Cookie-Management-Diensten, gelten die folgenden Hinweise: Die Dauer der Speicherung der Einwilligung kann bis zu zwei Jahren betragen. Hierbei wird ein pseudonymer Nutzer-Identifikator gebildet und mit dem Zeitpunkt der Einwilligung, Angaben zur Reichweite der Einwilligung (z. B. welche Kategorien von Cookies und/oder Diensteanbieter) sowie dem Browser, System und verwendeten Endgerät gespeichert.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Geschäftliche Leistungen
Wir verarbeiten Daten unserer Vertrags- und Geschäftspartner, z.B. Kunden und Interessenten (zusammenfassend bezeichnet als "Vertragspartner") im Rahmen von vertraglichen und vergleichbaren Rechtsverhältnissen sowie damit verbundenen Maßnahmen und im Rahmen der Kommunikation mit den Vertragspartnern (oder vorvertraglich), z.B., um Anfragen zu beantworten.
Diese Daten verarbeiten wir zur Erfüllung unserer vertraglichen Pflichten, zur Sicherung unserer Rechte und zu Zwecken der mit diesen Angaben einhergehenden Verwaltungsaufgaben sowie der unternehmerischen Organisation. Die Daten der Vertragspartner geben wir im Rahmen des geltenden Rechts nur insoweit an Dritte weiter, als dies zu den vorgenannten Zwecken oder zur Erfüllung gesetzlicher Pflichten erforderlich ist oder mit Einwilligung der betroffenen Personen erfolgt (z.B. an beteiligte Telekommunikations-, Transport- und sonstige Hilfsdienste sowie Subunternehmer, Banken, Steuer- und Rechtsberater, Zahlungsdienstleister oder Steuerbehörden). Über weitere Verarbeitungsformen, z.B. zu Zwecken des Marketings, werden die Vertragspartner im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung informiert.
Welche Daten für die vorgenannten Zwecke erforderlich sind, teilen wir den Vertragspartnern vor oder im Rahmen der Datenerhebung, z.B. in Onlineformularen, durch besondere Kennzeichnung (z.B. Farben) bzw. Symbole (z.B. Sternchen o.ä.), oder persönlich mit.
Wir löschen die Daten nach Ablauf gesetzlicher Gewährleistungs- und vergleichbarer Pflichten, d.h., grundsätzlich nach Ablauf von 4 Jahren, es sei denn, dass die Daten in einem Kundenkonto gespeichert werden, z.B., solange sie aus gesetzlichen Gründen der Archivierung aufbewahrt werden müssen (z.B. für Steuerzwecke im Regelfall 10 Jahre). Daten, die uns im Rahmen eines Auftrags durch den Vertragspartner offengelegt wurden, löschen wir entsprechend den Vorgaben des Auftrags, grundsätzlich nach Ende des Auftrags.
Soweit wir zur Erbringung unserer Leistungen Drittanbieter oder Plattformen einsetzen, gelten im Verhältnis zwischen den Nutzern und den Anbietern die Geschäftsbedingungen und Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Drittanbieter oder Plattformen.
Kundenkonto
: Vertragspartner können innerhalb unseres Onlineangebotes ein Konto anlegen (z.B. Kunden- bzw. Nutzerkonto, kurz "Kundenkonto"). Falls die Registrierung eines Kundenkontos erforderlich ist, werden Vertragspartner hierauf ebenso hingewiesen wie auf die für die Registrierung erforderlichen Angaben. Die Kundenkonten sind nicht öffentlich und können von Suchmaschinen nicht indexiert werden. Im Rahmen der Registrierung sowie anschließender Anmeldungen und Nutzungen des Kundenkontos speichern wir die IP-Adressen der Kunden nebst den Zugriffszeitpunkten, um die Registrierung nachweisen und etwaigem Missbrauch des Kundenkontos vorbeugen zu können.
Wenn Kunden ihr Kundenkonto gekündigt haben, werden die das Kundenkonto betreffenden Daten gelöscht, vorbehaltlich, deren Aufbewahrung ist aus gesetzlichen Gründen erforderlich. Es obliegt den Kunden, ihre Daten bei erfolgter Kündigung des Kundenkontos zu sichern.
Wirtschaftliche Analysen und Marktforschung
: Aus betriebswirtschaftlichen Gründen und um Markttendenzen, Wünsche der Vertragspartner und Nutzer erkennen zu können, analysieren wir die uns vorliegenden Daten zu Geschäftsvorgängen, Verträgen, Anfragen, etc., wobei in die Gruppe der betroffenen Personen Vertragspartner, Interessenten, Kunden, Besucher und Nutzer unseres Onlineangebotes fallen können.
Die Analysen erfolgen zum Zweck betriebswirtschaftlicher Auswertungen, des Marketings und der Marktforschung (z.B. zur Bestimmung von Kundengruppen mit unterschiedlichen Eigenschaften). Dabei können wir, sofern vorhanden, die Profile von registrierten Nutzern samt ihrer Angaben, z.B. zu in Anspruch genommenen Leistungen, berücksichtigen. Die Analysen dienen alleine uns und werden nicht extern offenbart, sofern es sich nicht um anonyme Analysen mit zusammengefassten, also anonymisierten Werten handelt. Ferner nehmen wir Rücksicht auf die Privatsphäre der Nutzer und verarbeiten die Daten zu den Analysezwecken möglichst pseudonym und, sofern machbar, anonym (z.B. als zusammengefasste Daten).
Publikationstätigkeit
: Wir verarbeiten die Daten von unseren Kontaktpartnern, Interviewpartnern sowie sonstigen Personen, die Gegenstand unserer publizistischen, redaktionellen und journalistischen sowie verwandter Tätigkeiten sind. In diesem Zusammenhang verweisen wir auf die Geltung von Schutzvorschriften der Meinungs- und Pressefreiheit gem. Art. 85 DSGVO in Verbindung mit den jeweiligen nationalen Gesetzen. Die Verarbeitung dient der Erfüllung unserer Auftragstätigkeiten und findet im Übrigen insbesondere auf Grundlage des Interesses der Allgemeinheit an Informations- und Medienangeboten statt.
Angebot von Software- und Plattformleistungen
: Wir verarbeiten die Daten unserer Nutzer, angemeldeter und etwaiger Testnutzer (nachfolgend einheitlich als "Nutzer" bezeichnet), um ihnen gegenüber unsere vertraglichen Leistungen erbringen zu können sowie auf Grundlage berechtigter Interessen, um die Sicherheit unseres Angebotes gewährleisten und es weiterentwickeln zu können. Die erforderlichen Angaben sind als solche im Rahmen des Auftrags-, Bestell- bzw. vergleichbaren Vertragsschlusses gekennzeichnet und umfassen die zur Leistungserbringung und Abrechnung benötigten Angaben sowie Kontaktinformationen, um etwaige Rücksprachen halten zu können.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Interessenten, Geschäfts- und Vertragspartner, Kunden.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation, Büro- und Organisationsverfahren, Verwaltung und Beantwortung von Anfragen, Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, Konversionsmessung (Messung der Effektivität von Marketingmaßnahmen), Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Rechtliche Verpflichtung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. c. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Zahlungsdienstleister
Im Rahmen von Vertrags- und sonstigen Rechtsbeziehungen, aufgrund gesetzlicher Pflichten oder sonst auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen bieten wir den betroffenen Personen effiziente und sichere Zahlungsmöglichkeiten an und setzen hierzu neben Banken und Kreditinstituten weitere Zahlungsdienstleister ein (zusammenfassend "Zahlungsdienstleister").
Zu den durch die Zahlungsdienstleister verarbeiteten Daten gehören Bestandsdaten, wie z.B. der Name und die Adresse, Bankdaten, wie z.B. Kontonummern oder Kreditkartennummern, Passwörter, TANs und Prüfsummen sowie die Vertrags-, Summen- und empfängerbezogenen Angaben. Die Angaben sind erforderlich, um die Transaktionen durchzuführen. Die eingegebenen Daten werden jedoch nur durch die Zahlungsdienstleister verarbeitet und bei diesen gespeichert. D.h., wir erhalten keine konto- oder kreditkartenbezogenen Informationen, sondern lediglich Informationen mit Bestätigung oder Negativbeauskunftung der Zahlung. Unter Umständen werden die Daten seitens der Zahlungsdienstleister an Wirtschaftsauskunfteien übermittelt. Diese Übermittlung bezweckt die Identitäts- und Bonitätsprüfung. Hierzu verweisen wir auf die AGB und die Datenschutzhinweise der Zahlungsdienstleister.
Für die Zahlungsgeschäfte gelten die Geschäftsbedingungen und die Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Zahlungsdienstleister, welche innerhalb der jeweiligen Webseiten bzw. Transaktionsapplikationen abrufbar sind. Wir verweisen auf diese ebenfalls zwecks weiterer Informationen und Geltendmachung von Widerrufs-, Auskunfts- und anderen Betroffenenrechten.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie), Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kunden, Interessenten.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation, Affiliate-Nachverfolgung.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Stripe:
Zahlungsdienstleistungen; Dienstanbieter: Stripe, Inc., 510 Townsend Street, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA; Website:
https://stripe.com/de
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://stripe.com/de/privacy
.
Bereitstellung des Onlineangebotes und Webhosting
Um unser Onlineangebot sicher und effizient bereitstellen zu können, nehmen wir die Leistungen von einem oder mehreren Webhosting-Anbietern in Anspruch, von deren Servern (bzw. von ihnen verwalteten Servern) das Onlineangebot abgerufen werden kann. Zu diesen Zwecken können wir Infrastruktur- und Plattformdienstleistungen, Rechenkapazität, Speicherplatz und Datenbankdienste sowie Sicherheitsleistungen und technische Wartungsleistungen in Anspruch nehmen.
Zu den im Rahmen der Bereitstellung des Hostingangebotes verarbeiteten Daten können alle die Nutzer unseres Onlineangebotes betreffenden Angaben gehören, die im Rahmen der Nutzung und der Kommunikation anfallen. Hierzu gehören regelmäßig die IP-Adresse, die notwendig ist, um die Inhalte von Onlineangeboten an Browser ausliefern zu können, und alle innerhalb unseres Onlineangebotes oder von Webseiten getätigten Eingaben.
Erhebung von Zugriffsdaten und Logfiles
: Wir selbst (bzw. unser Webhostinganbieter) erheben Daten zu jedem Zugriff auf den Server (sogenannte Serverlogfiles). Zu den Serverlogfiles können die Adresse und Name der abgerufenen Webseiten und Dateien, Datum und Uhrzeit des Abrufs, übertragene Datenmengen, Meldung über erfolgreichen Abruf, Browsertyp nebst Version, das Betriebssystem des Nutzers, Referrer URL (die zuvor besuchte Seite) und im Regelfall IP-Adressen und der anfragende Provider gehören.
Die Serverlogfiles können zum einen zu Zwecken der Sicherheit eingesetzt werden, z.B., um eine Überlastung der Server zu vermeiden (insbesondere im Fall von missbräuchlichen Angriffen, sogenannten DDoS-Attacken) und zum anderen, um die Auslastung der Server und ihre Stabilität sicherzustellen.
Content-Delivery-Network
: Wir setzen ein "Content-Delivery-Network" (CDN) ein. Ein CDN ist ein Dienst, mit dessen Hilfe Inhalte eines Onlineangebotes, insbesondere große Mediendateien, wie Grafiken oder Programm-Skripte, mit Hilfe regional verteilter und über das Internet verbundener Server schneller und sicherer ausgeliefert werden können.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Content Delivery Network (CDN).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Hetzner:
Leistungen auf dem Gebiet der Bereitstellung von informationstechnischer Infrastruktur und verbundenen Dienstleistungen (z.B. Speicherplatz und/oder Rechenkapazitäten); Dienstanbieter: Hetzner Online GmbH, Industriestr. 25, 91710 Gunzenhausen, Deutschland; Website:
https://www.hetzner.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.hetzner.com/de/rechtliches/datenschutz
.
Besondere Hinweise zu Applikationen (Apps)
Wir verarbeiten die Daten der Nutzer unserer Applikation, soweit diese erforderlich sind, um den Nutzern die Applikation sowie deren Funktionalitäten bereitstellen, deren Sicherheit überwachen und sie weiterentwickeln zu können. Wir können ferner Nutzer unter Beachtung der gesetzlichen Vorgaben kontaktieren, sofern die Kommunikation zu Zwecken der Administration oder Nutzung der Applikation erforderlich ist. Im Übrigen verweisen wir im Hinblick auf die Verarbeitung der Daten der Nutzer auf die Datenschutzhinweise in dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Die Verarbeitung von Daten, die für die Bereitstellung der Funktionalitäten der Applikation erforderlich ist, dient der Erfüllung von vertraglichen Pflichten. Dies gilt auch, wenn die Bereitstellung der Funktionen eine Berechtigung der Nutzer (z. B. Freigaben von Gerätefunktionen) voraussetzt. Sofern die Verarbeitung von Daten für die Bereitstellung der Funktionalitäten der Applikation nicht erforderlich ist, aber der Sicherheit der Applikation oder unseren betriebswirtschaftlichen Interessen dient (z. B. Erhebung von Daten zu Zwecken der Optimierung der Applikation oder Sicherheitszwecken), erfolgt sie auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen. Sofern Nutzer ausdrücklich deren Einwilligung in die Verarbeitung ihrer Daten gebeten werden, erfolgt die Verarbeitung der von der Einwilligung umfassten Daten auf Grundlage der Einwilligung.
Kommerzielle Nutzung
: Wir verarbeiten die Daten der Nutzer unserer Applikation, angemeldeter und etwaiger Testnutzer (nachfolgend einheitlich als "Nutzer" bezeichnet), um ihnen gegenüber unsere vertraglichen Leistungen erbringen zu können sowie auf Grundlage berechtigter Interessen, um die Sicherheit unserer Applikation gewährleisten und sie weiterzuentwickeln zu können. Die erforderlichen Angaben sind als solche im Rahmen des Nutzungs-, Auftrags-, Bestell- bzw. vergleichbaren Vertragsschlusses gekennzeichnet und können die zur Leistungserbringung und zur etwaigen Abrechnung benötigten Angaben sowie Kontaktinformationen, um etwaige Rücksprachen halten zu können, umfassen.
Speicherung eines universellen und eindeutigen Identifikators (UUID)
: Die Applikation speichert für Zwecke der Analyse der Nutzung und Funktionsfähigkeit der Applikation sowie der Speicherung der Einstellungen der Nutzer einen so genannten universellen und eindeutigen Identifikator (englisch "Universally Unique Identifier", UUID). Dieser Identifikator wird bei der Installation dieser Anwendung generiert (ist jedoch nicht mit dem Gerät verbunden, also keine Gerätekennung in diesem Sinne), bleibt zwischen dem Start der Applikation sowie ihrer Aktualisierungen gespeichert und wird gelöscht wenn Nutzer die Applikation von ihrem Gerät entfernen.
Speicherung eines pseudonymen Identifikators
: Damit wir die Applikation bereitstellen und ihre Funktionsfähigkeit sicherstellen können, verwenden wir einen pseudonymen Identifikator. Der die Identifikation ist ein mathematischer Wert (d. h. es werden keine Klardaten, wie z. B. Namen verwendet), der einem Gerät und/ oder der auf ihm installierten Installation der Applikation zugeordnet ist. Dieser Identifikator wird bei der Installation dieser Anwendung generiert, bleibt zwischen dem Start der Applikation sowie ihrer Aktualisierungen gespeichert und wird gelöscht wenn Nutzer die Applikation von dem Gerät entfernen.
Geräteberechtigungen für den Zugriff auf Funktionen und Daten
: Die Nutzung unserer Applikation oder ihrer Funktionalitäten kann Berechtigungen der Nutzer für Zugriff auf bestimmten Funktionen der verwendeten Geräte oder auf die, auf den Geräten gespeicherten oder mit Hilfe der Geräte zugänglichen Daten voraussetzen. Standardmäßig müssen diese Berechtigungen von den Nutzern erteilt werden und können jederzeit in den Einstellungen der jeweiligen Geräte widerrufen werden. Das genaue Verfahren zur Kontrolle der App-Berechtigungen kann vom Gerät und der Software der Nutzern abhängig sein. Bei Erläuterungsbedarf können sich Nutzer an uns wenden. Wir weisen darauf hin, dass die Versagung oder Widerruf der jeweiligen Berechtigungen die Funktionsfähigkeit unsere Applikation beeinflussen kann.
Kein Standortverlauf und keine Bewegungsprofile
: Die Standortdaten werden lediglich punktuell eingesetzt und nicht zur Bildung eines Standortverlaufs oder eines Bewegungsprofils der verwendeten Geräte, bzw. ihrer Nutzer verarbeitet.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen), Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie), Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Bezug von Applikationen über Appstores
Der Bezug unserer Applikation erfolgt über über spezielle Online-Plattformen, die von anderen Dienstanbietern betrieben werden, an (so genannte "Appstores"). In diesem Zusammenhang gelten zusätzlich zu unseren Datenschutzhinweisen die Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Appstores. Dies gilt insbesondere im Hinblick auf die auf den Plattformen eingesetzten Verfahren zur Reichweitemessung und zum interessensbezogenen Marketing sowie etwaige Kostenpflicht.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kunden.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Apple App Store:
App und Software Verkaufsplattform; Dienstanbieter: Apple Inc., Infinite Loop, Cupertino, CA 95014, USA; Website:
https://www.apple.com/de/ios/app-store/
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/de-ww/
.
Google Play Store:
App und Software Verkaufsplattform; Dienstanbieterin: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland; Website: https://play.google.com; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=de
Registrierung, Anmeldung und Nutzerkonto
Nutzer können ein Nutzerkonto anlegen. Im Rahmen der Registrierung werden den Nutzern die erforderlichen Pflichtangaben mitgeteilt und zu Zwecken der Bereitstellung des Nutzerkontos auf Grundlage vertraglicher Pflichterfüllung verarbeitet. Zu den verarbeiteten Daten gehören insbesondere die Login-Informationen (Nutzername, Passwort sowie eine E-Mail-Adresse).
Im Rahmen der Inanspruchnahme unserer Registrierungs- und Anmeldefunktionen sowie der Nutzung des Nutzerkontos speichern wir die IP-Adresse und den Zeitpunkt der jeweiligen Nutzerhandlung. Die Speicherung erfolgt auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen als auch jener der Nutzer an einem Schutz vor Missbrauch und sonstiger unbefugter Nutzung. Eine Weitergabe dieser Daten an Dritte erfolgt grundsätzlich nicht, es sei denn, sie ist zur Verfolgung unserer Ansprüche erforderlich oder es besteht eine gesetzliche Verpflichtung hierzu.
Die Nutzer können über Vorgänge, die für deren Nutzerkonto relevant sind, wie z.B. technische Änderungen, per E-Mail informiert werden.
Registrierung mit Klarnamen
: Aufgrund der Natur unserer Community bitten wir die Nutzer unser Angebot nur unter Verwendung von Klarnamen zu nutzen. D.h. die Nutzung von Pseudonymen ist nicht zulässig.
Löschung von Daten nach Kündigung
: Wenn Nutzer ihr Nutzerkonto gekündigt haben, werden deren Daten im Hinblick auf das Nutzerkonto, vorbehaltlich einer gesetzlichen Erlaubnis, Pflicht oder Einwilligung der Nutzer, gelöscht.
Es obliegt den Nutzern, ihre Daten bei erfolgter Kündigung vor dem Vertragsende zu sichern. Wir sind berechtigt, sämtliche während der Vertragsdauer gespeicherte Daten des Nutzers unwiederbringlich zu löschen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, Verwaltung und Beantwortung von Anfragen.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Blogs und Publikationsmedien
Wir nutzen Blogs oder vergleichbare Mittel der Onlinekommunikation und Publikation (nachfolgend "Publikationsmedium"). Die Daten der Leser werden für die Zwecke des Publikationsmediums nur insoweit verarbeitet, als es für dessen Darstellung und die Kommunikation zwischen Autoren und Lesern oder aus Gründen der Sicherheit erforderlich ist. Im Übrigen verweisen wir auf die Informationen zur Verarbeitung der Besucher unseres Publikationsmediums im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzhinweise.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Feedback (z.B. Sammeln von Feedback via Online-Formular).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Kontaktaufnahme
Bei der Kontaktaufnahme mit uns (z.B. per Kontaktformular, E-Mail, Telefon oder via soziale Medien) werden die Angaben der anfragenden Personen verarbeitet, soweit dies zur Beantwortung der Kontaktanfragen und etwaiger angefragter Maßnahmen erforderlich ist.
Die Beantwortung der Kontaktanfragen im Rahmen von vertraglichen oder vorvertraglichen Beziehungen erfolgt zur Erfüllung unserer vertraglichen Pflichten oder zur Beantwortung von (vor)vertraglichen Anfragen und im Übrigen auf Grundlage der berechtigten Interessen an der Beantwortung der Anfragen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Zahlungsdaten (z.B. Bankverbindungen, Rechnungen, Zahlungshistorie), Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kommunikationspartner, Kunden, Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation, Verwaltung und Beantwortung von Anfragen, Feedback (z.B. Sammeln von Feedback via Online-Formular), Umfragen und Fragebögen (z.B. Umfragen mit Eingabemöglichkeiten, Multiple-Choice-Fragen).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO), Wahrnehmung öffentlicher Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. e. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
HubSpot:
Kundenpflege und -servicesoftware (Verwaltung von Kundenanfragen aus verschiedenen Kanälen), Ticketingsystem, Feedback, Zufriedenheits- und andere Umfragen; Dienstanbieter: HubSpot, Inc., 25 First St., 2nd floor, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02141, USA; Website:
https://www.hubspot.de
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://legal.hubspot.com/de/privacy-policy
.
Helpscout:
Customer service platform; Service provider: Help Scout PBC, 100 City Hall Square, 5th Floor, Boston, Massachusetts, United States; Website:
https://www.helpscout.com
; Privacy Policy:
https://www.helpscout.com/privacy/
Mailchimp:
E-Mail Versand für Marketing E-Mails und Produktinformationen; Dienstanbieter: Intuit Inc., 2700 Coast Avenue, CMountain View, CA 94043; Website:
https://mailchimp.com/
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.intuit.com/privacy/statement/
.
Videokonferenzen, Onlinemeetings, Webinare und Bildschirm-Sharing
Wir setzen Plattformen und Anwendungen anderer Anbieter (nachfolgend bezeichnet als “Drittanbieter”) zu Zwecken der Durchführung von Video und Audio-Konferenzen, Webinaren und sonstigen Arten von Video und Audio-Meetings ein. Bei der Auswahl der Drittanbieter und ihrer Leistungen beachten wir die gesetzlichen Vorgaben.
In diesem Rahmen werden Daten der Kommunikationsteilnehmer verarbeitet und auf den Servern der Drittanbieter gespeichert, soweit diese Bestandteil von Kommunikationsvorgängen mit uns sind. Zu diesen Daten können insbesondere Anmelde- und Kontaktdaten, visuelle sowie stimmliche Beiträge sowie Eingaben in Chats und geteilte Bildschirminhalte gehören.
Sofern Nutzer im Rahmen der Kommunikation, Geschäfts- oder anderen Beziehungen mit uns auf die Drittanbieter, bzw. deren Software oder Plattformen verwiesen werden, können die Drittanbieter Nutzungsdaten und Metadaten zu Sicherheitszwecken, Serviceoptimierung oder Marketingzwecken verarbeiten. Wir bitten daher, die Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Drittanbieter zu beachten.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter oder bestimmter Funktionen bitten (z. B. Einverständnis mit einer Aufzeichnung von Gesprächen), ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung die Einwilligung. Ferner kann deren Einsatz ein Bestandteil unserer (vor)vertraglichen Leistungen sein, sofern der Einsatz der Drittanbieter in diesem Rahmen vereinbart wurde. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen an einer effizienten und sicheren Kommunikation mit unseren unser Kommunikationspartnern verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie zusätzlich auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung verweisen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kommunikationspartner, Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation, Büro- und Organisationsverfahren, Direktmarketing (z.B. per E-Mail oder postalisch).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Google Cloud-Dienste:
Cloud-Speicher-Dienste; Dienstanbieter: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Website:
https://cloud.google.com/
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
, Sicherheitshinweise:
https://cloud.google.com/security/privacy
; Standardvertragsklauseln (Gewährleistung Datenschutzniveau bei Verarbeitung in Drittländern):
https://cloud.google.com/terms/data-processing-terms
;
https://cloud.google.com/terms/data-processing-terms
.
Musik und Podcasts
Wir nutzen Hosting- und Analyse-Angebote von Dienstanbieter, um unsere Audio-Inhalte zum Anhören bzw. zum Download anzubieten und statistische Informationen zum Abruf der Audio-Inhalte zu erhalten.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Reichweitenmessung (z.B. Zugriffsstatistiken, Erkennung wiederkehrender Besucher), Konversionsmessung (Messung der Effektivität von Marketingmaßnahmen), Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Podigee:
Podigee - Podcasthosting; Dienstanbieter: Podigee GmbH, Revaler Straße 28, 10245 Berlin, Deutschland; Website:
https://www.podigee.com/de
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.podigee.com/de/about/privacy/
.
Bewerbungsverfahren
Das Bewerbungsverfahren setzt voraus, dass Bewerber uns die für deren Beurteilung und Auswahl erforderlichen Daten mitteilen. Welche Informationen erforderlich sind, ergibt sich aus der Stellenbeschreibung oder im Fall von Onlineformularen aus den dortigen Angaben.
Grundsätzlich gehören zu den erforderlichen Angaben, die Informationen zur Person, wie der Name, die Adresse, eine Kontaktmöglichkeit sowie die Nachweise über die für eine Stelle notwendigen Qualifikationen. Auf Anfragen teilen wir zusätzlich gerne mit, welche Angaben benötigt werden.
Sofern zur Verfügung gestellt, können uns Bewerber ihre Bewerbungen mittels eines Onlineformulars übermitteln. Die Daten werden entsprechend dem Stand der Technik verschlüsselt an uns übertragen. Ebenfalls können Bewerber uns ihre Bewerbungen via E-Mail übermitteln. Hierbei bitten wir jedoch zu beachten, dass E-Mails im Internet grundsätzlich nicht verschlüsselt versendet werden. Im Regelfall werden E-Mails zwar auf dem Transportweg verschlüsselt, aber nicht auf den Servern von denen sie abgesendet und empfangen werden. Wir können daher für den Übertragungsweg der Bewerbung zwischen dem Absender und dem Empfang auf unserem Server keine Verantwortung übernehmen.
Für Zwecke der Bewerbersuche, Einreichung von Bewerbungen und Auswahl von Bewerbern können wir unter Beachtung der gesetzlichen Vorgaben, Bewerbermanagement-, bzw. Recruitment-Software und Plattformen und Leistungen von Drittanbietern in Anspruch nehmen.
Bewerber können uns gerne zur Art der Einreichung der Bewerbung kontaktieren oder uns die Bewerbung auf dem Postweg zuzusenden.
Verarbeitung besonderer Kategorien von Daten:
Soweit im Rahmen des Bewerbungsverfahrens besondere Kategorien von personenbezogenen Daten im Sinne des Art. 9 Abs. 1 DSGVO (z.B. Gesundheitsdaten, wie z.B. Schwerbehinderteneigenschaft oder ethnische Herkunft) bei Bewerbern angefragt werden, damit der Verantwortliche oder die betroffene Person die ihm bzw. ihr aus dem Arbeitsrecht und dem Recht der sozialen Sicherheit und des Sozialschutzes erwachsenden Rechte ausüben und seinen bzw. ihren diesbezüglichen Pflichten nachkommen kann, erfolgt deren Verarbeitung nach Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. b. DSGVO, im Fall des Schutzes lebenswichtiger Interessen der Bewerber oder anderer Personen gem. Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. c. DSGVO oder für Zwecke der Gesundheitsvorsorge oder der Arbeitsmedizin, für die Beurteilung der Arbeitsfähigkeit des Beschäftigten, für die medizinische Diagnostik, für die Versorgung oder Behandlung im Gesundheits- oder Sozialbereich oder für die Verwaltung von Systemen und Diensten im Gesundheits- oder Sozialbereich gem. Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. h. DSGVO. Im Fall einer auf freiwilliger Einwilligung beruhenden Mitteilung der besonderen Kategorien von Daten erfolgt deren Verarbeitung auf Grundlage von Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. a. DSGVO.
Löschung von Daten:
Die von den Bewerbern zur Verfügung gestellten Daten können im Fall einer erfolgreichen Bewerbung für die Zwecke des Beschäftigungsverhältnisses von uns weiterverarbeitet werden. Andernfalls, sofern die Bewerbung auf ein Stellenangebot nicht erfolgreich ist, werden die Daten der Bewerber gelöscht. Die Daten der Bewerber werden ebenfalls gelöscht, wenn eine Bewerbung zurückgezogen wird, wozu die Bewerber jederzeit berechtigt sind. Die Löschung erfolgt, vorbehaltlich eines berechtigten Widerrufs der Bewerber, spätestens nach dem Ablauf eines Zeitraums von sechs Monaten, damit wir etwaige Anschlussfragen zu der Bewerbung beantworten und unseren Nachweispflichten aus den Vorschriften zur Gleichbehandlung von Bewerbern nachkommen können. Rechnungen über etwaige Reisekostenerstattung werden entsprechend den steuerrechtlichen Vorgaben archiviert.
Aufnahme in einen Bewerberpool:
Die Aufnahme in einen Bewerber-Pool, sofern angeboten, erfolgt auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung. Die Bewerber werden darüber belehrt, dass ihre Zustimmung zur Aufnahme in den Talentpool freiwillig ist, keinen Einfluss auf das laufende Bewerbungsverfahren hat und sie ihre Einwilligung jederzeit für die Zukunft widerrufen können.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bewerberdaten (z.B. Angaben zur Person, Post- und Kontaktadressen, die zur Bewerbung gehörenden Unterlagen und die darin enthaltenen Informationen, wie z.B. Anschreiben, Lebenslauf, Zeugnisse sowie weitere im Hinblick auf eine konkrete Stelle oder freiwillig von Bewerbern mitgeteilte Informationen zu deren Person oder Qualifikation).
Betroffene Personen:
Bewerber.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Bewerbungsverfahren (Begründung und etwaige spätere Durchführung sowie mögliche spätere Beendigung des Beschäftigungsverhältnisses).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Bewerbungsverfahren als vorvertragliches bzw. vertragliches Verhältnis (Art. 9 Abs. 2 lit. b DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
LinkedIn Recruiter:
Recruiting-Plattform und -Leistungen; Dienstanbieter:
https://www.linkedin.com
, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company, Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Irland; Website:
https://www.linkedin.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
Xing:
Dienstanbieter: XING AG, Dammtorstraße 29-32, 20354 Hamburg, Deutschland; Website:
https://www.xing.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung
.
Cloud-Dienste
Wir nutzen über das Internet zugängliche und auf den Servern ihrer Anbieter ausgeführte Softwaredienste (sogenannte "Cloud-Dienste", auch bezeichnet als "Software as a Service") für die folgenden Zwecke: Dokumentenspeicherung und Verwaltung, Kalenderverwaltung, E-Mail-Versand, Tabellenkalkulationen und Präsentationen, Austausch von Dokumenten, Inhalten und Informationen mit bestimmten Empfängern oder Veröffentlichung von Webseiten, Formularen oder sonstigen Inhalten und Informationen sowie Chats und Teilnahme an Audio- und Videokonferenzen.
In diesem Rahmen können personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet und auf den Servern der Anbieter gespeichert werden, soweit diese Bestandteil von Kommunikationsvorgängen mit uns sind oder von uns sonst, wie im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung dargelegt, verarbeitet werden. Zu diesen Daten können insbesondere Stammdaten und Kontaktdaten der Nutzer, Daten zu Vorgängen, Verträgen, sonstigen Prozessen und deren Inhalte gehören. Die Anbieter der Cloud-Dienste verarbeiten ferner Nutzungsdaten und Metadaten, die von ihnen zu Sicherheitszwecken und zur Serviceoptimierung verwendet werden.
Sofern wir mit Hilfe der Cloud-Dienste für andere Nutzer oder öffentlich zugängliche Webseiten Formulare o.a. Dokumente und Inhalte bereitstellen, können die Anbieter Cookies auf den Geräten der Nutzer für Zwecke der Webanalyse oder, um sich Einstellungen der Nutzer (z.B. im Fall der Mediensteuerung) zu merken, speichern.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir um eine Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Cloud-Dienste bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung die Einwilligung. Ferner kann deren Einsatz ein Bestandteil unserer (vor)vertraglichen Leistungen sein, sofern der Einsatz der Cloud-Dienste in diesem Rahmen vereinbart wurde. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h., Interesse an effizienten und sicheren Verwaltungs- und Kollaborationsprozessen) verarbeitet
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kunden, Beschäftigte (z.B. Angestellte, Bewerber, ehemalige Mitarbeiter), Interessenten, Kommunikationspartner.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Büro- und Organisationsverfahren.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Google Cloud-Dienste:
Cloud-Speicher-Dienste; Dienstanbieter: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Website:
https://cloud.google.com/
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
, Sicherheitshinweise:
https://cloud.google.com/security/privacy
; Standardvertragsklauseln (Gewährleistung Datenschutzniveau bei Verarbeitung in Drittländern):
https://cloud.google.com/terms/data-processing-terms
;
https://cloud.google.com/terms/data-processing-terms
.
Newsletter und elektronische Benachrichtigungen
Wir versenden Newsletter, E-Mails und weitere elektronische Benachrichtigungen (nachfolgend "Newsletter“) nur mit der Einwilligung der Empfänger oder einer gesetzlichen Erlaubnis. Sofern im Rahmen einer Anmeldung zum Newsletter dessen Inhalte konkret umschrieben werden, sind sie für die Einwilligung der Nutzer maßgeblich. Im Übrigen enthalten unsere Newsletter Informationen zu unseren Leistungen und uns.
Um sich zu unseren Newslettern anzumelden, reicht es grundsätzlich aus, wenn Sie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse angeben. Wir können Sie jedoch bitten, einen Namen, zwecks persönlicher Ansprache im Newsletter, oder weitere Angaben, sofern diese für die Zwecke des Newsletters erforderlich sind, zu tätigen.
Double-Opt-In-Verfahren:
Die Anmeldung zu unserem Newsletter erfolgt grundsätzlich in einem sogenannte Double-Opt-In-Verfahren. D.h., Sie erhalten nach der Anmeldung eine E-Mail, in der Sie um die Bestätigung Ihrer Anmeldung gebeten werden. Diese Bestätigung ist notwendig, damit sich niemand mit fremden E-Mail-Adressen anmelden kann. Die Anmeldungen zum Newsletter werden protokolliert, um den Anmeldeprozess entsprechend den rechtlichen Anforderungen nachweisen zu können. Hierzu gehört die Speicherung des Anmelde- und des Bestätigungszeitpunkts als auch der IP-Adresse. Ebenso werden die Änderungen Ihrer bei dem Versanddienstleister gespeicherten Daten protokolliert.
Löschung und Einschränkung der Verarbeitung:
Wir können die ausgetragenen E-Mail-Adressen bis zu drei Jahren auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen speichern, bevor wir sie löschen, um eine ehemals gegebene Einwilligung nachweisen zu können. Die Verarbeitung dieser Daten wird auf den Zweck einer möglichen Abwehr von Ansprüchen beschränkt. Ein individueller Löschungsantrag ist jederzeit möglich, sofern zugleich das ehemalige Bestehen einer Einwilligung bestätigt wird. Im Fall von Pflichten zur dauerhaften Beachtung von Widersprüchen behalten wir uns die Speicherung der E-Mail-Adresse alleine zu diesem Zweck in einer Sperrliste (sogenannte "Blocklist") vor.
Die Protokollierung des Anmeldeverfahrens erfolgt auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen zu Zwecken des Nachweises seines ordnungsgemäßen Ablaufs. Soweit wir einen Dienstleister mit dem Versand von E-Mails beauftragen, erfolgt dies auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen an einem effizienten und sicheren Versandsystem.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Der Versand der Newsletter erfolgt auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung der Empfänger oder, falls eine Einwilligung nicht erforderlich ist, auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen am Direktmarketing, sofern und soweit diese gesetzlich, z.B. im Fall von Bestandskundenwerbung, erlaubt ist. Soweit wir einen Dienstleister mit dem Versand von E-Mails beauftragen, geschieht dies auf der Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen. Das Registrierungsverfahren wird auf der Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen aufgezeichnet, um nachzuweisen, dass es in Übereinstimmung mit dem Gesetz durchgeführt wurde.
Inhalte: Informationen zu uns, unseren Leistungen, Aktionen und Angeboten.
Messung von Öffnungs- und Klickraten
: Die Newsletter enthalten einen sogenannte "web-beacon“, d.h., eine pixelgroße Datei, die beim Öffnen des Newsletters von unserem Server, bzw., sofern wir einen Versanddienstleister einsetzen, von dessen Server abgerufen wird. Im Rahmen dieses Abrufs werden zunächst technische Informationen, wie Informationen zum Browser und Ihrem System, als auch Ihre IP-Adresse und der Zeitpunkt des Abrufs, erhoben.
Diese Informationen werden zur technischen Verbesserung unseres Newsletters anhand der technischen Daten oder der Zielgruppen und ihres Leseverhaltens auf Basis ihrer Abruforte (die mit Hilfe der IP-Adresse bestimmbar sind) oder der Zugriffszeiten genutzt. Diese Analyse beinhaltet ebenfalls die Feststellung, ob die Newsletter geöffnet werden, wann sie geöffnet werden und welche Links geklickt werden. Diese Informationen werden den einzelnen Newsletterempfängern zugeordnet und in deren Profilen bis zu deren Löschung gespeichert. Die Auswertungen dienen uns dazu, die Lesegewohnheiten unserer Nutzer zu erkennen und unsere Inhalte an sie anzupassen oder unterschiedliche Inhalte entsprechend den Interessen unserer Nutzer zu versenden.
Die Messung der Öffnungsraten und der Klickraten sowie Speicherung der Messergebnisse in den Profilen der Nutzer sowie deren weitere Verarbeitung erfolgen auf Grundlage einer Einwilligung der Nutzer.
Ein getrennter Widerruf der Erfolgsmessung ist leider nicht möglich, in diesem Fall muss das gesamte Newsletterabonnement gekündigt, bzw. muss ihm widersprochen werden. In diesem Fall werden die gespeicherten Profilinformationen gelöscht.
Voraussetzung der Inanspruchnahme kostenloser Leistungen
: Die Einwilligungen in den Versand von Mailings kann als Voraussetzung zur Inanspruchnahme kostenloser Leistungen (z.B. Zugang zu bestimmten Inhalten oder Teilnahme an bestimmten Aktionen) abhängig gemacht werden. Sofern die Nutzer die kostenlose Leistung in Anspruch nehmen möchten, ohne sich zum Newsletter anzumelden, bitten wir Sie um eine Kontaktaufnahme.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten).
Betroffene Personen:
Kommunikationspartner, Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Direktmarketing (z.B. per E-Mail oder postalisch), Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
Sie können den Empfang unseres Newsletters jederzeit kündigen, d.h. Ihre Einwilligungen widerrufen, bzw. dem weiteren Empfang widersprechen. Einen Link zur Kündigung des Newsletters finden Sie entweder am Ende eines jeden Newsletters oder können sonst eine der oben angegebenen Kontaktmöglichkeiten, vorzugswürdig E-Mail, hierzu nutzen.
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Mailchimp:
E-Mail Versand für Marketing E-Mails und Produktinformationen; Dienstanbieter: Intuit Inc., 2700 Coast Avenue, CMountain View, CA 94043; Website:
https://mailchimp.com/
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.intuit.com/privacy/statement/
.
Webanalyse, Monitoring und Optimierung
Die Webanalyse (auch als "Reichweitenmessung" bezeichnet) dient der Auswertung der Besucherströme unseres Onlineangebotes und kann Verhalten, Interessen oder demographische Informationen zu den Besuchern, wie z.B. das Alter oder das Geschlecht, als pseudonyme Werte umfassen. Mit Hilfe der Reichweitenanalyse können wir z.B. erkennen, zu welcher Zeit unser Onlineangebot oder dessen Funktionen oder Inhalte am häufigsten genutzt werden oder zur Wiederverwendung einladen. Ebenso können wir nachvollziehen, welche Bereiche der Optimierung bedürfen.
Neben der Webanalyse können wir auch Testverfahren einsetzen, um z.B. unterschiedliche Versionen unseres Onlineangebotes oder seiner Bestandteile zu testen und optimieren.
Zu diesen Zwecken können sogenannte Nutzerprofile angelegt und in einer Datei (sogenannte "Cookie") gespeichert oder ähnliche Verfahren mit dem gleichen Zweck genutzt werden. Zu diesen Angaben können z.B. betrachtete Inhalte, besuchte Webseiten und dort genutzte Elemente und technische Angaben, wie der verwendete Browser, das verwendete Computersystem sowie Angaben zu Nutzungszeiten gehören. Sofern Nutzer in die Erhebung ihrer Standortdaten eingewilligt haben, können je nach Anbieter auch diese verarbeitet werden.
Es werden ebenfalls die IP-Adressen der Nutzer gespeichert. Jedoch nutzen wir ein IP-Masking-Verfahren (d.h., Pseudonymisierung durch Kürzung der IP-Adresse) zum Schutz der Nutzer. Generell werden die im Rahmen von Webanalyse, A/B-Testings und Optimierung keine Klardaten der Nutzer (wie z.B. E-Mail-Adressen oder Namen) gespeichert, sondern Pseudonyme. D.h., wir als auch die Anbieter der eingesetzten Software kennen nicht die tatsächliche Identität der Nutzer, sondern nur den für Zwecke der jeweiligen Verfahren in deren Profilen gespeicherten Angaben.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung von Daten die Einwilligung. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h. Interesse an effizienten, wirtschaftlichen und empfängerfreundlichen Leistungen) verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie auch auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung hinweisen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Reichweitenmessung (z.B. Zugriffsstatistiken, Erkennung wiederkehrender Besucher), Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen).
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen:
IP-Masking (Pseudonymisierung der IP-Adresse).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Matomo:
Die durch das Cookie erzeugte Informationen über Ihre Benutzung dieser Webseite werden nur auf unserem Server gespeichert und nicht an Dritte weitergegeben; Dienstanbieter: Webanalyse/ Reichweitenmessung im Selbsthosting; Website:
https://matomo.org/
; Löschung von Daten: Die Cookies haben eine Speicherdauer von maximal 13 Monaten.
Online-Marketing
Wir verarbeiten personenbezogene Daten zu Zwecken des Onlinemarketings, worunter insbesondere die Vermarktung von Werbeflächen oder Darstellung von werbenden und sonstigen Inhalten (zusammenfassend als "Inhalte" bezeichnet) anhand potentieller Interessen der Nutzer sowie die Messung ihrer Effektivität fallen kann.
Zu diesen Zwecken werden sogenannte Nutzerprofile angelegt und in einer Datei (sogenannte "Cookie") gespeichert oder ähnliche Verfahren genutzt, mittels derer die für die Darstellung der vorgenannten Inhalte relevante Angaben zum Nutzer gespeichert werden. Zu diesen Angaben können z.B. betrachtete Inhalte, besuchte Webseiten, genutzte Onlinenetzwerke, aber auch Kommunikationspartner und technische Angaben, wie der verwendete Browser, das verwendete Computersystem sowie Angaben zu Nutzungszeiten gehören. Sofern Nutzer in die Erhebung ihrer Standortdaten eingewilligt haben, können auch diese verarbeitet werden.
Es werden ebenfalls die IP-Adressen der Nutzer gespeichert. Jedoch nutzen wir zur Verfügung stehende IP-Masking-Verfahren (d.h., Pseudonymisierung durch Kürzung der IP-Adresse) zum Schutz der Nutzer. Generell werden im Rahmen des Onlinemarketingverfahren keine Klardaten der Nutzer (wie z.B. E-Mail-Adressen oder Namen) gespeichert, sondern Pseudonyme. D.h., wir als auch die Anbieter der Onlinemarketingverfahren kennen nicht die tatsächlich Identität der Nutzer, sondern nur die in deren Profilen gespeicherten Angaben.
Die Angaben in den Profilen werden im Regelfall in den Cookies oder mittels ähnlicher Verfahren gespeichert. Diese Cookies können später generell auch auf anderen Webseiten die dasselbe Onlinemarketingverfahren einsetzen, ausgelesen und zu Zwecken der Darstellung von Inhalten analysiert als auch mit weiteren Daten ergänzt und auf dem Server des Onlinemarketingverfahrensanbieters gespeichert werden.
Ausnahmsweise können Klardaten den Profilen zugeordnet werden. Das ist der Fall, wenn die Nutzer z.B. Mitglieder eines sozialen Netzwerks sind, dessen Onlinemarketingverfahren wir einsetzen und das Netzwerk die Profile der Nutzer mit den vorgenannten Angaben verbindet. Wir bitten darum, zu beachten, dass Nutzer mit den Anbietern zusätzliche Abreden, z.B. durch Einwilligung im Rahmen der Registrierung, treffen können.
Wir erhalten grundsätzlich nur Zugang zu zusammengefassten Informationen über den Erfolg unserer Werbeanzeigen. Jedoch können wir im Rahmen sogenannter Konversionsmessungen prüfen, welche unserer Onlinemarketingverfahren zu einer sogenannten Konversion geführt haben, d.h. z.B., zu einem Vertragsschluss mit uns. Die Konversionsmessung wird alleine zur Analyse des Erfolgs unserer Marketingmaßnahmen verwendet.
Solange nicht anders angegeben, bitten wir Sie davon auszugehen, dass verwendete Cookies für einen Zeitraum von zwei Jahren gespeichert werden.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung von Daten die Einwilligung. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h. Interesse an effizienten, wirtschaftlichen und empfängerfreundlichen Leistungen) verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie auch auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung hinweisen.
Facebook-Pixel und Zielgruppenbildung (Custom Audiences)
: Mit Hilfe des Facebook-Pixels (oder vergleichbarer Funktionen, zur Übermittlung von Event-Daten oder Kontaktinformationen mittels von Schnittstellen in Apps) ist es Facebook zum einen möglich, die Besucher unseres Onlineangebotes als Zielgruppe für die Darstellung von Anzeigen (sogenannte "Facebook-Ads") zu bestimmen. Dementsprechend setzen wir das Facebook-Pixel ein, um die durch uns geschalteten Facebook-Ads nur solchen Nutzern bei Facebook und innerhalb der Dienste der mit Facebook kooperierenden Partner (so genanntes "Audience Network"
https://www.facebook.com/audiencenetwork/
) anzuzeigen, die auch ein Interesse an unserem Onlineangebot gezeigt haben oder die bestimmte Merkmale (z.B. Interesse an bestimmten Themen oder Produkten, die anhand der besuchten Webseiten ersichtlich werden) aufweisen, die wir an Facebook übermitteln (sogenannte "Custom Audiences“). Mit Hilfe des Facebook-Pixels möchten wir auch sicherstellen, dass unsere Facebook-Ads dem potentiellen Interesse der Nutzer entsprechen und nicht belästigend wirken. Mit Hilfe des Facebook-Pixels können wir ferner die Wirksamkeit der Facebook-Werbeanzeigen für statistische und Marktforschungszwecke nachvollziehen, indem wir sehen, ob Nutzer nach dem Klick auf eine Facebook-Werbeanzeige auf unsere Webseite weitergeleitet wurden (sogenannte "Konversionsmessung“).
Wir sind gemeinsam mit Facebook Irland Ltd. für die Erhebung oder den Erhalt im Rahmen einer Übermittlung (jedoch nicht die weitere Verarbeitung) von "Event-Daten", die Facebook mittels des Facebook-Pixels und vergleichbarer Funktionen (z. B. Schnittstellen), die auf unserem Onlineangebot ausgeführt werden, erhebt oder im Rahmen einer Übermittlung zu folgenden Zwecken erhält, gemeinsam verantwortlich: a) Anzeige von Inhalten Werbeinformationen, die den mutmaßlichen Interessen der Nutzer entsprechen; b) Zustellung kommerzieller und transaktionsbezogener Nachrichten (z. B. Ansprache von Nutzern via Facebook-Messenger); c) Verbesserung der Anzeigenauslieferung und Personalisierung von Funktionen und Inhalten (z. B. Verbesserung der Erkennung, welche Inhalte oder Werbeinformationen mutmaßlich den Interessen der Nutzer entsprechen). Wir haben mit Facebook eine spezielle Vereinbarung abgeschlossen ("Zusatz für Verantwortliche",
https://www.facebook.com/legal/controller_addendum
), in der insbesondere geregelt wird, welche Sicherheitsmaßnahmen Facebook beachten muss (
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/data_security_terms
) und in der Facebook sich bereit erklärt hat die Betroffenenrechte zu erfüllen (d. h. Nutzer können z. B. Auskünfte oder Löschungsanfragen direkt an Facebook richten). Hinweis: Wenn Facebook uns Messwerte, Analysen und Berichte bereitstellt (die aggregiert sind, d. h. keine Angaben zu einzelnen Nutzern erhalten und für uns anonym sind), dann erfolgt diese Verarbeitung nicht im Rahmen der gemeinsamen Verantwortlichkeit, sondern auf Grundlage eines Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrages ("Datenverarbeitungsbedingungen ",
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/dataprocessing
) , der "Datensicherheitsbedingungen" (
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/data_security_terms
) sowie im Hinblick auf die Verarbeitung in den USA auf Grundlage von Standardvertragsklauseln ("Facebook-EU-Datenübermittlungszusatz,
https://www.facebook.com/legal/EU_data_transfer_addendum). Die
Rechte der Nutzer (insbesondere auf Auskunft, Löschung, Widerspruch und Beschwerde bei zuständiger Aufsichtsbehörde), werden durch die Vereinbarungen mit Facebook nicht eingeschränkt.
Facebook - Zielgruppen Bildung via Datenupload
: Wir übermitteln Kontaktinformationen (Namen, E-Mail-Adressen und Telefonnummern) in Listenform an Facebook zwecks Bildung von Zielgruppen (sog. "Custom Audiences") für eine an den mutmaßlichen Interessen der Nutzer orientierte Anzeige von Inhalten und Werbeinformationen. Die Übermittlung und Abgleich mit bei Facebook vorhandenen Daten erfolgen nicht im Klartext, sondern als so genannte "Hashwerte", also mathematische Abbildungen der Daten (diese Methode wird z. B. bei der Speicherung von Passwörtern verwendet). Nach dem Abgleich zwecks Bildung von Zielgruppen, werden die Kontaktinformationen gelöscht. Die Verarbeitung der Kontaktinformationen erfolgt auf Grundlage eines Auftragsverarbeitungsvertrages mit Facebook Irland Ltd. ("Datenverarbeitungsbedingungen ",
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/dataprocessing
), der "Datensicherheitsbedingungen" (
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/data_security_terms
) sowie im Hinblick auf die Verarbeitung in den USA auf Grundlage von Standardvertragsklauseln ("Facebook-EU-Datenübermittlungszusatz,
https://www.facebook.com/legal/EU_data_transfer_addendum
). Weitere Informationen zur Verarbeitung von Kontaktinformationen finden sich in den "Nutzungsbedingungen für Custom Audiences mit Kundenliste",
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/customaudience.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen), Event-Daten (Facebook) ("Event-Daten" sind Daten, die z. B. via Facebook-Pixel (via Apps oder auf anderen Wegen) von uns an Facebook übermittelt werden können und sich auf Personen oder deren Handlungen beziehen; Zu den Daten gehören z. B. Angaben über Besuche auf Websites, Interaktionen mit Inhalten, Funktionen, Installationen von Apps, Käufe von Produkten, etc.; die Event-Daten werden zwecks Bildung von Zielgruppen für Inhalte und Werbeinformationen (Custom Audiences) verarbeitet; Event Daten beinhalten nicht die eigentlichen Inhalte (wie z. B. verfasste Kommentare), keine Login-Informationen und keine Kontaktinformationen (also keine Namen, E-Mail-Adressen und Telefonnummern). Event Daten werden durch Facebook nach maximal zwei Jahren gelöscht, die aus ihnen gebildeten Zielgruppen mit der Löschung unseres Facebook-Kontos), Kontaktinformationen (Facebook) ("Kontaktinformationen" sind Daten, die betroffene Personen (klar) identifizieren, wie z. B. Namen, E-Mail-Adressen und Telefonnummern, die an Facebook, z. B. via Facebook-Pixel oder Upload zu Abgleichzwecken zwecks Bildung von Custom Audiences übermittelt werden können; Nach dem Abgleich zwecks Bildung von Zielgruppen, werden die Kontaktinformationen gelöscht).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Marketing, Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen), Konversionsmessung (Messung der Effektivität von Marketingmaßnahmen), Remarketing, Zielgruppenbildung, Zielgruppenbildung (Bestimmung von für Marketingzwecke relevanten Zielgruppen oder sonstige Ausgabe von Inhalten).
Sicherheitsmaßnahmen:
IP-Masking (Pseudonymisierung der IP-Adresse).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
Wir verweisen auf die Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Anbieter und die zu den Anbietern angegebenen Widerspruchsmöglichkeiten (sog. "Opt-Out"). Sofern keine explizite Opt-Out-Möglichkeit angegeben wurde, besteht zum einen die Möglichkeit, dass Sie Cookies in den Einstellungen Ihres Browsers abschalten. Hierdurch können jedoch Funktionen unseres Onlineangebotes eingeschränkt werden. Wir empfehlen daher zusätzlich die folgenden Opt-Out-Möglichkeiten, die zusammenfassend auf jeweilige Gebiete gerichtet angeboten werden: a) Europa:
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu
. b) Kanada:
https://www.youradchoices.ca/choices
. c) USA:
https://www.aboutads.info/choices
. d) Gebietsübergreifend:
https://optout.aboutads.info
.
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Google Ads und Konversionsmessung:
Wir nutzen das Onlinemarketingverfahren "Google Ads", um Anzeigen im Google-Werbe-Netzwerk zu platzieren (z.B., in Suchergebnissen, in Videos, auf Webseiten, etc.), damit sie Nutzern angezeigt werden, die ein mutmaßliches Interesse an den Anzeigen haben. Ferner messen wir die Konversion der Anzeigen. Wir erfahren jedoch nur die anonyme Gesamtanzahl der Nutzer, die auf unsere Anzeige geklickt haben und zu einer mit einem sog "Conversion-Tracking-Tag" versehenen Seite weitergeleitet wurden. Wir selbst erhalten jedoch keine Informationen, mit denen sich Nutzer identifizieren lassen. Dienstanbieter: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland, parent company: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Website:
https://marketingplatform.google.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
.
Facebook-Pixel und Zielgruppenbildung (Custom Audiences):
Dienstanbieter:
https://www.facebook.com
, Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Facebook, 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA; Website:
https://www.facebook.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
.
LinkedIn:
Insights Tag / Konversionsmessung; Dienstanbieter: LinkedIn Corporation, 2029 Stierlin Court, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Website:
https://www.linkedin.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
, Cookie-Policy:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/cookie_policy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
.
Angebot eines Affiliate-Programms
Wir bieten ein Affiliate-Programm an, d.h., Provisionen oder sonstige Vorteile (zusammenfassend bezeichnet als "Provision") für Nutzer (bezeichnet als "Affiliates“), die auf unsere Angebote und Leistungen verweisen. Der Verweis erfolgt mittels eines dem jeweiligen Affiliate zugeordneten Links oder anderer Methoden (z.B. Rabatt-Codes), die es uns erlauben, zu erkennen, dass die Inanspruchnahme unserer Leistungen auf dem Verweis beruhte (zusammenfassend bezeichnet als "Affiliate-Links").
Um nachverfolgen zu können, ob die Nutzer unsere Leistungen aufgrund der von den Affiliates eingesetzten Affiliate-Links wahrgenommen haben, ist es notwendig, dass wir erfahren, dass die Nutzer einem Affiliate-Link gefolgt sind. Die Zuordnung der Affiliate-Links zu den jeweiligen Geschäftsabschlüssen oder zur sonstigen Inanspruchnahme unserer Leistungen dient alleine dem Zweck der Provisionsabrechnung und wird aufgehoben, sobald sie für den Zweck nicht mehr erforderlich ist.
Für die Zwecke der vorgenannten Zuordnung der Affiliate-Links können die Affiliate-Links um bestimmte Werte ergänzt werden, die ein Bestandteil des Links sind oder anderweitig, z.B. in einem Cookie, gespeichert werden können. Zu den Werten können insbesondere die Ausgangswebseite (Referrer), der Zeitpunkt, eine Online-Kennung der Betreiber der Webseite, auf der sich der Affiliate-Link befand, eine Online-Kennung des jeweiligen Angebotes, die Art des verwendeten Links, die Art des Angebotes und eine Online-Kennung des Nutzers gehören.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung von Daten die Einwilligung. Ferner kann deren Einsatz ein Bestandteil unserer (vor)vertraglichen Leistungen sein, sofern der Einsatz der Drittanbieter in diesem Rahmen vereinbart wurde. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h. Interesse an effizienten, wirtschaftlichen und empfängerfreundlichen Leistungen) verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie auch auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung hinweisen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Vertragsdaten (z.B. Vertragsgegenstand, Laufzeit, Kundenkategorie), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten), Geschäfts- und Vertragspartner.
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice, Affiliate-Nachverfolgung.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Präsenzen in sozialen Netzwerken (Social Media)
Wir unterhalten Onlinepräsenzen innerhalb sozialer Netzwerke und verarbeiten in diesem Rahmen Daten der Nutzer, um mit den dort aktiven Nutzern zu kommunizieren oder um Informationen über uns anzubieten.
Wir weisen darauf hin, dass dabei Daten der Nutzer außerhalb des Raumes der Europäischen Union verarbeitet werden können. Hierdurch können sich für die Nutzer Risiken ergeben, weil so z.B. die Durchsetzung der Rechte der Nutzer erschwert werden könnte.
Ferner werden die Daten der Nutzer innerhalb sozialer Netzwerke im Regelfall für Marktforschungs- und Werbezwecke verarbeitet. So können z.B. anhand des Nutzungsverhaltens und sich daraus ergebender Interessen der Nutzer Nutzungsprofile erstellt werden. Die Nutzungsprofile können wiederum verwendet werden, um z.B. Werbeanzeigen innerhalb und außerhalb der Netzwerke zu schalten, die mutmaßlich den Interessen der Nutzer entsprechen. Zu diesen Zwecken werden im Regelfall Cookies auf den Rechnern der Nutzer gespeichert, in denen das Nutzungsverhalten und die Interessen der Nutzer gespeichert werden. Ferner können in den Nutzungsprofilen auch Daten unabhängig der von den Nutzern verwendeten Geräte gespeichert werden (insbesondere, wenn die Nutzer Mitglieder der jeweiligen Plattformen sind und bei diesen eingeloggt sind).
Für eine detaillierte Darstellung der jeweiligen Verarbeitungsformen und der Widerspruchsmöglichkeiten (Opt-Out) verweisen wir auf die Datenschutzerklärungen und Angaben der Betreiber der jeweiligen Netzwerke.
Auch im Fall von Auskunftsanfragen und der Geltendmachung von Betroffenenrechten weisen wir darauf hin, dass diese am effektivsten bei den Anbietern geltend gemacht werden können. Nur die Anbieter haben jeweils Zugriff auf die Daten der Nutzer und können direkt entsprechende Maßnahmen ergreifen und Auskünfte geben. Sollten Sie dennoch Hilfe benötigen, dann können Sie sich an uns wenden.
Facebook
: Wir sind gemeinsam mit Facebook Irland Ltd. für die Erhebung (jedoch nicht die weitere Verarbeitung) von Daten der Besucher unserer Facebook-Seite (sog. "Fanpage") verantwortlich. Zu diesen Daten gehören Informationen zu den Arten von Inhalten, die Nutzer sich ansehen oder mit denen sie interagieren, oder die von ihnen vorgenommenen Handlungen (siehe unter „Von dir und anderen getätigte und bereitgestellte Dinge“ in der Facebook-Datenrichtlinie:
https://www.facebook.com/policy
), sowie Informationen über die von den Nutzern genutzten Geräte (z. B. IP-Adressen, Betriebssystem, Browsertyp, Spracheinstellungen, Cookie-Daten; siehe unter „Geräteinformationen“ in der Facebook-Datenrichtlinie-erklärung:
https://www.facebook.com/policy
). Wie in der Facebook-Datenrichtlinie unter „Wie verwenden wir diese Informationen?“ erläutert, erhebt und verwendet Facebook Informationen auch, um Analysedienste, so genannte "Seiten-Insights", für Seitenbetreiber bereitzustellen, damit diese Erkenntnisse darüber erhalten, wie Personen mit ihren Seiten und mit den mit ihnen verbundenen Inhalten interagieren. Wir haben mit Facebook eine spezielle Vereinbarung abgeschlossen ("Informationen zu Seiten-Insights",
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/page_controller_addendum
), in der insbesondere geregelt wird, welche Sicherheitsmaßnahmen Facebook beachten muss und in der Facebook sich bereit erklärt hat die Betroffenenrechte zu erfüllen (d. h. Nutzer können z. B. Auskünfte oder Löschungsanfragen direkt an Facebook richten). Die Rechte der Nutzer (insbesondere auf Auskunft, Löschung, Widerspruch und Beschwerde bei zuständiger Aufsichtsbehörde), werden durch die Vereinbarungen mit Facebook nicht eingeschränkt. Weitere Hinweise finden sich in den "Informationen zu Seiten-Insights" (
https://www.facebook.com/legal/terms/information_about_page_insights_data
).
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Kontaktanfragen und Kommunikation, Feedback (z.B. Sammeln von Feedback via Online-Formular), Marketing.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Instagram:
Soziales Netzwerk; Dienstanbieter: Instagram Inc., 1601 Willow Road, Menlo Park, CA, 94025, USA, Mutterunternehmen: Facebook, 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA; Website:
https://www.instagram.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://instagram.com/about/legal/privacy
.
Facebook:
Soziales Netzwerk; Dienstanbieter: Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, Dublin 2, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Facebook, 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA; Website:
https://www.facebook.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out): Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
.
LinkedIn:
Soziales Netzwerk; Dienstanbieter: LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company, Wilton Place, Dublin 2, Irland; Website:
https://www.linkedin.com
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
https://www.linkedin.com/psettings/guest-controls/retargeting-opt-out
.
Twitter:
Soziales Netzwerk; Dienstanbieter: Twitter International Company, One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street, Dublin 2 D02 AX07, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Twitter Inc., 1355 Market Street, Suite 900, San Francisco, CA 94103, USA; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://twitter.com/de/privacy
, (Einstellungen)
https://twitter.com/personalization
.
YouTube:
Soziales Netzwerk und Videoplattform; Dienstanbieter: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
Xing:
Soziales Netzwerk; Dienstanbieter: XING AG, Dammtorstraße 29-32, 20354 Hamburg, Deutschland; Website:
https://www.xing.de
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://privacy.xing.com/de/datenschutzerklaerung.
Plugins und eingebettete Funktionen sowie Inhalte
Wir binden in unser Onlineangebot Funktions- und Inhaltselemente ein, die von den Servern ihrer jeweiligen Anbieter (nachfolgend bezeichnet als "Drittanbieter”) bezogen werden. Dabei kann es sich zum Beispiel um Grafiken, Videos oder Stadtpläne handeln (nachfolgend einheitlich bezeichnet als "Inhalte”).
Die Einbindung setzt immer voraus, dass die Drittanbieter dieser Inhalte die IP-Adresse der Nutzer verarbeiten, da sie ohne die IP-Adresse die Inhalte nicht an deren Browser senden könnten. Die IP-Adresse ist damit für die Darstellung dieser Inhalte oder Funktionen erforderlich. Wir bemühen uns, nur solche Inhalte zu verwenden, deren jeweilige Anbieter die IP-Adresse lediglich zur Auslieferung der Inhalte verwenden. Drittanbieter können ferner sogenannte Pixel-Tags (unsichtbare Grafiken, auch als "Web Beacons" bezeichnet) für statistische oder Marketingzwecke verwenden. Durch die "Pixel-Tags" können Informationen, wie der Besucherverkehr auf den Seiten dieser Webseite, ausgewertet werden. Die pseudonymen Informationen können ferner in Cookies auf dem Gerät der Nutzer gespeichert werden und unter anderem technische Informationen zum Browser und zum Betriebssystem, zu verweisenden Webseiten, zur Besuchszeit sowie weitere Angaben zur Nutzung unseres Onlineangebotes enthalten als auch mit solchen Informationen aus anderen Quellen verbunden werden.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung von Daten die Einwilligung. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h. Interesse an effizienten, wirtschaftlichen und empfängerfreundlichen Leistungen) verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie auch auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung hinweisen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Bereitstellung unseres Onlineangebotes und Nutzerfreundlichkeit, Erbringung vertragliche Leistungen und Kundenservice.
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
YouTube:
Soziales Netzwerk und Videoplattform; Dienstanbieter: Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, Mutterunternehmen: Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
; Widerspruchsmöglichkeit (Opt-Out):
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated
.
Management, Organisation und Hilfswerkzeuge
Wir setzen Dienstleistungen, Plattformen und Software anderer Anbieter (nachfolgend bezeichnet als "Drittanbieter”) zu Zwecken der Organisation, Verwaltung, Planung sowie Erbringung unserer Leistungen ein. Bei der Auswahl der Drittanbieter und ihrer Leistungen beachten wir die gesetzlichen Vorgaben.
In diesem Rahmen können personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet und auf den Servern der Drittanbieter gespeichert werden. Hiervon können diverse Daten betroffen sein, die wir entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung verarbeiten. Zu diesen Daten können insbesondere Stammdaten und Kontaktdaten der Nutzer, Daten zu Vorgängen, Verträgen, sonstigen Prozessen und deren Inhalte gehören.
Sofern Nutzer im Rahmen der Kommunikation, von Geschäfts- oder anderen Beziehungen mit uns auf die Drittanbieter bzw. deren Software oder Plattformen verwiesen werden, können die Drittanbieter Nutzungsdaten und Metadaten zu Sicherheitszwecken, zur Serviceoptimierung oder zu Marketingzwecken verarbeiten. Wir bitten daher darum, die Datenschutzhinweise der jeweiligen Drittanbieter zu beachten.
Hinweise zu Rechtsgrundlagen:
Sofern wir die Nutzer um deren Einwilligung in den Einsatz der Drittanbieter bitten, ist die Rechtsgrundlage der Verarbeitung von Daten die Einwilligung. Ferner kann deren Einsatz ein Bestandteil unserer (vor)vertraglichen Leistungen sein, sofern der Einsatz der Drittanbieter in diesem Rahmen vereinbart wurde. Ansonsten werden die Daten der Nutzer auf Grundlage unserer berechtigten Interessen (d.h. Interesse an effizienten, wirtschaftlichen und empfängerfreundlichen Leistungen) verarbeitet. In diesem Zusammenhang möchten wir Sie auch auf die Informationen zur Verwendung von Cookies in dieser Datenschutzerklärung hinweisen.
Verarbeitete Datenarten:
Bestandsdaten (z.B. Namen, Adressen), Kontaktdaten (z.B. E-Mail, Telefonnummern), Inhaltsdaten (z.B. Eingaben in Onlineformularen), Nutzungsdaten (z.B. besuchte Webseiten, Interesse an Inhalten, Zugriffszeiten), Meta-/Kommunikationsdaten (z.B. Geräte-Informationen, IP-Adressen).
Betroffene Personen:
Kommunikationspartner, Nutzer (z.B. Webseitenbesucher, Nutzer von Onlinediensten).
Zwecke der Verarbeitung:
Reichweitenmessung (z.B. Zugriffsstatistiken, Erkennung wiederkehrender Besucher), Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen (Erstellen von Nutzerprofilen).
Rechtsgrundlagen:
Einwilligung (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. a. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. b. DSGVO), Berechtigte Interessen (Art. 6 Abs. 1 S. 1 lit. f. DSGVO), Vertragserfüllung und vorvertragliche Anfragen (EKD) (§ 6 Nr. 5 DSG-EKD).
Eingesetzte Dienste und Diensteanbieter:
Confluence:
Software zur Erstellung und Administration von Wiki- & Wissens-Plattformen; Dienstanbieter: Atlassian Inc. (San Francisco, Harrison Street Location), 1098 Harrison Street, San Francisco, California 94103, USA; Website:
https://www.atlassian.com/software/confluence
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
HubSpot:
Social Media Publishing, Reporting (z.B. Traffic-Quellen, Zugriffszahlen, Webanalyse), Kontaktmanagement (z.B. Kontaktformulare, Direktkommunikation und Nutzersegmentierung), Landing Pages; Dienstanbieter: HubSpot, Inc., 25 First St., 2nd floor, Cambridge, Massachusetts 02141, USA; Website:
https://www.hubspot.de
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://legal.hubspot.com/de/privacy-policy
.
Jira:
Webanwendung zur Fehlerverwaltung, Problembehandlung und operativem Projektmanagement; Dienstanbieter: Atlassian Inc. (San Francisco, Harrison Street Location), 1098 Harrison Street, San Francisco, California 94103, USA; Website:
https://www.atlassian.com/software/jira
; Datenschutzerklärung:
https://www.atlassian.com/legal/privacy-policy
.
Löschung von Daten
Die von uns verarbeiteten Daten werden nach Maßgabe der gesetzlichen Vorgaben gelöscht, sobald deren zur Verarbeitung erlaubten Einwilligungen widerrufen werden oder sonstige Erlaubnisse entfallen (z.B., wenn der Zweck der Verarbeitung dieser Daten entfallen ist oder sie für den Zweck nicht erforderlich sind).
Sofern die Daten nicht gelöscht werden, weil sie für andere und gesetzlich zulässige Zwecke erforderlich sind, wird deren Verarbeitung auf diese Zwecke beschränkt. D.h., die Daten werden gesperrt und nicht für andere Zwecke verarbeitet. Das gilt z.B. für Daten, die aus handels- oder steuerrechtlichen Gründen aufbewahrt werden müssen oder deren Speicherung zur Geltendmachung, Ausübung oder Verteidigung von Rechtsansprüchen oder zum Schutz der Rechte einer anderen natürlichen oder juristischen Person erforderlich ist.
Im Rahmen unserer Datenschutzhinweise können wir den Nutzern weitere Informationen zu der Löschung sowie zu der Aufbewahrung von Daten mitteilen, die speziell für die jeweiligen Verarbeitungsprozesses gelten.
Änderung und Aktualisierung der Datenschutzerklärung
Wir bitten Sie, sich regelmäßig über den Inhalt unserer Datenschutzerklärung zu informieren. Wir passen die Datenschutzerklärung an, sobald die Änderungen der von uns durchgeführten Datenverarbeitungen dies erforderlich machen. Wir informieren Sie, sobald durch die Änderungen eine Mitwirkungshandlung Ihrerseits (z.B. Einwilligung) oder eine sonstige individuelle Benachrichtigung erforderlich wird.
Sofern wir in dieser Datenschutzerklärung Adressen und Kontaktinformationen von Unternehmen und Organisationen angeben, bitten wir zu beachten, dass die Adressen sich über die Zeit ändern können und bitten die Angaben vor Kontaktaufnahme zu prüfen.
Rechte der betroffenen Personen
Ihnen stehen als Betroffene nach der DSGVO verschiedene Rechte zu, die sich insbesondere aus Art. 15 bis 21 DSGVO ergeben:
Widerspruchsrecht: Sie haben das Recht, aus Gründen, die sich aus Ihrer besonderen Situation ergeben, jederzeit gegen die Verarbeitung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten, die aufgrund von Art. 6 Abs. 1 lit. e oder f DSGVO erfolgt, Widerspruch einzulegen; dies gilt auch für ein auf diese Bestimmungen gestütztes Profiling. Werden die Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten verarbeitet, um Direktwerbung zu betreiben, haben Sie das Recht, jederzeit Widerspruch gegen die Verarbeitung der Sie betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten zum Zwecke derartiger Werbung einzulegen; dies gilt auch für das Profiling, soweit es mit solcher Direktwerbung in Verbindung steht.
Widerrufsrecht bei Einwilligungen:
Sie haben das Recht, erteilte Einwilligungen jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Auskunftsrecht:
Sie haben das Recht, eine Bestätigung darüber zu verlangen, ob betreffende Daten verarbeitet werden und auf Auskunft über diese Daten sowie auf weitere Informationen und Kopie der Daten entsprechend den gesetzlichen Vorgaben.
Recht auf Berichtigung:
Sie haben entsprechend den gesetzlichen Vorgaben das Recht, die Vervollständigung der Sie betreffenden Daten oder die Berichtigung der Sie betreffenden unrichtigen Daten zu verlangen.
Recht auf Löschung und Einschränkung der Verarbeitung:
Sie haben nach Maßgabe der gesetzlichen Vorgaben das Recht, zu verlangen, dass Sie betreffende Daten unverzüglich gelöscht werden, bzw. alternativ nach Maßgabe der gesetzlichen Vorgaben eine Einschränkung der Verarbeitung der Daten zu verlangen.
Recht auf Datenübertragbarkeit:
Sie haben das Recht, Sie betreffende Daten, die Sie uns bereitgestellt haben, nach Maßgabe der gesetzlichen Vorgaben in einem strukturierten, gängigen und maschinenlesbaren Format zu erhalten oder deren Übermittlung an einen anderen Verantwortlichen zu fordern.
Beschwerde bei Aufsichtsbehörde:
Entsprechend den gesetzlichen Vorgaben und unbeschadet eines anderweitigen verwaltungsrechtlichen oder gerichtlichen Rechtsbehelfs, haben Sie ferner das Recht, bei einer Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde, insbesondere einer Aufsichtsbehörde im Mitgliedstaat, in dem Sie sich gewöhnlich aufhalten, der Aufsichtsbehörde Ihres Arbeitsplatzes oder des Ortes des mutmaßlichen Verstoßes, eine Beschwerde einzulegen, wenn Sie der Ansicht sei sollten, dass die Verarbeitung der Ihre Person betreffenden personenbezogenen Daten gegen die DSGVO verstößt.
Begriffsdefinitionen
In diesem Abschnitt erhalten Sie eine Übersicht über die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung verwendeten Begrifflichkeiten. Viele der Begriffe sind dem Gesetz entnommen und vor allem im Art. 4 DSGVO definiert. Die gesetzlichen Definitionen sind verbindlich. Die nachfolgenden Erläuterungen sollen dagegen vor allem dem Verständnis dienen. Die Begriffe sind alphabetisch sortiert.
Affiliate-Nachverfolgung:
Im Rahmen der Affiliate-Nachverfolgung werden Links, mit deren Hilfe die verlinkenden Webseiten Nutzer zu Webseiten mit Produkt- oder sonstigen Angeboten verweisen, protokolliert. Die Betreiber der jeweils verlinkenden Webseiten können eine Provision erhalten, wenn Nutzer diesen sogenannten Affiliate-Links folgen und anschließend die Angebote wahrnehmen (z.B. Waren kaufen oder Dienstleistungen in Anspruch nehmen). Hierzu ist es erforderlich, dass die Anbieter nachverfolgen können, ob Nutzer, die sich für bestimmte Angebote interessieren, diese anschließend auf die Veranlassung der Affiliate-Links wahrnehmen. Daher ist es für die Funktionsfähigkeit von Affiliate-Links erforderlich, dass sie um bestimmte Werte ergänzt werden, die ein Bestandteil des Links werden oder anderweitig, z.B. in einem Cookie, gespeichert werden. Zu den Werten gehören insbesondere die Ausgangswebseite (Referrer), der Zeitpunkt, eine Online-Kennung der Betreiber der Webseite, auf der sich der Affiliate-Link befand, eine Online-Kennung des jeweiligen Angebotes, eine Online-Kennung des Nutzers als auch nachverfolgungsspezifische Werte, wie, z.B. Werbemittel-ID, Partner-ID und Kategorisierungen
Content Delivery Network (CDN):
Ein "Content Delivery Network" (CDN) ist ein Dienst, mit dessen Hilfe Inhalte eines Onlineangebotes, insbesondere große Mediendateien, wie Grafiken oder Programm-Skripte mit Hilfe regional verteilter und über das Internet verbundener Server, schneller und sicherer ausgeliefert werden können.
IP-Masking:
Als "IP-Masking” wird eine Methode bezeichnet, bei der das letzte Oktett, d.h., die letzten beiden Zahlen einer IP-Adresse, gelöscht wird, damit die IP-Adresse nicht mehr der eindeutigen Identifizierung einer Person dienen kann. Daher ist das IP-Masking ein Mittel zur Pseudonymisierung von Verarbeitungsverfahren, insbesondere im Onlinemarketing
Konversionsmessung:
Die Konversionsmessung (auch als "Besuchsaktionsauswertung" bezeichnet) ist ein Verfahren, mit dem die Wirksamkeit von Marketingmaßnahmen festgestellt werden kann. Dazu wird im Regelfall ein Cookie auf den Geräten der Nutzer innerhalb der Webseiten, auf denen die Marketingmaßnahmen erfolgen, gespeichert und dann erneut auf der Zielwebseite abgerufen. Beispielsweise können wir so nachvollziehen, ob die von uns auf anderen Webseiten geschalteten Anzeigen erfolgreich waren.
Personenbezogene Daten:
"Personenbezogene Daten“ sind alle Informationen, die sich auf eine identifizierte oder identifizierbare natürliche Person (im Folgenden "betroffene Person“) beziehen; als identifizierbar wird eine natürliche Person angesehen, die direkt oder indirekt, insbesondere mittels Zuordnung zu einer Kennung wie einem Namen, zu einer Kennnummer, zu Standortdaten, zu einer Online-Kennung (z.B. Cookie) oder zu einem oder mehreren besonderen Merkmalen identifiziert werden kann, die Ausdruck der physischen, physiologischen, genetischen, psychischen, wirtschaftlichen, kulturellen oder sozialen Identität dieser natürlichen Person sind.
Profile mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen:
Die Verarbeitung von "Profilen mit nutzerbezogenen Informationen", bzw. kurz "Profilen" umfasst jede Art der automatisierten Verarbeitung personenbezogener Daten, die darin besteht, dass diese personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden, um bestimmte persönliche Aspekte, die sich auf eine natürliche Person beziehen (je nach Art der Profilbildung können dazu unterschiedliche Informationen betreffend die Demographie, Verhalten und Interessen, wie z.B. die Interaktion mit Webseiten und deren Inhalten, etc.) zu analysieren, zu bewerten oder, um sie vorherzusagen (z.B. die Interessen an bestimmten Inhalten oder Produkten, das Klickverhalten auf einer Webseite oder den Aufenthaltsort). Zu Zwecken des Profilings werden häufig Cookies und Web-Beacons eingesetzt.
Reichweitenmessung:
Die Reichweitenmessung (auch als Web Analytics bezeichnet) dient der Auswertung der Besucherströme eines Onlineangebotes und kann das Verhalten oder Interessen der Besucher an bestimmten Informationen, wie z.B. Inhalten von Webseiten, umfassen. Mit Hilfe der Reichweitenanalyse können Webseiteninhaber z.B. erkennen, zu welcher Zeit Besucher ihre Webseite besuchen und für welche Inhalte sie sich interessieren. Dadurch können sie z.B. die Inhalte der Webseite besser an die Bedürfnisse ihrer Besucher anpassen. Zu Zwecken der Reichweitenanalyse werden häufig pseudonyme Cookies und Web-Beacons eingesetzt, um wiederkehrende Besucher zu erkennen und so genauere Analysen zur Nutzung eines Onlineangebotes zu erhalten.
Remarketing:
Vom "Remarketing“ bzw. "Retargeting“ spricht man, wenn z.B. zu Werbezwecken vermerkt wird, für welche Produkte sich ein Nutzer auf einer Webseite interessiert hat, um den Nutzer auf anderen Webseiten an diese Produkte, z.B. in Werbeanzeigen, zu erinnern.
Verantwortlicher:
Als "Verantwortlicher“ wird die natürliche oder juristische Person, Behörde, Einrichtung oder andere Stelle, die allein oder gemeinsam mit anderen über die Zwecke und Mittel der Verarbeitung von personenbezogenen Daten entscheidet, bezeichnet.
Verarbeitung:
"Verarbeitung" ist jeder mit oder ohne Hilfe automatisierter Verfahren ausgeführte Vorgang oder jede solche Vorgangsreihe im Zusammenhang mit personenbezogenen Daten. Der Begriff reicht weit und umfasst praktisch jeden Umgang mit Daten, sei es das Erheben, das Auswerten, das Speichern, das Übermitteln oder das Löschen.
Zielgruppenbildung:
Von Zielgruppenbildung (bzw. "Custom Audiences“) spricht man, wenn Zielgruppen für Werbezwecke, z.B. Einblendung von Werbeanzeigen, bestimmt werden. So kann z.B. anhand des Interesses eines Nutzers an bestimmten Produkten oder Themen im Internet geschlussfolgert werden, dass dieser Nutzer sich für Werbeanzeigen für ähnliche Produkte oder den Onlineshop, in dem er die Produkte betrachtet hat, interessiert. Von "Lookalike Audiences“ (bzw. ähnlichen Zielgruppen) spricht man wiederum, wenn die als geeignet eingeschätzten Inhalte Nutzern angezeigt werden, deren Profile bzw. Interessen mutmaßlich den Nutzern, zu denen die Profile gebildet wurden, entsprechen. Zu Zwecken der Bildung von Custom Audiences und Lookalike Audiences werden im Regelfall Cookies und Web-Beacons eingesetzt.
Podigee Newsletter Abonnieren
Den Podigee Newsletter Abonnieren
Wenn du vor dem Abonnieren mehr zum Newsletter erfahren möchtest, findest du
hier
alles darüber.
*
Pflichtfeld
E-Mail-Adresse
*
Vorname
Nachname
Datenschutz
Bitte stimme zu, dass du den Podigee Newsletter erhalten möchtest:
Podigee Newsletter
Du kannst dich jederzeit wieder abmelden, indem du auf den Link in der Fußzeile des Newsletters klickst.Für mehr Informationen zu unserem Datenschutz: https://www.podigee.com/de/ueber-uns/datenschutz/
Wir nutzen Mailchimp als unsere Marketing-Plattform. Durch den Klick auf Abonnieren nimmst du zur Kenntnis, dass deine Informationen zur Bearbeitung an Mailchimp gesendet werden.
Erfahre mehr
über
            Mailchimp's Datenschutz.
Abonnieren
Sub-policy 39
https://www.dacast.com/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
Last updated: July 29, 2020
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully to understand how DACAST, its subsidiary and affiliate corporations, successors, and assigns (collectively referred to as “DACAST”) use and protect the information you provide. This privacy policy (the “Privacy Policy”) applies to this World Wide Web site and any variations or successors to this website (www.DACAST.com, the “DACAST Site”), any DACAST computer software downloadable or otherwise available from the DACAST Site (“DACAST Software”) and any DACAST services purchased or otherwise made available from the DACAST Site (“DACAST Services” and “DACAST Video Streaming Services“) (collectively, the “DACAST Properties”). This Privacy Policy (“Privacy Policy”) applies to all Users (“Users”) of the DACAST Properties.
1. WHAT INFORMATION DACAST COLLECTS FROM YOU
DACAST may collect two (2) types of information about you: Personal and Non-Personal.
1.1 Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that lets DACAST know the specifics of who you are and which may be used to identify, contact, or locate you (e.g. name, mailing address, telephone number and email address). DACAST may collect Personal Information when you use the DACAST Properties including, without limitation, setting up account information, filling out surveys, corresponding with DACAST, or otherwise volunteering information about yourself.
1.2 Non-Personal Information
Non-Personal Information refers to information that, by itself, does not identify you as a specific individual (e.g. demographic information or website visitations). DACAST may collect Non-Personal Information through any of the methods discussed above as well as automatically through the use of industry-standard technologies described further below.
1.3 Types of Data Collected
We collect all types of data from our visitors, including hashed emails, etc in order to track visitors’ cross-device, via email, by partners like NextRoll.
1.4 California Residents
If you are a California resident and would like more information about how your data is used by our partners you can find it here:
California Residents section of NextRoll’s Service Privacy Notice
.
2. HOW DACAST COLLECTS YOUR INFORMATION
The Personal Information practices set forth apply to all DACAST’s customers worldwide.
2.1. Registration
Prior to using one or more of the DACAST Properties, DACAST may require certain Personal Information and Non-Personal Information to create an individual account (“Account”) or to enable features or functionality of the DACAST Properties. Failure to provide all required information required by DACAST may prevent access to any or all DACAST Properties, and failure to maintain accurate information may result in suspension or termination of access to any or all DACAST Properties.
2.2 Information Collected Through Technology
While you are able to visit the DACAST Site and remain anonymous, DACAST or its third-party service providers may still collect Non-Personal Information about your use of the DACAST Properties (e.g. your Internet browser, operating system, IP address, connection speed, and the domain name of your Internet service provider). Such information may be gathered by the following methods:
(a) Cookies. Cookies, including local shared objects, are small pieces of information that are stored by your browser on your computer’s hard drive which works by assigning to your computer a unique number that has no meaning outside of the DACAST Site. Cookies do not generally contain any Personal Information. Most web browsers automatically accept cookies, but you can usually configure your browser to prevent this. Not accepting cookies may make certain features of the DACAST Properties unavailable to you.
(b) IP Address. You may visit many areas of the DACAST Site anonymously without the need to become a registered User. Even in such cases, DACAST may collect IP addresses automatically. An IP address is a number that is automatically assigned to your computer whenever you begin Services with an Internet services provider. Each time you access the DACAST Site and each time you request one of DACAST’s pages, the server logs your IP address.
(c) Web Beacons. Web beacons are small pieces of data that are embedded in web pages and emails. DACAST may use these technical methods in HTML emails that DACAST sends to Users to determine whether they have opened those emails and/or clicked on links in those emails. The information from the use of these technical methods may be collected in a form that constitutes Personal Information.
(d) Tracking Content Usage. If you use the DACAST Services and you post audiovisual materials including, without limitation, text, logos, artwork, graphics, pictures, advertisements, sound and other related intellectual property contained in such materials (collectively, “Content”) to your website or to a third party website, DACAST tracks and captures Non-Personal Information associated with User accounts and the use of Content.
2.3 Cross Device Opt-Out:
If you wish to opt-out from receiving cross-device site advertising (i.e. tracking a user across devices), you can do so by accessing your device setting or visiting and employing the controls described on the
NAI’s Mobile Choices page
.
3. HOW DACAST USES YOUR INFORMATION
3.1 System Administration
DACAST may use Non-Personal Information for the purposes of system administration, assisting in diagnosing problems with DACAST servers, monitoring DACAST’s system performance and traffic on the DACAST Properties and to gather broad demographic information about DACAST customers.
3.2 Personalization
DACAST uses Cookies and IP Addresses to track features such as delivering Content specific to your interests and informing you of new, relevant services or certain third-party offerings.
3.3 Notices to Registered Users
If you have registered for an Account, DACAST may use your Personal Information to send emails regarding your registration, including confirmation to verify the accuracy of any information you have provided, and instructions on how to post Content. DACAST may also send you emails to verify your identity or to notify you if DACAST believes your use of DACAST Properties violates any applicable agreement for the use of the DACAST Properties.
3.4 Advertising
DACAST may use Non-Personal Information to assist in optimizing the delivery of advertisements to viewers of your Content.
3.5 Advertising Opt-Out:
If you wish to opt-out of receiving targeted advertising, you can do so by visiting one of the following links
Digital Advertising Alliance
,
the
Network Advertising Initiative
,
and the
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (Europe only)
.
3.6 Promotional Emails
DACAST may use your Personal Information to send you emails periodically listing promotions or events relating to the DACAST Properties or from DACAST’s marketing partners or sponsors. You have the choice to opt-out of receiving such promotional emails by sending an email to support@DACAST.com and/or following the instructions in such correspondence. Once DACAST has processed your opt-out request, DACAST will not send you promotional emails unless you opt back into receiving such communications.
3.7 Contact Information
If you contact DACAST by telephone, email, or letter, DACAST may keep a record of your contact information and correspondence. If you report a problem with the DACAST Properties, DACAST may collect this information in a file specific to you. You may contact DACAST at help@DACAST.com to request the removal of this information from DACAST’s database.
4. HOW TO ACCESS AND CHANGE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
Upon request, DACAST shall allow Users to update or correct Personal Information previously submitted, but only to the extent, such activities will not compromise privacy or security interests. Additionally, upon request, DACAST shall delete Personal Information from the database where such information is stored; however, it may be impossible to entirely delete a User’s entry without some residual information being retained due to the manner in which data backups are maintained. Requests to delete Personal Information shall be submitted to
support@DACAST.com
.
5. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
DACAST does not sell, trade or rent Personal Information collected through the DACAST Properties to any third party. Notwithstanding the foregoing, DACAST shall: (1) fully cooperate with law enforcement agencies; and (2) may be required to disclose Personal Information upon receipt of a court order, subpoena, or to cooperate with a law enforcement investigation.
Here are the third party data processors, storage, and infrastructure partners:
Billing services (includes Recurly, Stripe, PayPal) to enable payment for the services and the provisioning of the services
Operational data (includes AWS, Akamai, Limelight, Verizon) that enable us to actually provide the streaming services
Paywall services (InPlayer) to provide services allowing our customers to monetize their content through Pay per View and Subscriptions
Communication and customer service tools (includes Akita, Pardot, Salesforce, Helpscout, and Zendesk) to help assist customers and communicate with them
Data tools (includes Google Data Studio, Profitwell) in order to analyze and report within the company to improve the service
6. SAFEGUARDING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
6.1 Security Measures
DACAST takes appropriate security measures to protect against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of Personal Information. These include, but are not limited to, internal reviews of: (a) DACAST’s data collection; (b) storage and processing practices; (c) electronic security measures, and (d) physical security measures to guard against unauthorized access to systems where DACAST stores Personal Information. All DACAST employees, contractors, and agents who access Personal Information are bound by confidentiality obligations and may be subject to discipline, including termination and criminal prosecution or unauthorized use or disclosure of Personal Information.
6.2 Third-Party Links
The DACAST Properties may contain links to third parties who may collect Personal Information and Non-Personal Information directly from you. Additionally, DACAST may use third parties to provide components of the DACAST Properties. In either case, such third parties may have separate privacy policies and data collection practices, independent of DACAST. DACAST: (a) has no responsibility or liability for these independent policies or actions; (b) is not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of such websites; and (c) does not make any warranties or representations about the contents, products or services offered on such websites or the security of any information you provide to them.
7. WHAT ARE YOUR DATA PROTECTION RIGHTS?
DACAST would like to make sure you are fully aware of all of your data protection rights. Every user is entitled to the following:
The right to access
– You have the right to request DACAST for copies of your personal data. We may charge you a small fee for this service.
The right to rectification
– You have the right to request that DACAST correct any information you believe is inaccurate. You also have the right to request DACAST to complete the information you believe is incomplete.
The right to erasure
– You have the right to request that DACAST erase your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to restrict processing
– You have the right to request that DACAST restrict the processing of your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to object to processing
– You have the right to object to DACAST’s processing of your personal data, under certain conditions.
The right to data portability
– You have the right to request that DACAST transfer the data that we have collected to another organization, or directly to you, under certain conditions.
If you make a request, we have one month to respond to you. If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please contact us at our email:
Call us at: +1 855-896-9300
Or write to us:
privacy@dacast.com
8. COOKIES
8.1 Definition
Cookies are text files placed on your computer to collect standard Internet log information and visitor behavior information. When you visit our websites, we may collect information from you automatically through cookies or similar technology
For further information, visit allaboutcookies.org.
8.2 How do we use cookies?
DACAST uses cookies in a range of ways to improve your experience on our website, including:
Keeping you signed in
Understanding how you use our website
Track features such as delivering content specific to your interests
Informing you of new, relevant services.
8.3 What types of cookies do we use?
There are a number of different types of cookies, however, our website uses:
Functionality – DACAST uses these cookies so that we recognize you on our website and remember your previously selected preferences. These could include what language you prefer and the location you are in. A mix of first-party and third-party cookies are used.
Advertising – DACAST uses these cookies to collect information about your visit to our website, the content you viewed, the links you followed, and information about your browser, device, and your IP address. DACAST sometimes shares some limited aspects of this data with third parties for advertising purposes. We may also share online data collected through cookies with our advertising partners. This means that when you visit another website, you may be shown advertising based on your browsing patterns on our website.
8.4 How to manage cookies?
You can set your browser not to accept cookies, and the above website tells you how to remove cookies from your browser. However, in a few cases, some of our website features may not function as a result.
9. PRIVACY POLICIES OF OTHER WEBSITES
The DACAST website contains links to other websites. Our privacy policy applies only to our website, so if you click on a link to another website, you should read their privacy policy.
10. CHANGES TO DACAST’S PRIVACY POLICY
DACAST continually strives to implement new technologies and processes to better protect you, your privacy, and your use of the DACAST Properties. As a result, changes to this Privacy Policy may be made by DACAST from time to time. In no event will these changes result in the degradation of any of the security measures designed to protect you from unauthorized disclosure, as such measures are described in this Privacy Policy.
11. SPECIAL NOTE REGARDING CHILDREN UNDER 13 YEARS OF AGE
The use of the DACAST Properties is not intended for minors under the age of 18 (“Minors”). Minors are not authorized by DACAST to use the DACAST Properties, even if Minors set up an Account or accept the terms of any agreement for DACAST Properties. Parents or guardians may authorize Minors between the ages of 13 and 17 to use the DACAST Properties, provided they assume all responsibility and legal liability for the conduct of such Minor including, without limitation, monitoring the Minor’s access and use of the DACAST Properties. DACAST does not intentionally collect nor maintain any personally identifiable information from Minors. If you discover your Minor child has submitted his/her information to DACAST, you may request to have such information deleted from DACAST’s database by sending an email request to support@DACAST.com together with the email address that was submitted by the Minor. Upon receiving the request, DACAST shall delete such information within twenty (20) business days. If DACAST learns that a Minor is using the DACAST Properties, DACAST will require verified parental or guardian consent, in accordance with the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of 1998 (“COPPA”).
12. RIGHTS OF CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS – THE CALIFORNIA CONSUMER PRIVACY ACT OF 2018 (CCPA)
If you are a resident of the State of California in the United States, you are entitled to certain rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA). The categories of Personal Information we collect about or from you are described in section 1 above, and the business purposes for which we collect such Personal Information are described in section 3 above.
As a business subject to the CCPA, DACAST does not sell Personal Information. DACAST may share Personal Information with third-party service providers or business partners for our own business purposes as described in section 5 above. However, we disclose your Personal Information to these third parties only where you have consented to disclosure of Personal Information to such third parties or where such third parties have agreed to contractual
limitations around their use, retention, and disclosure of Personal Information.
As a resident of the State of California, you have the following rights under the CCPA:
You have the right to request access to the Personal Information we collect from or about you.
You have the right to request details about how we process or disclose your Personal Information.
You have the right to request that we delete the Personal Information we have collected about you, subject to
certain exceptions.
You have the right to not be denied any goods or services for exercising your rights under the CCPA.
To exercise any of these rights, you may contact DACAST by following the instructions in section 14 below. We may need to verify your identity before we are able to process your requests.
13. RIGHTS OF EUROPEAN DATA SUBJECTS – THE GENERAL DATA PROTECTION REGULATION (GDPR)
13.1 GDPR Rights
If you are in one of the EU/EEA countries, you are entitled to certain rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) EU Regulation 2016/679 and applicable national data protection regulations. By visiting the DACAST Websites or communicating with DACAST, you acknowledge that we may process your Personal Information for the purposes described above, either on the basis of your consent or if we have other lawful grounds to do so. Under the GDPR, you have the following rights with respect to your Personal Information:
You have the right to withdraw consent to the processing, where consent is the basis of processing. For the Personal Information we collect on the DACAST Websites, this means you may withdraw your consent to processing by leaving the DACAST Websites, suspending your account if you have registered on our Websites, and requesting that we delete your Personal Information.
You have the right to access your Personal Information that we hold and request further details about how we process it, under certain conditions. See section 7.
For more information on GDPR
To exercise any of these rights, you may contact DACAST at
gdpr@dacast.com
.
13.2 Cross-border Personal Information transfers and the EU-US Privacy Shield
The Site, and the features and functionality of the Site, may be provided using resources and servers located in various countries around the world, including the United States and other countries. Therefore, personal information about users of the Site may be transferred, processed and stored outside the country where you access the Site, including to countries where the level of data protection may not be deemed adequate by the local legal or regulatory authority in the country of origin of the data. By using the Site, you consent to this transfer. We will protect the privacy and security of personal information we collect in accordance with this Privacy Policy, regardless of where it is processed or stored.
DACAST complies with the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss – U.S. Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the United States, respectively.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov/
.
If you are in the European Union, you have a right to access your Personal Information. If you wish to access your information held by DACAST, please follow the contact information at the end of this notice. DACAST may be liable for onward transfers to third parties in violation of the Privacy Shield Principles. We will investigate and attempt to resolve requests, complaints, and disputes regarding the use and disclosure of your information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and may require further information from you in order to identify you and to address the matter at issue.
14. CONTACT DACAST
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy please contact DACAST by sending a letter or email to: DACAST, LLC. Attn: Privacy 1175 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94103
privacy@dacast.com
This website uses cookies to deliver its service and track its performance.
Accept necessary cookies only
Ok
MENU
MENU
Video Platform
Stream
Stream Live Video
Live Streaming Platform
Online Video Platform (OVP)
Over-the-Top (OTT)
Video on Demand (VOD)
RTMP Streaming Platform
HTTP Live Streaming platform
Connect
Broadcast Live Online
China Content Delivery
HTML5 Video Player
Worldwide Delivery Solutions
Expo Video Gallery
CDN Live Streaming
Manage
Online Video Hosting
Video CMS
Privacy & Security
Measure
Video Analytics
Video Monetization
Video Marketing
Solutions
Events
Live Events Streaming
Broadcast Live Sports
Live Fitness Classes
Production and Publishing
Business
Video for Enterprises
Video for Marketing Professionals
Video for Sales
Organizations
Churches and Houses Of Worship
Governments and Municipalities
Education and e-Learning Institutions
Entertainment and Media
Creative Agencies
Live Streaming for Musicians
TV and Radio Stations
Developers
API
Video API
Video API Documentation
Player API Documentation
SDK
Tools
Developer Tools
Video Transcoding
Pay-Per-View Streaming
Secure Video Upload
Pricing
Resources
Learning Center
Blog
Press
Case Studies
Latest Features
Support
24/7 Support
Phone Support
Professional Services
Support Articles
Knowledge Base
FAQ
Company
About Us
Careers
Partners
Contact
LOGIN
Sub-policy 40
https://d1.awsstatic.com/legal/privacypolicy/AWS_Privacy_Notice_German_2023-09-22.pdf:

Sub-policy 41
https://issuu.com/legal/privacy:
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
DMCA Guidelines
EU Publisher Guidelines
Copyright
Cookies
Accessibility Statement
Issuu Inc’s Privacy Policy regulating personal data processed in accordance with the EU REGULATION 2016/679 OF THE EUROPEAN PARLIAMENT AND OF THE COUNCIL of 27 April 2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data, and repealing Directive 95/46/EC (General Data Protection Regulation).
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: September 2nd, 2021
PLEASE NOTE: The Issuu Privacy Policy is effective as of the "Last Updated" date above. (See
the previous version of the Privacy Policy
.)
1. This policy is effective from September 2th 2021.
2. This Privacy Policy describes how and when Issuu Inc collects, uses and shares your personal data when you use the Issuu app and other services offered for sale on www.issuu.com. If you have any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy, please contact our data protection officer at
privacy@issuu.com
.
2.1 Issuu Inc is an international media company (hereinafter “Issuu”, “we”, or “us”), providing an online platform named ISSUU that enables registered users (hereinafter “User”) to upload and promote their content, in particular publications and other content, hereinafter the “Platform”).
2.2 Our address headquarter is located at: 131 Lytton Ave, Palo Alto, CA 94301, United States. The company is duly incorporated under the laws of the state of Delaware.
2.3 The privacy policy may be amended from time to time by us with a fair notice to you before the new privacy policy comes into force.
2.4
Please note, that you may use our Platform without signing up, in which case we will only collect data based on your consent to our
cookie policy
.
3. Data controller
3.1 Issuu is the data controller for the personal data collected from Users domiciled within the EU when using the Platform.
3.2 We will process your personal data in compliance with European General Data Protection Regulation. (“GDPR”)
3.3 This privacy policy covers our processing of personal data processed if you are domiciled within the EU, when you use the Platform.
4. Purpose and legal basis
4.1 We process your personal data in order for us to manage our user relationship with you, including managing your account and provide you with access to use the Platform, we collect and use information about you. The processing of your personal data is performed on the legal basis of:
fulfilment of our contractual obligations when delivering the Platform to you.
4.2 We process your personal data to facilitate any sale of content via the Platform on the legal basis of:
fulfilment of our contractual obligations to facilitate your purchase of content.
4.3 We process your personal data to manage communications with you through the entire lifecycle with you as a user using embedded services within our Platform including live chat and messaging functionality. The processing of your personal data is performed on the legal basis of:
fulfilment of our contractual obligations when delivering the Platform to you.
and our legitimate interest to improve our platform and services.
4.4 We also process your personal data to deliver and improve the Platform, to let you know about our policies and Terms of -Service, to manage our business, to improve our offerings, develop new features and updates, develop personalization services and other types of service, including but not limited to develop and implement algorithms and machine learning. This processing is on the basis of:
Our legitimate interest to improve our platform and services.
4.5 We also use your personal data to display to you personalized marketing message on our Platform, to inform you about new features and updates on the Platform. The processing of personal data is performed based on:
your freely given consent to receive marketing by e-mail and push notifications provided when signing up to the Platform or at a later stage,
You may withdraw your consent at any time under your Profile Settings or by clicking the “Unsubscribe” button in any marketing e-mail or by contacting us by email at privacy@issuu.com
.
If you withdraw your consent to receive personalized marketing message on the platform in your Profile Settings, will we still display marketing message to you on the Platform, but they will be of a generic nature and therefore less relevant to you.
Please be aware that the content on the Platform may contain advertisement, product placement and other marketing material, that is placed within the content as part of the content. This marketing is outside of our control and will not be affected by your withdrawal of your consent to receive marketing by e-mail.
5. Categories of personal data
5.1 We mainly collect the personal data that you submit to us, including your contact information and purchase history and information you provide us with in our communications channels including chat and messenger services But we also collect information in several ways from different parts of the Platform, as further detailed below, including but not limited to the way you use the Platform and if applied tracking information about your whereabouts on the Internet and technical information about your devices and location.
5.2 Please visit Clause 8 to read more about your right to access and deletion of your personal data.
5.3
When signing up and logging in
5.3.1 When registering via our online Platform, you provide us with certain information, including email, password, username, name, country of origin, preferred language. When registering and signing in/logging in via third-party supported application login (such as Facebook, Google, Hootesuit), you authorize us to access certain account information from that third-party application, such as basic profile information; name, profile picture, e-mail address (optional), current city (optional). Some of this information will never be made public, such as password. Other information can be either hidden by default (email address, country of origin) or public by default (name and profile picture if third party application sign up).
5.4
Please note that your username will be public at all times.
5.5
When using the Platform
5.5.1 We register the information you provide us with, when using the Platform, including what content you view and read, your content orders, your traffic on the Platform and your communication with us.
5.5.2 The Users are encouraged not to reveal personal data concerning themselves  or a third party on the platform, in particular special categories of data (such as information about a person’s health, addictions or allergies) when commenting on the content or making reviews, nor when uploading to the Platform.
5.5.2.1 Should a User make such information about them or others public, the User is responsible for ensuring it has a legal ground for disclosing the information.
5.5.3 We use cookies to enable the Platform to work, and to provide you with a personalized experience and to collect information about your interests and whereabouts on the Internet. For further information on our use of Cookies, please see our
cookie policy
.
6. Transfer of data to third countries including United States
6.1
As Issuu is located in the United States all collected data is transferred to the United States for processing.
6.2
We undertake the transfer to the United States on the legal basis of fulfilling our contractual obligation towards you. The transfer of your personal data  is necessary for us to perform our contractual obligations to you as a User under the Terms of Service and to deliver the services we have agreed with you as a User  to provide.
6.3 We and our suppliers have, as required by the General Data Protection Regulation, implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures to keep your personal data safe. Please contact us at privacy@issuu.com if you would like to learn more about how we keep your personal data safe.
7. Sharing of data
7.1 Personal data about our Users is an essential part of our business. We only share your personal data as described below apart from when we share it with a third-party vendor (including card processing and payment service providers), from whom you have purchased content.
7.2 We may share personal data regarding you if we are obligated to do so by law, to enforce our terms of service, to protect us against loss or damage. This may include exchanging information with the police, courts or law enforcement organisations.
7.3 If we sell our business or our company assets are acquired by a third party, personal data held by us about our users may be one of the transferred assets.
7.4 We may also share some of your personal information with Google, Youtube or other third-party service providers, to provide use of integrations and links to external content by use of API. Your personal data is only shared when you choose to activate a link in a publication to external content on YouTube or other services hosting the content linked to in a publication. To facilitate this, your data will be shared with the third-party API services, namely the Youtube API services. Please be aware, that when you activate such a link you will be subject to the terms of service and privacy policy of said third party. In the Privacy policy you can find information about what information they collect from you and how and when they process it and how to enact your rights to information and deletion. Please consider reading the third party’s privacy policy before activating a link in a publication. As for Google you may find
their Privacy policy here
.
8. Your rights as a user
8.1 As provided by the GDPR, you have the right to:
Access personal data regarding you.
You can always access your account to review the personal data we have collected about you. You may delete and amend the data collected.
You also have the right to obtain a copy of the personal data free of charge. However, we may charge a fee corresponding to administrative costs if further copies of the information are requested, or if the request is unfounded or excessive.
Ask for rectification
of incorrect or inaccurate data concerning you, or to have incomplete personal data completed. You can use your access to your account to update your personal data.
Ask for erasure of personal data regarding you
(under certain circumstances).
Ask for the restriction of the processing of your data
(under certain circumstances).
Object to the processing of your data
for marketing purposes by withdrawing your personal consent.
You can at any time withdraw your consent by deleting your profile.
You have the right of portability of the personal data you have submitted to us. We will deliver your personal data in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format
When we receive a request to access, rectify, erase or port data, we may ask you for additional information in order to confirm your identity and ensure data security. You can send a request at
our help-center
.
8.2 You have the right to complain regarding the processing of personal data concerning you to the supervisory authority, which in Denmark is the Danish Data Protection Agency:
Datatilsynet
Borgergade 28
1300 København K
Phone no.: 33 19 32 00
E-mail: dt@datatilsynet.dk
9. Data retention and account deletion
9.1 We store your personal data for as long as your account is active.
9.2 We may also store some of your personal data to comply with our legal obligations.
9.3 You may add or update certain information to your account. When you update information, however, we often maintain a copy of the unrevised information in systems back-ups for a period of time until our backup is updated with the latest version.
9.4 You may request deactivation of your account by following the instructions at the Platform.  If you deactivate your account, we do not delete your information but hold it for you until such time as you either activate your account again or delete it.
9.5 When you delete your account, we delete the data attached to your account including your username. The username will be deleted from all reviews, and the reviews will be anonymized for future viewing.
9.6 Please note that some information may remain in our records after your account has been deleted, and that we may only be able to delete this information later when updating our backups.
10. Security
10.1 User accounts including personal data are protected by a password for your privacy and security. You should ensure no unauthorized access to your account and personal data by choosing and protecting your password appropriately, and by signing off when finishing accessing your account. When signing in via third-party application provider your password is solely managed by such third-party.
10.2 We do our best to ensure that user accounts are kept private. However, various instances such as unauthorized entry/use, hardware or software failure, and other factors, may compromise the security of the personal data.
10.3 This Privacy Policy only governs information collected on the Platform and through our cookies.
11. Children's privacy
11.1 The Platform is intended for use by people above the age of sixteen or the legal age for granting consent to an information service provider on the Internet in the jurisdiction in which you reside. If we receive notice or reasonably believe that someone under the appropriate age has provided us with personal information, we will promptly delete the account and all personal information that has been provided to us.
11.2 We may use a registration of age as a tool to try and prevent users under the legal age in the jurisdiction where the user resides to read content not rated for minors.
12. Changes to Privacy Policy
12.1 This Privacy Policy may be amended from time to time. You will be notified before we make changes to this policy with a fair notice and you will be given the opportunity to review this revised policy before you choose to continue using the Platform.
12.2 We will use only use personal data in accordance with the privacy policy under which the personal data was collected unless we specifically ask for your consent to process (reuse) your personal data for a new purpose.
13. Questions or concerns our representative within the EU
13.1 In accordance with article 27 of the GDPR we have appointed a representative: Issuu ApS, Gasvaerksvej 16, DK 1656 Copenhagen, Denmark.
13.2 If you have any feedback on this Privacy Policy or you want to contact us, you can contact us:
By email at privacy@issuu.com with any questions and suggestions or by using the contact information on our websites.
Sub-policy 42
https://www.google.com/intl/de/policies/privacy:
Datenschutzerklärung & Nutzungsbedingungen
Übersicht
Datenschutzerklärung
Nutzungsbedingungen
Technologien
Häufig gestellte Fragen
Google-Konto
Datenschutzerklärung
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Rahmenbedingungen für Datenübermittlungen
Wichtige Begriffe
Partner
Aktualisierungen
Google-Datenschutzerklärung
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, vertrauen Sie uns Ihre Daten an. Wir sind uns bewusst, dass dies eine große Verantwortung ist und setzen alles daran, Ihre Daten zu schützen und zu gewährleisten, dass Sie die Kontrolle darüber behalten.
In dieser Datenschutzerklärung erfahren Sie, welche Daten von uns erhoben werden, welche Zwecke wir damit verfolgen und wie Sie Ihre Daten aktualisieren, verwalten, exportieren und löschen können.
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union oder des Vereinigten Königreichs auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, finden Sie unten im Abschnitt
Anforderungen in Europa
weitere Informationen zu Ihren Rechten sowie zur Einhaltung dieser Gesetze durch Google.
Privatsphärecheck
Sie möchten Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern?
Privatsphärecheck machen
Wirksam ab dem 16. September 2024
|
Archivierte Versionen
|
PDF herunterladen
Inhalt
Einführung
Von Google erhobene Daten
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Datenweitergabe
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Anforderungen in Europa
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Wir entwickeln eine Vielzahl von Diensten, die Millionen von Menschen Tag für Tag helfen, die Welt ganz neu zu entdecken und mit ihr zu interagieren. Zu unseren Diensten zählen:
Google-Apps, -Websites und -Geräte, wie die Google-Suche, YouTube und Google Home
Plattformen wie der Chrome-Browser und das Android-Betriebssystem
Produkte, die in Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern integriert sind, wie Werbe- und Analyseprodukte und das eingebettete Google Maps
Sie können unsere Dienste auf vielfältige Weise nutzen, um Ihre Privatsphäre zu verwalten. So haben Sie beispielsweise die Möglichkeit, sich für ein Google-Konto zu registrieren, wenn Sie Inhalte wie E-Mails und Fotos erstellen und verwalten oder relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten möchten. Sie können auch zahlreiche Google-Dienste nutzen, ohne sich anzumelden oder ein Konto zu erstellen, beispielsweise wenn Sie die Google Suche verwenden oder sich YouTube-Videos ansehen. Außerdem ist es möglich, in einem privaten Modus im Web zu surfen, etwa im
Inkognitomodus von Chrome
, sodass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Bei allen unseren Diensten können Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen ändern und so festlegen, ob wir manche Arten von Daten erheben und wie wir sie verwenden.
Um Ihnen unsere Datenschutzerklärung möglichst verständlich zu machen, haben wir Beispiele, Videos und Definitionen für
Schlüsselbegriffe
angefügt. Wenn Sie dennoch Fragen dazu haben,
können Sie uns gern kontaktieren
.
Von Google erhobene Daten
Im Folgenden erklären wir Ihnen, welche Arten von Daten wir erheben, während Sie unsere Dienste nutzen
Wir erheben Daten, um allen unseren Nutzern bessere Dienste zur Verfügung zu stellen – von der Feststellung grundlegender Informationen wie zum Beispiel Ihrer Sprache bis hin zu komplexeren Fragen wie zum Beispiel
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
, den
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
, oder den YouTube-Videos, die Sie interessant finden. Welche Daten Google erhebt und wie diese verwendet werden hängt davon ab, wie Sie unsere Dienste nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen verwalten.
Wenn Sie nicht in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, speichern wir die von uns erhobenen Daten mit
eindeutigen Kennungen
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem
Gerät
verknüpft sind, welche Sie verwenden. Auf diese Weise können wir verschiedene Dinge tun, wie beispielsweise Ihre Einstellungen über Browsersitzungen hinweg beibehalten, zum Beispiel Ihre bevorzugte Sprache oder ob Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse oder Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Aktivitäten sehen möchten.
Wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, erheben wir auch Daten, die wir in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern und als
personenbezogene Daten
erachten.
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste bereitstellen
Wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen, stellen Sie uns
personenbezogene Daten
zur Verfügung, darunter Ihren Namen und ein Passwort. Sie können Ihrem Konto auch eine
Telefonnummer
oder
Zahlungsinformationen
hinzufügen. Selbst wenn Sie nicht bei einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind, können Sie uns Daten zur Verfügung stellen, etwa eine E-Mail-Adresse, um mit Google zu kommunizieren oder Benachrichtigungen zu unseren Diensten zu erhalten.
Wir erheben auch die Inhalte, die Sie bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erstellen, hochladen oder von anderen erhalten. Dazu gehören beispielsweise E-Mails, die Sie verfassen und empfangen, Fotos und Videos, die Sie speichern, Dokumente und Tabellen, die Sie erstellen, und Kommentare, die Sie zu YouTube-Videos schreiben.
Daten, die wir bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste erheben
Ihre Apps, Browser und Geräte
Wir erheben Daten über die Apps, Browser und
Geräte
, die Sie beim Zugriff auf Google-Dienste verwenden. Das hilft uns, Funktionen wie automatische Produktupdates anzubieten oder Ihren Bildschirm zu dimmen, wenn Ihr Akku schwach ist.
Zu den von uns erhobenen Daten zählen
eindeutige Kennungen
, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Browsers, der Typ und die Einstellungen des Geräts, das Betriebssystem, Informationen zum Mobilfunknetz wie der Name des Mobilfunkanbieters und die Telefonnummer sowie die Versionsnummer der App. Wir erheben auch Daten über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten. Hierzu zählen u. a. die
IP-Adresse
, Absturzberichte, Systemaktivitäten sowie das Datum, die Uhrzeit und die Verweis-URL Ihrer Anfrage.
Wir erheben diese Daten, wenn ein Google-Dienst auf Ihrem Gerät unsere Server kontaktiert, beispielsweise wenn Sie eine App vom Play Store installieren oder wenn ein Dienst automatische Updates abfragt. Wenn Sie ein
Android-Gerät mit Google Apps
verwenden, kontaktiert Ihr Gerät regelmäßig die Google-Server, um Daten über Ihr Gerät und die Verbindung zu unseren Diensten bereitzustellen. Zu diesen Daten zählen beispielsweise
der Typ Ihres Geräts und der Name Ihres Mobilfunkanbieters
, Absturzberichte, die von Ihnen installierten Apps und, abhängig von den Einstellungen auf Ihrem Gerät,
weitere Informationen dazu, wie Sie Ihr Android-Gerät verwenden
.
Ihre Aktivitäten
Wir erheben in unseren Diensten Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten. Diese Daten verwenden wir beispielsweise, um Ihnen ein YouTube-Video zu empfehlen, das Ihnen gefallen könnte. Unter anderem könnten folgende Aktivitätsdaten erhoben werden:
Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen
Videos, die Sie sich ansehen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Kaufaktivitäten
Personen, mit denen Sie kommunizieren oder Inhalte austauschen
Aktivitäten auf Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Der Chrome-Browserverlauf, den Sie
mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisiert
haben
Wenn Sie unsere
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
, erheben wir möglicherweise Anruf- und Nachrichteninformationen wie Ihre Telefonnummer, die Anrufernummer, die Nummer des Angerufenen, Weiterleitungsnummern, die E-Mail-Adressen von Sender und Empfänger, das Datum und die Uhrzeit von Anrufen und Nachrichten, die Dauer von Anrufen, Routing-Informationen und die Art und Anzahl von Anrufen und Nachrichten.
Die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Aktivitätsdaten können Sie sich in Ihrem Google-Konto ansehen und sie dort auch verwalten.
Zum Google-Konto
Ihre Standortdaten
Wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, erheben wir Standortinformationen. Dadurch können wir Ihnen Funktionen wie Wegbeschreibungen, Suchergebnisse für Dinge in Ihrer Nähe und Werbung auf Grundlage Ihres Standorts anbieten.
Je nachdem, welche Produkte Sie nutzen und welche Einstellungen Sie auswählen, kann Google verschiedene Arten von Standortinformationen verwenden, um bestimmte Dienste und Produkte hilfreicher zu gestalten. Dazu gehören unter anderem:
GPS- und andere
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
IP-Adresse
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
, zum Beispiel von Ihren Suchanfragen oder
Orte, die Sie mit einem Label versehen, etwa Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
, wie etwa WLAN-Zugriffspunkte, Funkmasten und Bluetooth-fähige Geräte
Die durch uns erhobenen Arten von Standortdaten und wie lange wir diese speichern hängen zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab. Zum Beispiel können Sie mit der App „Einstellungen“ auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
die Standorterfassung Ihres Geräts aktivieren oder deaktivieren
. Wenn Sie eine private Karte mit Orten erstellen möchten, die Sie mit Ihren angemeldeten Geräten besuchen, können Sie auch den
Standortverlauf
aktivieren. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und anderen Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten, die möglicherwiese ebenfalls Standortinformationen enthalten, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden,
finden Sie hier
.
In manchen Fällen erhebt Google auch Daten über Sie aus
öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Unter Umständen erhalten wir auch Daten über Sie von vertrauenswürdigen Partnern. Dazu zählen Verzeichnisdienste, die uns in Google-Diensten anzuzeigende Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, Marketingpartner, die uns Daten über potenzielle Kunden unserer Geschäftsdienste bereitstellen, und Sicherheitspartner, die uns Daten liefern, mit denen wir uns
vor Missbrauch schützen
können. Wir erhalten auch Daten von
Partnern, damit wir in deren Auftrag Werbung und Recherchedienste zur Verfügung stellen können
.
Zum Erheben und Speichern von Daten verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Dazu zählen
Cookies
,
Pixel-Tags
, die lokale Speicherung wie etwa
Browser-Webspeicher
oder
Anwendungsdaten-Caches
, Datenbanken und
Serverprotokolle
.
Gründe für die Datenerhebung durch Google
Wir verwenden Daten zur Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen die von uns im Rahmen unserer Dienste erhobenen Daten für folgende Zwecke:
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
. Hierzu zählen beispielsweise die Verarbeitung Ihrer Suchbegriffe, um Suchergebnisse einzublenden, oder das Vorschlagen von Empfängern aus Ihren Kontakten, wenn Sie Inhalte teilen möchten.
Wartung und Verbesserung unserer Dienste
Wir verwenden Ihre Daten,
um zu gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
. Beispielsweise verwenden wir sie zur Überprüfung von Störungen oder zur Beseitigung von Problemen, die Sie uns gemeldet haben. Außerdem nutzen wir Ihre Daten, um
unsere Dienste zu verbessern
. Dazu zählt beispielsweise die Feststellung, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die in unseren Diensten verwendete Rechtschreibprüfung verbessern können.
Entwicklung neuer Dienste
Wir nutzen die im Rahmen unserer bestehenden Dienste erhobenen Daten zur Entwicklung neuer Dienste. Beispielsweise halfen uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten zur Personalisierung unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen die Bereitstellung von Empfehlungen, von personalisierten Inhalten und
von personalisierten Suchergebnissen
. Beispielsweise erhalten Sie im
Sicherheitscheck
Sicherheitstipps, die auf Ihre persönliche Nutzung von Google-Produkten zugeschnitten sind. Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen kann Google Play Daten nutzen, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen zeigen wir Ihnen möglicherweise auch auf Ihre Interessen und Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten bezogene
personalisierte Werbung
. Wenn Sie beispielsweise nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen, kann auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden. In Ihren Einstellungen für Werbung unter
Mein Anzeigen-Center
können Sie festlegen, welche Daten wir zur Auswahl der präsentierten Werbung verwenden.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung, die auf
sensiblen Kategorien
, wie der ethnischen Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexuellen Orientierung oder Gesundheit beruht.
Wir zeigen Ihnen keine personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage von Ihren Inhalten aus Google Drive, Gmail oder Google Fotos.
Wir geben Daten, durch die Sie persönlich identifizierbar sind, wie beispielsweise Ihren Namen oder Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, nur dann an Werbetreibende weiter, wenn Sie uns dazu auffordern. Wenn Sie beispielsweise Werbung für einen Blumenladen in Ihrer Nähe sehen und die Schaltfläche "Zum Anrufen tippen" auswählen, verbinden wir Ihren Anruf und geben Ihre Telefonnummer möglicherweise an den Blumenladen weiter.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Messung der Leistung
Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden. Beispielsweise analysieren wir Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren. Zusätzlich nutzen wir Daten der Werbeanzeigen, mit denen Sie interagieren, einschließlich Ihrer zugehörigen Aktivitäten in der Google Suche, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen. Dazu nutzen wir verschiedene Tools, wie z. B. Google Analytics. Wenn Sie Websites besuchen oder Apps verwenden, bei denen Google Analytics eingesetzt wird, kann ein Google Analytics-Kunde sich dafür entscheiden, es Google zu ermöglichen,
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website oder in dieser App mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites oder in anderen Apps zu verknüpfen
, bei denen ebenfalls unsere Werbedienste genutzt werden.
Kommunikation mit Ihnen
Wir nutzen die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um uns direkt mit Ihnen in Verbindung zu setzen. So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, wie einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden. Außerdem könnten wir Sie auch über bevorstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen in Bezug auf unsere Dienste informieren. Und wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung etwaiger Probleme behilflich zu sein.
Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Wir nutzen Daten, um die Verbesserung der
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
unserer Dienste zu unterstützen. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder
der Öffentlichkeit
schaden könnten.
Um Ihre Daten zu diesen Zwecken zu verarbeiten, verwenden wir verschiedene Technologien. Wir nutzen automatisierte Systeme, die Ihre Inhalte analysieren, sodass wir Ihnen personalisierte Suchergebnisse, personalisierte Werbung oder andere Funktionen bereitstellen können, die auf Ihre Nutzung unserer Dienste zugeschnitten sind. Zusätzlich analysieren wir Ihre Inhalte, damit wir
Missbrauch erkennen können
, wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte. Wir verwenden auch
Algorithmen
, um Muster in Daten zu erkennen. Google Übersetzer hilft beispielsweise Personen, über Sprachbarrieren hinweg zu kommunizieren, indem der Dienst geläufige Sprachmuster in Sätzen erkennt, die übersetzt werden sollen.
Unter Umständen werden
die durch uns erhobenen Daten zu den oben beschriebenen Zwecken dienst- und geräteübergreifend verwendet
. Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise, je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen, Videos von Gitarrenspielern auf YouTube ansehen, kann eine Werbeanzeige für Gitarrenunterricht auf einer Website ausgeliefert werden, auf der unsere Anzeigenprodukte verwendet werden. Je nach Ihren Kontoeinstellungen könnten
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, um die Dienste von Google und die von Google ausgelieferten Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Wenn andere Nutzer bereits über Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder andere Sie identifizierende Daten verfügen, zeigen wir diesen Nutzern möglicherweise die öffentlich sichtbaren Daten Ihres Google-Kontos an, wie Ihren Namen und Ihr Foto. Damit können andere Personen beispielsweise eine von Ihnen stammende E-Mail identifizieren.
Bevor wir Daten zu anderen als den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung aufgeführten Zwecken nutzen, bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Sie haben Entscheidungsmöglichkeiten in Bezug auf die durch uns erhobenen Daten und ihre Verwendung
In diesem Abschnitt werden die wichtigsten Einstellungen beschrieben, mit denen Sie Ihre Privatsphäre in unseren Diensten verwalten können. Sie können auch den
Privatsphärecheck
verwenden, um wichtige Datenschutzeinstellungen zu überprüfen und anzupassen. Zusätzlich zu diesen Tools bieten wir auch spezifische Datenschutzeinstellungen in unseren Produkten. Mehr dazu erfahren Sie in unserem
Leitfaden zum Datenschutz in Google-Produkten
.
Zum Privatsphärecheck
Daten verwalten, überprüfen und aktualisieren
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind, können Sie Ihre Daten jederzeit in den von Ihnen verwendeten Diensten überprüfen und aktualisieren. Beispielsweise ermöglichen Ihnen Fotos und Drive die Verwaltung bestimmter auf Google gespeicherter Inhaltstypen.
Wir stellen Ihnen auch einen Ort zur Verfügung, an dem Sie die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Daten überprüfen und deren Speicherung steuern können. Ihr
Google-Konto
beinhaltet:
Datenschutzeinstellungen
Aktivitätseinstellungen
Hier können Sie festlegen, welche Arten von Aktivitäten in Ihrem Konto gespeichert werden sollen. Wenn Sie zum Beispiel den YouTube-Verlauf aktiviert haben, werden die Videos, die Sie sich ansehen, und die Dinge, nach denen Sie suchen, in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, damit Sie bessere Empfehlungen erhalten und Videos an der zuletzt angesehenen Stelle fortsetzen können. Und wenn die Einstellung „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert ist, werden Ihre Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert. So können Dienste persönlicher für Sie gestaltet werden, damit Sie unter anderem schneller Suchergebnisse und nützlichere Empfehlungen zu Apps und Inhalten erhalten. „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ hat auch eine Untereinstellung, mit der Sie festlegen können, ob
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites, in anderen Apps und auf Geräten, die Google-Dienste nutzen
, in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert und zur Verbesserung von Google-Diensten verwendet werden. Zu diesen Informationen gehört beispielsweise, welche Apps Sie auf Android installieren und verwenden.
Aktivitätseinstellungen aufrufen
Einstellungen für Werbung
Hier können Sie Ihre Einstellungen zu Werbeanzeigen verwalten, die auf Google sowie auf Websites und in Apps im Rahmen einer
Partnerschaft mit Google
von Google ausgeliefert werden. Sie können Ihre Interessen verändern, auswählen, ob Ihre personenbezogenen Daten verwendet werden sollen, um sich relevantere Werbung präsentieren zu lassen, und bestimmte Werbedienste aktivieren oder deaktivieren.
Zu „Mein Anzeigen-Center“
Über mich
Personenbezogene Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto verwalten und festlegen, wer sie in Google-Diensten sehen kann.
Zu "Über mich"
Soziale Empfehlungen
Hier können Sie auswählen, ob Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihren Aktivitäten wie Rezensionen und Empfehlungen in Werbeanzeigen erscheinen sollen.
Zu "Soziale Empfehlungen"
Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste genutzt werden
Daten von Websites und Apps, auf bzw. in denen Google-Dienste wie Google Analytics genutzt werden, verwalten, die eventuell an Google weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie ihre Dienste aufrufen oder damit interagieren.
Zu Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Möglichkeiten zur Überprüfung und Aktualisierung Ihrer Daten
Meine Aktivitäten
In „Meine Aktivitäten“ können Sie überprüfen und festlegen, welche Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeichert werden, wenn Sie angemeldet sind und Google-Dienste verwenden, zum Beispiel Ihre Suchanfragen oder Nutzung von Google Play. Sie können sich die Inhalte nach Datum und Thema sortiert ansehen und Ihre Aktivitäten teilweise oder vollständig löschen.
Zu "Meine Aktivitäten"
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard ermöglicht Ihnen die Verwaltung von Daten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Zu Google Dashboard
Ihre personenbezogenen Daten
Hier können Sie Ihre Kontaktdaten wie Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und Ihre Telefonnummer verwalten.
Zu den personenbezogenen Daten
Wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit Ihrem Browser oder Gerät verknüpft sind, z. B.:
Personalisierte Suche:
Hier können Sie auswählen
, ob Ihnen anhand Ihrer Suchaktivitäten relevantere Ergebnisse und Empfehlungen bereitgestellt werden sollen.
YouTube-Einstellungen: Hier können Sie Ihren
YouTube-Suchverlauf
und Ihren
YouTube-Wiedergabeverlauf
pausieren und löschen.
Einstellungen für Werbung: Hier können Sie
Ihre Einstellungen für Werbeanzeigen verwalten
, die Ihnen auf Google und Websites sowie in Apps von Google-Anzeigenpartnern präsentiert werden.
Daten exportieren, entfernen und löschen
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Sie können über den
Kontoinaktivität-Manager
auch einer anderen Person Zugriff zu Teilen Ihres Google-Kontos gewähren, falls Sie unerwarteterweise nicht in der Lage sind, Ihr Konto zu verwenden.
Und schließlich können Sie auch basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht und unseren Richtlinien eine
Anfrage zum Entfernen von Inhalten
aus bestimmten Google-Diensten stellen.
Es gibt auch andere Möglichkeiten festzulegen, welche Daten von Google erhoben werden dürfen, und zwar unabhängig davon, ob Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet sind oder nicht. Hierzu zählen:
Browsereinstellungen: Ihr Browser lässt sich beispielsweise so konfigurieren, dass angezeigt wird, wenn von Google ein
Cookie
in Ihrem Browser gesetzt wurde. Ihr Browser lässt sich auch so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies von einer bestimmten Domain oder allen Domains blockiert werden. Beachten Sie aber, dass Cookies erforderlich sind,
damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
und etwa Ihre Spracheinstellungen gespeichert werden können.
Geräteeinstellungen: Ihr Gerät verfügt möglicherweise über Steuerelemente, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten wir erheben. So können Sie beispielsweise auf Ihrem Android-Gerät
Standorteinstellungen anpassen
.
Datenweitergabe
Datenweitergabe durch Sie
In vielen unserer Dienste können Sie Daten mit anderen Personen teilen. Sie bestimmen in diesem Fall, wie dabei vorgegangen werden soll. Beispielsweise können Sie entscheiden, welche Ihrer Videos auf YouTube öffentlich geteilt werden und welche vertraulich bleiben sollen. Bedenken Sie, dass, wenn Sie Daten öffentlich teilen, Suchmaschinen, einschließlich der Google-Suche, möglicherweise auf diese Daten zugreifen können.
Wenn Sie angemeldet sind und mit Google-Diensten interagieren, z. B. wenn Sie Kommentare zu einem YouTube-Video verfassen oder eine App bei Play rezensieren, werden Ihr Name und Ihr Foto neben Ihrer Aktivität angezeigt. Diese Daten werden wir gegebenenfalls
entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen für "Soziale Empfehlungen"
auch in Werbeanzeigen veröffentlichen.
Datenweitergabe durch Google
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Unternehmen, Organisationen oder Personen außerhalb von Google nur in folgenden Fällen weiter:
Mit Ihrer Einwilligung
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wenn Sie beispielsweise
Google Home verwenden, um eine Tischreservierung vorzunehmen
, holen wir Ihre Zustimmung ein, bevor wir dem Restaurant Ihren Namen oder Ihre Telefonnummer weitergeben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Steuerungsmöglichkeiten, damit Sie
Drittanbieter-Apps und -Websites einsehen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben. Vor der Weitergabe von
sensiblen personenbezogenen Daten
holen wir Ihre ausdrückliche Einwilligung ein.
Im Falle von Domain-Administratoren
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Bildungseinrichtung oder Mitarbeiter einer Organisation sind, die Google-Dienste nutzt, haben der
Domainadministrator
und Reseller, die Ihr Konto verwalten, Zugriff auf Ihr Google-Konto. Diese haben folgende Möglichkeiten:
Auf die in Ihrem Konto gespeicherten Daten zugreifen und diese speichern, z. B. Ihre E-Mail
Statistiken zu Ihrem Konto ansehen, z. B. wie viele Apps Sie installieren
Das Passwort für Ihr Konto ändern
Den Zugriff auf Ihr Konto sperren oder beenden
Ihre Kontodaten abrufen, um anwendbare Gesetze, Vorschriften und gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
Ihre Möglichkeiten einschränken, Daten oder Datenschutzeinstellungen zu löschen oder zu bearbeiten
Für die Verarbeitung durch andere Stellen
Wir stellen personenbezogene Daten unseren
verbundenen Unternehmen
, anderen vertrauenswürdigen Unternehmen oder Personen zur Verfügung, die diese in unserem Auftrag verarbeiten. Dies geschieht auf der Grundlage unserer Weisungen und im Einklang mit unserer Datenschutzerklärung sowie anderen geeigneten Vertraulichkeits- und Sicherheitsmaßnahmen. Beispielsweise nutzen wir Dienstanbieter zur Unterstützung beim Betrieb unserer Rechenzentren, Bereitstellen unserer Produkte und Dienste, Verbessern unserer internen Geschäftsprozesse und Anbieten zusätzlichen Supports für unsere Kunden und Nutzer. Außerdem arbeiten wir mit Dienstanbietern zusammen, die uns beim Prüfen von Videoinhalten auf YouTube aus Gründen der öffentlichen Sicherheit unterstützen und uns durch das Analysieren und Anhören von Beispielausschnitten gespeicherter Audioaufnahmen von Nutzern helfen, die Audioerkennungstechnologien von Google zu verbessern.
Aus rechtlichen Gründen
Wir geben personenbezogene Daten an Stellen außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir nach Treu und Glauben davon ausgehen dürfen, dass die Offenlegung dieser Daten vernünftigerweise notwendig ist, um folgende Zwecke zu erfüllen:
Geltende Gesetze, Vorschriften oder
gerichtliche Verfahren einzuhalten oder einer vollstreckbaren behördlichen Anordnung nachzukommen
. In unserem
Transparenzbericht
veröffentlichen wir Daten über die Anzahl und die Art der Anfragen, die wir von Behörden erhalten.
Geltende Nutzungsbedingungen durchzusetzen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verstöße.
Betrug, Sicherheitsmängel oder technische Probleme aufzudecken, zu verhindern oder anderweitig zu bekämpfen.
Die Rechte, das Eigentum oder die Sicherheit von Google,
unserer Nutzer
oder der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden zu schützen.
Wir geben möglicherweise
nicht personenbezogene Daten
an die Öffentlichkeit und unsere Partner, beispielsweise an Publisher, Werbetreibende, Entwickler oder Rechteinhaber, weiter. Beispielsweise veröffentlichen wir Daten,
um Trends bezüglich der allgemeinen Nutzung unserer Dienste aufzuzeigen
. Darüber hinaus erlauben wir
bestimmten Partnern
, Daten von Ihrem Browser oder Gerät unter Verwendung ihrer eigenen Cookies oder ähnlicher Technologien zu Werbe- und Messzwecken zu erheben.
Falls Google an einem Unternehmenszusammenschluss, einem Unternehmenserwerb oder einem Verkauf von Vermögensgegenständen beteiligt ist, werden wir weiterhin dafür sorgen, die Vertraulichkeit Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten sicherzustellen. Zusätzlich werden wir betroffene Nutzer benachrichtigen, bevor personenbezogene Daten übermittelt oder Gegenstand einer anderen Datenschutzerklärung werden.
Gewährleistung der Datensicherheit
Wir integrieren Sicherheitsfunktionen in unsere Dienste, um Ihre Daten zu schützen
Alle Google-Produkte sind mit starken Sicherheitsfunktionen ausgestattet, die Ihre Daten fortwährend schützen. Die Erkenntnisse, die wir durch die Bereitstellung unserer Dienste gewinnen, helfen uns, Bedrohungen der Sicherheit automatisch abzufangen und zu verhindern, dass Sie mit solchen konfrontiert werden. Wenn wir tatsächlich ein Risiko erkennen, von dem Sie unserer Meinung nach erfahren sollten, benachrichtigen wir Sie und schlagen Ihnen Maßnahmen vor, um sich besser zu schützen.
Wir bemühen uns intensiv darum, Sie und Google vor unbefugtem Zugriff auf Daten oder vor unbefugter Veränderung, Offenlegung oder Vernichtung von Daten zu schützen. Unsere Maßnahmen umfassen Folgendes:
Wir verschlüsseln Ihre Daten, um sie während der Übertragung zu schützen.
Wir bieten eine Vielzahl von Sicherheitsfunktionen, wie
Safe Browsing
, Sicherheitscheck und die
Bestätigung in zwei Schritten
, um Ihnen zu helfen, Ihr Konto zu schützen.
Wir überprüfen laufend unsere Praktiken zur Erhebung, Speicherung und Verarbeitung von Daten, einschließlich der physischen Sicherheitsmaßnahmen, um unsere Systeme vor unbefugtem Zugriff zu schützen.
Der Zugriff auf personenbezogene Daten wird durch uns beschränkt und nur Mitarbeitern, Auftragnehmern und Kundenservicemitarbeitern von Google gewährt, die diese Daten für die weitere Datenverarbeitung unbedingt benötigen. Alle Personen mit diesen Zugriffsrechten sind strengen Vertraulichkeitsverpflichtungen unterworfen und können disziplinarischen Maßnahmen unterzogen oder entlassen werden, falls sie diese Verpflichtungen nicht einhalten.
Löschen und Exportieren Ihrer Daten
Sie können Ihre Daten jederzeit exportieren oder aus Ihrem Google-Konto löschen.
Sie können eine Kopie Ihrer Inhalte aus Ihrem Google-Konto exportieren, um diese zu sichern oder sie mit einem anderen Dienst als den von Google zu nutzen.
Daten exportieren
Zum Löschen Ihrer Daten haben Sie folgende Möglichkeiten:
Inhalte aus
bestimmten Google-Diensten
löschen
Bestimmte Elemente in Ihrem Konto unter Verwendung von
Meine Aktivitäten
suchen und dann löschen
Bestimmte Google-Produkte
einschließlich Ihrer mit diesen Produkten verknüpften Daten löschen
Gesamtes Google-Konto löschen
Daten löschen
Aufbewahrung Ihrer Informationen
Wir speichern erhobene Daten über verschiedene Zeiträume, abhängig davon, um welche Daten es sich handelt, wie wir sie nutzen und wie Sie Ihre Einstellungen konfigurieren:
Einige Daten können Sie jederzeit löschen, beispielsweise Ihre
personenbezogenen Daten
oder selbst erstellte oder hochgeladene Inhalte, wie
Fotos
und
Dokumente
. Darüber hinaus können Sie in Ihrem Konto gespeicherte
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten
löschen oder
festlegen, dass diese nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht werden
. Wir speichern diese Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto, bis Sie sie entweder selbst entfernen oder entfernen lassen.
Andere Daten werden nach einer bestimmten Zeit automatisch gelöscht oder anonymisiert, etwa
Werbedaten
in Serverprotokollen.
Einige Daten, etwa dazu, wie oft Sie unsere Dienste nutzen, speichern wir, bis Sie Ihr Google-Konto löschen.
Einige Daten speichern wir für längere Zeit, wenn dies aus legitimen geschäftlichen oder rechtlichen Gründen erforderlich ist. Diese Gründe können Sicherheit, Betrugs- und Missbrauchsabwehr oder eine Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich sein.
Wenn Sie Daten löschen, beginnen wir mit einem Datenlöschvorgang, um dafür zu sorgen, dass die Daten sicher und vollständig von unseren Servern entfernt werden oder nur in anonymisierter Form gespeichert bleiben. Wir bemühen uns, Daten mithilfe unserer Dienste davor zu schützen, irrtümlich oder mutwillig gelöscht zu werden. Aus diesem Grund kann es zwischen der von Ihnen durchgeführten Löschung von Inhalten und dem Zeitpunkt, zu dem Kopien aus unseren aktiven Systemen und Sicherungssystemen gelöscht werden, zu Verzögerungen kommen.
Weitere Informationen zur Dauer der Datenspeicherung bei Google und Angaben dazu, wie lange es dauert, bis wir Ihre Informationen löschen,
finden Sie hier
.
Compliance und Zusammenarbeit mit Regierungsbehörden
Wir überprüfen die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung regelmäßig und verarbeiten Ihre Daten entsprechend dieser Datenschutzerklärung.
Datenübermittlung
Wir betreiben
Server auf der ganzen Welt
. Deshalb können Ihre Daten auf Servern verarbeitet werden, die außerhalb des Landes liegen, in dem Sie leben. Datenschutzgesetze sind von Land zu Land unterschiedlich und einige bieten mehr Schutz als andere. Unabhängig davon, wo Ihre Daten verarbeitet werden, wenden wir grundsätzlich dieselben, in der Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen Schutzmaßnahmen an. Ferner halten wir bestimmte
rechtliche Rahmenbedingungen
zu Datenübermittlungen ein.
Sobald wir formale schriftliche Beschwerden erhalten, nehmen wir mit der Person, die die Beschwerde eingereicht hat, Kontakt auf. Wir arbeiten mit den jeweils zuständigen Regulierungsbehörden einschließlich der lokalen Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörden zusammen, um alle Beschwerden bezüglich der Übermittlung Ihrer Daten beizulegen, die wir nicht direkt mit Ihnen klären können.
Anforderungen in Europa
So können Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben und Google kontaktieren
Wenn das Datenschutzrecht der Europäischen Union (EU) oder des Vereinigten Königreichs (UK) auf die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten Anwendung findet, stellen wir Ihnen die in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Steuerungsmöglichkeiten
zur Verfügung, damit Sie Ihre Rechte ausüben können, Auskunft über Ihre Daten zu erhalten, sie zu aktualisieren, zu
löschen
und deren Verarbeitung einzuschränken. Darüber hinaus haben Sie das Recht, der Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten zu widersprechen oder Ihre Daten in einen anderen Dienst zu exportieren.
Bei weiteren Fragen oder Anliegen hinsichtlich Ihrer Rechte können Sie sich
an Google und an unsere Datenschutzabteilung wenden
. Falls Sie Bedenken bezüglich Ihrer Rechte gemäß lokalem geltenden Recht haben, können Sie sich außerdem an Ihre lokale Datenschutzaufsichtsbehörde wenden.
Datenverantwortlicher
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
hängt von Ihrem gewöhnlichen Aufenthaltsort ab, sofern dies in den Datenschutzhinweisen eines bestimmten Dienstes nicht anders angegeben ist:
Google Ireland Limited, mit Sitz in Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Irland, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder der Schweiz haben.
Google LLC, mit Sitz in 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA, für Nutzer von Google-Diensten, die ihren gewöhnlichen Aufenthalt im Vereinigten Königreich haben.
Google LLC ist unabhängig von Ihrem Wohnort der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, die in Diensten wie der
Google Suche
und Google Maps indexiert und angezeigt werden. Google Ireland Limited ist der zuständige Datenverantwortliche für die Verarbeitung von Informationen, mit denen Google AI-Modelle trainiert werden, um sie in Diensten einzusetzen, die Google Ireland Limited im Europäischen Wirtschaftsraum oder in der Schweiz bereitstellt.
Rechtsgrundlagen der Verarbeitung
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten zu den in dieser Datenschutzerklärung beschriebenen
Zwecken
auf der Basis der folgenden rechtlichen Grundlagen:
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, um Ihnen einen Dienst bereitzustellen, den Sie im Rahmen eines Vertrags angefordert haben.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, soweit wir oder
Dritte
ein berechtigtes Interesse daran haben, dies zu tun. Dabei wenden wir
geeignete Maßnahmen
zum Schutz Ihrer Privatsphäre an.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer lebenswichtige Interessen oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Daten, wenn wir dazu eine rechtliche Verpflichtung haben.
Wir bitten Sie um Ihre Einwilligung zur Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten für bestimmte Zwecke. Sie haben das Recht, Ihre Einwilligung jederzeit zu widerrufen.
Ihre Datenschutzeinstellungen sowie die Art, wie Sie Google-Dienste verwenden, bestimmen, welche Daten verarbeitet werden, zu welchem Zweck dies geschieht und was die Rechtsgrundlagen dafür sind. In der folgenden Tabelle werden diese Verarbeitungszwecke, die Arten der verarbeiteten Daten sowie die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung ausführlicher erläutert.
Warum und wie wir Daten verarbeiten
Welche Daten wir verarbeiten
Rechtliche Gründe
Bereitstellung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir verarbeiten die Begriffe, nach denen Sie suchen, um Ihnen entsprechende Suchergebnisse anzuzeigen.
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, um Ihnen die angeforderten Daten senden zu können, beispielsweise ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, verwenden wir Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen – beispielsweise für die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für das Produkt oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Wir verarbeiten Ihre Zahlungsinformationen, wenn Sie zusätzlichen Speicherplatz für Google Drive kaufen.
Wir können Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen verwenden, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren. So können wir Ihnen helfen, diese Personen zu finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Eine E‑Mail mit einer Flugbestätigung kann verwendet werden, um eine Check‑in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Google erhebt auch Daten über Sie aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen. Wenn beispielsweise Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird, kann die Google-Suchmaschine diesen Artikel indexieren und anderen Personen zeigen, wenn sie nach Ihrem Namen suchen. Oder wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Wir können Ihnen helfen, Ihren Standort mithilfe der
Google-Standortfreigabe
zu teilen. So können andere Sie auf einer Karte finden oder Ihre voraussichtliche Ankunftszeit abschätzen.
Wie im Abschnitt
Datenweitergabe
beschrieben, geben wir personenbezogene Daten außerhalb von Google weiter, wenn wir Ihre Einwilligung dazu haben. Wir bieten Ihnen außerdem Einstellungen, mit denen Sie
Apps und Websites von Drittanbietern überprüfen und verwalten
können, denen Sie Zugriff auf Daten in Ihrem Google-Konto gewährt haben.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise durch das Bereitstellen eines YouTube-Videos oder durch die Bearbeitung und Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung, wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder physische Waren von uns kaufen.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispiel: Verwendung von Kontaktdaten (wie Namen und E‑Mail-Adressen) von Personen, mit denen Sie in Google-Produkten interagieren, damit Sie diese Personen leichter finden, wenn Sie in Google-Diensten wie Gmail, Fotos und Assistant etwas mit ihnen teilen oder mit ihnen kommunizieren möchten.
Ihre
Einwilligung
, z. B. wenn Sie Ihren Standort über die Google-Standortfreigabe teilen.
Aufrechterhaltung und Verbesserung von Google-Diensten, ‑Produkten und ‑Funktionen
Aufrechterhaltung des Dienstes, damit er wie vorgesehen funktioniert, z. B. durch Fehlerbehebung sowie Nachverfolgung und Behebung von Problemen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir überprüfen fortlaufend die ordnungsgemäße Funktion unserer Dienste, um Probleme zu erkennen. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erhobenen Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beheben.
Wir erfassen die Interaktionen von Nutzern mit Schaltflächen in Anwendungen wie Google Maps und der Google Suche, um festzustellen, ob sie wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Verbesserung der Google-Dienste sowie der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit dieser Dienste, z. B. durch Erkennung, Verhinderung und Reaktion von bzw. auf Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsrisiken und technische Probleme, die den Dienst oder Nutzer beeinträchtigen könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten zu Ihren Interaktionen mit unseren Diensten, damit wir die Produkte weiter optimieren können. So können wir beispielsweise besser feststellen, wenn Nutzer zu lange brauchen, um eine bestimmte Aufgabe auszuführen, oder manche Schritte überhaupt nicht beenden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
Wir analysieren, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Wir analysieren die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Wir analysieren Suchanfragen bei Google Shopping, um festzustellen, welche Produkte, Händler und Marken für verschiedene Arten von Suchanfragen relevant sind.
Die Safe Browsing-Funktion von Google Chrome kann Informationen zu verdächtigen Websites zwischen dem Browser eines Nutzers und Google-Servern teilen und dadurch z. B. zum Schutz vor Phishing, Malware und schädlicher Werbung beitragen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Erfüllung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise bei der Verwendung der Interaktionsprotokolle von Google-Apps, um sicherzustellen, dass diese wie vorgesehen funktionieren.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Verwaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, welche Suchbegriffe am häufigsten falsch geschrieben werden, damit wir die Rechtschreibprüfung für alle unsere Dienste verbessern können.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Durchführung von Recherchen, mit denen unsere Dienste für unsere Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Beispielsweise arbeiten wir daran, die Übersetzungsqualität von Google Übersetzer zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Entwicklung neuer Google-Dienste, ‑Produkte und ‑Funktionen
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Nutzer Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, organisiert haben, halfen uns bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos.
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie kurze Inhalte von Creatorn erstellt und von Nutzern angesehen werden, halfen Google dabei, neue YouTube-Dienste zu entwickeln.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen können wir Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit Diensten wie der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard speichern, um die Audiotechnologien von Google weiterzuentwickeln und zu verbessern.
Wir verwenden Informationen, die online oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind, um neue Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und grundlegende Technologien zu entwickeln, die für verschiedene Google-Produkte wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI-Funktionen eingesetzt werden.
Wir nutzen Ihre Interaktionen mit KI-Modellen und ‑Technologien wie Gemini-Apps, um diese Modelle zu entwickeln, zu trainieren, zu optimieren und zu verbessern, damit sie besser auf Ihre Anfragen reagieren. Wir verwenden sie auch, um Klassifikatoren und Filter zu aktualisieren und dadurch z. B. die Sicherheit, das Sprachverständnis und die Genauigkeit zu verbessern.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Beispielsweise haben uns Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen Fotos in Picasa, der ersten Foto-App von Google, verwendet haben, bei der Entwicklung von Google Fotos geholfen. Oder wir nutzen Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen weiterzuentwickeln, die diese grundlegenden Technologien nutzen – wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Zum Beispiel verwenden wir Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten – wie Ihre Interaktionen mit Gemini-Apps – um Modelle für maschinelles Lernen zu trainieren und zu verbessern und um ihr Sprachverständnis sowie ihre Sicherheitsklassifikatoren und -filter zu aktualisieren.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
, beispielsweise das Speichern von Audioaufnahmen von Sprachinteraktionen mit der Google Suche, Assistant, Maps und Gboard, um Technologien zur Audioerkennung von Google zu entwickeln und verbessern.
Zur Bereitstellung personalisierter Dienste, einschließlich Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen
Um unsere Dienste für Sie anzupassen, etwa über Empfehlungen, personalisierte Inhalte und personalisierte Suchergebnisse.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Der Sicherheitscheck von Google bietet Ihnen Sicherheitstipps, die an Ihre Nutzung von Google-Produkten angepasst sind.
Google News bietet Ihnen möglicherweise lokale Nachrichten, die auf Ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Die Google Suche bietet Ihnen möglicherweise Ergebnisse, die auf ihrem ungefähren Standort basieren.
Google Assistant kann Ihre Kontakte verwenden, um auf Anfrage Nachrichten zu senden, z. B. „SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Google Play nutzt Daten, etwa über Apps, die Sie installiert haben, und Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, um neue Apps zu empfehlen, die Ihnen gefallen könnten.
Möglicherweise zeigen wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Google kann Werbung basierend auf dem Kontext der von Ihnen besuchten Website anzeigen, beispielsweise Anzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Tipps zum Gärtnern.
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und „Web- & App-Aktivitäten“ aktiviert haben, können Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse erhalten, die auf Ihren bisherigen Suchanfragen und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten basieren.
Je nach Ihren Einstellungen, um auf Ihre Interessen bezogene personalisierte Werbung anzuzeigen.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wenn Sie nach „Mountainbikes“ suchen oder Videos über Mountainbiken ansehen, kann in Ihren Suchergebnissen oder auf YouTube Werbung für Sportausrüstung eingeblendet werden.
Wenn Sie sich auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, wird Ihnen beim Surfen im Web möglicherweise mehr Werbung zu diesem Thema präsentiert.
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Um einen
Vertrag mit Ihnen auszuführen
, zum Beispiel wenn Google Assistant Ihre Kontakte verwendet, um auf Ihre Anfrage hin eine Nachricht zu senden, wie „Sende eine SMS an Max Mustermann“.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Personalisierung unserer Dienste, um sie nutzerfreundlicher zu gestalten.
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Google Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht, Sicherheitstipps passend zu Ihrer Nutzung von Google-Produkten geben oder gegebenenfalls die Nutzung altersgerecht anpassen.
Einblenden von Werbung, um viele unserer Dienste kostenlos anbieten zu können.
Zum Beispiel zeigen wir möglicherweise Werbung, die auf dem Kontext einer besuchten Website basiert, wie Werbeanzeigen für Gartengeräte auf einer Seite mit Gartentipps. Bei personalisierter Werbung bitten wir Sie um Ihre Einwilligung.
Mit Ihrer
Einwilligung
– beispielsweise Empfehlungen bei Google Play basierend auf Videos, die Sie sich auf YouTube angesehen haben, oder personalisierte Werbung auf Grundlage Ihrer Interessen. Zum Beispiel könnte Ihnen Werbung rund um das Thema Backen angezeigt werden, wenn Sie im Web surfen, nachdem Sie auf YouTube Videos über Backen angesehen haben.
Zur Leistungsmessung – Wir nutzen die Daten zur Analyse und Messung, um zu verstehen, wie unsere Dienste verwendet werden.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir analysieren Daten über Ihre Besuche auf unseren Websites, um das Design unserer Produkte zu optimieren.
Wir nutzen Daten zu der Werbung, mit der Sie interagieren, um Werbetreibenden ein besseres Verständnis ihrer Werbekampagnen zu ermöglichen.
Wir verwenden Daten darüber, welche Orte Nutzer in Google Earth am häufigsten anklicken, um zu erfahren, welche Funktionen beliebt sind, und um Fehler zu identifizieren.
Die Google Suche erhebt, wie oft eine bestimmte Anfrage gestellt wurde und wie Nutzer die Qualität ihrer Suchergebnisse wahrnehmen, um die Google Suche noch hilfreicher zu gestalten.
Google Übersetzer analysiert Daten über die Anzahl der angefertigten Übersetzungen und die Häufigkeit, mit der eine Übersetzung als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln und Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Wir geben möglicherweise nicht personenidentifizierbare Informationen an unsere Partner – beispielsweise Lizenzgeber von Inhalten – weiter, wenn wir Lizenzgebühren zahlen.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Erkenntnisse darüber, wie Personen unsere Dienste nutzen, um die Leistung unserer Dienste zu gewährleisten und zu verbessern.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir die Nutzung von Google Übersetzer, um die Übersetzungsqualität zu verbessern und Google Übersetzer in weiteren Sprachen verfügbar zu machen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Beispielsweise beobachten wir Nutzungsmuster in Google Earth, um Programmfehler zu identifizieren.
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie oft eine Übersetzung bei Google Übersetzer als minderwertig eingestuft wird, um Probleme bei der Nutzung des Dienstes zu beheben.
Entwicklung neuer Produkte und Funktionen, die für unsere Nutzer hilfreich sind.
Zum Beispiel analysieren wir Daten zur Anzahl der in Google Übersetzer angefertigten Übersetzungen, um mögliche neue Funktionen zu ermitteln.
Einhalten von Verpflichtungen gegenüber unseren Partnern wie Entwicklern und Rechteinhabern.
Zum Beispiel erstellen wir Berichte für die Lizenzgeber von Inhalten, die mit der Zahlung von Lizenzgebühren einhergehen.
Für die Kommunikation mit Ihnen – Wir verwenden die von uns erhobenen Daten, wie etwa Ihre E-Mail-Adresse, um direkt mit Ihnen zu interagieren.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
So könnten wir Ihnen beispielsweise eine Benachrichtigung senden, wenn wir verdächtige Aktivitäten feststellen, z. B. einen Versuch, sich von einem ungewöhnlichen Standort aus in Ihrem Google-Konto anzumelden.
Möglicherweise informieren wir Sie über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen unserer Dienste.
Wenn Sie Google kontaktieren, zeichnen wir Ihre Anfrage auf, um Ihnen bei der Lösung eventuell auftretender Probleme behilflich sein zu können.
Google-Dienste wie Google Fotos können Ihnen, abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen, Marketingmitteilungen über Angebote wie beispielsweise Rabattaktionen für Fotodrucke senden.
Google-Dienste wie YouTube Premium und YouTube Music Premium können Sie über anstehende Änderungen Ihres Abonnements informieren.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Zur
Ausführung eines Vertrags
mit Ihnen, beispielsweise wenn Sie den Google-Support kontaktieren oder sich für Mitteilungen über Produktupdates anmelden.
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Bereitstellung, Aufrechterhaltung und Optimierung von Diensten, um die Anforderungen unserer Nutzer zu erfüllen.
Wir informieren Sie beispielsweise über unsere Dienste, beispielsweise über anstehende Änderungen oder Verbesserungen.
Marketing, um Nutzer über unsere Dienste zu informieren.
Zum Beispiel können wir eine E-Mail an Nutzer von Google Fotos senden, die Informationen zu einer Rabattaktion für Fotodrucke enthält.
Zum Schutz von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit
Zur Verbesserung der Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste. Dazu zählen das Erkennen, Verhindern und Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln und technischen Problemen, die Google, unseren Nutzern oder der Öffentlichkeit schaden könnten.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wir erheben und analysieren IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten, um unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch zu schützen. Dieser Missbrauch kann viele verschiedene Formen annehmen, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbung Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Wir analysieren Ihre Inhalte, um
Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen
.
Wir verarbeiten Informationen zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen, Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Fähigkeit zur Rechenschaftslegung zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Zur Einhaltung geltender Gesetze, Verordnungen sowie Rechtsverfahren oder Befolgung eines vollstreckbaren behördlichen Ersuchens.
Beispiele für Verarbeitungsaktivitäten:
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde.
Aufgrund rechtlicher Verpflichtungen müssen wir bestimmte Daten speichern, etwa aufgrund einer Dokumentationspflicht im Finanzbereich. Beispielsweise speichern wir aus steuerrechtlichen oder buchhalterischen Gründen Daten zu Zahlungen, die Sie an Google geleistet haben.
Verschiedene Gesetze und Vorschriften verpflichten uns dazu, Maßnahmen zu ergreifen, um sicherzustellen, dass unsere Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen. Um Ihr Alter zu bestimmen, verarbeiten wir das von Ihnen angegebene Geburtsdatum. Wir verarbeiten auch Informationen über Ihre Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten, sowohl wenn Sie in einem Google-Konto angemeldet als auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, und verwenden maschinelles Lernen, um festzustellen, ob Sie wahrscheinlich über 18 Jahre alt sind. In bestimmten Fällen, wenn wir nicht bestätigen können, dass Sie alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen, können wir andere Informationen anfordern, um Ihr Alter zu überprüfen, beispielsweise Ihren Personalausweis, Ihre Kreditkarte, ein Foto von Ihnen oder Ihre Telefonnummer.
Welche Daten verarbeitet werden, hängt von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Die Daten können Folgendes umfassen:
Daten, die Sie uns bei der Nutzung unserer Dienste zur Verfügung stellen:
Inhalte, die Sie erstellen, hochladen oder empfangen (z. B. Fotos, Videos, E‑Mails, Dokumente und Tabellen).
Google Dashboard
: Damit können Sie Daten verwalten, die mit bestimmten Produkten verknüpft sind.
Personenbezogene Daten, die Sie angeben, wenn Sie ein Google-Konto erstellen (z. B.
Ihr Name
und Ihr Passwort,
Ihre Telefonnummer
, Ihr Geburtsdatum oder
Zahlungsinformationen
).
Daten, die wir erheben, wenn Sie unsere Dienste nutzen:
Informationen zu Ihren Apps, Browsern und Geräten
wie
eindeutige IDs
, die mit dem Browser, der App oder dem Gerät verknüpft sind, den, die bzw. das Sie verwenden, sowie Informationen über die Interaktion Ihrer Apps, Browser und Geräte mit unseren Diensten (z. B. IP-Adresse, Absturzberichte und Systemaktivitäten).
Informationen zu Ihren Aktivitäten in unseren Diensten
wie Ihre Suchbegriffe, der mit Ihrem Google-Konto synchronisierte Chrome-Browserverlauf, Ihre Aufrufe und Interaktionen von bzw. mit Inhalten und Werbung sowie Ihre Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden. Die in Ihrem Google-Konto gespeicherten Aktivitäten können Sie auf der Seite
Meine Aktivitäten
einsehen und verwalten.
Standortinformationen
, die etwa anhand von GPS, IP-Adresse und anderen Daten von Sensoren an Ihrem Gerät oder in dessen Nähe ermittelt werden können. Dies hängt zum Teil von Ihren Geräte- und Kontoeinstellungen ab.
Informationen aus öffentlich zugänglichen Quellen
wie Informationen, die online (z. B. wenn Ihr Name in Ihrer lokalen Zeitung erwähnt wird) oder aus anderen Quellen öffentlich verfügbar sind.
Informationen von unseren vertrauenswürdigen Partnern
, z. B. von Verzeichnisdiensten, die uns Informationen zu Unternehmen liefern, die in Google-Diensten angezeigt werden sollen, oder von Sicherheitspartnern, die uns Daten liefern, um vor Missbrauch zu schützen.
Die rechtlichen Grundlagen für die Verarbeitung dieser Informationen hängen von Ihren Einstellungen sowie von der Art ab, wie Sie die Google-Dienste nutzen. Diese Grundlagen können Folgendes umfassen:
Wahrung unserer
berechtigten Interessen
und derer von Dritten, einschließlich:
Durchsetzen rechtlicher Forderungen, einschließlich der Untersuchung möglicher Verletzungen anwendbarer Nutzungsbedingungen.
Wir analysieren beispielsweise Inhalte, um Missbrauch wie Spam, Malware und illegale Inhalte zu erkennen.
Aufdecken, Verhindern oder anderweitiges Bekämpfen von Betrug, Missbrauch, Sicherheitsmängeln oder technischen Problemen bei unseren Diensten.
Zum Beispiel erheben und analysieren wir IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten zum Schutz vor automatisiertem Missbrauch.
Schutz der Rechte, des Eigentums und der Sicherheit von Google, unserer Nutzer und der Öffentlichkeit vor Schaden, einschließlich der Offenlegung von Informationen gegenüber Behörden.
Beispielsweise reagieren wir auf gerichtliche Verfahren oder vollstreckbare Aufforderungen von staatlichen Stellen und Gerichten zur Offenlegung von Daten, nachdem jede Anfrage sorgfältig geprüft wurde, um sicherzustellen, dass sie den anwendbaren Gesetzen entspricht.
Recherchen, durch die unsere Dienste für Nutzer verbessert werden und die für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind.
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Wenn dies zum Schutz Ihrer
lebenswichtigen Interessen
oder denen einer anderen Person erforderlich ist. Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Daten, um sexuellen Missbrauch von Kindern im Internet zu erkennen und zu bekämpfen.
Wenn wir eine
rechtliche Verpflichtung
haben, zum Beispiel zur Aufbewahrung bestimmter Informationen zu Zwecken der Dokumentationspflicht oder zur Verarbeitung und Aufbewahrung von Informationen, um dabei zu helfen sicherzustellen, dass die Nutzer alt genug sind, um unsere Dienste zu nutzen.
Google-Dienste verknüpfen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, bieten wir Ihnen die Wahl, eine Verknüpfung zwischen bestimmten Google-Diensten beizubehalten. Weitere Informationen zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten und zum Verwalten Ihrer Auswahl finden Sie unter
Informationen zum GDM und zu Ihren verknüpften Diensten
.
Informationen über diese Datenschutzerklärung
Anwendungsbereich dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt für alle Dienste, die von Google LLC und seinen
verbundenen Unternehmen
angeboten werden, einschließlich YouTube, Android und Dienste, die auf Websites Dritter bereitgestellt werden, wie Werbedienste. Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für Dienste, für die gesonderte Datenschutzrichtlinien gelten und die die vorliegende Datenschutzerklärung nicht beinhalten.
Diese Datenschutzerklärung gilt nicht für
den Umgang mit Daten durch andere Unternehmen und Organisationen, die unsere Dienste bewerben,
Dienste, die von anderen Unternehmen oder Personen angeboten werden, einschließlich von ihnen angebotene Produkte oder Websites, die möglicherweise Google-Dienste beinhalten, für die die Erklärung gilt, sowie Produkte oder Websites, die Ihnen in Suchergebnissen angezeigt werden oder die über einen Link in unseren Diensten erreicht werden können
Änderungen an dieser Datenschutzerklärung
Wir ändern diese Datenschutzerklärung von Zeit zu Zeit. Wir werden Ihre Rechte im Rahmen dieser Datenschutzerklärung ohne Ihre ausdrückliche Zustimmung nicht einschränken. Wir geben immer das Veröffentlichungsdatum der letzten Änderungen an und bieten Ihnen Zugriff auf
archivierte Versionen
. Bei wesentlichen Änderungen weisen wir deutlicher auf diese hin. So werden Sie zum Beispiel bei bestimmten Diensten per E-Mail über eine Änderung der Datenschutzerklärung benachrichtigt.
Weitere Informationen zum Datenschutz
Google-Dienste
Die folgenden Datenschutzhinweise bieten zusätzliche Informationen zu manchen Google-Diensten:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini-Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Mit Family Link verwaltete Google-Konten für Kinder unter 13 Jahren (in einigen Ländern gilt ein anderes Mindestalter für Google-Konten)
Family Link-Leitfaden zum Datenschutz für Kinder und Teenager
Erhebung von Sprach- und Audiodaten im Rahmen von Funktionen für Kinder in Google Assistant
Wenn Sie Mitglied einer Organisation sind, die Google Workspace oder Google Cloud Platform verwendet, erfahren Sie in den
Datenschutzhinweisen zu Google Cloud
, wie diese Dienste Ihre personenbezogenen Informationen erheben und verarbeiten.
Weitere hilfreiche Ressourcen
Die folgenden Links bieten hilfreiche Ressourcen, um weitere Informationen über unsere Praktiken und Datenschutzeinstellungen zu erhalten.
Ihr Google-Konto
verfügt über zahlreiche Einstellungen, mit denen Sie Ihr Konto verwalten können.
Der
Privatsphärecheck
führt Sie durch die wichtigsten Datenschutzeinstellungen für Ihr Google-Konto.
Im
Google Sicherheitscenter
erhalten Sie Informationen zu unseren integrierten Sicherheitsmaßnahmen und Datenschutzeinstellungen. Außerdem können Sie hier die Tools kennenlernen, mit denen Sie innerhalb Ihrer Familie Grundregeln für die Nutzung digitaler Onlinemedien aufstellen können.
In den
Google-Datenschutzinformationen für Jugendliche
finden Sie Antworten auf einige der uns am häufigsten gestellten Fragen zum Datenschutz
Der Abschnitt
Datenschutz & Nutzungsbedingungen
bietet weitere Hintergrundinformationen zu dieser Datenschutzerklärung und zu unseren Nutzungsbedingungen.
Unter
Technologien
finden Sie weitere Informationen zu folgenden Themen:
So verwendet Google Cookies
Die für
Werbung
verwendeten Technologien
Wie wir Daten von Websites oder Apps verwenden, auf bzw. in denen unsere Dienste genutzt werden
Wichtige Begriffe
Algorithmus
Ein Prozess oder Regelwerk, dem ein Computer beim Ausführen von Problemlösungsverfahren folgt.
Applikationsdaten-Cache
Ein Applikationsdaten-Cache ist ein Datenspeicher auf einem Gerät. Damit kann eine Webanwendung zum Beispiel ohne Internetverbindung ausgeführt oder die Leistung der Anwendung durch schnelleres Laden der Inhalte verbessert werden.
Browser-Webspeicher
Mithilfe des Browser-Webspeichers können Websites Daten in einem Browser auf einem Gerät speichern. Wenn der Speicher als "lokaler Speicher" verwendet wird, können Daten sitzungsübergreifend gespeichert werden. Dadurch sind sie auch nach dem Schließen und erneuten Öffnen des Browsers weiterhin abrufbar. Eine Technologie, die dies ermöglicht, ist HTML 5.
Cookies
Ein Cookie ist eine kleine Datei, die eine Zeichenkette enthält, die an Ihren Computer gesendet wird, wenn Sie eine Website aufrufen. Wenn Sie die Website das nächste Mal besuchen, kann diese anhand des Cookies Ihren Browser wiedererkennen. Cookies können Nutzereinstellungen und andere Informationen speichern. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Einige Funktionen oder Dienste einer Website werden ohne Cookies möglicherweise nicht richtig ausgeführt. Lernen Sie mehr darüber,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
und wie Google Daten, einschließlich Cookies, verwendet,
wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner nutzen
Eindeutige IDs
Bei einer eindeutigen ID handelt es sich um eine Zeichenfolge, anhand derer ein Browser, eine App oder ein Gerät eindeutig identifiziert werden kann. Solche IDs haben eine unterschiedliche Verwendungsdauer und unterscheiden sich darin, ob sie durch den Nutzer zurückgesetzt werden können und wie der Nutzer auf sie zugreifen kann.
Eindeutige IDs werden zu verschiedenen Zwecken verwendet, etwa aus Sicherheitsgründen und zur Betrugserkennung, zum Synchronisieren von Diensten wie dem E-Mail-Posteingang oder zum Speichern von Einstellungen und Anbieten personalisierter Werbung. In Cookies gespeicherte eindeutige IDs dienen beispielsweise dazu, Websites die Darstellung von Browserinhalten in Ihrer bevorzugten Sprache zu ermöglichen. Ihr Browser lässt sich so konfigurieren, dass alle Cookies abgelehnt werden oder dass angezeigt wird, wenn ein Cookie gesendet wird. Weitere Informationen dazu,
wie Google Cookies verwendet
Auf anderen Plattformen als Browsern werden eindeutige IDs zur Erkennung eines bestimmten Geräts oder einer App auf diesem Gerät verwendet. Eine eindeutige ID wie die Werbe-ID wird beispielsweise verwendet, um Ihnen auf Android-Geräten relevante Werbung anzuzeigen. Dies können Sie in Ihren Geräteeinstellungen
verwalten
. Eindeutige IDs können auch vom Hersteller einem Gerät fest zugewiesen werden. Diese IDs werden gelegentlich auch als "Universally Unique ID" oder kurz "UUID" bezeichnet. Ein Beispiel hierfür ist die IMEI-Nummer eines Smartphones. Anhand dieser eindeutigen ID können wir etwa unseren Dienst an Ihr Gerät anpassen oder Geräteprobleme im Zusammenhang mit unseren Diensten analysieren.
Gerät
Ein Gerät ist ein Computer, mit dessen Hilfe auf Google-Dienste zugegriffen werden kann. Beispielsweise werden Desktop-Computer, Tablets, intelligente Lautsprecher und Smartphones als Geräte bezeichnet.
Google-Konto
Um einige unserer Dienste nutzen zu können, ist es erforderlich, ein
Google-Konto
zu erstellen und einige personenbezogene Daten (typischerweise Ihren Namen, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse und ein Passwort) anzugeben. Mithilfe dieser Kontoinformationen ist es möglich, Sie zu authentifizieren, wenn Sie auf Dienste von Google zugreifen, und Ihr Konto vor nicht autorisierten Zugriffen durch andere Nutzer zu schützen. Sie können Ihr Konto jederzeit über die Google-Kontoeinstellungen bearbeiten oder löschen.
IP-Adresse
Jedem Gerät, das mit dem Internet verbunden ist, wird eine Nummer zugewiesen. Diese wird als Internet Protocol(IP)-Adresse bezeichnet. Diese Nummern werden normalerweise in Blöcken zugewiesen, die bestimmten geografischen Gebieten zugeordnet sind. Anhand der IP-Adresse kann oftmals der Ort identifiziert werden, von dem aus sich das Gerät mit dem Internet verbindet.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Nicht-personenbezogene Daten
Das sind Nutzer-Informationen, die erfasst werden, sodass sie nicht länger auf individuell identifizierbare Nutzer verweisen können.
Personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um Daten, die Sie uns zur Verfügung stellen und anhand derer Sie persönlich identifiziert werden können (z. B. Ihr Name, Ihre E-Mail-Adresse oder Zahlungsinformationen), oder sonstige Daten, die von Google mit Informationen dieser Art in Verbindung gebracht werden können, beispielsweise Informationen, die wir mit Ihrem Google-Konto verknüpfen.
Pixel-Tag
Ein Pixel-Tag wird auf einer Website oder innerhalb einer E-Mail-Nachricht platziert, um bestimmte Aktivitäten wie das Aufrufen von Websites oder das Öffnen von E-Mails zu erfassen. Pixel-Tags werden häufig in Kombination mit Cookies eingesetzt.
Sensible personenbezogene Daten
Hierbei handelt es sich um besondere Kategorien personenbezogener Daten wie etwa vertrauliche medizinische Informationen, die Zugehörigkeit zu einer bestimmten ethnischen Gruppe, politische oder religiöse Gesinnungen oder sexuelle Neigungen.
Serverprotokolle
Wie bei den meisten Websites zeichnen unsere Server automatisch Ihre Aufrufe unserer Websites auf. Diese „Serverprotokolle“ enthalten normalerweise Ihre Webanfrage, die IP-Adresse, den Browsertyp, die Browsersprache, das Datum und die Uhrzeit Ihrer Anfrage sowie ein oder mehrere Cookies, die Ihren Browser eindeutig identifizieren können.
Ein typischer Protokolleintrag für die Suche nach dem Begriff "Autos" sieht folgendermaßen aus:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
ist dabei die IP-Adresse, die der Internetanbieter dem Nutzer zuweist. Je nach Dienst kann dem Nutzer jedes Mal, wenn er eine Verbindung mit dem Internet herstellt, eine andere Adresse zugewiesen werden.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
sind das Datum und die Uhrzeit der Suchanfrage.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
ist die angeforderte URL einschließlich Anfrage.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
sind der verwendete Browser und das verwendete Betriebssystem.
740674ce2123a969
ist die eindeutige Cookie-ID, die diesem Computer beim ersten Besuch von Google zugewiesen wird. Hinweis: Cookies können von Nutzern gelöscht werden. Wenn der Nutzer seit dem letzten Aufruf von Google das Cookie vom Computer gelöscht hat, wird ihm beim nächsten Aufruf von Google auf dem entsprechenden Gerät erneut eine solche eindeutige Cookie-ID zugewiesen.
Verbundene Unternehmen
Ein verbundenes Unternehmen ist eine juristische Person, die zur Google-Unternehmensgruppe gehört, einschließlich der folgenden Unternehmen, die Dienstleistungen in der EU anbieten: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp und Google Dialer Inc. Weitere Informationen zu den
Unternehmen, die Geschäftsdienstleistungen in der EU anbieten
Verweis-URL
Eine Verweis-URL (Uniform Resource Locator) ist die Information, die ein Webbrowser in der Regel an eine Ziel-Website übermittelt, wenn Sie auf einen Link zu der betreffenden Website klicken. Die Verweis-URL enthält die URL der letzten Website, die im Browser aufgerufen wurde.
Zusätzliche Informationen
Ähnliche Informationen im Zusammenhang mit Ihrer körperlichen oder psychischen Gesundheit
Wenn Sie von uns angebotene Fitnessprodukte und ‐Apps wie Fitbit, die Pixel Watch, Nest oder Google Fit verwenden, erheben wir Daten von Ihnen, z. B. Ihre Größe und Ihr Gewicht. Mithilfe dieser Apps und Geräte sammeln wir außerdem Daten wie Schlafrhythmus, Herzfrequenz, Hauttemperatur, verbrannte Kalorien und zurückgelegte Schritte.
Aktivitäten auf Websites und in Apps von Drittanbietern, die unsere Dienste nutzen
Websites und Apps, bei denen Google-Dienste wie Werbung und Analysen integriert sind, geben Daten an uns weiter.
Diese Daten werden unabhängig vom verwendeten Browser oder Browsermodus erhoben. Beispielsweise kann der Inkognitomodus in Chrome zwar dazu beitragen, dass andere Personen, die Ihr Gerät verwenden, nicht sehen können, welche Inhalte Sie aufgerufen haben. Websites und Apps von Drittanbietern, bei denen unsere Dienste integriert sind, können dennoch Daten an Google weitergeben, wenn Sie sie öffnen.
Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
zu einigen der Optionen, mit denen Sie festlegen können, welche Daten weitergegeben werden, wenn Sie Websites und Apps öffnen oder nutzen, die Google-Dienste verwenden.
Aktivitäten in Google-Diensten
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, können Daten zu Ihren Aktivitäten auf Websites, in Apps und in Diensten von Google in den Web- & App-Aktivitäten Ihres Kontos gespeichert werden. Einige Aktivitäten können Informationen über den ungefähren Ort enthalten, an dem Sie sich bei der Nutzung des Google-Dienstes aufgehalten haben. Wenn Sie unter Verwendung eines ungefähren Orts nach etwas suchen, wird dafür ein Gebiet von mindestens drei Quadratkilometern verwendet. Alternativ wird der Ort erweitert, bis der Bereich den Standort von mindestens 1.000 Personen umfasst. So wird Ihre Privatsphäre besser geschützt.
In einigen Fällen werden Orte, an denen Sie in der Vergangenheit gesucht haben, möglicherweise dazu verwendet, einen relevanten Standort für Ihre Suche zu schätzen. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Berlin nach Cafés suchen, zeigt Google bei zukünftigen Suchanfragen möglicherweise Ergebnisse für Berlin an.
Unter
Meine Aktivitäten
können Sie Ihre Web- & App-Aktivitäten ansehen und verwalten.
Android-Gerät mit Google-Apps
Android-Geräte mit Google-Apps sind Geräte, die von Google oder einem unserer Partner verkauft werden und umfassen Smartphones, Kameras, Fahrzeuge, Wearables und Fernseher. Diese Geräte nutzen Google Play-Dienste und andere vorinstallierte Apps. Dazu zählen Dienste wie Gmail, Maps, die Kamera- und Telefon-App Ihres Smartphones, die Sprachausgabe, die Tastatureingabe und Sicherheitsfunktionen. Weitere Informationen über Google Play-Dienste
finden Sie hier
.
Bereitstellung unserer Dienste
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele dafür, wie wir Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung unserer Dienste nutzen:
Wir verwenden die IP-Adresse Ihres Geräts, damit Sie die von Ihnen angeforderten Daten laden können, wie etwa ein YouTube-Video.
Wir verwenden eindeutige IDs, die in Cookies auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert sind, um Sie als die Person zu authentifizieren, die auf Ihr Google-Konto zugreifen darf.
Fotos und Videos, die Sie in Google Fotos hochladen, werden verwendet, um Ihnen zu helfen, Alben, Collagen und andere Kreationen zu erstellen, die Sie mit anderen teilen können.
Weitere Informationen
Eine Flugbestätigung, die Sie per E-Mail erhalten, kann verwendet werden, um eine Check-in-Schaltfläche in Gmail zu erstellen.
Wenn Sie Dienstleistungen oder Artikel von uns kaufen, teilen Sie uns möglicherweise Informationen wie Ihre Lieferadresse oder Lieferanweisungen mit. Wir verwenden diese Informationen beispielsweise für die Verarbeitung, die Durchführung und die Lieferung Ihrer Bestellung sowie zur Bereitstellung des Supports für den Artikel oder die Dienstleistung, die Sie kaufen.
Bestimmte Google-Dienste
Beispielsweise können Sie
Ihren Blog
aus Blogger oder
eine Google-Website, die Ihnen gehört
, aus Google Sites löschen. Zusätzlich können Sie
Rezensionen
löschen, die Sie zu Apps, Spielen und anderen Inhalten im Play Store verfasst haben.
Bestimmte Partner
Beispielsweise gestatten wir Creatorn und Werbetreibenden, mit Messunternehmen zusammenzuarbeiten, um mithilfe von Cookies oder ähnlichen Technologien mehr über die Zielgruppe ihrer YouTube-Videos oder Werbeanzeigen zu erfahren. Ein weiteres Beispiel sind Händler auf unseren Shopping-Seiten, die mithilfe von Cookies ermitteln, wie viele Nutzer ihre Produkteinträge sehen.
Hier erhalten Sie weitere Informationen
zu diesen Partnern und zu deren Verwendung Ihrer Daten.
Cookies – Damit unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Wir verwenden beispielsweise ein Cookie namens "lbcs", mit dessen Hilfe sich eine große Zahl von Google Docs-Dokumenten in einem einzigen Browser öffnen lässt. Wird dieses Cookie blockiert, kann Google Docs nicht korrekt ausgeführt werden.
Weitere Informationen
Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten auf dieser Website mit Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites verknüpfen
Google Analytics nutzt eigene Cookies, also Cookies, die vom Google Analytics-Kunden gesetzt wurden. Bei der Verwendung unserer Systeme können Google Analytics-Kunden und Google über Google Analytics generierte Daten mit Drittanbieter-Cookies verknüpfen, die durch Besuche auf anderen Websites generiert wurden. Beispielsweise könnte ein Werbetreibender seine Google Analytics-Daten dazu verwenden, relevantere Werbung zu erstellen oder seinen Traffic genauer zu analysieren.
Weitere Informationen
Der für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Informationen zuständige Datenverantwortliche
Das ist das mit Google verbundene Unternehmen, welches für die Verarbeitung Ihrer Daten und die Einhaltung der anwendbaren Datenschutzgesetze verantwortlich ist.
der Öffentlichkeit
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten gemäß den Richtlinien von Google zur Entfernung von Inhalten oder gemäß anwendbarem Recht, um das betreffende Ersuchen zu prüfen sowie Transparenz zu gewährleisten, die Rechenschaftspflicht zu verbessern und Missbrauch und Betrug bei diesen Verfahren zu verhindern.
Dienste nutzen, um Anrufe zu tätigen und zu erhalten oder um Nachrichten zu senden und zu empfangen
Beispiele für diese Dienste sind:
Google Voice zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Anrufen, Senden von SMS und Verwalten der Mailbox
Google Meet zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen
Gmail zum Senden und Empfangen von E-Mails
Google Chat zum Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Duo zum Tätigen und Empfangen von Videoanrufen und Senden und Empfangen von Nachrichten
Google Fi für einen Telefontarif
Dritte
Beispielsweise verarbeiten wir Ihre Daten, um Rechteinhabern Nutzungsstatistiken bereitzustellen, sie also darüber zu informieren, wie ihre Inhalte in unseren Diensten genutzt wurden. Wir könnten Ihre Daten auch dann verarbeiten, wenn Personen nach Ihrem Namen suchen und wir Suchergebnisse von Websites anzeigen, die öffentlich verfügbare Daten über Sie enthalten.
für die Öffentlichkeit von Vorteil sind
Wir verarbeiten beispielsweise Informationen zu
Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten
aus unseren Diensten, um die Öffentlichkeit zu informieren, Recherchen zu ermöglichen und Transparenz in Bezug auf diese Ersuchen zu bieten.
Geeignete Sicherheitsmaßnahmen
Beispielsweise können wir Daten anonymisieren oder verschlüsseln, damit sie mit keinen anderen Daten über Sie verknüpft werden können.
Weitere Informationen
Geräte
Wir können beispielsweise Informationen von Ihren Geräten nutzen, um Ihnen bei der Entscheidung behilflich zu sein, welches Gerät Sie für die Installation einer App oder zum Ansehen eines Films verwenden sollten, die Sie bei Google Play gekauft haben. Diese Informationen verwenden wir außerdem zum Schutz Ihres Kontos.
Gerichtliches Verfahren oder vollstreckbares behördliches Ersuchen
Wie andere Technologie- und Kommunikationsunternehmen auch erhält Google regelmäßig Anfragen von staatlichen Behörden und Gerichten auf der ganzen Welt, in denen wir zur Offenlegung von Nutzerdaten aufgefordert werden. Die Achtung Ihrer Privatsphäre und die Sicherheit Ihrer gespeicherten Daten sind zwei wesentliche Aspekte, an denen wir uns bei der Frage orientieren, ob wir diesen rechtlichen Anfragen nachkommen. Unsere Rechtsabteilung prüft jede einzelne Anfrage unabhängig von ihrer Art. Häufig werden Anfragen abgelehnt, die zu allgemein gehalten sind oder bei denen das korrekte Verfahren nicht eingehalten wurde. Weitere Informationen finden Sie in unserem
Transparenzbericht
.
Gewährleisten und verbessern
Beispielsweise analysieren wir, wie Personen mit Werbung interagieren, um die Leistung unserer Werbeanzeigen zu verbessern.
Gewährleisten, dass unsere Dienste ordnungsgemäß funktionieren
Beispielsweise überprüfen wir fortlaufend, ob unsere Systeme ordnungsgemäß funktionieren, sodass Probleme erkannt werden können. Wenn wir feststellen, dass eine Funktion fehlerhaft ist, ermöglichen uns die vor dem Eintreten des Problems erfassten Aktivitätsdaten, das Problem schneller zu beseitigen.
Ihre Aktivitäten auf anderen Websites und in Apps
Diese Aktivitäten könnten durch die Nutzung von Google-Diensten entstehen. Beispiele dafür sind die Synchronisierung Ihres Kontos mit Chrome oder Besuche von Websites und Apps von Google-Partnern. Viele Websites und Apps arbeiten bei der Verbesserung ihrer Inhalte und Dienste mit Google zusammen. Beispielsweise können Websites unsere Werbedienste wie AdSense oder Analysetools wie Google Analytics verwenden oder andere Inhalte wie Videos von YouTube einbetten. Von diesen Produkten können Daten über Ihre Aktivitäten an Google weitergegeben werden. Je nach
Ihren Kontoeinstellungen
und den verwendeten Produkten können diese Daten mit Ihren personenbezogenen Daten verknüpft werden, zum Beispiel, wenn ein Partner Google Analytics in Verbindung mit unseren Werbediensten verwendet.
Weitere Informationen über die Datennutzung durch Google
, wenn Sie die Websites oder Apps unserer Partner verwenden
In deren Namen Werbung und Recherchedienste bereitstellen
Beispielsweise können Händler Daten von ihren Kundenkartenprogrammen hochladen, um Informationen zu diesen Programmen in die Such- oder Shopping-Ergebnisse aufzunehmen oder sich ein besseres Bild von der Leistung ihrer Werbekampagnen zu machen. Wir stellen Werbetreibenden nur zusammengefasste Berichte zur Verfügung, die keine Informationen über einzelne Personen preisgeben.
in unseren Diensten erhobene Daten verwenden
Je nach Ihren verfügbaren Einstellungen finden Sie im Folgenden Beispiele für die Verwendung der von uns in unseren Diensten erhobenen Daten:
Wenn Sie in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und eine Suche auf Google durchführen, erscheinen neben Suchergebnissen aus dem öffentlichen Web auch relevante Informationen aus den Inhalten, die in anderen Google-Produkten wie Gmail oder Google Kalender vorhanden sind. Dazu zählen unter anderem der Status Ihrer gebuchten Flüge, Restaurant- und Hotelreservierungen oder Ihre Fotos.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie mit jemandem über Gmail kommuniziert haben und diese Person zu einem Google Docs-Dokument oder einem Termin in Google Kalender hinzufügen möchten, wird die E-Mail-Adresse automatisch vervollständigt, sobald Sie mit der Eingabe des Namens beginnen. Diese Funktion vereinfacht das Teilen von Inhalten mit Freunden und Bekannten.
Weitere Informationen
Die Google App kann Daten nutzen, die Sie in anderen Google-Produkten gespeichert haben, um Ihnen, entsprechend Ihren Einstellungen, personalisierte Inhalte einzublenden. Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihren Web- & App-Aktivitäten Suchanfragen gespeichert haben, kann Ihnen die Google App Nachrichtenartikel und andere zu Ihren Interessen passende Informationen auf der Basis Ihrer Aktivitäten zeigen, wie z. B. Sportergebnisse.
Wenn Sie Ihr Google-Konto mit Google Home verknüpfen, können Sie über Google Assistant Ihre Daten verwalten und Dinge erledigen. So können Sie beispielsweise Ihrem Google Kalender Termine hinzufügen oder die Terminübersicht für einen bestimmten Tag aufrufen, Statusaktualisierungen zu einem gebuchten Flug abrufen oder Informationen wie Wegbeschreibungen an Ihr Smartphone senden.
Weitere Informationen
Wenn Sie ein Nutzer in der EU sind, wirken sich Ihre Entscheidungen zum Verknüpfen von Diensten darauf aus, wie bestimmte Google-Dienste die Daten dienstübergreifend verwenden können.
Informationen über Objekte in der Nähe Ihres Geräts
Wenn Sie die Standortdienste von Google unter Android nutzen, können wir die Leistung von Apps verbessern, die, wie Google Maps, Standortdaten benötigen. Wenn Sie den Standortdienst von Google nutzen, sendet Ihr Gerät über Sensoren wie den Beschleunigungsmesser, über nahe gelegene Mobilfunkmasten und über WLAN-Zugangspunkte, wie die MAC-Adresse und die Signalstärke, Informationen an Google. Diese Daten ermöglichen eine bessere Bestimmung Ihres Standorts. Den Google-Standortdienst können Sie in den Einstellungen Ihres Geräts aktivieren.
Weitere Informationen
Inhalte und Werbeanzeigen, die Sie sich ansehen und mit denen Sie interagieren
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten zu Aufrufen und Interaktionen mit Werbeanzeigen, damit wir Werbetreibenden zusammengefasste Berichte bereitstellen können, aus denen hervorgeht, ob wir ihre Werbeanzeige auf einer Seite ausgeliefert haben und ob die Werbeanzeige von einem Nutzer gesehen wurde. Darüber hinaus können auch andere Interaktionen gemessen werden, etwa wie Sie Ihre Maus über eine Werbeanzeige bewegen oder ob Sie mit der Seite interagieren, auf der die Werbeanzeige eingeblendet wird.
löschen
Sie können beispielsweise, wie oben beschrieben, basierend auf dem anwendbaren Recht (einschließlich Datenschutzrecht) und unseren Richtlinien das
Entfernen von Inhalten aus bestimmten Google-Diensten beantragen
, einschließlich Inhalten, in denen sich möglicherweise Ihre Daten befinden.
Missbrauch erkennen
Wenn wir auf unseren Systemen Spam, Malware, illegale Inhalte (einschließlich
Darstellungen des sexuellen Missbrauchs und der Ausbeutung von Kindern
) und andere Formen von Missbrauch feststellen, die gegen unsere Richtlinien verstoßen, können wir Ihr Konto deaktivieren oder andere angemessene Maßnahmen ergreifen. Unter bestimmten Umständen melden wir den Verstoß auch den zuständigen Behörden.
Öffentlich zugängliche Quellen
Beispielsweise erheben wir Daten, die online oder in anderen öffentlichen Quellen verfügbar sind, um die KI-Modelle von Google zu trainieren sowie Produkte und Funktionen wie Google Übersetzer, Gemini-Apps und Cloud AI weiterzuentwickeln. Wenn Ihre Unternehmensinformationen auf einer Website erscheinen, können wir sie indexieren und in Google-Diensten anzeigen.
Orte, denen Sie ein Label hinzufügen, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihr Arbeitsplatz
Sie können wichtige Orte in Ihrem Google-Konto speichern, z. B. Ihr Zuhause oder Ihren Arbeitsplatz. Wenn Sie Ihre Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse festlegen, werden damit bestimmte Aktionen einfacher, etwa das Abrufen von Wegbeschreibungen oder Ergebnissen in der Nähe Ihrer Privat- oder Arbeitsadresse. Außerdem sehen Sie relevantere Werbung.
Sie können Ihre Privat- und Arbeitsadresse jederzeit in Ihrem
Google-Konto
bearbeiten oder löschen.
Partnerschaft mit Google
Es gibt mehr als zwei Millionen Partnerwebsites und -apps im Google-Werbenetzwerk.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierte Suchergebnisse
Wenn Sie beispielsweise in Ihrem Google-Konto angemeldet sind und die Einstellungen für Web- & App-Aktivitäten aktiviert sind, erhalten Sie relevantere Suchergebnisse auf der Basis Ihrer früheren Suchaktivitäten und Aktivitäten in anderen Google-Diensten.
Weitere Informationen dazu erhalten Sie hier.
Auch wenn Sie abgemeldet sind, können Sie personalisierte Suchergebnisse erhalten. Wenn Sie dieses Maß an Personalisierung bei der Suche nicht wünschen, können Sie
privat suchen und surfen
oder die
personalisierte Suche in abgemeldetem Zustand
deaktivieren.
Personalisierte Werbung
Möglicherweise wird Ihnen auch personalisierte Werbung präsentiert, die auf den Daten des Werbetreibenden basiert. Wenn Sie beispielsweise auf der Website eines Werbetreibenden eingekauft haben, kann dieser die Daten über Ihren Besuch zum Einblenden von Werbeanzeigen nutzen.
Weitere Informationen
Personalisierung unserer Dienste
Beispielsweise können wir ein Google-Doodle auf der Startseite der Suche zeigen, das sich speziell auf einen feierlichen Anlass in Ihrem Land bezieht.
Personen, mit denen Sie online am häufigsten zu tun haben
Wenn Sie zum Beispiel beim Schreiben einer E-Mail eine Adresse in das Feld "Empfänger", "Cc" oder "Bcc" eingeben, schlägt Gmail Ihnen Adressen von Personen vor,
die Sie am häufigsten kontaktieren
.
Sensible Kategorien
Wenn wir Ihnen personalisierte Werbung präsentieren, so basiert diese auf Themen, von denen wir denken, dass Sie aufgrund Ihrer Aktivitäten daran interessiert sein könnten. Beispielsweise könnten wir Werbung für Themen wie "Kochen und Rezepte" oder "Flugreisen" einblenden. Wir verwenden jedoch nicht solche Themen und schalten nicht solche personalisierten Werbeanzeigen, die auf sensiblen Kategorien wie ethnischer Zugehörigkeit, Religion, sexueller Orientierung oder Gesundheit basieren.
Dasselbe verlangen wie auch von unseren Werbetreibenden
, die unsere Dienste nutzen.
Sensordaten von Ihrem Gerät
Ihr Gerät ist möglicherweise mit Sensoren ausgestattet, die zur genaueren Bestimmung Ihres Standorts und Ihrer Bewegungen verwendet werden können. Beispielsweise kann mithilfe eines Beschleunigungsmessers Ihre Bewegungsgeschwindigkeit erfasst werden und mit einem Gyroskop die Richtung festgestellt werden, in die Sie sich bewegen.
Weitere Informationen dazu, wie wir Standortinformationen verwenden
Server auf der ganzen Welt
Wir betreiben Rechenzentren
auf der ganzen Welt
, um Nutzern unsere Produkte ununterbrochen zur Verfügung stellen zu können.
Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit
Im Folgenden finden Sie Beispiele für die Nutzung Ihrer Daten zur Gewährleistung von Sicherheit und Zuverlässigkeit unserer Dienste:
Durch das Erheben und Analysieren von IP-Adressen und Cookiedaten können wir unsere Dienste durch automatisierte Mechanismen vor Missbrauch schützen. Dieser Missbrauch nimmt viele verschiedene Formen an, zum Beispiel das Senden von Spam an Gmail-Nutzer. Außerdem könnte Werbetreibenden durch betrügerisches Klicken auf Werbeanzeigen Geld gestohlen werden oder Inhalte durch das Starten eines Distributed-Denial-of-Service-Angriffs (DDoS) unterdrückt werden.
Mit der Funktion "Letzte Kontoaktivität" in Gmail können Sie feststellen, ob und wann eine andere Person ohne Ihr Wissen auf Ihre E-Mail zugegriffen hat. In dieser Funktion finden Sie Informationen zu den letzten Aktivitäten in Gmail, wie etwa die IP-Adressen, über die auf Ihre E-Mails zugegriffen wurde, sowie wo und wann der Zugriff erfolgt ist.
Weitere Informationen
Sprach- und Audiodaten
Sie können zum Beispiel entscheiden, ob Sie möchten, dass Google eine Audioaufnahme in Ihrem Google-Konto speichert, wenn Sie mit der Google Suche, Google Assistant und Google Maps interagieren. Wenn Ihr Gerät einen Befehl zur Aktivierung der Sprachsteuerung erkennt, beispielsweise „Hey Google“, zeichnet Google sowohl Ihre Stimme und Audio als auch einige Sekunden vor der Aktivierung auf.
Weitere Informationen
Synchronisation mit Ihrem Google-Konto
Ihr Chrome-Browserverlauf wird nur dann in Ihrem Konto gespeichert, wenn Sie in Chrome die Synchronisierung mit Ihrem Google-Konto aktiviert haben.
Weitere Informationen
Telefonnummer
Wenn Sie Ihrem Konto Ihre Telefonnummer hinzugefügt haben, kann diese abhängig von Ihren Einstellungen in Google-Diensten für unterschiedliche Zwecke verwendet werden. Beispielsweise kann Ihre Telefonnummer dazu genutzt werden, Ihnen zu helfen, wieder auf Ihr Konto zugreifen zu können, wenn Sie Ihr Passwort vergessen haben. Außerdem kann sie anderen Personen helfen, Sie zu finden und mit Ihnen Kontakt aufzunehmen. Schließlich kann sie verwendet werden, um für Sie relevantere Werbung einzublenden.
Weitere Informationen
Trends aufzuzeigen
Wenn viele Nutzer nach etwas Bestimmtem suchen, kann dies Aufschluss über aktuelle Trends geben. Google Trends analysiert Suchanfragen in der Google Websuche, um die Anzahl der Suchanfragen in einem bestimmten Zeitraum zu ermitteln, und veröffentlicht eine Zusammenfassung dieser Ergebnisse.
Weitere Informationen
Unsere Dienste verbessern
Beispielsweise können wir anhand von Cookies analysieren, wie Nutzer mit unseren Diensten interagieren. Diese Analyse kann uns helfen, unsere Produkte zu optimieren. So könnten wir zum Beispiel feststellen, dass Nutzern die Durchführung einer bestimmten Aufgabe zu lange dauert oder dass manche Schritte überhaupt nicht durchgeführt werden können. In diesem Fall können wir diese Funktion überarbeiten und das Produkt für alle verbessern.
unserer Nutzer
Beispielsweise gibt Google Daten zu Ersuchen um Entfernung von Inhalten aus unseren Diensten an Lumen weiter, um Missbrauch zu verhindern und die Transparenz und Rechenschaft in Bezug auf unsere Moderation von Online-Inhalten zu verbessern. Lumen erfasst und analysiert diese Ersuchen, um Forschung zu ermöglichen, mit deren Hilfe Internetnutzer ihre Rechte besser verstehen.
Weitere Informationen
Vor Missbrauch schützen
Beispielsweise können uns Informationen über Sicherheitsbedrohungen helfen, Sie zu informieren, wenn wir denken, dass Unbefugte Zugriff auf Ihr Konto erlangt haben (an diesem Punkt können wir Ihnen helfen, Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihres Kontos zu ergreifen).
Werbung, die Sie besonders nützlich finden
Wenn Sie sich beispielsweise auf YouTube Videos zum Thema Backen ansehen, werden Ihnen beim Surfen im Web unter Umständen mehr Werbeanzeigen zu diesem Thema eingeblendet. Anhand Ihrer IP-Adresse können wir auch Ihren ungefähren Standort ermitteln, damit wir Werbung für Pizza-Lieferservices in der Nähe einblenden können, wenn Sie den Suchbegriff "Pizza" eingeben. Hier finden Sie weitere Informationen
über Werbung bei Google
und
warum Ihnen bestimmte Werbeanzeigen präsentiert werden
.
Zahlungsinformationen
Wenn Sie Ihrem Google-Konto eine Kreditkarte oder eine andere Zahlungsmethode hinzufügen, können Sie damit in allen unseren Diensten Artikel einkaufen, wie z. B. Apps im Play Store. Unter Umständen bitten wir Sie um weitere Informationen, wie eine Unternehmenssteuernummer, um Ihre Zahlung verarbeiten zu können. In manchen Fällen müssen wir Ihre Identität überprüfen und könnten Sie dafür nach Informationen fragen.
Wir können Zahlungsinformationen auch verwenden, um zu überprüfen, ob Sie die Altersbeschränkungen einhalten. Dies kann beispielsweise der Fall sein, wenn Sie ein falsches Geburtsdatum angegeben haben, das darauf schließen lässt, dass Sie für ein Google-Konto nicht alt genug sind.
Weitere Informationen
Google
Über Google
Datenschutz
Nutzungsbedingungen
Transparenz-Center
Eine Drop‑down-Liste, um die Sprache der Website zu ändern. Jede Option ist der Name einer Sprache. Es gibt insgesamt 65 Optionen.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 43
https://getsitecontrol.com/privacy/:
Getsitecontrol
Solutions
Widgets
Create email opt-in forms, promo
bars, surveys & exit popups.
Automations
Set up automated workflows and let them work while you sleep.
Contacts
Get your contact list organized and
build audience segments.
Broadcasts
Send promotional emails about new products, sales, and events.
Shopify App
Install Getsitecontrol app for Shopify and grow your store faster.
Templates
Widget templates
Choose among premade signup forms, promo banners & bars.
Email templates
Discover professional email templates for different occasions.
Resources
Blog
Fresh ideas and actionable guides to
help you grow your online business.
Help center
Questions about Getsitecontrol?
Find answers in our knowledge base.
Use cases
Find out how to use widgets, with detailed tutorials and examples.
Community
Stay in the loop and access new templates in our Slack community.
Pricing
Products
Getsitecontrol
Popups & inline forms, email marketing and automated workflows.
Aurora theme for Shopify
A flexible and feature-rich Shopify theme to express your unique style.
Apps for Shopify
Apps for Shopify stores developed under the GSC umbrella brand.
Getform
Online forms & link trees for your brand. Generate leads without a website.
Log in
Sign up free
Privacy policy
This Privacy Policy should be reviewed alongside our Terms of Service. By using our Website, Services, and Apps, you acknowledge that you have read and agreed to both documents.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines how Getwebcraft Limited (“Getwebcraft,” “we,” “us,” or “our” as appropriate) collects, stores, utilizes, and shares your information during your interactions with our
Website
and the usage of our products and services (collectively, “Services”), including but not limited to the applications accessible on the
Shopify platform
. It also describes your rights in relation to your personal information.
By visiting our website and utilizing our Services, you give consent to the collection, transfer, manipulation, storage, disclosure, and other forms of using your information, as described within this Privacy Policy.
Note that this Privacy Policy is an essential aspect of both the terms and conditions that oversee the use of our Website and any applicable terms and conditions that relate to the use of our Apps.
1. Introduction
1.1 We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our website visitors and service users. A visitor of our website or end user of our service is referred to as “you”, “your(s)” or “yourself”.
1.2 This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with respect to the Personally Identifiable Information (hereinafter to be referred to as “PII”), as defined in Article 4 of the GDPR, of our website visitors and service users; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data.
1.3 This Privacy Policy also applies to the transfer of personal data from the UK to countries outside of the UK. We use the UK Addendum to ensure that personal data is transferred in a secure and compliant manner.
1.4 Our website incorporates privacy controls that affect how we will process your personal data. By using the privacy controls, you can specify whether you would like to receive direct marketing communications. You can access the privacy controls via your Getsitecontrol dashboard.
1.5 In addition, the terms “collect”, “process”, “treat”, “use”, “share”, “disclose”, “divulge” and analogous words shall refer to your PII and other data collected from our visitors and end users.
1.6 From time to time, this Policy may be translated into other languages for your convenience. The English language version of each of these documents shall be the version that prevails and governs your use of Website and our products and services.
2. Information We Collect
2.1 When you visit and use our Website, sign up for our Services and Apps, or contact the Getwebcraft team, we may ask you to provide us with some PII that can be used to contact or identify you, and information on your use or potential use of the Services. PII that we might collect includes information like your email address and name. PII may also include other information you supply to us concerning your preferences and interests expressed while using the Services and Apps.
By providing us with this information, you consent to your information being collected, used, disclosed, and stored by us in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We will only collect personal data that is necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. We will not collect any Special Categories of Personal Data (such as data about race, religion, or health) without your explicit consent.
2.2 We use your PII to administer your account and provide you services, to send communications and administrative emails, to respond to your inquiries, and to send marketing and product update messages to those who ask for such messages. Overall, through the provision of its Services, Getwebcraft will collect the following types of PII:
Personal Information
Personal Information includes information that can be used to personally identify an individual person, including but not limited to: first name, last name, title, date of birth, billing address, email address and telephone numbers.
Accordingly, you hereby represent and warrant to Getwebcraft that you have the necessary rights and authorizations required for the disclosure of any and all PII.
Personal Information collected by Getwebcraft includes: Name and Email
Non-Personal Information
Non-Personal Information includes information that cannot be used to personally identify an individual person, such as: general demographic information, anonymous usage data including number of clicks, platform types, preferences you submit and preferences that are generated based on the data you submit.
Personal Information Collected via Third-Party Tools
Personal Information Collected via Third-Party Tools includes such information as aggregated user statistics, analytics, demographic information, and web site usage information. As our user, you will generally be able to control and select the amount and type of PII you may disclose to us.
Personal Information Collected via Social Media Integration
We may allow our users to use single sign-on authentication services such as those provided by Facebook, Google, and others (if applicable). Henceforth, the Site might provide an option of using your social media credentials and, thus, by such action, we will collect your PII as given by such third party platforms, but never more than the PII these platforms disclose. If you close your social media account, or if you deauthorize our access, your access to our website may be suspended. For more information, please read the terms and policies of such third-party platforms.
Technical Information Collected via our website
As you navigate through the website, certain information can be passively collected (that is, gathered without you actively providing the information) using various technologies and means, such as Internet Protocol addresses, cookies, Internet tags, and navigational data collection.
Internet Protocol (IP) addresses
An IP Address is a number assigned to your computer by your Internet service provider so you can access the Internet and is generally considered to be non-personally identifiable information, because in most cases an IP address is dynamic (changing each time you connect to the Internet), rather than static (unique to a particular user's computer). We use your IP address to diagnose problems with our server, report aggregate information, determine the fastest route for your computer to connect to our Website, and administer and improve services to our consumers.
Cookies
A “cookie” is a bit of information that a website sends to your web browser that helps the site remember information about you and your preferences. “Session cookies” are temporary bits of information that are erased once you exit your web browser window or otherwise turn your computer off. Session cookies are used to improve navigation on websites and to collect aggregate statistical information.
Persistent Cookies
Persistent cookies are more permanent bits of information that are placed on the hard drive of your computer and stay there unless you delete the cookie. Persistent cookies store information on your computer for a number of purposes, such as retrieving certain information you have previously provided (e.g., username), helping to determine which areas of the website visitors find most valuable, and customizing the website based on your preferences.
Internet tags
Internet tags, also known as single-pixel GIFs, clear GIFs, invisible GIFs, and 1-by-1 GIFs, are smaller than cookies and tell the Site's server information such as the IP address and browser type related to the visitor's computer.
Navigational data
Navigational data is also known as “log files,” “server logs”, “clickstream” data and “Internet Tags”, and used for system management, to improve the content of the site, market research purposes, and to communicate information to visitors.
2.3 We do not collect any Special Categories of Personal Data about you (this includes details about your race or ethnicity, religious or philosophical beliefs, sex life, sexual orientation, political opinions, trade union membership, information about your health, and genetic and biometric data). Nor do we collect any information about criminal convictions and offences.
2.4 We also collect, use and share Aggregated Data such as statistical or demographic data for any purpose. Aggregated Data could be derived from your personal data but is not considered personal data in law as this data will not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may aggregate your Usage Data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific website feature. However, if we combine or connect Aggregated Data with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data which will be used in accordance with this privacy policy.
2.5 You can instruct your device or browser, by changing its options, to stop accepting cookies or to prompt you before accepting a cookie. If you do not accept cookies, however, you may not be able to use all functionality of our Services.
2.6 When we send emails to our registered customers, we may track who opened the emails and who clicked on any of the hyperlinks. We do this to measure the performance of our email campaigns, and to improve our offerings.
3. Third-party links and services
3.1 It is possible that our Website or our Apps will contain links to third-party websites and services. Please remember that when you use a link to go from our Website to another website or you request a service from a third party, this privacy policy no longer applies.
3.2 Your browsing and interaction on any other website, or your dealings with any other third-party service provider, is subject to that website’s or third-party service provider’s own rules and policies.
3.3 We do not monitor, control, or endorse the privacy practices of any third parties.
3.4 We encourage you to become familiar with the privacy practices of every website you visit or third party service provider that you deal with and to contact them if you have any questions about their respective privacy policies and practices.
3.5 This privacy policy applies solely to personal information collected by us through our Website and functionality and does not apply to these third-party websites and third-party service providers.
4. Use and Disclosure of Personal Information
4.1 We use your personal information to provide you with our services, to communicate with you, to improve our services, and to protect our legal rights. We may also share your personal information with third parties, such as our payment processors.
4.2 We do not use or disclose your PII without your consent unless one of the following circumstances applies:
We will need to use your PII in order to comply with the obligations we have under the service agreement we have with you.
We may share aggregated information with third parties that does not include PII and we may otherwise disclose aggregated service usage information with third parties.
We will use the information you provide to bill and collect sums owed to us. Uses for this purpose include sending you emails, invoices, receipts, and notices of delinquency, to alert you if we need a different credit card number, and to otherwise try to collect money owed. Financial transactions relating to our website and services are handled by our payment services providers called Adyen, Bluesnap, and PayPal. We advise you to read and agree to their terms and conditions and their privacy policy as well when using our Website. We will share transaction data with our payment services providers only to the extent necessary for the purposes of processing your payments, refunding such payments and dealing with complaints and queries relating to such payments and refunds.
We may send you informational and promotional content in accordance with your marketing preferences. You can stop receiving our promotional emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in every email.
We may use your information to request feedback and to contact you about your use of our website, to administer a contest, promotion, survey or other site feature.
We may use your information as part of our efforts to keep our website safe and secure (for example, for fraud monitoring and prevention).
We may use your information and PII as supporting items in order to enforce our terms, conditions and policies for business purposes, to comply with legal and regulatory requirements or in connection with our contract, as well as to respond to legal requests and prevent harm. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond. We may send you system alert messages. For example, we may inform you of temporary or permanent changes to our Services, such as planned outages, new features, version updates, releases, abuse warnings, and changes to our Privacy policy.
We may share Personal information with third parties if access, use, or disclosure of such information is necessary to (a) satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process or an enforceable governmental request, (b) enforce the applicable Terms of service, including investigation of potential violations thereof, (c) detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues, or (d) protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Getwebcraft, its users or the public as required or permitted by law.
If our business is sold or merges in whole or in part with another business that would become responsible for providing the website to you, we retain the right to transfer your PII to the new business. The new business would retain the right to use your PII according to the terms of this Privacy Policy as well as to any changes to this privacy notice as instituted by the new business. We will also retain the right to transfer your PII if our company files for bankruptcy and some or all of our assets are sold to another individual or business.
4.3 In order to provide our services, we use third-party platforms and tools, such as those provided by PayPal, Google and Amazon, among other providers. Please be aware that such platforms are governed by their own terms, policies and personal data collection practices and policies. Accordingly, by acknowledging your consent to this Policy, you are also acknowledging the applicable terms and conditions of such third-party platforms, which provide functionalities that include aggregated statistics. Upon the case of any discrepancy or conflict among this Policy and the terms of them, the terms of the latter entities will govern. We will keep a list of any sub-processors that will be involved in the processing of your PII due to the provision of our service and will inform you of any intended material changes concerning the addition or replacement of sub-processors before such changes are effective, thereby giving you the opportunity to object to such changes.
4.4 Finally, we may disclose your information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding potential violations of our policies, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person and illegal activities, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
5. Retaining and Deleting Personal Data
5.1 Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
5.2 We will only retain your personal data for as long as reasonably necessary to fulfill the purposes we collected it for, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or reporting requirements. We may retain your personal data for a longer period in the event of a complaint or if we reasonably believe there is a prospect of litigation with respect to our relationship with you.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorised use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal, regulatory, tax, accounting or other requirements.
6. Your Privacy Rights as Data Subject
6.1 As we mentioned hereabove, for the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation or GDPR, for European Union residents and United Kingdom residents, Getwebcraft is a “data controller” of the PII you provide to us for the primary purposes of providing you with our services.
This section below covers the certain situations that you, as data subject, and we as a data controller, are most likely to see, but you should also carefully review the full list of data subject rights here:
https://gdpr-info.eu/chapter-3/
and
https://gdpr-info.eu/chapter-4/
You have the right to be informed about the PII we collect from you, and how we process it. For our EU and UK customers and users, by signing up, you agree to the terms and conditions of our services and hereby acknowledge, agree, and unequivocally consent to the collection, processing, management, treatment, transfer, and authorization of your PII by Getwebcraft, its affiliates, and authorized third parties.
If you are a resident of Switzerland, the contact details for the data protection authorities are available here:
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home.html
.
6.2 You can request information provided are “forgotten”; that is, to have your entire PII removed from our service. If we are asked to do this, in accordance with Article 17 GDPR, we will remove any PII we collected from you as requested. We will also need to contact any third parties that process your PII on our behalf, such as our cloud service providers. To ensure that any personal data in the possession of Getwebcraft can be removed in a timely manner, you can relay any request to be “forgotten” to us by submitting a request.
6.3 As a data subject, in accordance with Article 15 GDPR, you have the right to obtain confirmation as to whether or not we process your personal data and, where we do, access the personal data. You can always ask us to confirm how and where your PII is being stored and processed. You also have the right to know how that data is shared with third parties by us.
6.4 As a data subject, in accordance with Article 16 GDPR, you have the right to have any inaccurate PII about you rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have any incomplete PII data about you completed.
6.5 In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent for consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing purposes; and/or the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions include situations where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
6.6 In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
6.7 In accordance with Article 18 GDPR, you have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for:
the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority vested in us;
direct marketing (including profiling);
processing for purposes of scientific/historical research and statistics;
in relation to automated decision-making and profiling;
or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
6.8 In accordance with Article 20 GDPR, our users located in the EU, EEA or/and UK may request Getwebcraft to send them any PII in our possession. In this case, we will provide you with any PII that you have in a commonly used, machine-readable format.
6.9 You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affects you.
6.10 To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal information is consent, in accordance with Article 7 (3) GDPR, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the withdrawal.
6.11 You have the right to file a complaint with supervisory authorities if your information has not been processed in compliance with the GDPR. In accordance with Article 77 GDPR, if the supervisory authorities fail to address your complaint properly, you may have the right to a judicial remedy.
6.12 With respect to data transfers from controllers to processors and/or processors to processors, standard contractual clauses pursuant to Article 28(7) of Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (including enforceable data subject rights and effective legal remedies, pursuant to Article 46(1) and Article 46(2)(c) of Regulation 2016/679), we act as a data exporter/controller transferring any data provided to us to the data importer/processor. We may transfer the information you provide to us to contractors and affiliated organisations that may be located outside of your home country. By agreeing to use our service and website, you hereby agree to such transfer. It is our responsibility to ensure such third parties agree to the same level of confidentiality as we have with you. As a data exporter, we will make all reasonable efforts to determine that the data importer is able, through the implementation of appropriate technical and organisational measures provide the required service and protect any data provided to them. We will also ensure the data provided to the data importer are used only for specific reasons to which you have consented or as may be required to provide our services to you.
6.13 This Privacy Policy complies with the
relevant SCCs
and the UK Addendum. We use these mechanisms to ensure that your personal information is transferred securely and in a compliant manner when it is transferred from the European Economic Area (EEA) or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States of America (USA).
6.14 You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your PII data by means of a written notice to us. Your privacy notice request must include, at the least, the following information: (i) your complete name, address and/or e-mail address in order for us to notify you the response to your request; (ii) attached documents establishing your identity; and (iii) a clear and concise description of the PII with regard to which you seek to enforce any of your privacy rights. If you request rectification, please indicate amendments to be made and attach documentation to back up your request.
Upon receipt of your written privacy notice request, and after due review, we may then edit, deactivate and/or delete your PII from our services within thirty (30) days. In case of secure databases under our control where deletion is impossible, we will make such information permanently inaccessible.
7. Safeguarding Your Information
7.1 We are committed to keeping the personal information you provide us secure and we will take reasonable precautions to protect your personal data from loss, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction, taking into account the risks involved in the processing and the nature of the personal data.
7.2 You can be assured that personal information collected through the website is secure and is maintained in a manner consistent with current industry standards, but please remember that no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage is 100% secure. While we strive to use commercially acceptable means to protect your information, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
7.3 We have implemented information security policies, rules and technical measures to protect the personal information that we have under our control from:
unauthorized access;
improper use or disclosure;
unauthorized modification; and
unlawful destruction or accidental loss.
7.4 All our employees and data processors (i.e. those who process your personal information on our behalf, for the purposes listed above), who have access to, and are associated with the processing of personal information, are obliged to respect the confidentiality of the personal information of all users of the Site.
7.5 The importance of security for all PII associated with our users is of utmost concern to us. Your personal information is protected in several ways. We protect the information you input by undertaking the reasonable technical and administrative security measures (e.g. firewalls, data encryption, physical & administrative access controls to the data and servers) that limit the risk of loss, abuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration.
7.6 If you provide us with your credit card information, the information is encrypted using secure socket layer technology (SSL) and stored within other encryption systems. Although no method of transmission over the Internet or electronic storage is 100% secure, we follow all requirements and implement additional generally accepted industry standards.
7.7 If you make a payment to us, we use third-party payment processors such as Adyen, Bluesnap or PayPal. Payments are encrypted through the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI-DSS) or analogous systems. Your purchase transaction data is stored only as long as it is necessary to complete your purchase transaction. All direct payment gateways adhere to the standards set by PCI-DSS as managed by the PCI Security Standards Council, which is a joint effort of brands like Visa, MasterCard, American Express and Discover. PCI-DSS requirements help ensure the secure handling of credit card information by our site and related courses and its service providers.
8. User eligibility
8.1 This Website is not intended for children and we do not knowingly collect data relating to children. You must at least be eighteen (18) years of age or older to use our Website and our services. We may accept users under such age into our Services, provided, however, that they provide a valid consent proof of their parent or guardian.
8.2 We reserve the right to request any and all applicable proof of identification and consent proof from our users, at any moment, without prior notice, and at our sole and final discretion. Upon the failure to provide such proof of age, we reserve the right to immediately freeze, block or cancel the account, with no liability.
9. Amendments to this Privacy Policy
9.1 Periodically, and at our sole discretion, we may update, change, suspend and/modify or our website, our Services, this Privacy Policy and/or our Terms of Use, in whole or in part.
9.2 You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with any changes to this policy. Your use after any changes indicates your acceptance thereof.
9.3 We may notify you of changes to this policy by email.
10. Notice to California Residents
10.1 Pursuant to the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 or CCPA, Getwebcraft and its affiliates hereto provide the following notice regarding the categories of PII that we have collected or disclosed within the preceding twelve (12) months about California residents who are not employees, independent contractors, owners, directors, officers, or job applicants of Getwebcraft, or emergency contacts or benefits beneficiaries of the foregoing.
10.2 Henceforth, the CCPA provides Californians with the following rights:
Requests for Information
You (or your authorized agent) can request a copy of your PII, including how we have collected, used, and shared your PII over the past 12 months (if any), including the categories of PII we collected and our purposes for doing so; the categories of sources for that information; the categories of third parties with whom we shared it for a business purpose and our purposes for doing so.
Your Right to Opt Out of Sales
We do not sell your PII, thus, we do not offer opt-out notices.
Your Right to Notification
Under the CCPA, we will not collect new categories of PII or use them for materially different purposes without first notifying you.
Nondiscrimination for exercising your CCPA Rights
The CCPA prohibits us from discriminating against you for exercising your rights under the law. Such discrimination may include denying services, charging different prices or rates for services, providing a different level or quality of services, or suggesting that you will receive a different level or quality of goods or services as a result of exercising your rights.
Your Right to Delete PII
You can request that we delete your PII by contacting Getwebcraft. You also can request that we delete specific information, and we will honor such requests, unless a due exception applies, such as when the information is necessary to complete a transaction, verify a fraud, review a chargeback or contract for which it was collected or when it is being used to detect, prevent, or investigate security incidents, comply with laws, identify and repair bugs or ensure another consumer’s ability to exercise their free speech rights or other rights provided by law.
Please take into consideration that we may deny your deletion request if retaining the PII is necessary for us, our affiliates, or our service providers in order to:
Complete the transaction for which we collected the PII information, provide a good or service that you requested, take actions reasonably anticipated within the context of our ongoing business relationship with you, or otherwise perform our contract with you;
Detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for such activities;
Debug our products to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality;
Exercise free speech, ensure the right of another consumer to exercise their free speech rights, or exercise another right provided for by law;
Comply with the California Electronic Communications Privacy Act (Cal. Penal Code § 1546 seq.);
Enable solely internal uses that are reasonably aligned with consumer expectations based on your relationship with us;
Comply with a legal obligation that has substantive grounds;
Make other internal and lawful uses of that information that are compatible with the context in which you provided it.
10.3 Overall, we may collect or will collect the following categories of PII from our visitors, users, and customers as necessary to fulfill our legal obligations and operational business purposes:
Personal information, as defined in the California customer records law, such as contact information and financial information;
Identifiers, such as online identifier, IP address and name;
Financial information, such as transaction information and history and securities trading information and history;
Internet or network activity information, such as browsing history and interactions with our and other websites and systems;
Geolocation data, such as device location and IP location;
Audio, electronic, visual and similar information, such as video recordings created in connection with our business activities;
Inferences drawn from any of the PII listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics.
11. Questions and Complaints
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy policy, please feel free to contact us via email
help@getsitecontrol.com
or chat with us on our website or in the dashboard of your App.
Legal address
Klimentos 41-43, Klimentos Tower, Flat/Office 25, 1061, Nicosia, Cyprus
Date of the last effective update is August 10, 2023.
Sub-policy 44
https://pubmatic.com/legal/privacy-policy:
PubMatic Platform Privacy Policy
This page is about the privacy practices on PubMatic’s Advertising Platform and the personal information it uses to deliver advertising and perform related activities.
Last Updated: November 21, 2024
PubMatic is an advertising technology company that provides a variety of online advertising-related services (see “
Who We Are
“). Any reference to
“you”, “your”, “user(s)”, “individual(s)”, “data subject(s)”,
implies the
“End User(s)”
who accesses websites, apps, or other digital properties that are being monetized through our Ad Services (defined below) so that we may deliver advertising and perform related activities (see “
About Us and Our Services
”). We want you to be familiar with how we collect, use, and share personal information and how you can exercise the privacy rights and choices available to you. This privacy policy (“
Policy
” or the “
Platform Privacy Policy”
) covers the personal information that we may process about you. If you are interested in our corporate and website privacy policy, which governs the personal information PubMatic collects about individuals when they visit, use, or interact with: (i) www.pubmatic.com and other websites operated by us, including PubMatic’s Client interfaces (the “
Websites
”); (ii) our social media pages (our “
Social Media Pages
”) and (iii) our events, sales and marketing activities (collectively, “
PubMatic Properties
”), please review our
Website Privacy Policy
. If you are interested in our applicant privacy practices, please review our
Careers Privacy Policy
.
Your Privacy Choices
Please visit
https://pubmatic.com/legal/opt-out/
to go directly to the interest-based advertising opt-outs we offer.
TABLE OF CONTENTS:
We recognize that reading and understanding privacy practices can be difficult and time-consuming. While we recommend that you read this document in its entirety, to make this process easier for you, we have taken steps to simplify it and provide the following quick links to make it easier to navigate.
WHO WE ARE
ABOUT US AND OUR AD SERVICES
PUBMATIC’S AD SERVICES & PRIVACY
AT A GLANCE
PUBMATIC’S AD SERVICES & PRIVACY – FULL POLICY
USER INFORMATION WE COLLECT
HOW WE USE THE USER INFORMATION
HOW WE DISCLOSE USER INFORMATION
YOUR CHOICES AND DATA PROTECTION RIGHTS
YOUR PRIVACY CHOICES
YOUR DATA RIGHTS
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR RESIDENTS SUBJECT TO STATE PRIVACY
LAWS
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR DATA SUBJECTS IN THE EEA, UK, AND
SWITZERLAND
INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSFERS
DATA PRIVACY FRAMEWORK
RETENTION OF USER INFORMATION
SECURITY
UPDATES TO THIS POLICY
CONTACTING US
—
WHO WE ARE
Any reference to
“PubMatic
” “
we
”,
“us”
or “
our
” means PubMatic, Inc. and its global subsidiaries including, as of the effective date of this Platform Privacy Policy, PubMatic Limited, PubMatic GmbH, PubMatic India Private Limited, パブ ティック株式会社 (PubMatic KK), PubMatic Pte. Ltd. and 据翼软件科技有限公司 (PubMatic Software (Shanghai)) Limited.
To get in touch with us, please see the “
Contacting Us
” section of this document.
ABOUT US AND OUR AD SERVICES
PubMatic provides technology via our advertising platform (the “
Platform
”) and related advertising tools (collectively the “
Ad Services
”) that allow Publishers to make space on their websites, mobile apps, internet-connected or over-the-top TV (known as ‘CTV’ and ‘OTT TV,’ respectively), or other digital properties available to show ads in order to generate revenue (what the advertising industry refers to as a ‘Supply Side Platform’ or ‘SSP’) and buyers to purchase the available space to display ads on these digital properties. In this Policy, we refer to those involved in selling ad space collectively as “
Publishers
”, those looking to buy ad space collectively as “
Media Buyers
” (including, for example advertisers, ad agencies, Demand-Side partners) and Media Buyers and Publishers together as “
Clients.
” Our Ad Services help Clients display relevant online advertising to the End Users who interact with Publishers’ digital properties and engage in planning and measurement to understand how these ads perform. This Policy applies only when we act as a “data controller” and not when we are a processor or service provider acting on behalf of our Clients.
PUBMATIC’S AD SERVICES & PRIVACY
AT A GLANCE
This section serves as a summary of our personal information handling practices and does not replace our full Policy found below.
Please note the following terms that are used in this summary:
Pseudonymous user data
– personal data that can no longer be attributed to a specific data subject without further technical processing or the use of additional data.
ID syncing
– the matching of two or more unique identifiers linked to the same individual.
Cookies and online identifiers
– cookies are small text files that are stored on a user’s browser; online identifiers are often used in lieu of cookies. Similar technologies such as pixels and web beacons, device fingerprinting technologies, local storage, and eTags (collectively
, ”Cookies”
) also allow access to, or storage of, information on a user’s browser or device. These technologies enable various online functionalities (including recognizing and tracking browsing behavior).
What We Do:
Provide Advertising technology for managing digital advertising campaigns and for monetizing digital properties.
User Information We Collect:
Pseudonymous User Information such as:
Unique online and device identifiers
Mobile device advertising identifiers
IP addresses
Browser and device information
Web browsing history from advertising impressions
Information about an individual’s engagement with ads
Information about an individual’s behavior on Digital Properties
Data We May Receive From Partners For Use in Connection With Our Ad
Services:
User Information such as:
Demographic data
Geolocation Information, including precise geolocation data
Obfuscated user identifiers such as hashed email addresses
Pseudonymous personal information (see “
User Information We Collect
” above)
ID Syncing data
How The Ad Services Collect Data:
Some of the ways our Ad Services collect User Information:
from Publishers passing us information so that we can help them monetize ad inventory space on their digital properties
from Clients uploading data onto our platform
from Clients using our technology (including Cookies) to gather data
through the process of serving ads (including how you interact with an ad)
Data Our Ad Services Do Not Collect:
PubMatic’s Ad Services do not collect directly identifiable personal information, including, for example:
PubMatic does not collect your email address
PubMatic does not collect your physical address
PubMatic does not collect your phone number
PubMatic does not collect your social security number
PubMatic does not collect your name
How We Use the Data We Collect:
The Ad Services processes the User Information we collect for advertising purposes, including:
Personalizing ads
Delivering ads
Limiting the number of times you see an ad (called “frequency capping”)
Measuring the effectiveness of ads and ad campaigns
Reporting on ad campaigns to our Clients
Maintaining records or transactions, user actions and conversions
Attributing purchases or other actions taken by a user to ads
Associating devices or identifiers that may be related to each other
Preventing malicious or fraudulent activity
Improving our Ad Services
Location based advertising
Service support and diagnostics
Administration of our business
How We Disclose the Data We Collect:
We disclose User Information that we collect to:
Media Buyers, as a way of informing them about the potential audience for their ads if they purchase a Publisher’s advertising inventory
Clients, to help them improve the effectiveness of their – and their client’s – ads
Service providers, Vendors, and Subprocessors
Where we think we’re required to by law or where we have determined that we need to
in order to defend or bring a legal claim.
PUBMATIC’S AD SERVICES &
PRIVACY – FULL POLICY
USER INFORMATION WE COLLECT
When you visit or use a digital property that uses our technology, we (and our Clients) use and deploy Cookies to automatically collect certain information about you and your computer or other devices, such as your mobile device, CTV, or OTT TV device. While none of this technology provides us with directly identifiable information (meaning, it doesn’t include your name, clear text email address, phone number), it may be considered “
personal data
” or “
personal information”
in some jurisdictions. Altogether, the personal data or personal information discussed in this policy shall be “
User Information.
” PubMatic collects or assigns pseudonymous identifiers (“
Online Identifiers”)
to your browser or other devices to enable our Ad Services to determine within a reasonable level of confidence that a browser or device is the same with which our Ad Services have previously interacted. These identifiers include:
cookie IDs (a unique ID randomly assigned by PubMatic to a browser);
unique online IDs (“
UUID
”) created by identity providers and used by our Clients;
mobile advertising IDs (a unique ID assigned by the mobile operating system (e.g., Apple ID for Advertising or Android Advertising ID)); or
CTV or OTT TV device identifier for advertising (a unique ID assigned by the OTT or CTV publisher).
If we (or our Media Buyers) can identify a browser or device, it increases the value of that advertisement to provide more content for you to enjoy. To opt out of our use of such technologies for interest-based advertising purposes, please follow the instructions for opting out, as described in “
Your Opt-Out Choices
” below. See PubMatic’s
Platform Cookie and Other Similar Technologies Policy
for more information on how PubMatic uses cookies and other similar technologies.
Our Ad Services may also automatically collect the following information and associate it with one of the identifiers described above (also User Information:
Browser and Device Information
, such as the IP address you use to connect to an online service; device type and model; manufacturer; operating system type and version (e.g. iOS or Android); web browser type and version (e.g., Chrome or Safari); user-agent; carrier name; time zone; network connection type (e.g., Wi-Fi or cellular); and information about our Publisher’s apps and versions currently active on a device.
Information about an End User’s behavior on our Publishers digital properties
(“
Behavioral Information
“), such as information about how you interact with the pages of those digital properties, session start/stop time, and precise geolocation (including latitude and longitude coordinates, but only if the Publisher’s digital property has enabled location services on the device and the End User has granted the Publisher permission to collect and share this information for advertising purposes).
Information about ads serviced, viewed, or clicked on
, such as the type of ad, where the ad was served, whether the End User interacted with the ad, the number of times an End User has seen the ad, and whether the End User visited the Media Buyer’s website or relevant app store and/or purchased or installed the product or service advertised (“
Ad Interaction
“).
Information about your location,
which we may derive from the approximate location of your device via your IP address (
“Geolocation Information”).
User Information we receive from third parties
We may also combine, merge and/or augment the User Information we collect about you with information received from Publishers and other Clients (such as our data providers) and may include:
Demographic or interest data, obfuscated user identifiers such as UUIDs, hashed email addresses and/or hashed phone numbers, and content viewed (“
Partner Provided Information
“). We do not intentionally collect or process sensitive User Information (e.g., social security numbers) and attempt to prohibit our Clients and partners from passing any such information to PubMatic.
Precise geolocation information collected through Digital Properties. We will not use precise geolocation information for interest-based advertising without your opt-in consent (“
Geolocation”).
We use this Geolocation to derive regions for ad performance reporting.
We work with Clients to help create or obtain groupings of End Users by one or more attributes (e.g., ‘cycling enthusiast’) for advertising purposes (“
Audience Segments”)
.
HOW WE USE THE USER INFORMATION
We process and/or disclose User Information for various business purposes, including to provide the Ad Services and to operate our business. This section will describe those purposes in detail and includes our data processing practices.
Numerous states within the United States have enacted consumer privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require additional disclosures (“
State Privacy Laws
”). If you are a resident of one of these states, this section applies to you.
Likewise, those located in the EEA or UK are also afforded various rights, including additional disclosures (
“UK & Europe Privacy Laws
”). Under UK & Europe Privacy Laws, we have established a legal basis for processing your personal information. In most instances, consent is the basis for PubMatic’s processing of User Information. If you do not consent with respect to PubMatic’s SSP, PubMatic may still solicit bids for advertising to be displayed to you but will not process your personal information. In some circumstances we may rely on our legitimate interest to collect and use your personal information, except where such interests are overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. For example, we may use any of the data described in this Policy for the secondary purpose of detecting, preventing or otherwise addressing fraud, security, or technical issues, as well as to protect against harm to our rights, property, or safety, or that of the public. This is necessary for us to pursue our, your and our partners’ legitimate interests. If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us using the contact details provided under the “
Contacting Us
” heading below. Please note that we take appropriate measures to ensure that any processing of User Information is done in accordance with applicable privacy laws and regulations, and with care for protecting your privacy and User Information.
Serve and Deliver Ads (Ad Services).
Generally, we process User Information to provide our products and services (including the Ad Services) as described in this Platform Privacy Policy. This is what allows Publishers to offer advertising inventory in their Digital Properties and Media Buyers to bid on and fill that inventory with relevant ads, as well as to determine inventory value and to inform bid decisions (i.e., whether to purchase an ad impression or not, for creating segments for End Users matching, targeting of lookalike audiences or retargeting users). For example, when a Publisher has potential ad inventory to offer, we will send a “bid request” to Media Buyers which includes the information detailed in this privacy policy so that Media Buyers can determine if they want to purchase the ad impression.
Ad Reporting.
Provide information and reports to Media Buyers about when and how End Users have been exposed to their ads, clicked on their ads, or visited their Digital Property (including whether an advertised app has been installed). This information is used to analyze an advertising campaign’s performance.
Frequency Capping.
Using information from our Ad Services to prevent seeing the same ad too many times.
Targeted Advertising.
The method by which we predict likely commercial interests (e.g., sports or travel) based on activities across websites, mobile apps, and other Digital Properties over time. We will also supplement User Information with additional information we receive from third parties, such as third-party advertising segments or audiences, to allow us to customize and more effectively tailor the ads we display to End Users and to optimize the display of ads (including limiting exposure to less relevant ads).
Location Based Advertising.
Location-based advertising, services, and content delivered in real-time using your device’s physical location (where permitted by law).
ID Syncs.
We may disclose cookie values to other advertising technology platforms so that they may match their identifier to our identifier.
Fraud Detection & Prevention (Security).
Identify invalid ad impressions, clicks, installs, or ad queries, protect us and our Publishers from fraudulent behavior, and protect the security of the Ad Services.
Business Operations & Improving the Ad Services.
These purposes include several processing activities supporting our ability to run the business for our Clients, such as to:
Facilitate navigation, display information more effectively, and to personalize your experience while using the Ad Services, as well as auditing, researching, and analyzing information to provide, protect, manage, and improve our Ad Services, develop new services, and ensure that our technologies function properly.
Calculate Ad Services usage levels, help diagnose server problems and administer the Ad Services.
Operate our business, such as billing, support, accounting, improving our internal operations, securing our systems, detecting fraudulent or illegal activity, and meeting our legal obligations.
We may disclose User Information to our service providers that store or process the User Information in furtherance of the services we offer via our Ad Services and on our behalf.
The following table illustrates the categories of User Information processed for each business purpose, the lawful basis under which we process User Information, and the categories of recipients of User Information where we engage third parties to augment our ability to provide the Ad Services.
Purpose of Use
Serve & Deliver Ads (Ad Services)
Ad Reporting
Frequency Capping
Targeted Advertising
Location Based Advertising
ID Syncs
Fraud Detection & Prevention (Security)
Business Operations & Improving the Ad Services
Categories of Personal Data
Online Identifiers
x
x
x
x
Demographic Information
x
x
x
Browser and Device Information
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
Behavioral Information
x
x
x
x
x
Ad Interaction
x
x
x
x
x
Partner Provided Information
x
x
x
Geolocation Information & Geolocation
x
x
x
x
Audience Segments
x
x
x
Lawful Basis (UK / EEA)
Consent
Consent
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Consent
Consent
Legitimate Interest
Legitimate Interest
Categories of Recipients
Affiliates
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
Clients
x
x
x
x
x
Attribution & Analytics Partners
x
x
x
x
Service Providers/
Sub processors & Consultants
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
x
We may disclose User Information in accordance with applicable laws, both within and outside of an individual’s country of residence for specific situations which include:
Where we need to comply with legal obligations or respond to requests from public and government authorities, even if they are outside your country of residence.
To enforce our terms and conditions, protect our operations or the operations of our affiliates, safeguard our rights, privacy, safety, or property, as well as the rights, privacy, safety, or property of our affiliates, you, or others;
When necessary to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims; and
In connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change.
Cross-device and Cross-app targeting
Cross-device and cross-app targeting are strategies employed in digital advertising to effectively connect and interact with individuals across multiple devices and different mobile applications. These strategies aim to enhance the advertising experience by delivering more relevant and personalized ads to you, regardless of the devices or mobile apps you use.
Our Publishers, Media Buyers, and Clients may use information that we share with them to establish connections among related devices (such as smartphones, tablets, and computers) for targeted advertising, analytics, and reporting purposes. They may create a match between your devices if you log into the same online service on multiple devices or web browsers, or if your devices share similar attributes that support an inference that they are used by you or someone in your household. For example, Media Buyers may deliver ads on a tablet based on activities you engaged in on your smartphone. To opt out of cross-device targeting practices, please follow the instructions located at “
Opting Out of Cross-Device Targeting
.”
Our Publishers and Clients also may use information about your activity across multiple, unaffiliated third-party mobile applications for targeted advertising, analytics, and reporting purposes. For example, if you use a travel app, these third parties may display travel-related ads to you on other, unrelated apps.
To opt out of cross-app targeting practices, please follow the instructions located at “
Opting Out of Interest-Based Advertising for Mobile Advertising Identifiers
” in the “
Your Privacy Choices
” section of the
Opt Out webpage
.
HOW WE DISCLOSE USER INFORMATION
Because of the role that PubMatic plays in the advertising ecosystem, many of the use cases described above involve a transfer of data to third parties – often to a Publisher or a Media Buyer. For example, when a Publisher works with us to fill an ad on one of their digital properties, we share information with Media Buyers so that they can determine whether they want to show an ad on that property, how much they want to spend on that ad impression, and what ad to show. More detail on these disclosures is provided below. For the purposes described in this Policy, we share your User Information with the following categories of recipients:
Our affiliates
: We may disclose your information to our affiliates (see “
Who We Are
“) who provide data processing and business administration support for the purposes described in this Policy. PubMatic, Inc., is the party responsible for the management of your User Information jointly used by it and its affiliates.
Third party service providers and partners
: We may disclose your information to our third party service providers and partners who provide data processing services to support the delivery of our Ad Services, or who have a key function in the online advertising ecosystem and with whom it is necessary for PubMatic to exchange information in order to deliver the Ad Services, in each case for purposes described in this Policy.
The following table lists the main categories third party service providers we engage to process your User Information and partners with whom information is exchanged, the nature of the services or role they provide, and the types of User Information they receive in order to provide these services / fulfill their role.
Category of Service Provider or Partner
Nature of Services / Information Sharing
User Information
Publishers
We may disclose data collected through our Ad Services to our Publishers to allow them to analyse the effectiveness and performance of our Ad Services and to offer targeted ad inventory to our Media Buyer Clients.
Browser and Device Information; Behavioral Information; Ad Interaction; Geolocation; Audience Segments; ID Sync Data
Media Buyers
We may share data we collect in connection with our Ad Services with our Media Buyer Clients for purposes relevant to our business relationships with them, such as for billing purposes, dispute resolution, or fraud prevention. This data is also allows them to make decisions regarding buying advertising inventory on Publishers’ Digital Properties and other websites and applications; to analyze the effectiveness and performance of their advertising campaigns via our services; and to enable our Media Buyer Clients to provide you with more personalized content.
Browser and Device Information; Behavioral Information; Ad Interaction; Partner Provided Information; Geolocation; Audience Segments; ID Sync Data; Business Administration Information.
Other Clients
We may share certain data we collect in connection with our Ad Services with brands, agencies and other interested third parties to help them better identify and validate commercial opportunities, promote transparency, and protect against fraud.
Browser and Device Information; Behavioral Information; Ad Interaction; Publisher Provided Information; Geolocation; Audience Segments; ID Sync Data
Attribution and Analytics Partners
We may share data (such as cookie ID, mobile device ID, or other unique identifier) with our (or our Publisher or Media Buyer’s) attribution and analytics partners to validate and measure the success and effectiveness of ads delivered via the Platform.
Browser and Device Information; Behavioral Information; Ad Interaction; Partner Provided Information; Geolocation; Audience Segments; ID Sync Data
IT service providers
IT service providers work on behalf of or with us to allow us to operate the Ad Services, and typically provide services such as data storage, data processing services, hosting services, and technical support.
Browser and Device Information; Behavioral Information; Ad Interaction; Publisher Provided Information; Geolocation; Audience Segments; ID Sync Data
Professional service providers
Professional service providers may be persons, companies or professional firms providing us with advice and consulting in areas such as lead management, campaign management, legal services, accountancy services, and fraud prevention.
Potentially all data types.
Other third parties
:
Buyers of some or part of our business
: We may share your information with a third party in the event of a contemplated or actual reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with any bankruptcy or similar proceedings).
For legal purposes
: We may share your information as we believe to be necessary or appropriate: (a) under applicable law, including laws outside your country of residence; (b) to comply with subpoenas, warrants, or other legal process; (c) to respond to requests from public and government authorities including public and government authorities outside your country of residence; (d) to enforce our terms and conditions; (e) to protect our operations or those of any of our affiliates; (f) to protect our rights, privacy, safety or property, and/or that of our affiliates, you or others; and (g) to allow us to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims.
With consent
: We may disclose an individual’s information to others with the individual’s consent to such disclosure.
YOUR PRIVACY CHOICES AND DATA RIGHTS
Your Privacy Choices
Cookies
To opt out of receiving advertising targeted to your interests (including retargeting) from our Ad Services through the use of cookies in your current browser, and for more information on what it means to opt out, please go to
https://pubmatic.com/legal/opt-out/
. Your opt-out choice will be linked to your browser only; therefore, you will need to renew your opt-out choice if you use a new device or browser, or if you clear your browser’s cookies. See PubMatic’s
Ad Services or “Platform Cookie Policy”
for more information on how PubMatic uses cookies and other similar technologies.
Mobile Apps
Your device may also include a feature that allows you to opt in to or out of having certain information collected through mobile apps used for targeted advertising purposes.
Connected TVs
Our Clients and partners may display interest-based advertising on CTVs (also known as smart TVs or connected devices), based on your use of CTVs over time and across non-affiliated CTV apps. To learn more about these practices and how to opt out, please review your connect TV’s settings menu and visit
https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/
.
Industry Opt Outs
We are a member of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). We also adhere to the Digital Advertising Alliance’s (DAA) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising and Multi-Site Data, the Application of Self-Regulatory Principles to the Mobile Environment, and the Application of the DAA Principles of Transparency and Control to Data Used Across Devices. PubMatic also adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau (“IAB”) Code of Conduct, and actively participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework (TCF 2). We comply with IAB’s Specifications and Policies under vendor identification number 76. Please visit
optout. networkadvertising.org
, or
optout.aboutads.info
to learn how to exercise choice regarding the collection of information about your online activities over time and across multiple third-party websites, online services, devices, or applications for interest-based advertising purposes.
Some of our Publishers have their own opt-out mechanisms that are linked from their sites, which you should review if you no longer wish to receive targeted advertising from a particular company.
Your Data Rights
Individuals may be entitled to exercise certain data subject rights available under applicable laws. These rights may include the right to request access to User Information we hold. Individuals may also have the right to object to, or request that we restrict, processing of User Information, such as profiling we perform for the purpose of interest-based advertising. Individuals may also have the right to ask that User Information be corrected, erased, or transferred to another party. Where we have asked for consent to process data, consent may be withdrawn.
To make a request to exercise your data rights with respect to your User Information, please visit our
DSR Notice Page
. We will take steps to verify your request, such as by asking you to provide confirmation that you control the device to which the request relates. We reserve the right to confirm your residence to accurately process your request and will need to confirm your identity to process your requests to exercise your right to know/access, delete, and correct. This is a security measure to, for example, help ensure we do not disclose information to a person who is not entitled to receive it. The identity verification process may vary depending on how you submit your request. We will only ask for information that we process to verify your identity, such as a cookie ID or mobile advertising ID.
Appeals
If we deny your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision by contacting us at pubmaticprivacy[at]pubmatic[.]com. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Authorized Agents
If you are submitting a rights request as an authorized agent, you are required to submit proof of your identity, and proof of authorization to make the request, such as a valid power of attorney or signed permission from the individual who is the subject of the request. In some cases, we may ask the individual to confirm they have given you permission to make the request. Please be advised that we cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request for an individual, please visit our
DSR Notice Page
.
Nondiscrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR RESIDENTS SUBJECT TO STATE PRIVACY LAWS
Depending on your state of residence, you may have the right to request access to, or deletion or correction of, your User Information. To make such a request with respect to your User Information, please visit our
DSR Notice Page
. We will take steps to verify your request, such as by asking you to provide confirmation that you control the device to which the request relates.
Personal Information that May Be “Shared,” “Sold,” or processed for “Targeted Advertising” & Your Opt-Out Rights under State Privacy Laws
As described in this Platform Privacy Policy, we process information to personalize and deliver ads, and for other ads-related purposes, including to build interest segments. Some of these activities may be considered “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information or using your information for purposes of “targeted advertising” under certain State Privacy Laws. We do not knowingly sell or share personal information about consumers under the age of 18.
If you reside in California, you may also opt out of web-based sales and sharing via our browser cookie by visiting the digital properties of our Clients with a legally-recognized opt-out preference signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control.
Categories of Personal Information
Categories of Recipients
Identifiers (such as cookie IDs and device and advertising IDs)
Demographic information (such as age and gender)
Commercial information (such as apps you download, purchases you make, and other conversion activities)
Internet or other electronic network activity information (such as Publishers’ digital properties that you visit and ads you click on)
Geolocation information, (such as inferred location based on IP address or other types of information that may include precise geolocation information)
Inferences (such as interests associated with a cookie ID based on Publisher digital properties you visit)
Our Clients
Third party data partners
Other Publishers and advertising intermediaries
Please visit
CCPA Privacy Policy
to review our CPRA and Data Broker Metrics
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FOR DATA SUBJECTS IN THE EEA, UK, AND SWITZERLAND
Depending on your location, you may have data subject rights (“
DSR
”s) described in the “
Your Data Rights
” section above; these rights are applicable, for example, to individuals located in the European Economic Area (“
EEA”
), United Kingdom (“
UK”
) and Switzerland. In order to exercise your rights under applicable laws, please visit our
DSR Notice Page
, which includes instructions for how to submit a request and details regarding our process for responding to requests.
If we have collected and processed your User Information with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your User Information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
If you are located in the EEA or the UK, you may also have the right to
complain to a Data Protection Authority
about our collection and use of your User Information. For more information, please contact your local Data Protection Authority.
EEA
Data Protection Authority member list
UK
Information Commissioner’s Office
Please note that because most of the personal information we store can only identify a particular browser or device, and cannot directly identify you personally, you may need to provide us with additional information to enable us to identify the User Information we hold about you and ensure that we accurately fulfill your request and do not infringe on the privacy rights of other individuals.
INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSERS
In connection with the PubMatic Properties and Ad Services, your User Information may be transferred to, and processed by PubMatic, its service providers, and partners in countries other than the country in which you are resident, including in the United States, India, and other locations where we have offices or employees (please see our
Locations
page for a full list) or engage service providers or our partners. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country of residence and may not provide the same level of protection as your jurisdiction. Regardless of where your data is located, PubMatic shall process your User Information in accordance with this Platform Privacy Policy.
If you are located in the EEA, UK or Switzerland, we will protect your User Information when it is transferred outside of your jurisdiction by (i) processing it in compliance with the Data-Privacy Framework (as applicable, defined below); (ii) processing it in a territory that provides an adequate level of protection for User Informationbased on the receiving country’s data protection laws; or (iii) to the extent that the Data Privacy Framework is unavailable and the recipient country has not been deemed to provide adequate protection, implementing appropriate safeguards to protect your User Information, such as requiring the recipient to comply with the EU Standard Contractual Clauses, or another lawful and approved transfer mechanism. Where we transfer User Information originating in the EEA, UK or Switzerland pursuant to a contract incorporating the EU Standard Contractual Clauses or another lawful and approved transfer mechanism, you may request a copy of such transfer mechanism (subject to the removal of confidential or commercially sensitive information).
DATA-PRIVACY FRAMEWORK
PubMatic, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-U.S. DPF”
), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-U.S. DPF”
) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (together, referred to herein as the “
Data Privacy Framework”
). PubMatic, Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regards to the processing of User Information received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. PubMatic, Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regards to the processing of User Information received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. Further, PubMatic is responsible for the processing of personal data it receives, under the EU-U.S. DPF, and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf. PubMatic complies with EU-U.S. DPF Principles for all onward transfers of personal data from the EU, including the onward transfer liability provisions. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Platform Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over PubMatic, Inc’s compliance with the Data Privacy Framework. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose User Information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. In compliance with the Data Privacy Framework, PubMatic, Inc. commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of User Information received in reliance on EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF with our Data Protection Officer at dpo[at]pubmatic[.]com. Additionally, PubMatic commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to our U.S.-based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge), TRUSTe. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, or we are not able to resolve the issue, individuals have the right to lodge a complaint with their local data privacy authority. For contact details of local Data Protection Authorities, please visit the European Data Protection Board member list (
https://www.edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/about-edpb/members_en
) or the UK data protection regulator (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
).
PubMatic GmbH acts as our EU Representative. If you wish to exercise your rights under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (EU GDPR) or have any queries in relation to your rights or general privacy matters, please write to: Attn: EEA Representative, PubMatic GmbH, Barbara Strozzilaan 101, 1083 HN Amsterdam Netherlands.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website,
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf?tabset-35584=2
you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
RETENTION OF USER INFORMATION
We will retain User Information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose of collection, including for the purposes of satisfying any business, legal, regulatory, accounting, or reporting requirements; to establish and defend legal claims; for fraud prevention purposes; or as long as required to meet our legal obligations. To determine the appropriate retention period for User Information, we consider the volume, nature, and sensitivity of the data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of that data, the purposes for which we process the data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, along with any applicable legal requirements.
The following represents the retention periods of User Information, by data type. For clarity, we will revise these periods as required or permitted by law.
USER INFORMATION
RETENTION PERIOD
Pseudonymous and/or obfuscated identifiers (e.g., Cookies, unique online IDs, mobile device advertising IDs, CTV/OTT ID, IP address, browser and/or device information, hashed emails, ID Syncing data); and Geolocation data)
20 days
Information linked to pseudonymous identifiers (e.g., web browsing history from advertising impressions; ad engagement statistics; digital property engagement analytics; and demographic data)
120 days
Personal data created through our processing (e.g., audience segmentation)
90 days
SECURITY
We use reasonable organizational, technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to protect the User Information we collect and process. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing User Information If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for example, if you feel that the security of any account you might have with us has been compromised), please immediately notify us of the problem by contacting us in accordance with the “Contacting Us” section below.
UPDATES TO THIS POLICY
We will review and update this Policy periodically and will note the date of its most recent revision at the top of this Policy. If we make material changes to this Policy, we will post the revised Policy on our website and may take additional measures to inform you about such changes prior to such changes taking effect. We encourage you to review this Policy frequently.
CONTACTING US
If you have any questions about this Platform Privacy Policy or PubMatic’s privacy practices, please contact us by email at pubmaticprivacy[at]pubmatic[.]com, or by mail using the details provided below.
Please note that email communications are not always secure, so please do not include sensitive information in your emails to us.
Residents outside the European Economic Area (EEA):
PubMatic, Inc. c/o Privacy
601 Marshall Street
Redwood City, California 94063, USA
European Economic Area (EEA), and Swiss Residents:
Attn: EEA Representative
PubMatic GmbH
Barbara Strozzilaan 101
1083 HN Amsterdam, Netherlands
UK Residents:
Attn: UK Representative
PubMatic Limited
18 – 22 Stoney Lane
Yardley, Birmingham B25 8YP, England
To comply with our obligations under EU/ UK data protection legislation, we have appointed a Data Protection Officer (DPO). Our DPO is contactable at dpo[at]pubmatic[.]com or by mail using the details provided above. Who is the controller of my data? For the purposes of EU/UK data protection legislation, PubMatic, Inc is the controller of your User Information.
About Cookies On This Site
We use cookies to personalize and enhance your experience on our site. Visit our
Privacy Policy
to learn more or manage your personal preferences in our
Cookie Consent Tool
. By using our site, you agree to our use of cookies.
Decline
Accept
Options
Sub-policy 45
https://www.outbrain.com/legal/privacy:
Outbrain and Teads
Close Agreement to Merge
Learn More
Privacy Center
Download
PRIVACY POLICY
Last Updated 30 October 2023
Outbrain is committed to protecting your personal data. This privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) governs Outbrain’s use of data collected by us, including any and all personal data. Personal data is information that relates to you and may identify you as an individual. We use your personal data in line with all applicable laws. To ensure compliance and to align with Outbrain’s values around trust and transparency we have a team of privacy champions responsible for continuously implementing our global privacy program.
1. Who we are, What we do, How you can contact Outbrain, our DPO or the relevant authorities
Who we are:
This privacy policy applies to Outbrain Inc., a Delaware, USA corporation with headquarters in New York; and its affiliated subsidiaries (collectively, “Outbrain,” or “we“, “us“, “our“). We operate in various offices around the world and we partner with publishers and marketers across the globe.
Please note that Outbrains’ subsidiary Outbrain DSP (formerly Zemanta) Inc has a separate Privacy Policy, which can be found
here
.
What we do:
Outbrain’s mission is to serve interesting recommendations to you based on what we believe are your interests. To achieve our mission we enter into agreements with:
online publishers and partners who want to recommend relevant content to their readers (this is
Outbrain Engage
);
advertisers who want readers to view their content (this is
Outbrain Amplify
); and
third party partners who help us serve relevant recommendations.
For further information on our Amplify (advertiser) services see
here
and our Engage (publisher) services see
here
.
How to contact us:
We regularly review our compliance with this Privacy Policy. Questions, comments and requests regarding this Privacy Policy are welcomed and should be addressed in the first instance to
privacy@outbrain.com
or by mail to
Outbrain Inc., 111 West 19th Street, 3rd Floor, New York, NY 10011, USA, Attn: Privacy Questions
.
If Outbrain does not satisfactorily answer your questions or concerns, you may also contact the following for advice, support or complaints:
Outbrain’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@outbrain.com
; and/or
the
Information Commissioner’s Office
, which is Outbrain’s lead supervisory authority within the European Territories.
2. Alliances and Adherence
We adhere to the Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the
Digital Advertising Alliance
(DAA) and the
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance
(EDAA);
We are members in good standing of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI), an association dedicated to responsible data collection and its use for digital advertising as well as the
Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada
(DAAC) AdChoices Program. We also adhere to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile. Outbrain also adheres to the Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising, and the IAB Europe OBA Framework; and
We are also TAG Brand Safety Certified
here
.
3. Outbrain User Types (including Opt Out Options)
Much of this Privacy Policy is divided into sections based on the way you may interact with Outbrain. You are either a Site Visitor, a User and/or a Business Partner (as defined below). Please determine what user type you are. For each user type we’ve explained what information we collect and why, what cookies and other similar technologies we use, how we share such information and your rights.
Site Visitors:
You are a Site Visitor when you visit and interact with our web sites, web pages, interactive features, blogs and their respective contents at Outbrain.com (or any derivation, such as Outbrain.co.uk; Outbrain.fr; outbrain.de etc.) (“
Our Sites
“).
See more here.
(a) What information we collect and why
We want to understand what services on Our Sites interest you and we want to remind you about the services we offer when you are not on Our Sites. In order to do this, we collect the following information from your device: (i) IP address; (ii) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser type (e.g., Chrome), operating system (e.g., iOS); (iii) the pages visited on Our Sites (e.g., the Outbrain “About” page); (iv) the time of visit (and corresponding time zone); and (v) referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP requests (e.g. information telling us how you arrived on Our Sites).
In addition, we may also collect your name and email address if you agree to send your details to us via Our Sites (e.g., by signing up to receive our newsletter).
(b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
Please see this
Cookie Table
, which is updated from time to time, under the section “Site Visitors” for a detailed list of first and third party cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) that may be used when you visit Our Sites.
(c) How we may share information
Sharing Information we learn about you on Our Sites
We do not sell and/or share personal data about you with third parties for third party marketing or advertising purposes. We may use various third parties (each listed on the
Cookie Table
) to help us market or advertise to you. We require that these third parties and companies agree to comply with all applicable data protection laws, keep all information shared with them confidential and to use the information only to perform their obligations to us. We do this by entering into agreements with all third parties who process personal data. If you post on our blog, your comment and information will be publicly available. Please contact
support@outbrain.com
to remove your comment.
Using Third Party Services on Our Sites
Our Sites contain links to other websites that we do not own or operate. We do not control, recommend or endorse the content, products, services, privacy policies or practices of these third party websites. For example, on Our Sites you will notice clickable icons which take you to the Outbrain Facebook page or the Outbrain LinkedIn page. If you choose to click on these links, you should know that these sites are not owned or operated by Outbrain and therefore these third party websites may send their own cookies to your device and they may independently collect personal data. It is therefore important that you get familiar with the privacy policies of these third party websites.
Also see the
Sharing
section of this Privacy Policy.
(d) Your rights
Our
Terms of Use
govern your use of Our Sites and apply to you when you interact with Our Sites. You can stop using Our Sites at any time. If you do, you may also want to remove any cookies that we have placed on any device used to access Our Sites, you can do this via your browser. If during your use of Our Sites you provided your email address, any email you receive from Outbrain includes an “unsubscribe” option. In addition, you may also opt-out of direct marketing by emailing
support@outbrain.com
.
For Site Visitors in the European Territory, Outbrain has implemented a consent management platform (powered by
OneTrust
) on Our Sites that provides you with the opportunity to consent, or not consent, to cookies and similar tracking technologies. Upon accessing Our Sites, you will see a banner in the centre of the page with information about the cookies we use. You may click the banner to reject any cookies (for example, performance cookies or targeting cookies) that are not strictly necessary cookies (as defined in the Cookie Table). By pressing “I Accept” on the banner you are indicating your acceptance to cookies and similar tracking technologies. Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of European Territory Site Visitors on Our Sites is consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time by clicking this button:
Cookies Settings
. In respect of all other Site Visitors not located in European Territories, we rely on our legitimate interest for processing any personal data however, this does not preclude non-European Territory Site Visitors from withdrawing consent at any time via our consent management platform.
Users:
You are a User when you visit a page of a website or application of one of Outbrain’s partners where the Outbrain widget is installed or our recommendations are placed (“Partner Sites”). For example, if you visit
https://news.sky.com/uk
,
www.spiegel.de
or
www.cnn.com
, the Outbrain widget is implemented on those websites. You know you are engaging with an Outbrain widget when you see text referencing Outbrain (e.g., “Recommended by Outbrain”, “by Outbrain” near recommendations If you click on the hyperlinked reference to Outbrain you will see a
detailed notice
that enables you to navigate to
Outbrain’s Interest Portal
and this Privacy Policy where you can opt out of personalized recommendations. In some instances, a partner may have white-label Outbrain’s service for their own offering. In such an event, such partners must disclose their use of Outbrain in their privacy policies.
Example of an Outbrain Widget
See more here
.
(a) What information we collect and why
We use UUIDs, IP Address and other Usage Information so that we can serve interesting recommendations. Outbrain’s recommendations may be paid for by an advertiser linking you to a new website or they may be organic such that the link is to another page on the same Partner’s Site. Outbrain may use high-level health interest categories to serve recommendations, that you can find
here
.
UUID
When you, as a User, first visit a Partner Site (e.g., CNN.com), Outbrain drops a cookie on your device in order to generate a UUID. Alternatively, if you first interact with a Partner using that Partner’s application, Outbrain receives your advertiser ID which is assigned to you by your device. We catalogue and analyze the content you consume across Partner Sites. Our recommendations are based on: (i) a UUIDs browsing history; (ii) similar browsing patterns of other Users; (iii) recommendations that are generally popular with Outbrain’s audience at this time; (iv) some randomness, and (v) targeting requirements that may be provided or requested by our Amplify clients. As an example, Outbrain may know that UUID 123 (which could be you on your iPhone X on The Guardian using Chrome as your browser) likes to read about far away holiday destinations and that people who like to read about far away holiday destinations also like to read about exotic food. When you interact with Outbrain we do not collect traditional personal data from you, like your email address or name, therefore we cannot associate your name with your UUID (for example, we do not know that John Smith, who is also UUID 123, likes to read about far away holiday destinations).
The UUID is a sequence of numbers and/or letters. This UUID attaches itself to your device and varies depending on your browser combination. In other words, Outbrain records a different UUID depending on which device and/or which browser you use when accessing the Partner Sites. For example, you will have one UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your mobile phone using the browser Safari, and a different UUID when you visit a Partner Site from your iPad using the browser Safari. Outbrain will combine and consolidate a UUID from a mobile device (handheld or tablet) from a browser that then accesses an application (or vice versa) from that same device. Outbrain does not conduct cross device tracking and therefore cannot link a user interacting with Outbrain on their phone as the same user who is interacting with Outbrain on their desktop.
IP Address
In addition to your UUID, we recognise your IP address, which we translate into geolocation and delete the last octet in order to mask the identifying information. We then use this masked information, in conjunction with information we received from other trusted third party partners (such as MaxMind) to determine a broad understanding of where you are located (e.g., New York). Outbrain will still recognise your IP address even if you opt out of personalised tracking as this is necessary to continue serving you context-based recommendations however, in such instances your IP address is not associated with your UUID and would not form part of any user profile.
Other Usage Information
In addition to your UUID and IP address, we also collect the following information from you on (a) desktop and mobile web: (i) User Agent data: device type (e.g., iPhone), browser type (e.g., chrome), operating system (e.g. iOS); (ii) the pages visited; (iii) the time of visit; and (iv) referring URLs and other information normally transmitted in HTTP requests. The above statistical information provides us with information about how many Users visited a specific page on our Partner Sites on which the Outbrain widget is installed, how long each User stayed on that page, the type of content on that page they clicked on and how they generally engaged with that page; and (b) on applications (i) application version (as it appears in App Store or Play Store); (ii) application ID or package name (as it appears in the App Store or Play Store); (iii) operating system ( e.g. IOS or Android); (iii) operating system version; and (iv) device model (e.g. iPhone X).This information is considered personal data if Outbrain associates it with a UUID.
As Outbrain does not have a direct relationship with Users interacting with Partner Sites, Outbrain relies on its partners to determine the lawful basis upon which Outbrain can process personal data. Each partner site relies on either
(b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
Outbrain cookies
Please see the
Cookie Table
under “Users” for a detailed list of the First Party Cookies we use when you interact with Partner Sites where the Outbrain technology is implemented.
Outbrain pixels
In addition to Outbrain’s visible widget on Partner Sites, certain Outbrain advertisers may implement the Outbrain pixel on their websites. The Outbrain pixel determines whether the User reaching the page where the pixel is installed has an Outbrain UUID in order to provide reporting to advertisers in respect of their particular campaign. If there is a UUID associated with such end user, Outbrain allows advertisers to either retarget those UUIDs and/or provides advertisers with the total number of Users (on an aggregated and anonymised basis) that reached a particular page (for example, an advertiser does not know that UUID1234 converted but only that 1 conversion took place). Outbrain does not pass its advertisers any personal data (including your UUID) or collect any further personal data via the pixel. Outbrain does not combine information received from the Outbrain pixel information with a UUID’s profile (for example, Outbrain only tracks that 1 conversion has taken place and not the UUID123 has converted when it reaches the advertiser’s chosen page). We require advertisers to disclose the usage of the Outbrain pixel on their own websites.Outbrain may also allow certain trusted third party partners to collect data via cookies delivered through the Outbrain widget. In such cases, Outbrain does not pass these third parties the data which Outbrain collects on its Users but allows such third parties to directly collect data (including personal data) via the widget for fraud and/or security purposes or in order to provide measurement information to advertisers (such as the number of conversions and/or impressions). Any such collection shall be governed by such third parties privacy policy.
Third party pixels
If you click on a link to one of our recommendations, the advertiser sponsoring the recommendation may place cookies (or third party cookies of third parties acting on the advertiser’s behalf) on your device either through redirects prior to arriving on the destination page of the recommendations or upon reaching the destination page. Such cookies are dropped for the purposes of providing analytics to the advertiser with regards to the advertiser’s campaign (for example, to see how many users viewed the advertiser’s campaign). We require our advertisers to disclose the use of third party pixels and/or cookies to end users via their website. As these cookies and/or pixels are added at the sole discretion of our advertisers you will be subject to that advertiser’s privacy notice and/or privacy policy.
Third Party Segments
Outbrain’s policy restricts targeting based on sensitive demographics like political views due to privacy concerns and the potential for bias. However, based on Outbrain’s third-party targeting options available to our advertisers, Outbrain may use third-party standard politics related segments
t
hat may indicate general political sentiment, interest in specific political issues, and political party affiliation. Outbrain does not knowingly create segments that are based upon what we consider to be sensitive information (for example, Personal Data revealing your racial or ethnic origin or your religious affiliations, or Personal Data concerning your sensitive health information, sex life or sexual orientation, or genetic or biometric data).
(c) How we may share information
Our Partners
Outbrain does not share and/or sell a User’s entire profiles with any third parties. However, we may share certain elements of a user profile (for example, UUID) with the following partners, including:
Brand safety, analytics and fraud partners;
Demand Side Platforms (DSP) and Supply Side Platforms (SSP);
Ad Exchanges and/or Networks; and
Demand Management Platforms.
Please see
here
for a list of some of our trusted partners. In addition, we may collect and/ or share some personal data with trusted partners by virtue of participating in the OpenRTB. Many of these partners are registered as IAB TCF Global Vendors and can be found
here
.
(d) Your rights
Outbrain opt out on desktop and mobile web
You may opt out of Outbrain’s personalized recommendations (or, if you have opted out and would like to opt back in) at any time by moving the toggle below. You may also opt out of personalized recommendations via Outbrain’s
Interest Profile
which is a website that provides a general visualization of the data Outbrain knows about you and may use to make its recommendations.
Outbrain opt out on apps
In order to opt-out of Outbrain’s recommendations on your mobile applications you can follow the steps below:
iOS Devices: Settings > Privacy > Advertising > Limit Ad Tracking
Android Devices: Google Settings App > Ads > Opt Out of Interest-based Advertising
Please note that an opt out via our Interest Profile and/or this Privacy Policy will not opt you out of personalised tracking on your applications. This opt out must be done via your device settings.
Additional Opt-Out Options
You may also opt out of receiving personalized ads served by us or other advertising companies through industry powered tools such as the NAI or the various DAA-based pages (DAA,
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
; DAAC,
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
, and/or EDAA
www.youronlinechoices.eu
). Visiting the NAI, DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages allows you to opt out of all some or all of the participating members’ services. Like Outbrain’s opt out, these opt outs do not mean you will no longer receive any advertising, the advertisements will just not be tailored to you. You will continue to receive advertisements, for example, based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e.,
contextually based ads
). Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective as our opt out is cookie based.
IMPORTANT INFORMATION
Even though you have opted out of Outbrain’s personalised recommendations:
You will still see Outbrain recommendations.
Opting out of Outbrain personalization tracking does not mean you will no longer receive recommendations from Outbrain. Instead, it means that Outbrain’s recommendations will not be personalized (i.e. they will be context based recommendations).
Your opt out will be cookie based and device/browser specific.
If you browse the web from several devices and/or browsers, you will need to opt out from each device and/or browser to ensure that we prevent personalization tracking on all of them. For the same reason, if you buy a new device, change browsers or delete (or clear) the opt out cookie, you will need to opt-out again. Opting out of personalization tracking is not the same as blocking cookies.
You must not opt in to Outbrain for at least 21 days as the deletion of your profile is tied to your UUID
.
Your opt out from Outbrain’s personalized recommendations is effective immediately. However, if your browser permits local storage and you opt into Outbrain’s personalized recommendations (for example, by accepting a cookie banner) within 21 days of your opt out, it is possible your prior profile will be reconnected to your UUID. If you do not opt in within 21 days, your profile will be deleted and cannot be recovered.
As with most opt out cookies, the Outbrain browser opt out relies upon a cookie.
The opt-out cookie is intended to be persistent to honor the user’s preferences. However, the “Intelligent Tracking Prevention” feature in iOS11 may impact the persistence of cookies across websites post a 24 hour window. We suggest using another browser or considering blocking all 3rd party cookies from the browser so that you are “opted out” without needing to rely on any company’s actual opt out methodology.
Your local storage will not be cleared.
Even though you have opted out of Outbrain’s personalised recommendations your local storage will not be automatically cleared and therefore you need to clear this at a browser level in addition to your opt out.
Business Partners:
You are a Business Partner when you register (or email with Outbrain) on behalf of the company you work for to use the Outbrain Amplify or Outbrain Engage Services.
See more here
.
(a) What information we collect and why
You may provide certain personal data (such as email address) when you sign up for the Amplify or Engage services or otherwise communicate or interact with us. If you apply to become a Business Partner, we may request additional information from you via advertiser application forms, insertion orders and other forms. We automatically collect information about your username’s actions in the Outbrain dashboard. As an example, as an Amplify Business Partner if you change the cost-per-click for one your campaigns, Outbrain’s audit trail will have a record of all those actions.
We collect and process the personal data above in order to perform our obligations under our agreement as a Business Partner (or prospective Business Partner) with you including to:
respond to your questions and requests;
to provide you with access to certain functions and features of our Amplify or Engage services (e.g., to provide and maintain your dashboard account);
verify your identity; and
communicate with you about your account, our products, and available promotions relevant to your use of the Amplify or Engage service.
(b) What cookies and other similar technologies we use
Please see this
Cookie Table
under “Business Partners” for a detailed list of First and Third Party cookies (and their corresponding retention periods) we use with Business Partners.
(c) How we may share information with anyone
We may disclose certain Business Partner information to vendors, contractors, or others who assist Outbrain in delivering the services (e.g., credit card processing). Also see the
Sharing
section of this Privacy Policy.
(d) Your rights
If as a Business Partner you wish to verify, correct, update or request the deactivation of your information, you may go to the Outbrain dashboard in order to edit your profile preferences or contact us at
support@outbrain.com
. If you are receiving Outbrain emails, you may “unsubscribe” using a link in the email. Note that unsubscribing shall not opt you out of notifications critical to providing the Amplify or Engage services (e.g., email invoices).
(e) Lawful Basis
Outbrain’s lawful basis for processing personal data of Business Partners is contractual.
4. Security Measures, Transfers Outside the EEA, Sharing and Data Retention
Security
Outbrain has a dedicated security team. We maintain tight controls over the personal data we collect, retaining it in firewalled and secured databases with strictly limited and controlled access rights, to ensure it is secure. Please see our
security standards
for more information.
Business Partners have access to certain password-protected features of the Amplify or Engage service. Business Partners are responsible for keeping this password confidential and for ensuring the same for their employees and/or their agents. Please remember that, unfortunately, the transmission of information via the internet is never completely secure. A common Internet scam is known as “spoofing” or “phishing.” This occurs when you receive an email from what appears to be a legitimate source requesting personal data from you. Please be aware that we will not send you any emails requesting you to verify credit card, bank information, or any other personal data. If you ever receive an email that appears to be from us requesting such information from you, do not respond to it, and do not click on any links appearing in the email. Instead, please forward the email to us at
legal@outbrain.com
, as we will investigate instances of possible Internet fraud.
Data Transfers Outside the EU/EEA
When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area (EEA) we will ensure such transfers are in compliance with relevant data protection laws, including, if applicable, EU Standard Contractual Clauses, or a European Commission positive adequacy decision under Article 25(6) of Directive 95/46/EC or Article 45 of the GDPR. In other words, your rights and protections remain with your data and we used approved contractual clauses and other measures designed to ensure that the recipients of your personal data protect it. Outbrain has in place the Standard Contractual Clauses between Outbrain entities to govern the transfer of data outside of the EEA.
Sharing
In addition to the description of how we may disclose your personal data for each user type, we may also disclose personal data as follows:
Within the family of companies controlled by Outbrain for internal reasons, primarily for business and operational purposes;
If we go through a business transition, such as a merger, acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of our assets, your personal data will likely be among the assets transferred;
When legally required to do so (e.g., to cooperate with law enforcement investigations or other legal proceedings); and/or
To respond to a genuine emergency.
In addition, we combine your personal data with those of other users in order to share trend information and aggregate user statistics with third parties, always in aggregated and anonymized form.
Data Retention
The retention period for each of the cookies Outbrain uses (whether our own or on our behalf by third parties) is stated in the
Cookie Table
. More specifically, the Outbrain cookie (Obuid),which is used for tracking user actions such as clicks, expires three (3) months after a user visited a particular site within our network however, this cookie will reset if a user returns to the same site or different site within our network. In addition, we do not retain any individual data point on a User for more than 13 months. For example, if UUID 123 read an article on December 31, 2018, on February 1, 2019 that article will no longer be part of UUID 123’s profile. Outbrain also maintains a Data Retention Policy that details the retention period for personal data based on our analysis of how long the specific data is reasonably required for legal or business purposes. When we no longer need personal data, we securely delete or destroy it. Aggregated data, which cannot identify a device/browser (or individual) and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, is maintained for as long as commercially necessary.
5. Children and Sensitive Data
Children
None of our services are intentionally directed at children under 16. We do not knowingly collect personal data from anyone under 16 years of age. If we determine upon collection that a Site Visitor, a User or a Business Partner is under 16, we will not use or maintain his/her personal data. If we become aware that we have unknowingly collected personal data from a child under the age of 16, we will make reasonable efforts to delete such information from our records. If you’re a kid, please go play in the yard, don’t use or interact with Outbrain!
Sensitive data
We do not collect or receive any sensitive categories of personal data.
6. European Territory Visitors
In compliance with certain privacy laws, in particular the European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Outbrain provides specific additional rights for individuals who interact with Outbrain such as the right to access, rectification, right to object, to complaint, erasure and blockage. More specifically and under certain circumstances:
the right to request information about whether and which personal data is processed by us, and the right to demand that personal data is rectified or amended.
the right to request that personal data should be deleted.
the right to demand that the processing of personal data should be restricted.
withdraw your consent to the processing and use of your data completely or partially at any time with future application.
have the right to obtain your personal data in a common, structured and mechanically readable format.
contact our data protection officer if there are any questions, comments, complaints or requests in connection with our statement on data protection and the processing of your personal data.
the right to complain to the responsible supervisory authority if believed that the processing of your personal data is in violation of the legislation.
In addition to the above, we reference certain rights for European Territory citizens throughout this Privacy Policy. Pursuant to the GDPR, citizens from “European Territories” mean the European Economic Area (EEA), the European Free Trade Area (EFTA) and Switzerland. For the purpose of this Privacy Policy, the term “European Territories” shall continue to include the United Kingdom, even after the United Kingdom leaves the European Economic Area following Brexit. If you are in the UK, or the European Economic Areas, the controller of your data is Outbrain UK Limited.
Please email
Privacy@outbrain.com
with any questions about exercising any of the above rights.
7. California Privacy Rights
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “ Personal Information” has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“ CCPA”) but does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
(a) Your California privacy rights.
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Information.
You can request the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information that we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting and/or selling Personal Information.
The categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information.
Whether we have disclosed your Personal Information for a business purpose, and if so, the categories of Personal Information received by each category of third party recipient.
Whether we’ve sold your Personal Information, and if so, the categories of Personal Information received by each category of third party recipient.
Access
.
You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
Deletion.
You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Opt-out of sales
.
If we sell your Personal Information, you can opt-out. In addition, if you direct us not to sell your Personal Information, we will consider it a request pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to stop sharing your personal information covered by that law with third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
Opt-in.
We contractually prohibit our publishing and advertising clients from placing our technology on pages that target individuals younger than 16 years old. If we learn that you are younger than 16 years old, we will asking for your permission (or if you are younger than 13 years old, your parent or guardian’s permission) to sell your Personal Information before we do so.
Non discrimination.
You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you services; increasing the price/rate of services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
(b) How to exercise your rights
You may exercise your California privacy rights described above as follows:
Right to information, access and deletion
. You can request to exercise your information, access and deletion rights by:
calling us toll free on 1-866-I-OPT-OUT and entering service code 253# to leave us a message.
emailing
privacy@outbrain.com
Right to opt-out of the “sale” of your Personal Information
. We do not sell your Personal Information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money). However, like many companies, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you. California law classifies our use of these services as a “sale” of your Personal Information to the companies that provide the services. This is because we allow them to collect information from our website users (e.g., online identifiers and browsing activity) so they can help serve ads more likely to interest you. To opt-out from this “sale”, click on this
link
which will take you to our Interest Profile where you can opt out of personalised recommendations.
We will need to confirm your identity and California residency to process your requests to exercise your information, access or deletion rights. We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it.
(c) Personal information that we collect, use and share
The chart below summarizes how we collect, use and share Personal Information by reference to the statutory categories specified in the CCPA, and describes our practices during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy. Categories in the chart refer to the categories described above in the general section of this Privacy Policy.
Outbrain User Type
Statutory category of personal information (PI)
(click for details)
Source of the PI
Purpose for collection
How we may share, disclose or “sell” information.
Site Visitors
Identifiers
Online Identifiers
Geolocation Data
Inferences
Internet or Network Information
Site Visitor
See Section 2(a) (Site Visitors).
See Section 2(c) (Site Visitors).
Users
Identifiers
Online Identifiers
Geolocation Data
Inferences
Internet or Network Information
Users
See Section 2(a) (Users).
See Section 2(c) (Users).
Business Partners
Identifiers
Financial Information
Business Partners
See Section 2(a) (Business Partners).
See Section 2(c) (Business Partners).
8. “Do Not Track” Disclosure
Some browsers transmit Do Not Track (DNT) signals to websites. Because there is no common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal, Outbrain does not currently alter, change, or respond to DNT requests or signals from these browsers. We will continue to monitor industry activity in this area and reassess our DNT practices as necessary. In the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of receiving personalized recommendations in the Users section.
9. EU-US Data Protection Framework (DPF) Participation
Outbrain complies with the
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF)
, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Outbrain has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Outbrain has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
Please click
here
to view our certification.
10. Complaint and Dispute Resolution Procedure under the DPF
Outbrain’s internal complaints mechanism
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Outbrain commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information.  EU and UK individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF should first contact Outbrain at:
DPO@outbrain.com
You may have the right to lodge a complaint with the data protection authority of your country of residence. If you live in the UK, you can make a complaint with the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
at this address
. If you live in the EU, you can find the relevant data protection authority
here
. To submit a complaint to the FTC, click
here
.
Independent Recourse Mechanism
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Outbrain commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF to Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services, Inc. (JAMS), an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
JAMS
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you. Please contact or visit the
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Outbrain’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Arbitration
You may also be able to invoke binding arbitration for unresolved complaints but prior to initiating such arbitration, a resident of a European country (including Switzerland) participating in the DPF must first:
(1) contact us and afford us the opportunity to resolve the issue;
(2) seek assistance from
JAMS
(an independent recourse mechanism); and
(3) contact the U.S. Department of Commerce (either directly or through a European Data Protection Authority) and afford the Department of Commerce time to attempt to resolve the issue.
If such a resident invokes binding arbitration, each party shall be responsible for its own attorney’s fees. Please be advised that, pursuant to the DPF, the arbitrator(s) may only impose individual-specific, non-monetary, equitable relief necessary to remedy any violation of the DPF Principles with respect to the resident. The arbitration option may not be invoked if the individual’s same claimed violation of the Principles
(1) has previously been subject to binding arbitration;
(2) was the subject of a final judgement entered in a court action to which the individual was a party; or
(3) was previously settled by the parties.
For more details, please click
here
.
European Individual Rights Under The
DPF
Outbrain must provide you:
Information on the types of personal data collected
Information on the purposes of collection and use
Information on the type or identity of third parties to which your personal data is disclosed
Choices for limiting use and disclosure of your personal data
Access to your personal data
Notification of the organization’s liability if it transfers your personal data
Notification of the requirement to disclose your personal data in response to lawful requests by public authorities
Reasonable and appropriate security for your personal data
A response to your complaint within 45 days
Cost-free independent dispute resolution to address your data protection concerns
The ability to invoke binding arbitration to address any complaint that the organization has violated its obligations under the DPF Principles to you and that has not been resolved by other means
OUTBRAIN’S
LIABILITY IN CASES OF ONWARD TRANSFERS TO THIRD PARTIES
In the context of an onward transfer, Outbrain has responsibility for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Outbrain remains liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Outbrain proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
11. How This Privacy Policy May Change
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will place a prominent notice that will be visible to you as a Site Visitor or Business Partner, but we do not have a means of advising Users of an update by way of notice. You should check back here periodically to see if the Privacy Policy has been updated as we will always show the date of the latest modification of the Privacy Policy at the top of the page so you can tell when it was last revised.
Data Protection Officer (DPO)
To communicate with our Data Protection Officer, please email at
dpo@outbrain.com
or use the contact details below.
Contact us
General questions
If you have any questions or concerns about your privacy you may contact us at:
Outbrain Inc.
111 West 19th Street
3rd Floor
New York, NY 10011, USA
Attn: Privacy questions
Email:
privacy@outbrain.com
or
dpo@outbrain.com
You may also contact your local data protection authority. A list of local data protection authorities is available
here
.
Sub-policy 46
https://www.taboola.com/policies/privacy-policy:
Please note: This website includes an accessibility system. Press Control-F11 to adjust the website to the visually impaired who are using a screen reader; Press Control-F10 to open an accessibility menu.
Popup heading
Close
Accessibility
Press enter for Accessibility for blind people
who use screen readers
Press enter for Keyboard Navigation
Press enter for Accessibility menu
Customers
Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
Why We Use Customer Information
To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
Customer Choices
Users
Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
Why We Use User Information
To Whom We Disclose User Information
User Choices
Interest-Based Advertising
Opt Out
Data Retention
Children
Site Visitors
Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Why We Use Site Visitor Information
To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
Third-Party Online Advertising
Site Visitor Choices
General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
Why We Use Your Information
Disclosing Your Information
Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
Third-Party Links
Security
International Data Transfers
Regional Privacy Rights
Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
Notice to Individuals in the State of California
Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
Notice to Individuals in Thailand
Notice to Individuals in Brazil
Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
Data Broker Requirements
Contact Us
Changes to This Privacy Policy
Taboola’s Opt-Out Options
Personal Data in Europe and UK
TABOOLA PRIVACY POLICY
Last Update:
November 6th, 2024
For Taboola’s opt-out status options, please
click here
.
For Taboola’s region-specific notices, please visit the applicable notice for individuals in
Brazil
,
California
and
additional U.S. states
,
Europe
(including the United Kingdom),
China
, or
Thailand
.
Privacy Self-Regulation:
Taboola is dedicated to providing Internet users the highest level of transparency and control over the use of their data in online advertising. In support of this, we adhere to the:
Self-Regulatory Principles set forth by the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), the Digital Advertising Alliance Canada (DAAC), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA);
Interactive Advertising Bureau’s (IAB) Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (OBA) and the IAB Europe OBA Framework. Taboola participates in the IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework and complies with its Specifications and Policies as vendor number 42; and the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) Code of Conduct
for Web and Mobile. Taboola is a proud member of the NAI, an association dedicated to responsible data collection use in digital advertising.
Taboola also maintains an externally-facing
Trust Center
, which is available for your reference. To update your AdChoices Opt Out settings, select your region here:
US
,
Canada
, or
Europe
(including the United Kingdom); and to manage all NAI member sites’ settings, click
here
.
Privacy Policy:
Taboola, Inc., together with its
Affiliates
, (“
Taboola
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”), recognize the importance of your privacy. In this privacy policy (“Privacy Policy”) we describe how we collect, process, use, and disclose information that we obtain in the following contexts:
our website,
www.taboola.com
and any Taboola website, digital property, communication, or form displaying this Privacy Policy (collectively, the “
Sites
”);
our content-discovery platforms, feeds, widgets, analytics tools, pixels, integrations, push notifications, and other technical applications that we provide on third-party websites (collectively, the “
Content Discovery Platform
”); and
the Taboola News suite of content-discovery tools available on mobile devices and operating systems (including the Start line of products, collectively “
Taboola News
”) (together with the Content Discovery Platform, the “
Services
”).
When you visit the Sites, or use or interact with any of our Services, we will collect information from or about you or your device, which may include personal information or personal data as defined by applicable privacy laws (“
Personal
Information
” or “
Personal Data
“) (collectively, the “
Information
”), and this Information will be handled as described in this Privacy Policy.
We may use Information collected through the Sites and Services in various ways, depending on whether you are:
(i) a publisher, advertiser, or other content provider that has a contractual relationship, with Taboola (a “
Customer
“);
(ii) a visitor to our Customers’ websites and digital properties who interacts with our Services (a “
User
“); or
(iii) a visitor to the Taboola Sites (a “
Site Visitor
“), which may include Customers and prospective customers.
Therefore, this Privacy Policy outlines specific provisions for each of these categories in Sections 1 – 3, and outlines provisions that apply to all three categories in Section 4 below.
For more information about how we use cookies on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Please note that our
Connexity
and
Skimlinks
business lines have separate privacy policies that apply to their services. Please visit their respective websites for information on their privacy practices.
1. Customers
1.1 Information We Collect from Customers (“Customer Information”)
We collect Customer Information directly from our Customers in the following ways:
Sites:
We will collect a Customer’s contact details when a Customer enters a contractual relationship with Taboola and we will collect a username and password when a Customer creates an account on any of our Sites.
When a Customer sends us an email asking a question, or signs up to receive our email newsletters, we will collect the Information that the Customer submits to us.
We will also collect other Information that Customers choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message or form that a Customer submits through our Sites or via email.
We may also collect Information from prospective customers through publicly-available sources.
Services:
When a Customer signs up to use our Services or uses Taboola’s analytics dashboard “Taboola Ads,” we collect Information such as the Customer’s name, email address, telephone number, payment card information, billing information, and any other Information the Customer may choose to provide to us on the platform.
We may also work with third party vendors to process payments to or from our Customers on our behalf. These vendors currently include
Stripe
and
Payoneer
, but are subject to change at any time. We do not have access to the Information that you provide to these third parties, and we encourage you to visit their privacy policies to understand their practices.
1.2 Why We Use Customer Information
We use Customer Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Services
. We use Customer Information to provide our Sites and Services and for other customer service purposes in relation to Customer accounts.
Communicating with you about your Taboola Partnership
. We use Customer Information to communicate, via email or otherwise, about Customers’ accounts; to contact Customers about Taboola’s products or services that we think may interest you; to respond to Customer inquiries, requests, or complaints; and to provide Customers with product updates, news, best practices, and other helpful or interesting information that can enhance your use of Taboola’s Services, in accordance with their communications preferences. When we communicate in this way, our emails may deploy a cookie that tracks when the emails are opened to measure Customer engagement. For more information about cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Customer Information to provide Customers with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes, including general updates about Taboola. These communications will be sent in accordance with our Customers’ communications preferences.
1.3 To Whom We Disclose Customer Information
We may disclose Customer Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Customer Information to any of Taboola’s current or future affiliates (affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by, or under common control with us, including, for example, Taboola.com Ltd., Taboola Europe Limited, Taboola (Thailand) Limited, and Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda., referred to herein as “
Affiliates
”), parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Customer Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
Customers
. We may disclose Customer Information to other Customers where relevant to the Service we provide. For example, we may provide publishers with information about what advertisers may appear on their network or advertisers with information about which publisher websites their campaigns have appeared on.
1.4 Customer Choices
Customers may access, correct, delete, or update the Information that they have provided to us by either updating the Information in their account, by emailing their dedicated account manager, or by emailing us at
support@taboola.com
.
We may send periodic promotional or informational emails to Customers in accordance with their communications preferences. At any time, Customers may opt out of such communications by following the opt-out instructions contained in the email. Please note that it may take up to ten (10) business days for us to process opt-out requests. If you opt out of receiving marketing and advertising emails from Taboola, we will still send you emails about your account and any Services that you have requested or received from us.
2. Users
2.1 Information We Collect from Users (“User Information”)
We automatically collect User Information when Users interact with our Services that appear on our Customers’ websites and digital properties. Like most other web-based services, we collect this User Information through cookies and other technologies. Taboola collects only pseudonymized data, which means we do not know who you are because we do not know or process your name, email address, or other identifiable data. Instead, we only process digital identifiers such as cookie IDs, IP addresses, mobile advertising IDs on your device, Taboola network browsing history and associated preferences, and in some limited circumstances, your hashed email address.
User Information that we collect includes, but is not limited to the following:
Content Discovery Platform
: We collect Information about a User’s device and operating system, IP address, the web pages accessed by Users within our Customers’ websites, the link that led a User to a Customer’s website, the dates and times a User accesses a Customers’ website, event information (e.g., system crashes), Information about the interactions with advertisements and Customers’ Services (e.g., availability, visibility, and clicks), general location information (e.g., city and state), hashed email addresses (when made available by the User), and gender (when made available by the User). We ask our Customers to obtain consent on our behalf, where required by applicable data protection laws, for us to collect this User Information. We may also obtain Information about you from our
data partners
.
Taboola News
: We collect in-app User behaviors (e.g. online status, browsing activity, and clicks) and implicit non-precise device location inferred from search queries (when enabled by the User) and SIM cards or IP addresses. For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
Taboola Push Notification
: We collect Information about Users’ time zone, location (country, region, city), language, mobile operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), browser, connection and internet service provider.
2.2 Why We Use User Information
We use User Information for the following purposes:
Providing and Improving our Service
. We may use User Information to provide and improve our Services to Users and our Customers.
Tailoring content
. We may use User Information to tailor the content and information that we may send or display to Users; to retarget content to Users through our Services and elsewhere; and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Services. For more information about how we tailor our content see information below about our
Interest Based Advertising
.
Tailoring content across multiple devices
. We may use User Information to improve a unique User’s experience across multiple browsers and devices (such as smartphones, tablets, or other viewing devices) by providing better targeted ad campaigns to that User. For instance, should we recognize a User on a web browser, we may want to provide that User similar or personalized content on mobile apps, as well. To do this, we identify unique Users across devices, or we may sync cookies and identifiers with our service providers or Customers that do this, to help our Customers enhance their own data and data segments, or to help them target the right audience.
Offering our Customers data segments that help target content and advertisements for topics, products, and services that may interest you.
A data segment is a grouping of users who share one or more attributes (e.g., travel enthusiasts). We offer a number of data segments, both proprietary and from our
data partners
, to our Customers so that they may better target Users who are more likely to be interested in their content and advertisements. Taboola does not knowingly create segments that are based upon what we consider to be sensitive information (for example, Personal Data revealing your racial or ethnic origin or your religious affiliations, or Personal Data concerning your sensitive health information, sex life or sexual orientation, or genetic or biometric data). In connection with our Services, our Customers may use these
standard health-related segments
about non-sensitive conditions such as an inferred interest in health and wellness or over the counter medications. In addition, Taboola offers our Customers
standard political-related segments
that may indicate general political sentiment, interest in specific political issues, and political party affiliation.
2.3 To Whom We Disclose User Information
We may disclose User Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose User Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose User Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, or fraud detection) on our behalf.
Unaffiliated third parties
. We may disclose User Information to other unaffiliated third parties, specifically with (i) our
data partners
, so that we can connect you with relevant content by allowing our advertisers to target specific audience segments, and (ii) our
programmatic demand and supply partners
, so that we can serve you with tailored advertisements.
Customers
. We may disclose User Information to Customers where relevant to the Service we provide those Customers. For example, we may provide publishers with information about the viewing and click-through patterns of the content they publish and may provide advertisers with information about conversion rates for analytics purposes.
2.4 User Choices
You have the right to request that Taboola provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, correct your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, and cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data, and opt-out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data. Please visit our Global Taboola Data Subject Access Request Portal available
here
. To opt out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Data, please click the U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal available
here
.
2.5 Interest-Based Advertising
Through our Services, including our Services on Customer websites, we may provide advertisements to you based on your recent browsing behavior across different Customer websites, browsers, or devices. For example, if on a first online visit, you browse on website A, then on a subsequent visit to website B, you may see content personalized based on your browsing history on website A. For example, if a user visits a clothing retail site, she might see clothing-related ads on another site she visits.
In order to target advertisements to you for products and services that may interest you, we may use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), HTML5 local storage, and other technologies. For more information about how we use these technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
We may also work with third parties such as ad networks, which are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to websites that you have visited in the past. These advertisers will deliver you targeted advertisements for products and services that may interest you. Third-party ad networks, our advertiser Customers (and their content providers and agents), and/or traffic measurement services may also use cookies, JavaScript, web beacons (including clear GIFs), Flash LSOs, and other technologies to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize advertising content to you. These
third-party cookies and other technologies
are governed by each third party’s specific privacy policy, not this one.
If you have questions about our collection and use of data for interest-based advertising purposes, please contact us at:
support@taboola.com
.
2.6 Opt Out
Taboola supports initiatives to offer our Users greater transparency and control over the uses of their Information. Therefore, we offer the following options for controlling the interest-based content and ads you receive.
If
you do not want to receive interest-based ads from Taboola, you can disable the display of such ads by clicking on the opt-out link below
. Please note that an opt out will not prevent you from seeing Taboola’s content recommendations. Rather, the opt out will prevent Taboola from using your Information to tailor these recommendations to your interests. You will continue to receive recommendations that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
You are currently:
Opted Out
Opt In
Not Opted Out
Opt Out
Not Opted Out
: Taboola will serve you personalized recommendations based on your history.
Opted Out
: You have opted out of tracking, Taboola will no longer serve you with personalized content recommendations based on your Internet use history.
Because our tracking mechanisms operate at the device and browser level, to fully opt-out across devices,
you will need to do so on each device and browser individually
. If your browsers are configured to reject cookies, your opt-out may not be effective, since we identify your choice to opt-out based on an opt-out cookie we deliver to you. In this case, you will need to confirm that your browser is configured properly in order for the opt-out to be effective. If you are using a Safari browser on iOS11 or macOS High Sierra, you must first adjust your Privacy and Security Settings to turn off both “Prevent Cross-Site Tracking” and “Block All Cookies”, and then return to this privacy policy or your preferred opt out platform to reset your opt out preferences.
Taboola may use non-cookie technologies in limited cases. Like cookies, these technologies allow Taboola to recommend ads that are tailored to your interests and to remember whether you have chosen to opt-out from our Services. Please note that some web browsers may not permit you to block the use of non-cookie technologies, but you can do so by simply clicking on the Opt Out feature above in this Section 2.6.
You can also opt-out of receiving targeted ads served by Taboola and other advertising companies
.
You may use the
NAI opt out tool
, which will allow you to opt out of receiving targeted ads from Taboola and from other NAI-approved member companies. The NAI also provides instructions to engage system-level mobile device opt outs in Android, iOS, and Windows Phone environments.
You may also visit one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites to learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
You can also opt out of the use of your email address for targeted ads through
Audience Matched Advertising
or AMA by Taboola and other advertising companies through the
NAI Audience Matched Advertising Opt Out (Beta)
.
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
2.7 Data Retention
We retain User Information, which is directly collected for purposes of serving ads, for at most thirteen (13) months from the User’s last interaction with our Services (often for a shorter period of time), after which time we de-identify the data by removing unique identifiers or aggregating the data.
We retain deidentified or aggregated data, which cannot identify an individual or device and is used for purposes of reporting and analysis, for as long as commercially necessary. We keep opt-out information for longer than this period so that we can continue to honor your opt-out requests.
2.8 Children
We do not knowingly collect any data or target any advertisements on websites directed to children under the age of eighteen (18). If you are the parent or guardian of a child under the age of eighteen (18) and have a concern regarding the Information we collect, please contact us at
dpo@taboola.com
.
3. Site Visitors
3.1 Information We Collect from Site Visitors
Taboola collects Site Visitor Information either directly from you or from third parties that collect this Information during your use of our Sites. We may combine all the Information that we collect from various sources.
Information we collect directly from you
. We may collect Site Visitor Information directly from you. For example, when you send us an email asking a question, or submit a form on our Sites to receive marketing materials or email newsletters, we will collect the Information that you submit to us. We may also collect any other Information that you choose to provide to us, such as the contents of a message that you submit through our Sites.
Information we collect from third parties
. We may collect Site Visitor Information about you from third parties that collect information on our behalf through your use of the Site, such as web analytics companies. Such information may include, without limitation, information about your operating system, IP address, settings and system configurations, device model, device ID and other unique device identifiers, mobile related information, the web pages you access within our Sites, the website that led you to our Sites, the website to which you go after leaving our Sites, the dates and times that you access our Sites, event information (e.g., system crashes) and web log data.
For more information about how we use cookies and other technologies, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
.
3.2 Why We Use Site Visitor Information
We use your Site Visitor Information for the following purposes:
Providing our Service
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide and manage our Sites and Services.
Tailoring content
. We use Site Visitor Information to tailor the content and information that we send or display to you on our Sites, and to otherwise personalize your experiences while using our Sites.
Communicating with you
. We use Site Visitor Information to communicate with you, including via email, about our Services; to respond to your inquiries via our website request forms; and to answer any questions or complaints you submit; to provide you with news, best practices or other information that we think may interest you.
Marketing and advertising
. We use Site Visitor Information to provide you with newsletters, special offers, and promotions, including via email; to contact you about products or services we think may interest you; and for other marketing, advertising, and promotional purposes. These communications will be sent in accordance with your communications preferences.
Analyzing use of our Sites
. We use Site Visitor Information to better understand how individuals access and use our Sites, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to honor their requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical or statistical purposes.
3.3 To Whom We Disclose Site Visitor Information
We may disclose Site Visitor Information as follows:
Taboola Affiliates
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to any current or future Affiliates, parent companies, or subsidiaries to process for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy.
Taboola service providers
. We may disclose Site Visitor Information to vendors, service providers, agents, contractors, or others who perform functions (e.g., maintenance, data analysis, customer relationship management, email marketing, surveys, credit card processing, data hosting, fraud detection) on our behalf.
3.4 Third-Party Online Advertising
To understand your interests and deliver advertisements that are tailored to your interests, we may work with service providers or third parties that use their own
cookies, web beacons, and other technologies
to collect Information about Site Visitors’ online activities, either on our Sites and/or other websites across the Internet  (“
Taboola Ad Partners
”). These Taboola Ad Partners include advertisers and ad networks that may collect Information about when you view or interact with one of their advertisements and may collect information regarding your activities on our Sites and your online activities over time and across different websites. Like most advertisers, Taboola works to place our advertisements where we think they will be most interesting and relevant to the recipient. One way we do this is by allowing ad networks to place their own cookies when an individual visits our Sites. This enables the ad network to recognize individuals who have previously visited the Taboola Sites. Then, if the ad network has purchased ad space on a third-party website, and recognizes that same individual visiting that third-party website, the ad network can deliver a Taboola advertisement, knowing that this individual has already expressed interest in Taboola by visiting the Taboola Sites. To learn more about third parties who collect Site Visitor Information, please review our
Cookie Policy
.
3.5 Site Visitor Choices
Site Visitors may opt out of the Taboola Ad Partners that collect information on the Sites to serve ads about Taboola. (Some U.S. Site Visitors may exercise their options directly with Taboola, as outlined below in Section 5.2.1 and Section 5.3.1). By visiting one of the Digital Advertising Alliance affiliate websites, you can learn more about User choices and opting out of interest-based advertising displayed by the many member companies.
Users in the United States may visit the DAA consumer choice page at
www.aboutads.info/choices
Users in Canada may visit the DAAC consumer choice page at
www.youradchoices.ca/choices
Users in Europe (including the United Kingdom) may visit the EDAA consumer choice page at
www.youronlinechoices.eu
Please note that an opt out from one or more companies listed on the DAA, DAAC, or EDAA consumer choice pages will not prevent you from seeing those companies’ advertisements. Rather, the opt out will prevent these companies from using your Information to display targeted content or ads to you. You may continue to receive advertisements that are selected based on the particular website that you are viewing (i.e., contextually based ads).
Also, if your browsers are configured to reject cookies when you visit the DAA, DAAC or EDAA consumer choice pages, your opt out may not be effective because your browser will refuse opt-out cookies (that alert companies that you have exercised your opt-out preference).
For Site Visitors who have subscribed to receive emails from us, you can manage your subscription by clicking your unique link that appears at the bottom of each of these emails.
4. General Provisions Applicable to Customers, Users, and Site Visitors
4.1 Why We Use Your Information
We use the Information that we collect from Customers, Users, and Site Visitors for the purposes respectively set forth in Sections 1-3 above, as well as for the following purposes:
Analyzing use of our Services
. We use the Information that we collect to better understand how Customers, Users, and Site Visitors access and use our Site and Services, both on an aggregated and individualized basis; to respond to Customers’, Users’, and Site Visitors’ requests and preferences; and for other research, analytical, and statistical purposes.
Legal compliance
. We use the Information that we collect to comply with applicable legal obligations, including requests from law enforcement or other governmental entities.
Protecting our rights and interests
. We use the Information that we collect to protect our rights and interests and the rights and interests of our Customers, Users, Site Visitors, and the general public, as well as to enforce this Privacy Policy and our
Terms of Use
.
4.2 Disclosing Your Information
When we share your Information with third parties as specified above, we require such recipients to agree to only use the Information we share with them in accordance with this Privacy Policy and our contractual specifications and for no other purpose than those determined by us in line with this Privacy Policy.
In addition to the disclosures detailed above, we may also disclose Information for the following purposes:
Business transfers
.
We reserve the right to disclose and/or transfer Information to another entity if we are acquired by or merged with another company, if we sell or transfer a business unit or assets to another company, if we undergo a bankruptcy proceeding, or if we engage in any other similar business transfer.
Legal compliance
.
We may disclose Information in order to comply with the law, regulation, a judicial proceeding, subpoena, court order, or other legal process.
Protecting rights and interests
.
We may disclose Information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person, violations of our
Terms of Use
or this Privacy Policy, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
Aggregate and de-identified Information
.
We may disclose to our Customers and other third parties aggregated or de-identified information about users for marketing, advertising, research, or other purposes.
4.3 Cookies and Other Tracking Mechanisms
For more information about how we use cookies and other tracking mechanisms on the Sites and when providing our Services, please refer to our
Cookie Policy
. You may disable certain tracking as discussed in our
Cookie Policy
(e.g., by disabling cookies).
4.4 Third-Party Links
Our Sites and Services may contain links to our
third-party partners’
websites. Any access to and use of such linked websites is not governed by this Privacy Policy but instead is governed by the privacy policies of those third-party websites. We are not responsible for the information security nor privacy practices of such third-party websites.
For example, our Sites include features from third-party social networking platforms, such as the Facebook “Like” button. These features may collect certain information, such as your IP address or the page you are visiting on our Sites, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or directly on our Sites. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing such features. As another example, our Services link to Customer websites, which are also not governed by this Privacy Policy but by the applicable Customers’ privacy policy.
4.5 Security
We value the security of your Information, including, but not limited to, the Information collected via the Sites or Services. Taboola is ISO 27001 and ISO 27701 certified and we have taken appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect the Information we collect about you from loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, destruction, and any other form of unauthorized processing. Please be aware, however, that no data security measures can guarantee 100% security.
4.6 International Data Transfers
We may transfer your Information outside the country in which it is collected, including to a country that may not offer the same level of protection for Information as the country in which you reside. Rest assured, however, that Taboola has arranged all contractual safeguards to ensure your Information is processed in a way that offers an adequate level of protection when it is shared between or among Taboola Affiliates, subsidiaries, and/or parent companies.
If you would like to learn more about EEA/UK Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.1.4 below. If you would like to learn more about Thailand Data Transfers, specifically, see Section 5.3.4 below.
5. Regional Privacy Rights
5.1 Notice to Individuals within the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom ("UK")
5.1.1 Data Controller and Representative
If you reside in the EEA or UK, Taboola.com Ltd. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Taboola.com Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
Our representative in the European Union is Lionheart Squared (Europe) Ltd., 2 Pembroke House, Upper Pembroke Street 28-32, Dublin, D02 EK84 Ireland.
Our representative in the UK is Taboola Europe Limited, Aldgate House, 2nd Floor, 33 Aldgate High Street, London EC3N 1DL, United Kingdom.
5.1.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the EEA or UK, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.1 as “
EEA/UK Data
”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.1.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Data, (iii) export your Personal Data, (iv) delete your Personal Data, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. Where we have obtained your consent, or our Customers have obtained it on our behalf, you have the right to withdraw it at any time. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
privacy@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. To learn more, please contact your local data protection authority, via the contact methods available
here
. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
privacy@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.1.4 EEA/UK Data Transfers
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among the EEA, the UK, Israel, the United States, Singapore and Hong Kong, and Taboola stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on (i) the European Commission’s decision, and (ii) UK adequacy regulations that Israel provides a level of data protection that is adequate for EEA/UK Data. These allow the free transfer of EEA/UK Data to Israel without the need for additional data transfer mechanisms.
Similarly, when Taboola transfers any personal data from the EEA to Taboola Europe Limited in the United Kingdom, it relies on the European Commission’s decision that the UK provides a level of data protection that is adequate for personal data from the EEA.
Beyond that, when Taboola transfers EEA/UK Data to other countries then, if those countries do not have a European Commission adequacy finding and are not the subject of UK adequacy regulations (as applicable), Taboola implements
Standard Contractual Clauses
approved by the European Commission and/or competent UK authorities (as applicable) to protect the transferred data. The Standard Contractual Clauses are contractual privacy and security commitments that are entered between companies that transfer personal data outside of the EEA.
In particular, non-EEA/UK Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
5.2 Notice to Individuals in the State of California
5.2.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
California residents have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with what Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, including the categories of Personal Information, the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom Taboola discloses Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information Taboola has collected about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, and (iv) opt you out of the sale or sharing of your Personal Information. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and cross-context behavioral advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.2.2 Summary of Consumer Requests
This is a
summary of the requests
that Taboola received and honored from California residents in the last calendar year.
5.2.3 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
During the 12-month period prior to the effective date of this notice, Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Statutory Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Disclosure of PI
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Additional data subject to Cal. Civ. Code section 1798.80 (e.g., name, address, work phone, employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information
through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms
)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
5.2.4 How Taboola Shares Your Personal Information
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. Under California law, such disclosures may be considered a “sale” when the personal information is exchanged for non-monetary consideration, or “sharing” when the personal information is disclosed for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information in accordance with the opt out methods we have provided throughout this notice.
We may sell or share for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes (and may have sold or shared during the 12-month period prior to the Effective Date of this Statement) the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
We do not have actual knowledge that we sell or share Personal Information of minors under 18 years old.
5.3 Notice to Individuals in Applicable U.S. States
5.3.1 Your Rights to Your Personal Information
Residents of U.S. states with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with information on/access to the Personal Information that we may hold about you, (ii) correct your Personal Information, (iii) delete your Personal Information, (iv) provide you a copy of your Personal Information, and (v) opt-out of targeted advertising or the sale of your Personal Information. Taboola does not profile in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects. You also have a right against discrimination for exercising any of these rights, which Taboola is committed to upholding and honoring at all times.
If you would like to opt out of Taboola’s disclosures, sharing, and sales of your Personal Information and targeted advertising, you may do so as outlined in
Taboola’s U.S. State Consumer Rights Portal
. Please note that this feature is currently only available for U.S. state residents with active U.S. state comprehensive privacy laws in effect. If you would like to effectuate additional consumer rights requests, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
.
5.3.2 Categories of Data that Taboola May Hold about You
Taboola may have used or obtained your Personal Information with respect to our Services and Sites in accordance with the chart below.
Consumer/Data Subject Type
Category of Personal Information (PI)
Sources of PI
Purpose of Collection
Sources
Customers
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Please visit section 1.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 1.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Users
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 2.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 2.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
Site Visitors
Identifiers (e.g., unique personal identifier, Internet Protocol address)
Commercial Information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, considered)
Internet/online activity (e.g., browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement)
Geolocation Data (e.g., non-precise geolocation derived from IP address)
Professional information (e.g., employment information through one of Taboola’s general inquiry forms)
Inferences (e.g., profile created reflecting consumer’s preferences, characteristics, predispositions, behavior)
Please visit section 3.1 this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.2 and 4.1 of this Privacy Notice
Please visit section 3.3 and 4.2 of this Privacy Notice
We may disclose your Personal Information by allowing certain third parties (such as online advertising services, advertising networks, and social networks) to collect Personal Information via automated technologies on our websites for targeted advertising purposes. You have the right to opt out of these types of disclosures of your Personal Information.
We may sell or share for targeted advertising purposes, the following categories of personal information about you to online advertising services, advertising networks and social networks:
Commercial Information
Geolocation Data
Identifiers
Internet/Online Activity
Inferences
5.4 Notice to Individuals in Thailand
5.6.1 Data Controller
If you reside in Thailand, Taboola (Thailand) Limited will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.6.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Thailand, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.3 as “Thailand Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), we will make clear to you at the relevant time what those legitimate interests are.
5.6.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (ii) export your Personal Data, (iii) delete your Personal Data, and (iv) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
If you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.6.4 Thailand Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside of Thailand. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses.
As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Thailand, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Thailand Data is adequately protected when transferred outside of Thailand, the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 mandates that such transfers take place using certain legal mechanisms.
When transferring Thailand data elsewhere, Taboola relies on Standard Contractual Clauses, set forth by the European Commission, that outline contractual privacy and security commitments between companies that transfer personal data (for example, from Taboola (Thailand) Limited to Taboola, Inc.). Taboola, Inc. and its Affiliates have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.5 Notice to Individuals in Brazil
5.7.1 Data Controller
If you reside in the Federative Republic of Brazil (“Brazil”), Taboola Brasil Internet Ltda. will be the controller of your Personal Data provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services.
5.7.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from Brazil, under the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados federal law 13,709/2018 (the “LGPD”), our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above (also referred to in this Section 5.4 as “Brazil Data”) will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
If we ask you to provide Personal Data to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Data is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Data).
Similarly, if we collect and use your Personal Data in reliance on our legitimate interests (or those of any third party), a notice will be provided to you in our disclosure statement.
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Data, including if you would like to better understand how our legitimate interests to process your data are balanced against your data protection rights and freedoms, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.7.3 Your Rights to Your Personal Data
You have the right to request that Taboola (i) confirm whether we are processing your Personal Data, (ii) provide you with access to the Personal Data we hold about you, (iii) disclose the public and private entities with which we have shared use of your Personal Data, (iv) correct your Personal Data, (v) export your Personal Data, for your own use or use by another controller (vi) anonymize, block, or delete any unnecessary or excessive data, (vii) delete all your Personal Data, and (vii) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Data. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Data and behavioral information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Data, please visit Taboola’s
Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
Brazilian data subjects can file a complaint in relation to the LGPD with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (the “ANPD”). In the meantime, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Data, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher, at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.7.4. Brazil Data Transfers
Taboola transfers data outside Brazil. As part of Taboola’s global operations, our data flows among Brazil, the EEA, the United States, Israel, and Hong Kong. To ensure that Brazil Data is adequately protected when transferred outside Brazil, the LGPD mandates that such transfers take place using
certain legal mechanisms
. Taboola has in place an Inter Group Data Transfer Agreement across its international entities, which is based on the EEA’s standard model clauses, and which may be updated upon further guidance from the future ANPD.
Note: Taboola currently stores Customer, User, and Visitor Information in our data centers located in the United States and Israel.
5.6 Notice to Individuals within the People’s Republic of China (“PRC”)
5.8.1 Processing Entity and Designated Office
If you reside in the PRC, Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. will be the processing entity of your Personal Information provided to, collected by or for, or processed by Taboola in connection with our Services. Our designated office is located at Room 501i, Unit 501, 5F, No. 61 on East 3rd Middle Road, Chaoyang District, Beijing, China, and Taboola Information Technology Shanghai Co. Ltd. can be contacted at
support@taboola.com
.
5.8.2 Legal Basis for Processing Personal Information
If you are a Customer, Site Visitor, or User from the PRC, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Information described above (also referred to in this Section 5.5 as “PRC Data”) will depend on the Personal Information concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Information from you only (i) where we have your consent to do so, (ii) where we need the Personal Information to perform a contract with you, or (iii) where the processing is reasonable to support news reporting or the public interest. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Information from you or may otherwise need the Personal Information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. If we ask you to provide Personal Information to comply with a legal requirement or to perform a contract with you, we will make this clear at the relevant time and advise you whether the provision of your Personal Information is mandatory or not (as well as of the possible consequences if you do not provide your Personal Information).
If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your Personal Information, please contact us as specified in Section 6 below.
5.8.3 Your Rights to Your Information
You have the right to know about and make decisions about the processing of your Personal Information — this includes the right to restrict or refuse the processing of your Personal Information. You also have the right to request that Taboola (i) provide you with access to consult or copy the Personal Information we hold about you, (ii) correct or supplement your Personal Information, (iii) transfer or export your Personal Information, (iv) delete your Personal Information, and (v) cease or restrict processing of your Personal Information. If you are a User and would like to understand what Personal Information and behavioural information Taboola holds about you, specifically, and how you can exercise any of your rights with respect to your Personal Information, please visit
Taboola’s Data Subject Access Request Portal
. Customers may also submit a data subject access request by emailing us at
dpo@taboola.com
so that Taboola may either respond with the relevant information or, if applicable, direct this request to, and cooperate with, your employer to respond.
You have the right to complain to the relevant department performing duties of Personal Information protection. However, if you have any questions about our collection and use of your Personal Information, please first contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you are unable to obtain the information or resolution that you seek, you may also contact our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@taboola.com
.
5.8.4 PRC Data Transfers
To provide Taboola’s Services, Personal Information about individuals in the PRC is collected by a server in Hong Kong, and our data then flows between Hong Kong, Israel, the EEA, the UK, the United States, and Singapore. Taboola does not store any Personal Information in the PRC, and instead stores Customer, User, and Visitor information in our data centers located in Israel and the United States.
When Taboola transfers Personal Information about individuals in the PRC to Taboola.com Ltd. in Israel, it relies (as applicable) on standard contractual clauses as set forth by the European Commission. In particular, non-PRC Taboola Affiliates, like Taboola, Inc. in the United States, have accordingly adopted Standard Contractual Clauses to ensure the legality, privacy, and security of the data flows necessary to provide, maintain, and develop our services.
6. Data Broker Requirements
THE ENTITY MAINTAINING THIS WEBSITE IS A DATA BROKER UNDER TEXAS LAW. TO CONDUCT BUSINESS IN TEXAS, A DATA BROKER MUST REGISTER WITH THE TEXAS SECRETARY OF STATE (TEXAS SOS). INFORMATION ABOUT DATA BROKER REGISTRANTS IS AVAILABLE ON THE TEXAS SOS WEBSITE.
The entity maintaining this website is a data broker under Texas law. To conduct business in Texas, a data broker must register with the Texas Secretary of State (Texas SOS). Information about data broker registrants is available on the Texas SOS website.
7. Contact Us
If you have questions about the privacy aspects of our Sites or Services, please contact us at
support@taboola.com
. If you wish to receive this policy in an alternative format, please contact privacy@taboola.com.
The names and contact details of our Affiliates which may process your Personal Information in their capacity as data controllers, can be found here:
www.taboola.com/contact
.
Residents in Brazil, China, the European Economic Area (including the United Kingdom) and Thailand, if you wish to escalate your inquiry after contacting the support team, you are welcome to contact our Data Protection Officer, Leonie Power, FieldFisher at
dpo@taboola.com
.
8. Changes to This Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is current as of the Effective Date set forth above.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time, so please be sure to check back periodically. We will post any changes to this Privacy Policy on our Sites.
If we make any changes to this Privacy Policy that materially affect our practices with regard to the Information we have previously collected from you, we will endeavor to provide you with notice in advance of such change by highlighting the change on our Sites. We will seek your prior consent to any material changes, if and where this is required by applicable data protection laws.